
 
 
 
 Produced by Jana Srna, Marie Bartolo, Bryan Ness and the
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 (This book was produced from scanned images of public
 domain material from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 [Transcriber's Note: Italic text is denoted by _underscores_ and
 small-capped text by =equal signs=. Transliterations of Greek text are
 denoted by #number signs#.]
 
 
 
 
   NOVUM ORGANUM
 
 
   BY
   LORD BACON
 
 
   EDITED BY JOSEPH DEVEY, M.A.
 
 
   [Illustration: Publisher's logo]
 
 
   NEW YORK
   P. F. COLLIER & SON
   MCMII
   22
 
 
 
 
 SCIENCE
 
 
 
 
 NOVUM ORGANUM
 
 OR
 
 TRUE SUGGESTIONS FOR THE INTERPRETATION OF NATURE
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 They who have presumed to dogmatize on nature, as on some well
 investigated subject, either from self-conceit or arrogance, and in the
 professorial style, have inflicted the greatest injury on philosophy
 and learning. For they have tended to stifle and interrupt inquiry
 exactly in proportion as they have prevailed in bringing others to
 their opinion: and their own activity has not counterbalanced the
 mischief they have occasioned by corrupting and destroying that of
 others. They again who have entered upon a contrary course, and
 asserted that nothing whatever can be known, whether they have fallen
 into this opinion from their hatred of the ancient sophists, or from
 the hesitation of their minds, or from an exuberance of learning, have
 certainly adduced reasons for it which are by no means contemptible.
 They have not, however, derived their opinion from true sources,
 and, hurried on by their zeal and some affectation, have certainly
 exceeded due moderation. But the more ancient Greeks (whose writings
 have perished), held a more prudent mean, between the arrogance of
 dogmatism, and the despair of scepticism; and though too frequently
 intermingling complaints and indignation at the difficulty of inquiry,
 and the obscurity of things, and champing, as it were, the bit, have
 still persisted in pressing their point, and pursuing their intercourse
 with nature; thinking, as it seems, that the better method was not to
 dispute upon the very point of the possibility of anything being known,
 but to put it to the test of experience. Yet they themselves, by only
 employing the power of the understanding, have not adopted a fixed
 rule, but have laid their whole stress upon intense meditation, and a
 continual exercise and perpetual agitation of the mind.
 
 Our method, though difficult in its operation, is easily explained.
 It consists in determining the degrees of certainty, while we, as it
 were, restore the senses to their former rank, but generally reject
 that operation of the mind which follows close upon the senses, and
 open and establish a new and certain course for the mind from the first
 actual perceptions of the senses themselves. This, no doubt, was the
 view taken by those who have assigned so much to logic; showing clearly
 thereby that they sought some support for the mind, and suspected its
 natural and spontaneous mode of action. But this is now employed too
 late as a remedy, when all is clearly lost, and after the mind, by
 the daily habit and intercourse of life, has come prepossessed with
 corrupted doctrines, and filled with the vainest idols. The art of
 logic therefore being (as we have mentioned), too late a precaution,[1]
 and in no way remedying the matter, has tended more to confirm errors,
 than to disclose truth. Our only remaining hope and salvation is to
 begin the whole labor of the mind again; not leaving it to itself,
 but directing it perpetually from the very first, and attaining our
 end as it were by mechanical aid. If men, for instance, had attempted
 mechanical labors with their hands alone, and without the power and aid
 of instruments, as they have not hesitated to carry on the labors of
 their understanding with the unaided efforts of their mind, they would
 have been able to move and overcome but little, though they had exerted
 their utmost and united powers. And just to pause awhile on this
 comparison, and look into it as a mirror; let us ask, if any obelisk of
 a remarkable size were perchance required to be moved, for the purpose
 of gracing a triumph or any similar pageant, and men were to attempt it
 with their bare hands, would not any sober spectator avow it to be an
 act of the greatest madness? And if they should increase the number of
 workmen, and imagine that they could thus succeed, would he not think
 so still more? But if they chose to make a selection, and to remove
 the weak, and only employ the strong and vigorous, thinking by this
 means, at any rate, to achieve their object, would he not say that they
 were more fondly deranged? Nay, if not content with this, they were
 to determine on consulting the athletic art, and were to give orders
 for all to appear with their hands, arms, and muscles regularly oiled
 and prepared, would he not exclaim that they were taking pains to rave
 by method and design? Yet men are hurried on with the same senseless
 energy and useless combination in intellectual matters, as long as
 they expect great results either from the number and agreement, or the
 excellence and acuteness of their wits; or even strengthen their minds
 with logic, which may be considered as an athletic preparation, but yet
 do not desist (if we rightly consider the matter) from applying their
 own understandings merely with all this zeal and effort. While nothing
 is more clear, than that in every great work executed by the hand of
 man without machines or implements, it is impossible for the strength
 of individuals to be increased, or for that of the multitude to combine.
 
 Having premised so much, we lay down two points on which we would
 admonish mankind, lest they should fail to see or to observe them. The
 first of these is, that it is our good fortune (as we consider it), for
 the sake of extinguishing and removing contradiction and irritation of
 mind, to leave the honor and reverence due to the ancients untouched
 and undiminished, so that we can perform our intended work, and yet
 enjoy the benefit of our respectful moderation. For if we should
 profess to offer something better than the ancients, and yet should
 pursue the same course as they have done, we could never, by any
 artifice, contrive to avoid the imputation of having engaged in a
 contest or rivalry as to our respective wits, excellences, or talents;
 which, though neither inadmissible nor new (for why should we not blame
 and point out anything that is imperfectly discovered or laid down by
 them, of our own right, a right common to all?), yet however just and
 allowable, would perhaps be scarcely an equal match, on account of
 the disproportion of our strength. But since our present plan leads
 up to open an entirely different course to the understanding, and one
 unattempted and unknown to them, the case is altered. There is an end
 to party zeal, and we only take upon ourselves the character of a
 guide, which requires a moderate share of authority and good fortune,
 rather than talents and excellence. The first admonition relates to
 persons, the next to things.
 
 We make no attempt to disturb the system of philosophy that now
 prevails, or any other which may or will exist, either more correct or
 more complete. For we deny not that the received system of philosophy,
 and others of a similar nature, encourage discussion, embellish
 harangues, are employed, and are of service in the duties of the
 professor, and the affairs of civil life. Nay, we openly express and
 declare that the philosophy we offer will not be very useful in such
 respects. It is not obvious, nor to be understood in a cursory view,
 nor does it flatter the mind in its preconceived notions, nor will
 it descend to the level of the generality of mankind unless by its
 advantages and effects.
 
 Let there exist then (and may it be of advantage to both), two sources,
 and two distributions of learning, and in like manner two tribes, and
 as it were kindred families of contemplators or philosophers, without
 any hostility or alienation between them; but rather allied and united
 by mutual assistance. Let there be in short one method of cultivating
 the sciences, and another of discovering them. And as for those who
 prefer and more readily receive the former, on account of their haste
 or from motives arising from their ordinary life, or because they
 are unable from weakness of mind to comprehend and embrace the other
 (which must necessarily be the case with by far the greater number),
 let us wish that they may prosper as they desire in their undertaking,
 and attain what they pursue. But if any individual desire, and is
 anxious not merely to adhere to, and make use of present discoveries,
 but to penetrate still further, and not to overcome his adversaries
 in disputes, but nature by labor, not in short to give elegant and
 specious opinions, but to know to a certainty and demonstration, let
 him, as a true son of science (if such be his wish), join with us; that
 when he has left the antechambers of nature trodden by the multitude,
 an entrance may at last be discovered to her inner apartments. And
 in order to be better understood, and to render our meaning more
 familiar by assigning determinate names, we have accustomed ourselves
 to call the one method the anticipation of the mind, and the other the
 interpretation of nature.
 
 We have still one request left. We have at least reflected and taken
 pains in order to render our propositions not only true, but of easy
 and familiar access to men's minds, however wonderfully prepossessed
 and limited. Yet it is but just that we should obtain this favor from
 mankind (especially in so great a restoration of learning and the
 sciences), that whosoever may be desirous of forming any determination
 upon an opinion of this our work either from his own perceptions, or
 the crowd of authorities, or the forms of demonstrations, he will not
 expect to be able to do so in a cursory manner, and while attending
 to other matters; but in order to have a thorough knowledge of the
 subject, will himself by degrees attempt the course which we describe
 and maintain; will be accustomed to the subtilty of things which is
 manifested by experience; and will correct the depraved and deeply
 rooted habits of his mind by a seasonable, and, as it were, just
 hesitation: and then, finally (if he will), use his judgment when he
 has begun to be master of himself.
 
 
 FOOTNOTE
 
 [1] Because it was idle to draw a logical conclusion from false
 principles, error being propagated as much by false premises, which
 logic does not pretend to examine, as by illegitimate inference. Hence,
 as Bacon says further on, men being easily led to confound legitimate
 inference with truth, were confirmed in their errors by the very
 subtilty of their genius.--_Ed._
 
 
 
 
 APHORISMS--BOOK I
 
 ON THE INTERPRETATION OF NATURE AND THE EMPIRE OF MAN
 
 
 I. Man, as the minister and interpreter of nature, does and understands
 as much as his observations on the order of nature, either with regard
 to things or the mind, permit him, and neither knows nor is capable of
 more.
 
 II. The unassisted hand and the understanding left to itself possess
 but little power. Effects are produced by the means of instruments and
 helps, which the understanding requires no less than the hand; and as
 instruments either promote or regulate the motion of the hand, so those
 that are applied to the mind prompt or protect the understanding.
 
 III. Knowledge and human power are synonymous, since the ignorance
 of the cause frustrates the effect; for nature is only subdued by
 submission, and that which in contemplative philosophy corresponds with
 the cause in practical science becomes the rule.
 
 IV. Man while operating can only apply or withdraw natural bodies;
 nature internally performs the rest.
 
 V. Those who become practically versed in nature are, the mechanic, the
 mathematician, the physician, the alchemist, and the _magician_,[2] but
 all (as matters now stand) with faint efforts and meagre success.
 
 VI. It would be madness and inconsistency to suppose that things which
 have never yet been performed can be performed without employing some
 hitherto untried means.
 
 VII. The creations of the mind and hand appear very numerous, if we
 judge by books and manufactures; but all that variety consists of
 an excessive refinement, and of deductions from a few well known
 matters--_not of a number of axioms_.[3]
 
 VIII. Even the effects already discovered are due to chance and
 experiment rather than to the sciences; for our present sciences are
 nothing more than peculiar arrangements of matters already discovered,
 and not methods for discovery or plans for new operations.
 
 IX. The sole cause and root of almost every defect in the sciences is
 this, that while we falsely admire and extol the powers of the human
 mind, we do not search for its real helps.
 
 X. The subtilty of nature is far beyond that of sense or of the
 understanding: so that the specious meditations, speculations, and
 theories of mankind are but a kind of insanity, only there is no one to
 stand by and observe it.
 
 XI. As the present sciences are useless for the discovery of effects,
 so the present system of logic[4] is useless for the discovery of the
 sciences.
 
 XII. The present system of logic rather assists in confirming and
 rendering inveterate the errors founded on vulgar notions than in
 searching after truth, and is therefore more hurtful than useful.
 
 XIII. The syllogism is not applied to the principles of the sciences,
 and is of no avail in intermediate axioms,[5] as being very unequal to
 the subtilty of nature. It forces assent, therefore, and not things.
 
 XIV. The syllogism consists of propositions; propositions of words;
 words are the signs of notions. If, therefore, the notions (which form
 the basis of the whole) be confused and carelessly abstracted from
 things, there is no solidity in the superstructure. Our only hope,
 then, is in genuine induction.
 
 XV. We have no sound notions either in logic or physics; substance,
 quality, action, passion, and existence are not clear notions; much
 less weight, levity, density, tenuity, moisture, dryness, generation,
 corruption, attraction, repulsion, element, matter, form, and the
 like. They are all fantastical and ill-defined.
 
 XVI. The notions of less abstract natures, as man, dog, dove, and the
 immediate perceptions of sense, as heat, cold, white, black, do not
 deceive us materially, yet even these are sometimes confused by the
 mutability of matter and the intermixture of things. All the rest which
 men have hitherto employed are errors, and improperly abstracted and
 deduced from things.
 
 XVII. There is the same degree of licentiousness and error in forming
 axioms as in abstracting notions, and that in the first principles,
 which depend on common induction; still more is this the case in axioms
 and inferior propositions derived from syllogisms.
 
 XVIII. The present discoveries in science are such as lie immediately
 beneath the surface of common notions. It is necessary, however, to
 penetrate the more secret and remote parts of nature, in order to
 abstract both notions and axioms from things by a more certain and
 guarded method.
 
 XIX. There are and can exist but two ways of investigating and
 discovering truth. The one hurries on rapidly from the senses and
 particulars to the most general axioms, and from them, as principles
 and their supposed indisputable truth, derives and discovers the
 intermediate axioms. This is the way now in use. The other constructs
 its axioms from the senses and particulars, by ascending continually
 and gradually, till it finally arrives at the most general axioms,
 which is the true but unattempted way.
 
 XX. The understanding when left to itself proceeds by the same way as
 that which it would have adopted under the guidance of logic, namely,
 the first; for the mind is fond of starting off to generalities, that
 it may avoid labor, and after dwelling a little on a subject is
 fatigued by experiment. But those evils are augmented by logic, for the
 sake of the ostentation of dispute.
 
 XXI. The understanding, when left to itself in a man of a steady,
 patient, and reflecting disposition (especially when unimpeded by
 received doctrines), makes some attempt in the right way, but with
 little effect, since the understanding, undirected and unassisted,
 is unequal to and unfit for the task of vanquishing the obscurity of
 things.
 
 XXII. Each of these two ways begins from the senses and particulars,
 and ends in the greatest generalities. But they are immeasurably
 different; for the one merely touches cursorily the limits of
 experiment and particulars, while the other runs duly and regularly
 through them--the one from the very outset lays down some abstract and
 useless generalities, the other gradually rises to those principles
 which are really the most common in nature.[6]
 
 XXIII. There is no small difference between the idols of the human mind
 and the ideas of the Divine mind--that is to say, between certain idle
 dogmas and the real stamp and impression of created objects, as they
 are found in nature.
 
 XXIV. Axioms determined upon in argument can never assist in the
 discovery of new effects; for the subtilty of nature is vastly superior
 to that of argument. But axioms properly and regularly abstracted from
 particulars easily point out and define new particulars, and therefore
 impart activity to the sciences.
 
 XXV. The axioms now in use are derived from a scanty handful, as it
 were, of experience, and a few particulars of frequent occurrence,
 whence they are of much the same dimensions or extent as their origin.
 And if any neglected or unknown instance occurs, the axiom is saved by
 some frivolous distinction, when it would be more consistent with truth
 to amend it.
 
 XXVI. We are wont, for the sake of distinction, to call that human
 reasoning which we apply to nature the anticipation of nature (as being
 rash and premature), and that which is properly deduced from things the
 interpretation of nature.
 
 XXVII. Anticipations are sufficiently powerful in producing unanimity,
 for if men were all to become even uniformly mad, they might agree
 tolerably well with each other.
 
 XXVIII. Anticipations again, will be assented to much more readily
 than interpretations, because being deduced from a few instances, and
 these principally of familiar occurrence, they immediately hit the
 understanding and satisfy the imagination; while, on the contrary,
 interpretations, being deduced from various subjects, and these widely
 dispersed, cannot suddenly strike the understanding, so that in common
 estimation they must appear difficult and discordant, and almost like
 the mysteries of faith.
 
 XXIX. In sciences founded on opinions and dogmas, it is right to make
 use of anticipations and logic if you wish to force assent rather than
 things.
 
 XXX. If all the capacities of all ages should unite and combine and
 transmit their labors, no great progress will be made in learning
 by anticipations, because the radical errors, and those which occur
 in the first process of the mind, are not cured by the excellence of
 subsequent means and remedies.
 
 XXXI. It is in vain to expect any great progress in the sciences by the
 superinducing or ingrafting new matters upon old. An instauration must
 be made from the very foundations, if we do not wish to revolve forever
 in a circle, making only some slight and contemptible progress.
 
 XXXII. The ancient authors and all others are left in undisputed
 possession of their honors; for we enter into no comparison of capacity
 or talent, but of method, and assume the part of a guide rather than of
 a critic.
 
 XXXIII. To speak plainly, no correct judgment can be formed either of
 our method or its discoveries by those anticipations which are now in
 common use; for it is not to be required of us to submit ourselves to
 the judgment of the very method we ourselves arraign.
 
 XXXIV. Nor is it an easy matter to deliver and explain our sentiments;
 for those things which are in themselves new can yet be only understood
 from some analogy to what is old.
 
 XXXV. Alexander Borgia[7] said of the expedition of the French into
 Italy that they came with chalk in their hands to mark up their
 lodgings, and not with weapons to force their passage. Even so do we
 wish our philosophy to make its way quietly into those minds that are
 fit for it, and of good capacity; for we have no need of contention
 where we differ in first principles, and in our very notions, and even
 in our forms of demonstration.
 
 XXXVI. We have but one simple method of delivering our sentiments,
 namely, we must bring men to particulars and their regular series and
 order, and they must for a while renounce their notions, and begin to
 form an acquaintance with things.
 
 XXXVII. Our method and that of the sceptics[8] agree in some respects
 at first setting out, but differ most widely, and are completely
 opposed to each other in their conclusion; for they roundly assert that
 nothing can be known; we, that but a small part of nature can be known,
 by the present method; their next step, however, is to destroy the
 authority of the senses and understanding, while we invent and supply
 them with assistance.
 
 XXXVIII. The idols and false notions which have already preoccupied the
 human understanding, and are deeply rooted in it, not only so beset
 men's minds that they become difficult of access, but even when access
 is obtained will again meet and trouble us in the instauration of the
 sciences, unless mankind when forewarned guard themselves with all
 possible care against them.
 
 XXXIX. Four species of idols beset the human mind,[9] to which (for
 distinction's sake) we have assigned names, calling the first Idols of
 the Tribe, the second Idols of the Den, the third Idols of the Market,
 the fourth Idols of the Theatre.
 
 XL. The formation of notions and axioms on the foundation of true
 induction is the only fitting remedy by which we can ward off and expel
 these idols. It is, however, of great service to point them out; for
 the doctrine of idols bears the same relation to the interpretation of
 nature as that of the confutation of sophisms does to common logic.[10]
 
 XLI. The idols of the tribe are inherent in human nature and the very
 tribe or race of man; for man's sense is falsely asserted to be the
 standard of things; on the contrary, all the perceptions both of the
 senses and the mind bear reference to man and not to the universe,
 and the human mind resembles those uneven mirrors which impart their
 own properties to different objects, from which rays are emitted and
 distort and disfigure them.[11]
 
 XLII. The idols of the den are those of each individual; for everybody
 (in addition to the errors common to the race of man) has his own
 individual den or cavern, which intercepts and corrupts the light of
 nature, either from his own peculiar and singular disposition, or from
 his education and intercourse with others, or from his reading, and
 the authority acquired by those whom he reverences and admires, or
 from the different impressions produced on the mind, as it happens to
 be preoccupied and predisposed, or equable and tranquil, and the like;
 so that the spirit of man (according to its several dispositions), is
 variable, confused, and as it were actuated by chance; and Heraclitus
 said well that men search for knowledge in lesser worlds, and not in
 the greater or common world.
 
 XLIII. There are also idols formed by the reciprocal intercourse and
 society of man with man, which we call idols of the market, from the
 commerce and association of men with each other; for men converse by
 means of language, but words are formed at the will of the generality,
 and there arises from a bad and unapt formation of words a wonderful
 obstruction to the mind. Nor can the definitions and explanations with
 which learned men are wont to guard and protect themselves in some
 instances afford a complete remedy--words still manifestly force the
 understanding, throw everything into confusion, and lead mankind into
 vain and innumerable controversies and fallacies.
 
 XLIV. Lastly, there are idols which have crept into men's minds from
 the various dogmas of peculiar systems of philosophy, and also from the
 perverted rules of demonstration, and these we denominate idols of the
 theatre: for we regard all the systems of philosophy hitherto received
 or imagined, as so many plays brought out and performed, creating
 fictitious and theatrical worlds. Nor do we speak only of the present
 systems, or of the philosophy and sects of the ancients, since numerous
 other plays of a similar nature can be still composed and made to agree
 with each other, the causes of the most opposite errors being generally
 the same. Nor, again, do we allude merely to general systems, but also
 to many elements and axioms of sciences which have become inveterate by
 tradition, implicit credence, and neglect. We must, however, discuss
 each species of idols more fully and distinctly in order to guard the
 human understanding against them.
 
 XLV. The human understanding, from its peculiar nature, easily supposes
 a greater degree of order and equality in things than it really finds;
 and although many things in nature be _sui generis_ and most irregular,
 will yet invent parallels and conjugates and relatives, where no
 such thing is. Hence the fiction, that all celestial bodies move in
 perfect circles, thus rejecting entirely spiral and serpentine lines
 (except as explanatory terms).[12] Hence also the element of fire
 is introduced with its peculiar orbit,[13] to keep square with those
 other three which are objects of our senses. The relative rarity of the
 elements (as they are called) is arbitrarily made to vary in tenfold
 progression, with many other dreams of the like nature.[14] Nor is this
 folly confined to theories, but it is to be met with even in simple
 notions.
 
 XLVI. The human understanding, when any proposition has been once
 laid down (either from general admission and belief, or from the
 pleasure it affords), forces everything else to add fresh support and
 confirmation; and although most cogent and abundant instances may
 exist to the contrary, yet either does not observe or despises them,
 or gets rid of and rejects them by some distinction, with violent
 and injurious prejudice, rather than sacrifice the authority of its
 first conclusions. It was well answered by him[15] who was shown in a
 temple the votive tablets suspended by such as had escaped the peril of
 shipwreck, and was pressed as to whether he would then recognize the
 power of the gods, by an inquiry, But where are the portraits of those
 who have perished in spite of their vows? All superstition is much
 the same, whether it be that of astrology, dreams, omens, retributive
 judgment, or the like, in all of which the deluded believers observe
 events which are fulfilled, but neglect and pass over their failure,
 though it be much more common. But this evil insinuates itself still
 more craftily in philosophy and the sciences, in which a settled maxim
 vitiates and governs every other circumstance, though the latter be
 much more worthy of confidence. Besides, even in the absence of that
 eagerness and want of thought (which we have mentioned), it is the
 peculiar and perpetual error of the human understanding to be more
 moved and excited by affirmatives than negatives, whereas it ought duly
 and regularly to be impartial; nay, in establishing any true axiom the
 negative instance is the most powerful.
 
 XLVII. The human understanding is most excited by that which strikes
 and enters the mind at once and suddenly, and by which the imagination
 is immediately filled and inflated. It then begins almost imperceptibly
 to conceive and suppose that everything is similar to the few objects
 which have taken possession of the mind, while it is very slow and
 unfit for the transition to the remote and heterogeneous instances by
 which axioms are tried as by fire, unless the office be imposed upon it
 by severe regulations and a powerful authority.
 
 XLVIII. The human understanding is active and cannot halt or rest, but
 even, though without effect, still presses forward. Thus we cannot
 conceive of any end or external boundary of the world, and it seems
 necessarily to occur to us that there must be something beyond. Nor can
 we imagine how eternity has flowed on down to the present day, since
 the usually received distinction of an infinity, a parte ante and a
 parte post,[16] cannot hold good; for it would thence follow that one
 infinity is greater than another, and also that infinity is wasting
 away and tending to an end. There is the same difficulty in considering
 the infinite divisibility of lines, arising from the weakness of our
 minds, which weakness interferes to still greater disadvantage with the
 discovery of causes; for although the greatest generalities in nature
 must be positive, just as they are found, and in fact not causable,
 yet the human understanding, incapable of resting, seeks for something
 more intelligible. Thus, however, while aiming at further progress, it
 falls back to what is actually less advanced, namely, final causes;
 for they are clearly more allied to man's own nature, than the system
 of the universe, and from this source they have wonderfully corrupted
 philosophy. But he would be an unskilful and shallow philosopher who
 should seek for causes in the greatest generalities, and not be
 anxious to discover them in subordinate objects.
 
 XLIX. The human understanding resembles not a dry light, but admits
 a tincture of the will[17] and passions, which generate their own
 system accordingly; for man always believes more readily that which
 he prefers. He, therefore, rejects difficulties for want of patience
 in investigation; sobriety, because it limits his hope; the depths of
 nature, from superstition; the light of experiment, from arrogance
 and pride, lest his mind should appear to be occupied with common
 and varying objects; paradoxes, from a fear of the opinion of the
 vulgar; in short, his feelings imbue and corrupt his understanding in
 innumerable and sometimes imperceptible ways.
 
 L. But by far the greatest impediment and aberration of the human
 understanding proceeds from the dulness, incompetence, and errors
 of the senses; since whatever strikes the senses preponderates over
 everything, however superior, which does not immediately strike them.
 Hence contemplation mostly ceases with sight, and a very scanty, or
 perhaps no regard is paid to invisible objects. The entire operation,
 therefore, of spirits inclosed in tangible bodies[18] is concealed,
 and escapes us. All that more delicate change of formation in the
 parts of coarser substances (vulgarly called alteration, but in fact
 a change of position in the smallest particles) is equally unknown;
 and yet, unless the two matters we have mentioned be explored and
 brought to light, no great effect can be produced in nature. Again,
 the very nature of common air, and all bodies of less density (of
 which there are many) is almost unknown; for the senses are weak and
 erring, nor can instruments be of great use in extending their sphere
 or acuteness--all the better interpretations of nature are worked out
 by instances, and fit and apt experiments, where the senses only judge
 of the experiment, the experiment of nature and the thing itself.
 
 LI. The human understanding is, by its own nature, prone to
 abstraction, and supposes that which is fluctuating to be fixed. But
 it is better to dissect than abstract nature: such was the method
 employed by the school of Democritus,[19] which made greater progress
 in penetrating nature than the rest. It is best to consider matter, its
 conformation, and the changes of that conformation, its own action,[20]
 and the law of this action or motion; for forms are a mere fiction
 of the human mind, unless you will call the laws of action by that
 name.[21]
 
 LII. Such are the idols of the tribe, which arise either from the
 uniformity of the constitution of man's spirit, or its prejudices, or
 its limited faculties or restless agitation, or from the interference
 of the passions, or the incompetence of the senses, or the mode of
 their impressions.
 
 LIII. The idols of the den derive their origin from the peculiar nature
 of each individual's mind and body, and also from education, habit, and
 accident; and although they be various and manifold, yet we will treat
 of some that require the greatest caution, and exert the greatest power
 in polluting the understanding.
 
 LIV. Some men become attached to particular sciences and
 contemplations, either from supposing themselves the authors and
 inventors of them, or from having bestowed the greatest pains upon
 such subjects, and thus become most habituated to them.[22] If men of
 this description apply themselves to philosophy and contemplations of
 a universal nature, they wrest and corrupt them by their preconceived
 fancies, of which Aristotle affords us a single instance, who made
 his natural philosophy completely subservient to his logic, and thus
 rendered it little more than useless and disputatious. The chemists,
 again, have formed a fanciful philosophy with the most confined views,
 from a few experiments of the furnace. Gilbert,[23] too, having
 employed himself most assiduously in the consideration of the magnet,
 immediately established a system of philosophy to coincide with his
 favorite pursuit.
 
 LV. The greatest and, perhaps, radical distinction between different
 men's dispositions for philosophy and the sciences is this, that
 some are more vigorous and active in observing the differences of
 things, others in observing their resemblances; for a steady and acute
 disposition can fix its thoughts, and dwell upon and adhere to a point,
 through all the refinements of differences, but those that are sublime
 and discursive recognize and compare even the most delicate and general
 resemblances; each of them readily falls into excess, by catching
 either at nice distinctions or shadows of resemblance.
 
 LVI. Some dispositions evince an unbounded admiration of antiquity,
 others eagerly embrace novelty, and but few can preserve the just
 medium, so as neither to tear up what the ancients have correctly laid
 down, nor to despise the just innovations of the moderns. But this
 is very prejudicial to the sciences and philosophy, and instead of a
 correct judgment we have but the factions of the ancients and moderns.
 Truth is not to be sought in the good fortune of any particular
 conjuncture of time, which is uncertain, but in the light of nature
 and experience, which is eternal. Such factions, therefore, are to be
 abjured, and the understanding must not allow them to hurry it on to
 assent.
 
 LVII. The contemplation of nature and of bodies in their individual
 form distracts and weakens the understanding; but the contemplation
 of nature and of bodies in their general composition and formation
 stupefies and relaxes it. We have a good instance of this in the school
 of Leucippus and Democritus compared with others, for they applied
 themselves so much to particulars as almost to neglect the general
 structure of things, while the others were so astounded while gazing
 on the structure that they did not penetrate the simplicity of nature.
 These two species of contemplation must, therefore, be interchanged,
 and each employed in its turn, in order to render the understanding at
 once penetrating and capacious, and to avoid the inconveniences we have
 mentioned, and the idols that result from them.
 
 LVIII. Let such, therefore, be our precautions in contemplation, that
 we may ward off and expel the idols of the den, which mostly owe their
 birth either to some predominant pursuit, or, secondly, to an excess
 in synthesis and analysis, or, thirdly, to a party zeal in favor
 of certain ages, or, fourthly, to the extent or narrowness of the
 subject. In general, he who contemplates nature should suspect whatever
 particularly takes and fixes his understanding, and should use so much
 the more caution to preserve it equable and unprejudiced.
 
 LIX. The idols of the market are the most troublesome of all, those
 namely which have entwined themselves round the understanding from the
 associations of words and names. For men imagine that their reason
 governs words, while, in fact, words react upon the understanding; and
 this has rendered philosophy and the sciences sophistical and inactive.
 Words are generally formed in a popular sense, and define things by
 those broad lines which are most obvious to the vulgar mind; but when
 a more acute understanding or more diligent observation is anxious to
 vary those lines, and to adapt them more accurately to nature, words
 oppose it. Hence the great and solemn disputes of learned men often
 terminate in controversies about words and names, in regard to which it
 would be better (imitating the caution of mathematicians) to proceed
 more advisedly in the first instance, and to bring such disputes to
 a regular issue by definitions. Such definitions, however, cannot
 remedy the evil in natural and material objects, because they consist
 themselves of words, and these words produce others;[24] so that we
 must necessarily have recourse to particular instances, and their
 regular series and arrangement, as we shall mention when we come to
 the mode and scheme of determining notions and axioms.
 
 LX. The idols imposed upon the understanding by words are of two
 kinds. They are either the names of things which have no existence
 (for as some objects are from inattention left without a name, so
 names are formed by fanciful imaginations which are without an
 object), or they are the names of actual objects, but confused, badly
 defined, and hastily and irregularly abstracted from things. Fortune,
 the _primum mobile_, the planetary orbits,[25] the element of fire,
 and the like fictions, which owe their birth to futile and false
 theories, are instances of the first kind. And this species of idols
 is removed with greater facility, because it can be exterminated by
 the constant refutation or the desuetude of the theories themselves.
 The others, which are created by vicious and unskilful abstraction,
 are intricate and deeply rooted. Take some word, for instance, as
 moist, and let us examine how far the different significations of this
 word are consistent. It will be found that the word moist is nothing
 but a confused sign of different actions admitted of no settled and
 defined uniformity. For it means that which easily diffuses itself
 over another body; that which is indeterminable and cannot be brought
 to a consistency; that which yields easily in every direction; that
 which is easily divided and dispersed; that which is easily united and
 collected; that which easily flows and is put in motion; that which
 easily adheres to, and wets another body; that which is easily reduced
 to a liquid state though previously solid. When, therefore, you come
 to predicate or impose this name, in one sense flame is moist, in
 another air is not moist, in another fine powder is moist, in another
 glass is moist; so that it is quite clear that this notion is hastily
 abstracted from water only, and common ordinary liquors, without any
 due verification of it.
 
 There are, however, different degrees of distortion and mistake
 in words. One of the least faulty classes is that of the names of
 substances, particularly of the less abstract and more defined species
 (those then of chalk and mud are good, of earth bad); words signifying
 actions are more faulty, as to generate, to corrupt, to change; but the
 most faulty are those denoting qualities (except the immediate objects
 of sense), as heavy, light, rare, dense. Yet in all of these there must
 be some notions a little better than others, in proportion as a greater
 or less number of things come before the senses.
 
 LXI. The idols of the theatre are not innate, nor do they introduce
 themselves secretly into the understanding, but they are manifestly
 instilled and cherished by the fictions of theories and depraved rules
 of demonstration. To attempt, however, or undertake their confutation
 would not be consistent with our declarations. For since we neither
 agree in our principles nor our demonstrations, all argument is out
 of the question. And it is fortunate that the ancients are left in
 possession of their honors. We detract nothing from them, seeing our
 whole doctrine relates only to the path to be pursued. The lame (as
 they say) in the path outstrip the swift who wander from it, and it
 is clear that the very skill and swiftness of him who runs not in the
 right direction must increase his aberration.
 
 Our method of discovering the sciences is such as to leave little to
 the acuteness and strength of wit, and indeed rather to level wit and
 intellect. For as in the drawing of a straight line, or accurate circle
 by the hand, much depends on its steadiness and practice, but if a
 ruler or compass be employed there is little occasion for either; so
 it is with our method. Although, however, we enter into no individual
 confutations, yet a little must be said, first, of the sects and
 general divisions of these species of theories; secondly, something
 further to show that there are external signs of their weakness; and,
 lastly, we must consider the causes of so great a misfortune, and so
 long and general a unanimity in error, that we may thus render the
 access to truth less difficult, and that the human understanding may
 the more readily be purified, and brought to dismiss its idols.
 
 LXII. The idols of the theatre, or of theories, are numerous, and may,
 and perhaps will, be still more so. For unless men's minds had been now
 occupied for many ages in religious and theological considerations, and
 civil governments (especially monarchies), had been averse to novelties
 of that nature even in theory (so that men must apply to them with some
 risk and injury to their own fortunes, and not only without reward,
 but subject to contumely and envy), there is no doubt that many other
 sects of philosophers and theorists would have been introduced, like
 those which formerly flourished in such diversified abundance among the
 Greeks. For as many imaginary theories of the heavens can be deduced
 from the phenomena of the sky, so it is even more easy to found many
 dogmas upon the phenomena of philosophy--and the plot of this our
 theatre resembles those of the poetical, where the plots which are
 invented for the stage are more consistent, elegant, and pleasurable
 than those taken from real history.
 
 In general, men take for the groundwork of their philosophy either
 too much from a few topics, or too little from many; in either case
 their philosophy is founded on too narrow a basis of experiment and
 natural history, and decides on too scanty grounds. For the theoretic
 philosopher seizes various common circumstances by experiment, without
 reducing them to certainty or examining and frequently considering
 them, and relies for the rest upon meditation and the activity of his
 wit.
 
 There are other philosophers who have diligently and accurately
 attended to a few experiments, and have thence presumed to deduce and
 invent systems of philosophy, forming everything to conformity with
 them.
 
 A third set, from their faith and religious veneration, introduce
 theology and traditions; the absurdity of some among them having
 proceeded so far as to seek and derive the sciences from spirits and
 genii. There are, therefore, three sources of error and three species
 of false philosophy; the sophistic, empiric, and superstitious.
 
 LXIII. Aristotle affords the most eminent instance of the first; for
 he corrupted natural philosophy by logic--thus he formed the world of
 categories, assigned to the human soul, the noblest of substances, a
 genus determined by words of secondary operation, treated of density
 and rarity (by which bodies occupy a greater or lesser space), by the
 frigid distinctions of action and power, asserted that there was a
 peculiar and proper motion in all bodies, and that if they shared
 in any other motion, it was owing to an external moving cause, and
 imposed innumerable arbitrary distinctions upon the nature of things;
 being everywhere more anxious as to definitions in teaching and the
 accuracy of the wording of his propositions, than the internal truth
 of things. And this is best shown by a comparison of his philosophy
 with the others of greatest repute among the Greeks. For the similar
 parts of Anaxagoras, the atoms of Leucippus and Democritus, the heaven
 and earth of Parmenides, the discord and concord of Empedocles,[26]
 the resolution of bodies into the common nature of fire, and their
 condensation according to Heraclitus, exhibit some sprinkling of
 natural philosophy, the nature of things, and experiment; while
 Aristotle's physics are mere logical terms, and he remodelled the
 same subject in his metaphysics under a more imposing title, and more
 as a realist than a nominalist. Nor is much stress to be laid on his
 frequent recourse to experiment in his books on animals, his problems,
 and other treatises; for he had already decided, without having
 properly consulted experience as the basis of his decisions and axioms,
 and after having so decided, he drags experiment along as a captive
 constrained to accommodate herself to his decisions: so that he is even
 more to be blamed than his modern followers (of the scholastic school)
 who have deserted her altogether.
 
 LXIV. The empiric school produces dogmas of a more deformed and
 monstrous nature than the sophistic or theoretic school; not being
 founded in the light of common notions (which, however poor and
 superstitious, is yet in a manner universal, and of a general
 tendency), but in the confined obscurity of a few experiments. Hence
 this species of philosophy appears probable, and almost certain to
 those who are daily practiced in such experiments, and have thus
 corrupted their imagination, but incredible and futile to others. We
 have a strong instance of this in the alchemists and their dogmas; it
 would be difficult to find another in this age, unless perhaps in the
 philosophy of Gilbert.[27] We could not, however, neglect to caution
 others against this school, because we already foresee and augur, that
 if men be hereafter induced by our exhortations to apply seriously
 to experiments (bidding farewell to the sophistic doctrines), there
 will then be imminent danger from empirics, owing to the premature
 and forward haste of the understanding, and its jumping or flying to
 generalities and the principles of things. We ought, therefore, already
 to meet the evil.
 
 LXV. The corruption of philosophy by the mixing of it up with
 superstition and theology, is of a much wider extent, and is
 most injurious to it both as a whole and in parts. For the human
 understanding is no less exposed to the impressions of fancy, than to
 those of vulgar notions. The disputatious and sophistic school entraps
 the understanding, while the fanciful, bombastic, and, as it were,
 poetical school, rather flatters it.
 
 There is a clear example of this among the Greeks, especially in
 Pythagoras, where, however, the superstition is coarse and overcharged,
 but it is more dangerous and refined in Plato and his school. This
 evil is found also in some branches of other systems of philosophy,
 where it introduces abstracted forms, final and first causes, omitting
 frequently the intermediate and the like. Against it we must use the
 greatest caution; for the apotheosis of error is the greatest evil
 of all, and when folly is worshipped, it is, as it were, a plague
 spot upon the understanding. Yet some of the moderns have indulged
 this folly with such consummate inconsiderateness, that they have
 endeavored to build a system of natural philosophy on the first chapter
 of Genesis, the book of Job, and other parts of Scripture; seeking
 thus the dead among the living.[28] And this folly is the more to be
 prevented and restrained, because not only fantastical philosophy, but
 heretical religion spring from the absurd mixture of matters divine
 and human. It is therefore most wise soberly to render unto faith the
 things that are faith's.
 
 LXVI. Having spoken of the vicious authority of the systems founded
 either on vulgar notions, or on a few experiments, or on superstition,
 we must now consider the faulty subjects for contemplation, especially
 in natural philosophy. The human understanding is perverted by
 observing the power of mechanical arts, in which bodies are very
 materially changed by composition or separation, and is induced to
 suppose that something similar takes place in the universal nature
 of things. Hence the fiction of elements, and their co-operation in
 forming natural bodies.[29] Again, when man reflects upon the entire
 liberty of nature, he meets with particular species of things, as
 animals, plants, minerals, and is thence easily led to imagine that
 there exist in nature certain primary forms which she strives to
 produce, and that all variation from them arises from some impediment
 or error which she is exposed to in completing her work, or from the
 collision or metamorphosis of different species. The first hypothesis
 has produced the doctrine of elementary properties, the second that
 of occult properties and specific powers; and both lead to trifling
 courses of reflection, in which the mind acquiesces, and is thus
 diverted from more important subjects. But physicians exercise a much
 more useful labor in the consideration of the secondary qualities of
 things, and the operations of attraction, repulsion, attenuation,
 inspissation, dilatation, astringency, separation, maturation, and the
 like; and would do still more if they would not corrupt these proper
 observations by the two systems I have alluded to, of elementary
 qualities and specific powers, by which they either reduce the
 secondary to first qualities, and their subtile and immeasurable
 composition, or at any rate neglect to advance by greater and
 more diligent observation to the third and fourth qualities, thus
 terminating their contemplation prematurely. Nor are these powers (or
 the like) to be investigated only among the medicines for the human
 body, but also in all changes of other natural bodies.
 
 A greater evil arises from the contemplation and investigation rather
 of the stationary principles of things from which, than of the active
 by which things themselves are created. For the former only serve for
 discussion, the latter for practice. Nor is any value to be set on
 those common differences of motion which are observed in the received
 system of natural philosophy, as generation, corruption, augmentation,
 diminution, alteration, and translation. For this is their meaning:
 if a body, unchanged in other respects, is moved from its place, this
 is translation; if the place and species be given, but the quantity
 changed, it is alteration; but if, from such a change, the mass and
 quantity of the body do not continue the same, this is the motion
 of augmentation and diminution; if the change be continued so as to
 vary the species and substance, and transfuse them to others, this is
 generation and corruption. All this is merely popular, and by no means
 penetrates into nature; and these are but the measures and bounds of
 motion, and not different species of it; they merely suggest how far,
 and not how or whence. For they exhibit neither the affections of
 bodies nor the process of their parts, but merely establish a division
 of that motion, which coarsely exhibits to the senses matter in its
 varied form. Even when they wish to point out something relative to
 the causes of motion, and to establish a division of them, they most
 absurdly introduce natural and violent motion, which is also a popular
 notion, since every violent motion is also in fact natural, that is to
 say, the external efficient puts nature in action in a different manner
 to that which she had previously employed.
 
 But if, neglecting these, any one were, for instance, to observe
 that there is in bodies a tendency of adhesion, so as not to suffer
 the unity of nature to be completely separated or broken, and a
 _vacuum_[30] to be formed, or that they have a tendency to return to
 their natural dimensions or tension, so that, if compressed or extended
 within or beyond it, they immediately strive to recover themselves, and
 resume their former volume and extent; or that they have a tendency to
 congregate into masses with similar bodies--the dense, for instance,
 toward the circumference of the earth, the thin and rare toward that of
 the heavens. These and the like are true physical genera of motions,
 but the others are clearly logical and scholastic, as appears plainly
 from a comparison of the two.
 
 Another considerable evil is, that men in their systems and
 contemplations bestow their labor upon the investigation and discussion
 of the principles of things and the extreme limits of nature, although
 all utility and means of action consist in the intermediate objects.
 Hence men cease not to abstract nature till they arrive at potential
 and shapeless matter,[31] and still persist in their dissection, till
 they arrive at atoms; and yet were all this true, it would be of little
 use to advance man's estate.
 
 LXVII. The understanding must also be cautioned against the
 intemperance of systems, so far as regards its giving or withholding
 its assent; for such intemperance appears to fix and perpetuate idols,
 so as to leave no means of removing them.
 
 These excesses are of two kinds. The first is seen in those who
 decide hastily, and render the sciences positive and dictatorial. The
 other in those who have introduced scepticism, and vague unbounded
 inquiry. The former subdues, the latter enervates the understanding.
 The Aristotelian philosophy, after destroying other systems (as the
 Ottomans[32] do their brethren) by its disputatious confutations,
 decided upon everything, and Aristotle himself then raises up questions
 at will, in order to settle them; so that everything should be certain
 and decided, a method now in use among his successors.
 
 The school of Plato introduced scepticism, first, as it were in joke
 and irony, from their dislike to Protagoras, Hippias,[33] and others,
 who were ashamed of appearing not to doubt upon any subject. But the
 new academy dogmatized in their scepticism, and held it as their tenet.
 Although this method be more honest than arbitrary decision (for its
 followers allege that they by no means confound all inquiry, like
 Pyrrho and his disciples, but hold doctrines which they can follow as
 probable, though they cannot maintain them to be true), yet when the
 human mind has once despaired of discovering truth, everything begins
 to languish. Hence men turn aside into pleasant controversies and
 discussions, and into a sort of wandering over subjects rather than
 sustain any rigorous investigation. But as we observed at first, we
 are not to deny the authority of the human senses and understanding,
 although weak, but rather to furnish them with assistance.
 
 LXVIII. We have now treated of each kind of idols, and their qualities,
 all of which must be abjured and renounced with firm and solemn
 resolution, and the understanding must be completely freed and cleared
 of them, so that the access to the kingdom of man, which is founded
 on the sciences, may resemble that to the kingdom of heaven, where no
 admission is conceded except to children.
 
 LXIX. Vicious demonstrations are the muniments and support of idols,
 and those which we possess in logic, merely subject and enslave the
 world to human thoughts, and thoughts to words. But demonstrations
 are in some manner themselves systems of philosophy and science; for
 such as they are, and accordingly as they are regularly or improperly
 established, such will be the resulting systems of philosophy and
 contemplation. But those which we employ in the whole process leading
 from the senses and things to axioms and conclusions, are fallacious
 and incompetent. This process is fourfold, and the errors are in equal
 number. In the first place the impressions of the senses are erroneous,
 for they fail and deceive us. We must supply defects by substitutions,
 and fallacies by their correction. Secondly, notions are improperly
 abstracted from the senses, and indeterminate and confused when they
 ought to be the reverse. Thirdly, the induction that is employed is
 improper, for it determines the principles of sciences by simple
 enumeration,[34] without adopting exclusions and resolutions, or just
 separations of nature. Lastly, the usual method of discovery and proof,
 by first establishing the most general propositions, then applying and
 proving the intermediate axioms according to them, is the parent of
 error and the calamity of every science. But we will treat more fully
 of that which we now slightly touch upon, when we come to lay down the
 true way of interpreting nature, after having gone through the above
 expiatory process and purification of the mind.
 
 LXX. But experience is by far the best demonstration, provided it
 adhere to the experiment actually made, for if that experiment be
 transferred to other subjects apparently similar, unless with proper
 and methodical caution it becomes fallacious. The present method of
 experiment is blind and stupid; hence men wandering and roaming without
 any determined course, and consulting mere chance, are hurried about
 to various points, and advance but little--at one time they are happy,
 at another their attention is distracted, and they always find that
 they want something further. Men generally make their experiments
 carelessly, and as it were in sport, making some little variation
 in a known experiment, and then if they fail they become disgusted
 and give up the attempt; nay, if they set to work more seriously,
 steadily, and assiduously, yet they waste all their time on probing
 some solitary matter, as Gilbert on the magnet, and the alchemists on
 gold. But such conduct shows their method to be no less unskilful than
 mean; for nobody can successfully investigate the nature of any object
 by considering that object alone; the inquiry must be more generally
 extended.
 
 Even when men build any science and theory upon experiment, yet they
 almost always turn with premature and hasty zeal to practice, not
 merely on account of the advantage and benefit to be derived from
 it, but in order to seize upon some security in a new undertaking of
 their not employing the remainder of their labor unprofitably, and by
 making themselves conspicuous, to acquire a greater name for their
 pursuit. Hence, like Atalanta, they leave the course to pick up the
 golden apple, interrupting their speed, and giving up the victory. But
 in the true course of experiment, and in extending it to new effects,
 we should imitate the Divine foresight and order; for God on the first
 day only created light, and assigned a whole day to that work without
 creating any material substance thereon. In like manner we must first,
 by every kind of experiment, elicit the discovery of causes and true
 axioms, and seek for experiments which may afford light rather than
 profit. Axioms, when rightly investigated and established, prepare
 us not for a limited but abundant practice, and bring in their train
 whole troops of effects. But we will treat hereafter of the ways of
 experience, which are not less beset and interrupted than those of
 judgment; having spoken at present of common experience only as a
 bad species of demonstration, the order of our subject now requires
 some mention of those external signs of the weakness in practice of
 the received systems of philosophy and contemplation[35] which we
 referred to above, and of the causes of a circumstance at first sight
 so wonderful and incredible. For the knowledge of these external
 signs prepares the way for assent, and the explanation of the causes
 removes the wonder; and these two circumstances are of material use in
 extirpating more easily and gently the idols from the understanding.
 
 LXXI. The sciences we possess have been principally derived from
 the Greeks; for the addition of the Roman, Arabic, or more modern
 writers, are but few and of small importance, and such as they are,
 are founded on the basis of Greek invention. But the wisdom of the
 Greeks was professional and disputatious, and thus most adverse to
 the investigation of truth. The name, therefore, of sophists, which
 the contemptuous spirit of those who deemed themselves philosophers,
 rejected and transferred to the rhetoricians--Gorgias,[36]
 Protagoras, Hippias, Polus--might well suit the whole tribe, such
 as Plato, Aristotle, Zeno, Epicurus, Theophrastus, and their
 successors--Chrysippus, Carneades, and the rest. There was only
 this difference between them--the former were mercenary vagabonds,
 travelling about to different states, making a show of their wisdom,
 and requiring pay; the latter more dignified and noble, in possession
 of fixed habitations, opening schools, and teaching philosophy
 gratuitously. Both, however (though differing in other respects), were
 professorial, and reduced every subject to controversy, establishing
 and defending certain sects and dogmas of philosophy, so that their
 doctrines were nearly (what Dionysius not unaptly objected to Plato)
 the talk of idle old men to ignorant youths. But the more ancient
 Greeks, as Empedocles, Anaxagoras, Leucippus, Democritus, Parmenides,
 Heraclitus, Xenophanes, Philolaus, and the rest[37] (for I omit
 Pythagoras as being superstitious), did not (that we are aware) open
 schools, but betook themselves to the investigation of truth with
 greater silence and with more severity and simplicity, that is, with
 less affectation and ostentation. Hence in our opinion they acted
 more advisedly, however their works may have been eclipsed in course
 of time by those lighter productions which better correspond with
 and please the apprehensions and passions of the vulgar; for time,
 like a river,[38] bears down to us that which is light and inflated,
 and sinks that which is heavy and solid. Nor were even these more
 ancient philosophers free from the national defect, but inclined too
 much to the ambition and vanity of forming a sect, and captivating
 public opinion, and we must despair of any inquiry after truth when it
 condescends to such trifles. Nor must we omit the opinion, or rather
 prophecy, of an Egyptian priest with regard to the Greeks, that they
 would forever remain children, without any antiquity of knowledge or
 knowledge of antiquity; for they certainly have this in common with
 children, that they are prone to talking, and incapable of generation,
 their wisdom being loquacious and unproductive of effects. Hence the
 external signs derived from the origin and birthplace of our present
 philosophy are not favorable.
 
 LXXII. Nor are those much better which can be deduced from the
 character of the time and age, than the former from that of the country
 and nation; for in that age the knowledge both of time and of the world
 was confined and meagre, which is one of the worst evils for those who
 rely entirely on experience--they had not a thousand years of history
 worthy of that name, but mere fables and ancient traditions; they were
 acquainted with but a small portion of the regions and countries of the
 world, for they indiscriminately called all nations situated far toward
 the north Scythians, all those to the west Celts; they knew nothing of
 Africa but the nearest part of Ethiopia, or of Asia beyond the Ganges,
 and had not even heard any sure and clear tradition of the regions of
 the New World. Besides, a vast number of climates and zones, in which
 innumerable nations live and breathe, were pronounced by them to be
 uninhabitable; nay, the travels of Democritus, Plato, and Pythagoras,
 which were not extensive, but rather mere excursions from home, were
 considered as something vast. But in our times many parts of the New
 World, and every extremity of the Old, are well known, and the mass of
 experiments has been infinitely increased; wherefore, if external signs
 were to be taken from the time of the nativity or procreation (as in
 astrology), nothing extraordinary could be predicted of these early
 systems of philosophy.
 
 LXXIII. Of all signs there is none more certain or worthy than that
 of the fruits produced, for the fruits and effects are the sureties
 and vouchers, as it were, for the truth of philosophy. Now, from the
 systems of the Greeks, and their subordinate divisions in particular
 branches of the sciences during so long a period, scarcely one single
 experiment can be culled that has a tendency to elevate or assist
 mankind, and can be fairly set down to the speculations and doctrines
 of their philosophy. Celsus candidly and wisely confesses as much,
 when he observes that experiments were first discovered in medicine,
 and that men afterward built their philosophical systems upon them,
 and searched for and assigned causes, instead of the inverse method of
 discovering and deriving experiments from philosophy and the knowledge
 of causes; it is not, therefore, wonderful that the Egyptians (who
 bestowed divinity and sacred honors on the authors of new inventions)
 should have consecrated more images of brutes than of men, for the
 brutes by their natural instinct made many discoveries, while men
 derived but few from discussion and the conclusions of reason.
 
 The industry of the alchemists has produced some effect, by chance,
 however, and casualty, or from varying their experiments (as mechanics
 also do), and not from any regular art or theory, the theory they have
 imagined rather tending to disturb than to assist experiment. Those,
 too, who have occupied themselves with natural magic (as they term it)
 have made but few discoveries, and those of small import, and bordering
 on imposture; for which reason, in the same manner as we are cautioned
 by religion to show our faith by our works, we may very properly apply
 the principle to philosophy, and judge of it by its works, accounting
 that to be futile which is unproductive, and still more so if, instead
 of grapes and olives, it yield but the thistle and thorns of dispute
 and contention.
 
 LXXIV. Other signs may be selected from the increase and progress of
 particular systems of philosophy and the sciences; for those which are
 founded on nature grow and increase, while those which are founded
 on opinion change and increase not. If, therefore, the theories we
 have mentioned were not like plants, torn up by the roots, but grew
 in the womb of nature, and were nourished by her, that which for the
 last two thousand years has taken place would never have happened,
 namely, that the sciences still continue in their beaten track, and
 nearly stationary, without having received any important increase,
 nay, having, on the contrary, rather bloomed under the hands of their
 first author, and then faded away. But we see that the case is reversed
 in the mechanical arts, which are founded on nature and the light
 of experience, for they (as long as they are popular) seem full of
 life, and uninterruptedly thrive and grow, being at first rude, then
 convenient, lastly polished, and perpetually improved.
 
 LXXV. There is yet another sign (if such it may be termed, being
 rather an evidence, and one of the strongest nature), namely, the
 actual confession of those very authorities whom men now follow; for
 even they who decide on things so daringly, yet at times, when they
 reflect, betake themselves to complaints about the subtilty of nature,
 the obscurity of things, and the weakness of man's wit. If they would
 merely do this, they might perhaps deter those who are of a timid
 disposition from further inquiry, but would excite and stimulate those
 of a more active and confident turn to further advances. They are
 not, however, satisfied with confessing so much of themselves, but
 consider everything which has been either unknown or unattempted by
 themselves or their teachers, as beyond the limits of possibility,
 and thus, with most consummate pride and envy, convert the defects of
 their own discoveries into a calumny on nature and a source of despair
 to every one else. Hence arose the New Academy, which openly professed
 scepticism,[39] and consigned mankind to eternal darkness; hence the
 notion that forms, or the true differences of things (which are in
 fact the laws of simple action), are beyond man's reach, and cannot
 possibly be discovered; hence those notions in the active and operative
 branches, that the heat of the sun and of fire are totally different,
 so as to prevent men from supposing that they can elicit or form, by
 means of fire, anything similar to the operations of nature; and again,
 that composition only is the work of man and mixture of nature, so
 as to prevent men from expecting the generation or transformation of
 natural bodies by art. Men will, therefore, easily allow themselves to
 be persuaded by this sign not to engage their fortunes and labor in
 speculations, which are not only desperate, but actually devoted to
 desperation.
 
 LXXVI. Nor should we omit the sign afforded by the great dissension
 formerly prevalent among philosophers, and the variety of schools,
 which sufficiently show that the way was not well prepared that leads
 from the senses to the understanding, since the same groundwork of
 philosophy (namely, the nature of things), was torn and divided into
 such widely differing and multifarious errors. And although in these
 days the dissensions and differences of opinions with regard to first
 principles and entire systems are nearly extinct,[40] yet there remain
 innumerable questions and controversies with regard to particular
 branches of philosophy. So that it is manifest that there is nothing
 sure or sound either in the systems themselves or in the methods of
 demonstration.[41]
 
 LXXVII. With regard to the supposition that there is a general
 unanimity as to the philosophy of Aristotle, because the other systems
 of the ancients ceased and became obsolete on its promulgation, and
 nothing better has been since discovered; whence it appears that it is
 so well determined and founded, as to have united the suffrages of both
 ages; we will observe--1st. That the notion of other ancient systems
 having ceased after the publication of the works of Aristotle is false,
 for the works of the ancient philosophers subsisted long after that
 event, even to the time of Cicero, and the subsequent ages. But at a
 later period, when human learning had, as it were, been wrecked in the
 inundation of barbarians into the Roman empire, then the systems of
 Aristotle and Plato were preserved in the waves of ages, like planks
 of a lighter and less solid nature. 2d. The notion of unanimity, on
 a clear inspection, is found to be fallacious. For true unanimity
 is that which proceeds from a free judgment, arriving at the same
 conclusion, after an investigation of the fact. Now, by far the greater
 number of those who have assented to the philosophy of Aristotle,
 have bound themselves down to it from prejudice and the authority
 of others, so that it is rather obsequiousness and concurrence than
 unanimity. But even if it were real and extensive unanimity, so far
 from being esteemed a true and solid confirmation, it should even
 lead to a violent presumption to the contrary. For there is no worse
 augury in intellectual matters than that derived from unanimity, with
 the exception of divinity and politics, where suffrages are allowed
 to decide. For nothing pleases the multitude, unless it strike the
 imagination or bind down the understanding, as we have observed above,
 with the shackles of vulgar notions. Hence we may well transfer
 Phocion's remark from morals to the intellect: "That men should
 immediately examine what error or fault they have committed, when the
 multitude concurs with, and applauds them."[42] This then is one of
 the most unfavorable signs. All the signs, therefore, of the truth and
 soundness of the received systems of philosophy and the sciences are
 unpropitious, whether taken from their origin, their fruits, their
 progress, the confessions of their authors, or from unanimity.
 
 LXXVIII. We now come to the causes of errors,[43] and of such
 perseverance in them for ages. These are sufficiently numerous and
 powerful to remove all wonder, that what we now offer should have so
 long been concealed from, and have escaped the notice of mankind, and
 to render it more worthy of astonishment, that it should even now have
 entered any one's mind, or become the subject of his thoughts; and
 that it should have done so, we consider rather the gift of fortune
 than of any extraordinary talent, and as the offspring of time rather
 than wit. But, in the first place, the number of ages is reduced to
 very narrow limits, on a proper consideration of the matter. For out
 of twenty-five[44] centuries, with which the memory and learning of
 man are conversant, scarcely six can be set apart and selected as
 fertile in science and favorable to its progress. For there are deserts
 and wastes in times as in countries, and we can only reckon up three
 revolutions and epochs of philosophy. 1. The Greek. 2. The Roman.
 3. Our own, that is the philosophy of the western nations of Europe:
 and scarcely two centuries can with justice be assigned to each. The
 intermediate ages of the world were unfortunate both in the quantity
 and richness of the sciences produced. Nor need we mention the Arabs,
 or the scholastic philosophy, which, in those ages, ground down the
 sciences by their numerous treatises, more than they increased their
 weight. The first cause, then, of such insignificant progress in the
 sciences, is rightly referred to the small proportion of time which has
 been favorable thereto.
 
 LXXIX. A second cause offers itself, which is certainly of the greatest
 importance; namely, that in those very ages in which men's wit and
 literature flourished considerably, or even moderately, but a small
 part of their industry was bestowed on natural philosophy, the great
 mother of the sciences. For every art and science torn from this root
 may, perhaps, be polished, and put into a serviceable shape, but can
 admit of little growth. It is well known, that after the Christian
 religion had been acknowledged, and arrived at maturity, by far the
 best wits were busied upon theology, where the highest rewards offered
 themselves, and every species of assistance was abundantly supplied,
 and the study of which was the principal occupation of the western
 European nations during the third epoch; the rather because literature
 flourished about the very time when controversies concerning religion
 first began to bud forth. 2. In the preceding ages, during the second
 epoch (that of the Romans), philosophical meditation and labor was
 chiefly occupied and wasted in moral philosophy (the theology of
 the heathens): besides, the greatest minds in these times applied
 themselves to civil affairs, on account of the magnitude of the Roman
 empire, which required the labor of many. 3. The age during which
 natural philosophy appeared principally to flourish among the Greeks,
 was but a short period, since in the more ancient times the seven sages
 (with the exception of Thales), applied themselves to moral philosophy
 and politics, and at a later period, after Socrates had brought
 down philosophy from heaven to earth, moral philosophy became more
 prevalent, and diverted men's attention from natural. Nay, the very
 period during which physical inquiries flourished, was corrupted and
 rendered useless by contradictions, and the ambition of new opinions.
 Since, therefore, during these three epochs, natural philosophy has
 been materially neglected or impeded, it is not at all surprising
 that men should have made but little progress in it, seeing they were
 attending to an entirely different matter.
 
 LXXX. Add to this that natural philosophy, especially of late, has
 seldom gained exclusive possession of an individual free from all other
 pursuits, even among those who have applied themselves to it, unless
 there may be an example or two of some monk studying in his cell, or
 some nobleman in his villa.[45] She has rather been made a passage and
 bridge to other pursuits.
 
 Thus has this great mother of the sciences been degraded most
 unworthily to the situation of a handmaid, and made to wait upon
 medicine or mathematical operations, and to wash the immature minds
 of youth, and imbue them with a first dye, that they may afterward be
 more ready to receive and retain another. In the meantime, let no one
 expect any great progress in the sciences (especially their operative
 part), unless natural philosophy be applied to particular sciences,
 and particular sciences again referred back to natural philosophy. For
 want of this, astronomy, optics, music, many mechanical arts, medicine
 itself, and (what perhaps is more wonderful), moral and political
 philosophy, and the logical sciences have no depth, but only glide over
 the surface and variety of things; because these sciences, when they
 have been once partitioned out and established, are no longer nourished
 by natural philosophy, which would have imparted fresh vigor and
 growth to them from the sources and genuine contemplation of motion,
 rays, sounds, texture, and conformation of bodies, and the affections
 and capacity of the understanding. But we can little wonder that the
 sciences grow not when separated from their roots.
 
 LXXXI. There is another powerful and great cause of the little
 advancement of the sciences, which is this; it is impossible to advance
 properly in the course when the goal is not properly fixed. But the
 real and legitimate goal of the sciences is the endowment of human
 life with new inventions and riches. The great crowd of teachers know
 nothing of this, but consist of dictatorial hirelings; unless it so
 happen that some artisan of an acute genius, and ambitious of fame,
 gives up his time to a new discovery, which is generally attended with
 a loss of property. The majority, so far from proposing to themselves
 the augmentation of the mass of arts and sciences, make no other use
 of an inquiry into the mass already before them, than is afforded by
 the conversion of it to some use in their lectures, or to gain, or
 to the acquirement of a name, and the like. But if one out of the
 multitude be found, who courts science from real zeal, and on his own
 account, even he will be seen rather to follow contemplation, and the
 variety of theories, than a severe and strict investigation of truth.
 Again, if there even be an unusually strict investigator of truth, yet
 will he propose to himself, as the test of truth, the satisfaction
 of his mind and understanding, as to the causes of things long since
 known, and not such a test as to lead to some new earnest of effects,
 and a new light in axioms. If, therefore, no one have laid down the
 real end of science, we cannot wonder that there should be error in
 points subordinate to that end.
 
 LXXXII. But, in like manner, as the end and goal of science is
 ill defined, so, even were the case otherwise, men have chosen an
 erroneous and impassable direction. For it is sufficient to astonish
 any reflecting mind, that nobody should have cared or wished to open
 and complete a way for the understanding, setting off from the senses,
 and regular, well-conducted experiment; but that everything has been
 abandoned either to the mists of tradition, the whirl and confusion of
 argument, or the waves and mazes of chance, and desultory, ill-combined
 experiment. Now, let any one but consider soberly and diligently
 the nature of the path men have been accustomed to pursue in the
 investigation and discovery of any matter, and he will doubtless first
 observe the rude and inartificial manner of discovery most familiar to
 mankind: which is no other than this. When any one prepares himself for
 discovery, he first inquires and obtains a full account of all that
 has been said on the subject by others, then adds his own reflections,
 and stirs up and, as it were, invokes his own spirit, after much
 mental labor, to disclose its oracles. All which is a method without
 foundation, and merely turns on opinion.
 
 Another, perhaps, calls in logic to assist him in discovery, which
 bears only a nominal relation to his purpose. For the discoveries of
 logic are not discoveries of principles and leading axioms, but only
 of what appears to accord with them.[46] And when men become curious
 and importunate, and give trouble, interrupting her about her proofs,
 and the discovery of principles or first axioms, she puts them off with
 her usual answer, referring them to faith, and ordering them to swear
 allegiance to each art in its own department.
 
 There remains but mere experience, which, when it offers itself, is
 called chance; when it is sought after, experiment.[47] But this kind
 of experience is nothing but a loose fagot; and mere groping in the
 dark, as men at night try all means of discovering the right road,
 while it would be better and more prudent either to wait for day, or
 procure a light, and then proceed. On the contrary, the real order of
 experience begins by setting up a light, and then shows the road by it,
 commencing with a regulated and digested, not a misplaced and vague
 course of experiment, and thence deducing axioms, and from those axioms
 new experiments: for not even the Divine Word proceeded to operate on
 the general mass of things without due order.
 
 Let men, therefore, cease to wonder if the whole course of science be
 not run, when all have wandered from the path; quitting it entirely,
 and deserting experience, or involving themselves in its mazes, and
 wandering about, while a regularly combined system would lead them in
 a sure track through its wilds to the open day of axioms.
 
 LXXXIII. The evil, however, has been wonderfully increased by an
 opinion, or inveterate conceit, which is both vainglorious and
 prejudicial, namely, that the dignity of the human mind is lowered by
 long and frequent intercourse with experiments and particulars, which
 are the objects of sense, and confined to matter; especially since such
 matters generally require labor in investigation, are mean subjects
 for meditation, harsh in discourse, unproductive in practice, infinite
 in number, and delicate in their subtilty. Hence we have seen the true
 path not only deserted, but intercepted and blocked up, experience
 being rejected with disgust, and not merely neglected or improperly
 applied.
 
 LXXXIV. Again, the reverence for antiquity,[48] and the authority of
 men who have been esteemed great in philosophy, and general unanimity,
 have retarded men from advancing in science, and almost enchanted them.
 As to unanimity, we have spoken of it above.
 
 The opinion which men cherish of antiquity is altogether idle, and
 scarcely accords with the term. For the old age and increasing years
 of the world should in reality be considered as antiquity, and this is
 rather the character of our own times than of the less advanced age of
 the world in those of the ancients; for the latter, with respect to
 ourselves, are ancient and elder, with respect to the world modern
 and younger. And as we expect a greater knowledge of human affairs,
 and more mature judgment from an old man than from a youth, on account
 of his experience, and the variety and number of things he has seen,
 heard, and meditated upon, so we have reason to expect much greater
 things of our own age (if it knew but its strength and would essay and
 exert it) than from antiquity, since the world has grown older, and its
 stock has been increased and accumulated with an infinite number of
 experiments and observations.
 
 We must also take into our consideration that many objects in nature
 fit to throw light upon philosophy have been exposed to our view, and
 discovered by means of long voyages and travels, in which our times
 have abounded. It would, indeed, be dishonorable to mankind, if the
 regions of the material globe, the earth, the sea, and stars, should
 be so prodigiously developed and illustrated in our age, and yet the
 boundaries of the intellectual globe should be confined to the narrow
 discoveries of the ancients.
 
 With regard to authority, it is the greatest weakness to attribute
 infinite credit to particular authors, and to refuse his own
 prerogative to time, the author of all authors, and, therefore, of all
 authority. For truth is rightly named the daughter of time, not of
 authority. It is not wonderful, therefore, if the bonds of antiquity,
 authority, and unanimity, have so enchained the power of man, that he
 is unable (as if bewitched) to become familiar with things themselves.
 
 LXXXV. Nor is it only the admiration of antiquity, authority, and
 unanimity, that has forced man's industry to rest satisfied with
 present discoveries, but, also, the admiration of the effects already
 placed within his power. For whoever passes in review the variety
 of subjects, and the beautiful apparatus collected and introduced by
 the mechanical arts for the service of mankind, will certainly be
 rather inclined to admire our wealth than to perceive our poverty:
 not considering that the observations of man and operations of nature
 (which are the souls and first movers of that variety) are few, and
 not of deep research; the rest must be attributed merely to man's
 patience, and the delicate and well-regulated motion of the hand or of
 instruments. To take an instance, the manufacture of clocks is delicate
 and accurate, and appears to imitate the heavenly bodies in its wheels,
 and the pulse of animals in its regular oscillation, yet it only
 depends upon one or two axioms of nature.
 
 Again, if one consider the refinement of the liberal arts, or even that
 exhibited in the preparation of natural bodies in mechanical arts and
 the like, as the discovery of the heavenly motions in astronomy, of
 harmony in music, of the letters of the alphabet[49] (still unadopted
 by the Chinese) in grammar; or, again, in mechanical operations, the
 productions of Bacchus and Ceres, that is, the preparation of wine
 and beer, the making of bread, or even the luxuries of the table,
 distillation, and the like; if one reflect also, and consider for how
 long a period of ages (for all the above, except distillation, are
 ancient) these things have been brought to their present state of
 perfection, and (as we instanced in clocks) to how few observations and
 axioms of nature they may be referred, and how easily, and as it were,
 by obvious chance or contemplation, they might be discovered, one
 would soon cease to admire and rather pity the human lot on account of
 its vast want and dearth of things and discoveries for so many ages.
 Yet even the discoveries we have mentioned were more ancient than
 philosophy and the intellectual arts; so that (to say the truth) when
 contemplation and doctrinal science began, the discovery of useful
 works ceased.
 
 But if any one turn from the manufactories to libraries, and be
 inclined to admire the immense variety of books offered to our view,
 let him but examine and diligently inspect the matter and contents of
 these books, and his astonishment will certainly change its object: for
 when he finds no end of repetitions, and how much men do and speak the
 same thing over again, he will pass from admiration of this variety to
 astonishment at the poverty and scarcity of matter, which has hitherto
 possessed and filled men's minds.
 
 But if any one should condescend to consider such sciences as are
 deemed rather curious than sound, and take a full view of the
 operations of the alchemists or magii, he will perhaps hesitate whether
 he ought rather to laugh or to weep. For the alchemist cherishes
 eternal hope, and when his labors succeed not, accuses his own
 mistakes, deeming, in his self-accusation, that he has not properly
 understood the words of art or of his authors; upon which he listens
 to tradition and vague whispers, or imagines there is some slight
 unsteadiness in the minute details of his practice, and then has
 recourse to an endless repetition of experiments: and in the meantime,
 when, in his casual experiments, he falls upon something in appearance
 new, or of some degree of utility, he consoles himself with such an
 earnest, and ostentatiously publishes them, keeping up his hope of
 the final result. Nor can it be denied that the alchemists have made
 several discoveries, and presented mankind with useful inventions. But
 we may well apply to them the fable of the old man, who bequeathed to
 his sons some gold buried in his garden, pretending not to know the
 exact spot, whereupon they worked diligently in digging the vineyard,
 and though they found no gold, the vintage was rendered more abundant
 by their labor.
 
 The followers of natural magic, who explain everything by sympathy
 and antipathy, have assigned false powers and marvellous operations
 to things by gratuitous and idle conjectures: and if they have ever
 produced any effects, they are rather wonderful and novel than of any
 real benefit or utility.
 
 In superstitious magic (if we say anything at all about it) we must
 chiefly observe, that there are only some peculiar and definite objects
 with which the curious and superstitious arts have, in every nation and
 age, and even under every religion, been able to exercise and amuse
 themselves. Let us, therefore, pass them over. In the meantime we
 cannot wonder that the false notion of plenty should have occasioned
 want.
 
 LXXXVI. The admiration of mankind with regard to the arts and sciences,
 which is of itself sufficiently simple and almost puerile, has been
 increased by the craft and artifices of those who have treated the
 sciences, and delivered them down to posterity. For they propose and
 produce them to our view so fashioned, and as it were masked, as to
 make them pass for perfect and complete. For if you consider their
 method and divisions, they appear to embrace and comprise everything
 which can relate to the subject. And although this frame be badly
 filled up and resemble an empty bladder, yet it presents to the vulgar
 understanding the form and appearance of a perfect science.
 
 The first and most ancient investigators of truth were wont, on the
 contrary, with more honesty and success, to throw all the knowledge
 they wished to gather from contemplation, and to lay up for use, into
 aphorisms, or short scattered sentences unconnected by any method, and
 without pretending or professing to comprehend any entire art. But
 according to the present system, we cannot wonder that men seek nothing
 beyond that which is handed down to them as perfect, and already
 extended to its full complement.
 
 LXXXVII. The ancient theories have received additional support and
 credit from the absurdity and levity of those who have promoted the
 new, especially in the active and practical part of natural philosophy.
 For there have been many silly and fantastical fellows who, from
 credulity or imposture, have loaded mankind with promises, announcing
 and boasting of the prolongation of life, the retarding of old age,
 the alleviation of pains, the remedying of natural defects, the
 deception of the senses, the restraint and excitement of the passions,
 the illumination and exaltation of the intellectual faculties, the
 transmutation of substances, the unlimited intensity and multiplication
 of motion, the impressions and changes of the air, the bringing into
 our power the management of celestial influences, the divination of
 future events, the representation of distant objects, the revelation of
 hidden objects, and the like. One would not be very wrong in observing
 with regard to such pretenders, that there is as much difference in
 philosophy, between their absurdity and real science, as there is in
 history between the exploits of Caesar or Alexander, and those of
 Amadis de Gaul and Arthur of Britain. For those illustrious generals
 are found to have actually performed greater exploits than such
 fictitious heroes are even pretended to have accomplished, by the
 means, however, of real action, and not by any fabulous and portentous
 power. Yet it is not right to suffer our belief in true history to be
 diminished, because it is sometimes injured and violated by fables. In
 the meantime we cannot wonder that great prejudice has been excited
 against any new propositions (especially when coupled with any mention
 of effects to be produced), by the conduct of impostors who have
 made a similar attempt; for their extreme absurdity, and the disgust
 occasioned by it, has even to this day overpowered every spirited
 attempt of the kind.
 
 LXXXVIII. Want of energy, and the littleness and futility of the tasks
 that human industry has undertaken, have produced much greater injury
 to the sciences: and yet (to make it still worse) that very want of
 energy manifests itself in conjunction with arrogance and disdain.
 
 For, in the first place, one excuse, now from its repetition become
 familiar, is to be observed in every art, namely, that its promoters
 convert the weakness of the art itself into a calumny upon nature:
 and whatever it in their hands fails to effect, they pronounce to be
 physically impossible. But how can the art ever be condemned while it
 acts as judge in its own cause? Even the present system of philosophy
 cherishes in its bosom certain positions or dogmas, which (it will be
 found on diligent inquiry) are calculated to produce a full conviction
 that no difficult, commanding, and powerful operation upon nature ought
 to be anticipated through the means of art; we instanced[50] above the
 alleged different quality of heat in the sun and fire, and composition
 and mixture. Upon an accurate observation the whole tendency of such
 positions is wilfully to circumscribe man's power, and to produce a
 despair of the means of invention and contrivance, which would not only
 confound the promises of hope, but cut the very springs and sinews of
 industry, and throw aside even the chances of experience. The only
 object of such philosophers is to acquire the reputation of perfection
 for their own art, and they are anxious to obtain the most silly and
 abandoned renown, by causing a belief that whatever has not yet been
 invented and understood can never be so hereafter. But if any one
 attempt to give himself up to things, and to discover something new;
 yet he will only propose and destine for his object the investigation
 and discovery of some one invention, and nothing more; as the nature
 of the magnet, the tides, the heavenly system, and the like, which
 appear enveloped in some degree of mystery, and have hitherto been
 treated with but little success. Now it is the greatest proof of want
 of skill, to investigate the nature of any object in itself alone; for
 that same nature, which seems concealed and hidden in some instances,
 is manifest and almost palpable in others, and excites wonder in the
 former, while it hardly attracts attention in the latter.[51] Thus the
 nature of consistency is scarcely observed in wood or stone, but passed
 over by the term solid without any further inquiry about the repulsion
 of separation or the solution of continuity. But in water-bubbles the
 same circumstance appears matter of delicate and ingenious research,
 for they form themselves into thin pellicles, curiously shaped into
 hemispheres, so as for an instant to avoid the solution of continuity.
 
 In general those very things which are considered as secret are
 manifest and common in other objects, but will never be clearly seen
 if the experiments and contemplation of man be directed to themselves
 only. Yet it commonly happens, that if, in the mechanical arts, any
 one bring old discoveries to a finer polish, or more elegant height of
 ornament, or unite and compound them, or apply them more readily to
 practice, or exhibit them on a less heavy and voluminous scale, and the
 like, they will pass off as new.
 
 We cannot, therefore, wonder that no magnificent discoveries, worthy
 of mankind, have been brought to light, while men are satisfied and
 delighted with such scanty and puerile tasks, nay, even think that they
 have pursued or attained some great object in their accomplishment.
 
 LXXXIX. Nor should we neglect to observe that natural philosophy has,
 in every age, met with a troublesome and difficult opponent: I mean
 superstition, and a blind and immoderate zeal for religion. For we see
 that, among the Greeks, those who first disclosed the natural causes of
 thunder and storms to the yet untrained ears of man were condemned as
 guilty of impiety toward the gods.[52] Nor did some of the old fathers
 of Christianity treat those much better who showed by the most positive
 proofs (such as no one now disputes) that the earth is spherical, and
 thence asserted that there were antipodes.[53]
 
 Even in the present state of things the condition of discussions on
 natural philosophy is rendered more difficult and dangerous by the
 summaries and methods of divines, who, after reducing divinity into
 such order as they could, and brought it into a scientific form, have
 proceeded to mingle an undue proportion of the contentious and thorny
 philosophy of Aristotle with the substance of religion.[54]
 
 The fictions of those who have not feared to deduce and confirm the
 truth of the Christian religion by the principles and authority of
 philosophers, tend to the same end, though in a different manner.[55]
 They celebrate the union of faith and the senses as though it were
 legitimate, with great pomp and solemnity, and gratify men's pleasing
 minds with a variety, but in the meantime confound most improperly
 things divine and human. Moreover, in these mixtures of divinity and
 philosophy the received doctrines of the latter are alone included,
 and any novelty, even though it be an improvement, scarcely escapes
 banishment and extermination.
 
 In short, you may find all access to any species of philosophy, however
 pure, intercepted by the ignorance of divines. Some in their simplicity
 are apprehensive that a too deep inquiry into nature may penetrate
 beyond the proper bounds of decorum, transferring and absurdly applying
 what is said of sacred mysteries in Holy Writ against those who
 pry into divine secrets, to the mysteries of nature, which are not
 forbidden by any prohibition. Others with more cunning imagine and
 consider, that if secondary causes be unknown, everything may more
 easily be referred to the Divine hand and wand, a matter, as they
 think, of the greatest consequence to religion, but which can only
 really mean that God wishes to be gratified by means of falsehood.
 Others fear, from past example, lest motion and change in philosophy
 should terminate in an attack upon religion. Lastly, there are others
 who appear anxious lest there should be something discovered in the
 investigation of nature to overthrow, or at least shake, religion,
 particularly among the unlearned. The last two apprehensions appear
 to resemble animal instinct, as if men were diffident, in the bottom
 of their minds and secret meditations, of the strength of religion
 and the empire of faith over the senses, and therefore feared that
 some danger awaited them from an inquiry into nature. But any one who
 properly considers the subject will find natural philosophy to be,
 after the Word of God, the surest remedy against superstition, and the
 most approved support of faith. She is, therefore, rightly bestowed
 upon religion as a most faithful attendant, for the one exhibits the
 will and the other the power of God. Nor was he wrong who observed,
 "Ye err, not knowing the Scriptures and the power of God," thus uniting
 in one bond the revelation of his will and the contemplation of his
 power. In the meanwhile, it is not wonderful that the progress of
 natural philosophy has been restrained, since religion, which has so
 much influence on men's minds, has been led and hurried to oppose her
 through the ignorance of some and the imprudent zeal of others.
 
 XC. Again, in the habits and regulations of schools, universities,
 and the like assemblies, destined for the abode of learned men and
 the improvement of learning, everything is found to be opposed to
 the progress of the sciences; for the lectures and exercises are so
 ordered, that anything out of the common track can scarcely enter the
 thoughts and contemplations of the mind. If, however, one or two have
 perhaps dared to use their liberty, they can only impose the labor on
 themselves, without deriving any advantage from the association of
 others; and if they put up with this, they will find their industry and
 spirit of no slight disadvantage to them in making their fortune; for
 the pursuits of men in such situations are, as it were, chained down
 to the writings of particular authors, and if any one dare to dissent
 from them he is immediately attacked as a turbulent and revolutionary
 spirit. Yet how great is the difference between civil matters and
 the arts, for there is not the same danger from new activity and new
 light. In civil matters even a change for the better is suspected
 on account of the commotion it occasions, for civil government is
 supported by authority, unanimity, fame, and public opinion, and not
 by demonstration. In the arts and sciences, on the contrary, every
 department should resound, as in mines, with new works and advances.
 And this is the rational, though not the actual view of the case, for
 that administration and government of science we have spoken of is
 wont too rigorously to repress its growth.
 
 XCI. And even should the odium I have alluded to be avoided, yet it is
 sufficient to repress the increase of science that such attempts and
 industry pass unrewarded; for the cultivation of science and its reward
 belong not to the same individual. The advancement of science is the
 work of a powerful genius, the prize and reward belong to the vulgar or
 to princes, who (with a few exceptions) are scarcely moderately well
 informed. Nay, such progress is not only deprived of the rewards and
 beneficence of individuals, but even of popular praise; for it is above
 the reach of the generality, and easily overwhelmed and extinguished
 by the winds of common opinions. It is not wonderful, therefore, that
 little success has attended that which has been little honored.
 
 XCII. But by far the greatest obstacle to the advancement of the
 sciences, and the undertaking of any new attempt or department, is to
 be found in men's despair and the idea of impossibility; for men of a
 prudent and exact turn of thought are altogether diffident in matters
 of this nature, considering the obscurity of nature, the shortness of
 life, the deception of the senses, and weakness of the judgment. They
 think, therefore, that in the revolutions of ages and of the world
 there are certain floods and ebbs of the sciences, and that they grow
 and flourish at one time, and wither and fall off at another, that when
 they have attained a certain degree and condition they can proceed no
 further.
 
 If, therefore, any one believe or promise greater things, they impute
 it to an uncurbed and immature mind, and imagine that such efforts
 begin pleasantly, then become laborious, and end in confusion.
 And since such thoughts easily enter the minds of men of dignity
 and excellent judgment, we must really take heed lest we should be
 captivated by our affection for an excellent and most beautiful
 object, and relax or diminish the severity of our judgment; and we
 must diligently examine what gleam of hope shines upon us, and in what
 direction it manifests itself, so that, banishing her lighter dreams,
 we may discuss and weigh whatever appears of more sound importance. We
 must consult the prudence of ordinary life, too, which is diffident
 upon principle, and in all human matters augurs the worst. Let us,
 then, speak of hope, especially as we are not vain promisers, nor
 are willing to enforce or insnare men's judgment, but would rather
 lead them willingly forward. And although we shall employ the most
 cogent means of enforcing hope when we bring them to particulars,
 and especially those which are digested and arranged in our Tables
 of Invention (the subject partly of the second, but principally of
 the fourth part of the Instauration), which are, indeed, rather
 the very object of our hopes than hope itself; yet to proceed more
 leniently we must treat of the preparation of men's minds, of which
 the manifestation of hope forms no slight part; for without it all
 that we have said tends rather to produce a gloom than to encourage
 activity or quicken the industry of experiment, by causing them to
 have a worse and more contemptuous opinion of things as they are than
 they now entertain, and to perceive and feel more thoroughly their
 unfortunate condition. We must, therefore, disclose and prefix our
 reasons for not thinking the hope of success improbable, as Columbus,
 before his wonderful voyage over the Atlantic, gave the reasons of his
 conviction that new lands and continents might be discovered besides
 those already known; and these reasons, though at first rejected, were
 yet proved by subsequent experience, and were the causes and beginnings
 of the greatest events.
 
 XCIII. Let us begin from God, and show that our pursuit from its
 exceeding goodness clearly proceeds from him, the author of good and
 father of light. Now, in all divine works the smallest beginnings lead
 assuredly to some result, and the remark in spiritual matters that
 "the kingdom of God cometh without observation," is also found to be
 true in every great work of Divine Providence, so that everything
 glides quietly on without confusion or noise, and the matter is
 achieved before men either think or perceive that it is commenced.
 Nor should we neglect to mention the prophecy of Daniel, of the last
 days of the world, "Many shall run to and fro, and knowledge shall be
 increased,"[56] thus plainly hinting and suggesting that fate (which
 is Providence) would cause the complete circuit of the globe (now
 accomplished, or at least going forward by means of so many distant
 voyages), and the increase of learning to happen at the same epoch.
 
 XCIV. We will next give a most potent reason for hope deduced from
 the errors of the past, and the ways still unattempted; for well
 was an ill-governed state thus reproved, "That which is worst with
 regard to the past should appear most consolatory for the future;
 for if you had done all that your duty commanded, and your affairs
 proceeded no better, you could not even hope for their improvement;
 but since their present unhappy situation is not owing to the force of
 circumstances, but to your own errors, you have reason to hope that by
 banishing or correcting the latter you can produce a great change for
 the better in the former." So if men had, during the many years that
 have elapsed, adhered to the right way of discovering and cultivating
 the sciences without being able to advance, it would be assuredly bold
 and presumptuous to imagine it possible to improve; but if they have
 mistaken the way and wasted their labor on improper objects, it follows
 that the difficulty does not arise from things themselves, which are
 not in our power, but from the human understanding, its practice and
 application, which is susceptible of remedy and correction. Our best
 plan, therefore, is to expose these errors; for in proportion as they
 impeded the past, so do they afford reason to hope for the future. And
 although we have touched upon them above, yet we think it right to give
 a brief, bare, and simple enumeration of them in this place.
 
 XCV. Those who have treated of the sciences have been either empirics
 or dogmatical.[57] The former like ants only heap up and use their
 store, the latter like spiders spin out their own webs. The bee, a
 mean between both, extracts matter from the flowers of the garden and
 the field, but works and fashions it by its own efforts. The true
 labor of philosophy resembles hers, for it neither relies entirely or
 principally on the powers of the mind, nor yet lays up in the memory
 the matter afforded by the experiments of natural history and mechanics
 in its raw state, but changes and works it in the understanding. We
 have good reason, therefore, to derive hope from a closer and purer
 alliance of these faculties (the experimental and rational) than has
 yet been attempted.
 
 XCVI. Natural philosophy is not yet to be found unadulterated, but is
 impure and corrupted--by logic in the school of Aristotle, by natural
 theology in that of Plato,[58] by mathematics in the second school of
 Plato (that of Proclus and others)[59] which ought rather to terminate
 natural philosophy than to generate or create it. We may, therefore,
 hope for better results from pure and unmixed natural philosophy.
 
 XCVII. No one has yet been found possessed of sufficient firmness
 and severity to resolve upon and undertake the task of entirely
 abolishing common theories and notions, and applying the mind afresh,
 when thus cleared and levelled, to particular researches; hence our
 human reasoning is a mere farrago and crude mass made up of a great
 deal of credulity and accident, and the puerile notions it originally
 contracted.
 
 But if a man of mature age, unprejudiced senses, and clear mind, would
 betake himself anew to experience and particulars, we might hope much
 more from such a one; in which respect we promise ourselves the fortune
 of Alexander the Great, and let none accuse us of vanity till they have
 heard the tale, which is intended to check vanity.
 
 For AEschines spoke thus of Alexander and his exploits: "We live not
 the life of mortals, but are born at such a period that posterity will
 relate and declare our prodigies"; as if he considered the exploits of
 Alexander to be miraculous.
 
 But in succeeding ages[60] Livy took a better view of the fact, and
 has made some such observation as this upon Alexander: "That he did no
 more than dare to despise insignificance." So in our opinion posterity
 will judge of us, that we have achieved no great matters, but only set
 less account upon what is considered important; for the meantime (as
 we have before observed) our only hope is in the regeneration of the
 sciences, by regularly raising them on the foundation of experience and
 building them anew, which I think none can venture to affirm to have
 been already done or even thought of.
 
 XCVIII. The foundations of experience (our sole resource) have
 hitherto failed completely or have been very weak; nor has a store
 and collection of particular facts, capable of informing the mind or
 in any way satisfactory, been either sought after or amassed. On the
 contrary, learned, but idle and indolent, men have received some mere
 reports of experience, traditions as it were of dreams, as establishing
 or confirming their philosophy, and have not hesitated to allow them
 the weight of legitimate evidence. So that a system has been pursued
 in philosophy with regard to experience resembling that of a kingdom
 or state which would direct its councils and affairs according to the
 gossip of city and street politicians, instead of the letters and
 reports of ambassadors and messengers worthy of credit. Nothing is
 rightly inquired into, or verified, noted, weighed, or measured, in
 natural history; indefinite and vague observation produces fallacious
 and uncertain information. If this appear strange, or our complaint
 somewhat too unjust (because Aristotle himself, so distinguished a
 man and supported by the wealth of so great a king, has completed an
 accurate history of animals, to which others with greater diligence
 but less noise have made considerable additions, and others again
 have composed copious histories and notices of plants, metals, and
 fossils), it will arise from a want of sufficiently attending to and
 comprehending our present observations; for a natural history compiled
 on its own account, and one collected for the mind's information as a
 foundation for philosophy, are two different things. They differ in
 several respects, but principally in this--the former contains only
 the varieties of natural species without the experiments of mechanical
 arts; for as in ordinary life every person's disposition, and the
 concealed feelings of the mind and passions are most drawn out when
 they are disturbed--so the secrets of nature betray themselves more
 readily when tormented by art than when left to their own course. We
 must begin, therefore, to entertain hopes of natural philosophy then
 only, when we have a better compilation of natural history, its real
 basis and support.
 
 XCIX. Again, even in the abundance of mechanical experiments, there
 is a very great scarcity of those which best inform and assist
 the understanding. For the mechanic, little solicitous about the
 investigation of truth, neither directs his attention, nor applies his
 hand to anything that is not of service to his business. But our hope
 of further progress in the sciences will then only be well founded,
 when numerous experiments shall be received and collected into natural
 history, which, though of no use in themselves, assist materially in
 the discovery of causes and axioms; which experiments we have termed
 enlightening, to distinguish them from those which are profitable. They
 possess this wonderful property and nature, that they never deceive
 or fail you; for being used only to discover the natural cause of
 some object, whatever be the result, they equally satisfy your aim by
 deciding the question.
 
 C. We must not only search for, and procure a greater number of
 experiments, but also introduce a completely different method, order,
 and progress of continuing and promoting experience. For vague and
 arbitrary experience is (as we have observed), mere groping in the
 dark, and rather astonishes than instructs. But when experience shall
 proceed regularly and uninterruptedly by a determined rule, we may
 entertain better hopes of the sciences.
 
 CI. But after having collected and prepared an abundance and store of
 natural history, and of the experience required for the operations
 of the understanding or philosophy, still the understanding is as
 incapable of acting on such materials of itself, with the aid of memory
 alone, as any person would be of retaining and achieving, by memory,
 the computation of an almanac. Yet meditation has hitherto done more
 for discovery than writing, and no experiments have been committed to
 paper. We cannot, however, approve of any mode of discovery without
 writing, and when that comes into more general use, we may have further
 hopes.
 
 CII. Besides this, there is such a multitude and host, as it were, of
 particular objects, and lying so widely dispersed, as to distract and
 confuse the understanding; and we can, therefore, hope for no advantage
 from its skirmishing, and quick movements and incursions, unless we
 put its forces in due order and array, by means of proper and well
 arranged, and, as it were, living tables of discovery of these matters,
 which are the subject of investigation, and the mind then apply itself
 to the ready prepared and digested aid which such tables afford.
 
 CIII. When we have thus properly and regularly placed before the eyes
 a collection of particulars, we must not immediately proceed to the
 investigation and discovery of new particulars or effects, or, at
 least, if we do so, must not rest satisfied therewith. For, though
 we do not deny that by transferring the experiments from one art to
 another (when all the experiments of each have been collected and
 arranged, and have been acquired by the knowledge, and subjected to
 the judgment of a single individual), many new experiments may be
 discovered tending to benefit society and mankind, by what we term
 literate experience; yet comparatively insignificant results are to be
 expected thence, while the more important are to be derived from the
 new light of axioms, deduced by certain method and rule from the above
 particulars, and pointing out and defining new particulars in their
 turn. Our road is not a long plain, but rises and falls, ascending to
 axioms, and descending to effects.
 
 CIV. Nor can we suffer the understanding to jump and fly from
 particulars to remote and most general axioms (such as are termed the
 principles of arts and things), and thus prove and make out their
 intermediate axioms according to the supposed unshaken truth of the
 former. This, however, has always been done to the present time from
 the natural bent of the understanding, educated too, and accustomed to
 this very method, by the syllogistic mode of demonstration. But we can
 then only augur well for the sciences, when the assent shall proceed by
 a true scale and successive steps, without interruption or breach, from
 particulars to the lesser axioms, thence to the intermediate (rising
 one above the other), and lastly, to the most general. For the lowest
 axioms differ but little from bare experiment;[61] the highest and most
 general (as they are esteemed at present), are notional, abstract, and
 of no real weight. The intermediate are true, solid, full of life, and
 upon them depend the business and fortune of mankind; beyond these are
 the really general, but not abstract, axioms, which are truly limited
 by the intermediate.
 
 We must not then add wings, but rather lead and ballast to the
 understanding, to prevent its jumping or flying, which has not yet been
 done; but whenever this takes place, we may entertain greater hopes of
 the sciences.
 
 CV. In forming axioms, we must invent a different form of induction
 from that hitherto in use; not only for the proof and discovery of
 principles (as they are called), but also of minor, intermediate, and,
 in short, every kind of axioms. The induction which proceeds by simple
 enumeration is puerile, leads to uncertain conclusions, and is exposed
 to danger from one contradictory instance, deciding generally from too
 small a number of facts, and those only the most obvious. But a really
 useful induction for the discovery and demonstration of the arts and
 sciences, should separate nature by proper rejections and exclusions,
 and then conclude for the affirmative, after collecting a sufficient
 number of negatives. Now this has not been done, nor even attempted,
 except perhaps by Plato, who certainly uses this form of induction in
 some measure, to sift definitions and ideas. But much of what has never
 yet entered the thoughts of man must necessarily be employed, in order
 to exhibit a good and legitimate mode of induction or demonstration,
 so as even to render it essential for us to bestow more pains upon
 it than have hitherto been bestowed on syllogisms. The assistance of
 induction is to serve us not only in the discovery of axioms, but
 also in defining our notions. Much indeed is to be hoped from such an
 induction as has been described.
 
 CVI. In forming our axioms from induction, we must examine and try
 whether the axiom we derive be only fitted and calculated for the
 particular instances from which it is deduced, or whether it be more
 extensive and general. If it be the latter, we must observe, whether
 it confirm its own extent and generality by giving surety, as it were,
 in pointing out new particulars, so that we may neither stop at actual
 discoveries, nor with a careless grasp catch at shadows and abstract
 forms, instead of substances of a determinate nature: and as soon as we
 act thus, well authorized hope may with reason be said to beam upon us.
 
 CVII. Here, too, we may again repeat what we have said above,
 concerning the extending of natural philosophy and reducing particular
 sciences to that one, so as to prevent any schism or dismembering of
 the sciences; without which we cannot hope to advance.
 
 CVIII. Such are the observations we would make in order to remove
 despair and excite hope, by bidding farewell to the errors of past
 ages, or by their correction. Let us examine whether there be other
 grounds for hope. And, first, if many useful discoveries have occurred
 to mankind by chance or opportunity, without investigation or attention
 on their part, it must necessarily be acknowledged that much more may
 be brought to light by investigation and attention, if it be regular
 and orderly, not hasty and interrupted. For although it may now and
 then happen that one falls by chance upon something that had before
 escaped considerable efforts and laborious inquiries, yet undoubtedly
 the reverse is generally the case. We may, therefore, hope for further,
 better, and more frequent results from man's reason, industry, method,
 and application, than from chance and mere animal instinct, and the
 like, which have hitherto been the sources of invention.
 
 CIX. We may also derive some reason for hope from the circumstance
 of several actual inventions being of such a nature, that scarcely
 any one could have formed a conjecture about them previously to their
 discovery, but would rather have ridiculed them as impossible. For
 men are wont to guess about new subjects from those they are already
 acquainted with, and the hasty and vitiated fancies they have thence
 formed: than which there cannot be a more fallacious mode of reasoning,
 because much of that which is derived from the sources of things does
 not flow in their usual channel.
 
 If, for instance, before the discovery of cannon, one had described
 its effects in the following manner: There is a new invention by which
 walls and the greatest bulwarks can be shaken and overthrown from a
 considerable distance; men would have begun to contrive various means
 of multiplying the force of projectiles and machines by means of
 weights and wheels, and other modes of battering and projecting. But
 it is improbable that any imagination or fancy would have hit upon a
 fiery blast, expanding and developing itself so suddenly and violently,
 because none would have seen an instance at all resembling it, except
 perhaps in earthquakes or thunder, which they would have immediately
 rejected as the great operations of nature, not to be imitated by man.
 
 So, if before the discovery of silk thread, any one had observed, that
 a species of thread had been discovered, fit for dresses and furniture,
 far surpassing the thread of worsted or flax in fineness, and at the
 same time in tenacity, beauty, and softness; men would have begun
 to imagine something about Chinese plants, or the fine hair of some
 animals, or the feathers or down of birds, but certainly would never
 have had an idea of its being spun by a small worm, in so copious a
 manner, and renewed annually. But if any one had ventured to suggest
 the silkworm, he would have been laughed at as if dreaming of some new
 manufacture from spiders.
 
 So again, if before the discovery of the compass, any one had said,
 that an instrument had been invented, by which the quarters and points
 of the heavens could be exactly taken and distinguished, men would
 have entered into disquisitions on the refinement of astronomical
 instruments, and the like, from the excitement of their imaginations;
 but the thought of anything being discovered, which, not being a
 celestial body, but a mere mineral or metallic substance, should yet
 in its motion agree with that of such bodies, would have appeared
 absolutely incredible. Yet were these facts, and the like (unknown for
 so many ages) not discovered at last either by philosophy or reasoning,
 but by chance and opportunity; and (as we have observed), they are of a
 nature most heterogeneous, and remote from what was hitherto known, so
 that no previous knowledge could lead to them.
 
 We may, therefore, well hope[62] that many excellent and useful matters
 are yet treasured up in the bosom of nature, bearing no relation or
 analogy to our actual discoveries, but out of the common track of
 our imagination, and still undiscovered, and which will doubtless be
 brought to light in the course and lapse of years, as the others have
 been before them; but in the way we now point out, they may rapidly and
 at once be both represented and anticipated.
 
 CX. There are, moreover, some inventions which render it probable
 that men may pass and hurry over the most noble discoveries which
 lie immediately before them. For however the discovery of gunpowder,
 silk, the compass, sugar, paper, or the like, may appear to depend on
 peculiar properties of things and nature, printing at least involves
 no contrivance which is not clear and almost obvious. But from want
 of observing that although the arrangement of the types of letters
 required more trouble than writing with the hand, yet these types once
 arranged serve for innumerable impressions, while manuscript only
 affords one copy; and again, from want of observing that ink might be
 thickened so as to stain without running (which was necessary, seeing
 the letters face upward, and the impression is made from above), this
 most beautiful invention (which assists so materially the propagation
 of learning) remained unknown for so many ages.
 
 The human mind is often so awkward and ill-regulated in the career of
 invention that it is at first diffident, and then despises itself. For
 it appears at first incredible that any such discovery should be made,
 and when it has been made, it appears incredible that it should so long
 have escaped men's research. All which affords good reason for the
 hope that a vast mass of inventions yet remains, which may be deduced
 not only from the investigation of new modes of operation, but also
 from transferring, comparing, and applying these already known, by the
 method of what we have termed literate experience.
 
 CXI. Nor should we omit another ground of hope. Let men only consider
 (if they will) their infinite expenditure of talent, time, and
 fortune, in matters and studies of far inferior importance and value;
 a small portion of which applied to sound and solid learning would be
 sufficient to overcome every difficulty. And we have thought right to
 add this observation, because we candidly own that such a collection of
 natural and experimental history as we have traced in our own mind, and
 as is really necessary, is a great and as it were royal work, requiring
 much labor and expense.
 
 CXII. In the meantime let no one be alarmed at the multitude of
 particulars, but rather inclined to hope on that very account. For the
 particular phenomena of the arts and nature are in reality but as a
 handful, when compared with the fictions of the imagination removed and
 separated from the evidence of facts. The termination of our method
 is clear, and I had almost said near at hand; the other admits of no
 termination, but only of infinite confusion. For men have hitherto
 dwelt but little, or rather only slightly touched upon experience,
 while they have wasted much time on theories and the fictions of the
 imagination. If we had but any one who could actually answer our
 interrogations of nature, the invention of all causes and sciences
 would be the labor of but a few years.
 
 CXIII. We think some ground of hope is afforded by our own example,
 which is not mentioned for the sake of boasting, but as a useful
 remark. Let those who distrust their own powers observe myself, one who
 have among my contemporaries been the most engaged in public business,
 who am not very strong in health (which causes a great loss of time),
 and am the first explorer of this course, following the guidance of
 none, nor even communicating my thoughts to a single individual; yet
 having once firmly entered in the right way, and submitting the powers
 of my mind to things, I have somewhat advanced (as I make bold to
 think) the matter I now treat of. Then let others consider what may
 be hoped from men who enjoy abundant leisure, from united labors, and
 the succession of ages, after these suggestions on our part, especially
 in a course which is not confined, like theories, to individuals,
 but admits of the best distribution and union of labor and effect,
 particularly in collecting experiments. For men will then only begin to
 know their own power, when each performs a separate part, instead of
 undertaking in crowds the same work.
 
 CXIV. Lastly, though a much more faint and uncertain breeze of hope
 were to spring up from our new continent, yet we consider it necessary
 to make the experiment, if we would not show a dastard spirit. For
 the risk attending want of success is not to be compared with that
 of neglecting the attempt; the former is attended with the loss of
 a little human labor, the latter with that of an immense benefit.
 For these and other reasons it appears to us that there is abundant
 ground to hope, and to induce not only those who are sanguine to make
 experiment, but even those who are cautious and sober to give their
 assent.
 
 CXV. Such are the grounds for banishing despair, hitherto one of the
 most powerful causes of the delay and restraint to which the sciences
 have been subjected; in treating of which we have at the same time
 discussed the signs and causes of the errors, idleness, and ignorance
 that have prevailed; seeing especially that the more refined causes,
 which are not open to popular judgment and observation, may be referred
 to our remarks on the idols of the human mind.
 
 Here, too, we should close the demolishing branch of our Instauration,
 which is comprised in three confutations: 1, the confutation of natural
 human reason left to itself; 2, the confutation of demonstration; 3,
 the confutation of theories, or received systems of philosophy and
 doctrines. Our confutation has followed such a course as was open to
 it, namely, the exposing of the signs of error, and the producing
 evidence of the causes of it: for we could adopt no other, differing as
 we do both in first principles and demonstrations from others.
 
 It is time for us therefore to come to the art itself, and the rule for
 the interpretation of nature: there is, however, still something which
 must not be passed over. For the intent of this first book of aphorisms
 being to prepare the mind for understanding, as well as admitting, what
 follows, we must now, after having cleansed, polished, and levelled
 its surface, place it in a good position, and as it were a benevolent
 aspect toward our propositions; seeing that prejudice in new matters
 may be produced not only by the strength of preconceived notions, but
 also by a false anticipation or expectation of the matter proposed. We
 shall therefore endeavor to induce good and correct opinions of what we
 offer, although this be only necessary for the moment, and as it were
 laid out at interest, until the matter itself be well understood.
 
 CXVI. First, then, we must desire men not to suppose that we are
 ambitious of founding any philosophical sect, like the ancient Greeks,
 or some moderns, as Telesius, Patricius, and Severinus.[63] For neither
 is this our intention, nor do we think that peculiar abstract opinions
 on nature and the principles of things are of much importance to men's
 fortunes, since it were easy to revive many ancient theories, and
 to introduce many new ones; as, for instance, many hypotheses with
 regard to the heavens can be formed, differing in themselves, and yet
 sufficiently according with the phenomena.
 
 We bestow not our labor on such theoretical and, at the same time,
 useless topics. On the contrary, our determination is that of trying,
 whether we can lay a firmer foundation, and extend to a greater
 distance the boundaries of human power and dignity. And although here
 and there, upon some particular points, we hold (in our own opinion)
 more true and certain, and I might even say, more advantageous tenets
 than those in general repute (which we have collected in the fifth part
 of our Instauration), yet we offer no universal or complete theory.
 The time does not yet appear to us to be arrived, and we entertain no
 hope of our life being prolonged to the completion of the sixth part of
 the Instauration (which is destined for philosophy discovered by the
 interpretation of nature), but are content if we proceed quietly and
 usefully in our intermediate pursuit, scattering, in the meantime, the
 seeds of less adulterated truth for posterity, and, at least, commence
 the great work.
 
 CXVII. And, as we pretend not to found a sect, so do we neither offer
 nor promise particular effects; which may occasion some to object to
 us, that since we so often speak of effects, and consider everything
 in its relation to that end, we ought also to give some earnest of
 producing them. Our course and method, however (as we have often said,
 and again repeat), is such as not to deduce effects from effects, nor
 experiments from experiments (as the empirics do), but in our capacity
 of legitimate interpreters of nature, to deduce causes and axioms from
 effects and experiments; and new effects and experiments from those
 causes and axioms.
 
 And although any one of moderate intelligence and ability will observe
 the indications and sketches of many noble effects in our tables of
 inventions (which form the fourth part of the Instauration), and also
 in the examples of particular instances cited in the second part, as
 well as in our observations on history (which is the subject of the
 third part); yet we candidly confess that our present natural history,
 whether compiled from books or our own inquiries, is not sufficiently
 copious and well ascertained to satisfy, or even assist, a proper
 interpretation.
 
 If, therefore, there be any one who is more disposed and prepared for
 mechanical art, and ingenious in discovering effects, than in the mere
 management of experiment, we allow him to employ his industry in
 gathering many of the fruits of our history and tables in this way,
 and applying them to effects, receiving them as interest till he can
 obtain the principal. For our own part, having a greater object in
 view, we condemn all hasty and premature rest in such pursuits as we
 would Atalanta's apple (to use a common allusion of ours); for we are
 not childishly ambitious of golden fruit, but use all our efforts to
 make the course of art outstrip nature, and we hasten not to reap moss
 or the green blade, but wait for a ripe harvest.
 
 CXVIII. There will be some, without doubt, who, on a perusal of our
 history and tables of invention, will meet with some uncertainty,
 or perhaps fallacy, in the experiments themselves, and will thence
 perhaps imagine that our discoveries are built on false foundations and
 principles. There is, however, really nothing in this, since it must
 needs happen in beginnings.[64] For it is the same as if in writing
 or printing one or two letters were wrongly turned or misplaced,
 which is no great inconvenience to the reader, who can easily by his
 own eye correct the error; let men in the same way conclude, that
 many experiments in natural history may be erroneously believed and
 admitted, which are easily expunged and rejected afterward, by the
 discovery of causes and axioms. It is, however, true, that if these
 errors in natural history and experiments become great, frequent, and
 continued, they cannot be corrected and amended by any dexterity of
 wit or art. If then, even in our natural history, well examined and
 compiled with such diligence, strictness, and (I might say) reverential
 scruples, there be now and then something false and erroneous in
 the details, what must we say of the common natural history, which
 is so negligent and careless when compared with ours? or of systems
 of philosophy and the sciences, based on such loose soil (or rather
 quicksand)? Let none then be alarmed by such observations.
 
 CXIX. Again, our history and experiments will contain much that
 is light and common, mean and illiberal, too refined and merely
 speculative, and, as it were, of no use, and this perhaps may divert
 and alienate the attention of mankind.
 
 With regard to what is common; let men reflect, that they have hitherto
 been used to do nothing but refer and adapt the causes of things of
 rare occurrence to those of things which more frequently happen,
 without any investigation of the causes of the latter, taking them for
 granted and admitted.
 
 Hence, they do not inquire into the causes of gravity, the rotation of
 the heavenly bodies, heat, cold, light, hardness, softness, rarity,
 density, liquidity, solidity, animation, inanimation, similitude,
 difference, organic formation, but taking them to be self-evident,
 manifest, and admitted, they dispute and decide upon other matters of
 less frequent and familiar occurrence.
 
 But we (who know that no judgment can be formed of that which is rare
 or remarkable, and much less anything new brought to light, without
 a previous regular examination and discovery of the causes of that
 which is common, and the causes again of those causes) are necessarily
 compelled to admit the most common objects into our history. Besides,
 we have observed that nothing has been so injurious to philosophy as
 this circumstance, namely, that familiar and frequent objects do not
 arrest and detain men's contemplation, but are carelessly admitted,
 and their causes never inquired after; so that information on unknown
 subjects is not more often wanted than attention to those which are
 known.
 
 CXX. With regard to the meanness, or even the filthiness of
 particulars, for which (as Pliny observes), an apology is requisite,
 such subjects are no less worthy of admission into natural history
 than the most magnificent and costly; nor do they at all pollute
 natural history, for the sun enters alike the palace and the privy,
 and is not thereby polluted. We neither dedicate nor raise a capitol
 or pyramid to the pride of man, but rear a holy temple in his mind,
 on the model of the universe, which model therefore we imitate. For
 that which is deserving of existence is deserving of knowledge, the
 image of existence. Now the mean and splendid alike exist. Nay, as
 the finest odors are sometimes produced from putrid matter (such as
 musk and civet), so does valuable light and information emanate from
 mean and sordid instances. But we have already said too much, for such
 fastidious feelings are childish and effeminate.
 
 CXXI. The next point requires a more accurate consideration, namely,
 that many parts of our history will appear to the vulgar, or even any
 mind accustomed to the present state of things, fantastically and
 uselessly refined. Hence, we have in regard to this matter said from
 the first, and must again repeat, that we look for experiments that
 shall afford light rather than profit, imitating the divine creation,
 which, as we have often observed, only produced light on the first
 day, and assigned that whole day to its creation, without adding any
 material work.
 
 If any one, then, imagine such matters to be of no use, he might
 equally suppose light to be of no use, because it is neither solid
 nor material. For, in fact, the knowledge of simple natures, when
 sufficiently investigated and defined, resembles light, which, though
 of no great use in itself, affords access to the general mysteries
 of effects, and with a peculiar power comprehends and draws with
 it whole bands and troops of effects, and the sources of the most
 valuable axioms. So also the elements of letters have of themselves
 separately no meaning, and are of no use, yet are they, as it were,
 the original matter in the composition and preparation of speech. The
 seeds of substances, whose effect is powerful, are of no use except in
 their growth, and the scattered rays of light itself avail not unless
 collected.
 
 But if speculative subtilties give offence, what must we say of the
 scholastic philosophers who indulged in them to such excess? And those
 subtilties were wasted on words, or, at least, common notions (which
 is the same thing), not on things or nature, and alike unproductive of
 benefit in their origin and their consequences: in no way resembling
 ours, which are at present useless, but in their consequences of
 infinite benefit. Let men be assured that all subtile disputes and
 discursive efforts of the mind are late and preposterous, when they
 are introduced subsequently to the discovery of axioms, and that their
 true, or, at any rate, chief opportunity is, when experiment is to be
 weighed and axioms to be derived from it. They otherwise catch and
 grasp at nature, but never seize or detain her: and we may well apply
 to nature that which has been said of opportunity or fortune, that she
 wears a lock in front, but is bald behind.
 
 In short, we may reply decisively to those who despise any part of
 natural history as being vulgar, mean, or subtile, and useless in its
 origin, in the words of a poor woman to a haughty prince,[65] who had
 rejected her petition as unworthy, and beneath the dignity of his
 majesty: "Then cease to reign"; for it is quite certain that the empire
 of nature can neither be obtained nor administered by one who refuses
 to pay attention to such matters as being poor and too minute.
 
 CXXII. Again, it may be objected to us as being singular and harsh,
 that we should with one stroke and assault, as it were, banish all
 authorities and sciences, and that too by our own efforts, without
 requiring the assistance and support of any of the ancients.
 
 Now we are aware, that had we been ready to act otherwise than
 sincerely, it was not difficult to refer our present method to
 remote ages, prior to those of the Greeks (since the sciences in all
 probability flourished more in their natural state, though silently,
 than when they were paraded with the fifes and trumpets of the Greeks);
 or even (in parts, at least) to some of the Greeks themselves, and to
 derive authority and honor from thence; as men of no family labor to
 raise and form nobility for themselves in some ancient line, by the
 help of genealogies. Trusting, however, to the evidence of facts, we
 reject every kind of fiction and imposture; and think it of no more
 consequence to our subject, whether future discoveries were known to
 the ancients, and set or rose according to the vicissitudes of events
 and lapse of ages, than it would be of importance to mankind to know
 whether the new world be the island of Atlantis,[66] and known to the
 ancients, or be now discovered for the first time.
 
 With regard to the universal censure we have bestowed, it is quite
 clear, to any one who properly considers the matter, that it is both
 more probable and more modest than any partial one could have been. For
 if the errors had not been rooted in the primary notions, some well
 conducted discoveries must have corrected others that were deficient.
 But since the errors were fundamental, and of such a nature, that
 men may be said rather to have neglected or passed over things, than
 to have formed a wrong or false judgment of them, it is little to be
 wondered at, that they did not obtain what they never aimed at, nor
 arrive at a goal which they had not determined, nor perform a course
 which they had neither entered upon nor adhered to.
 
 With regard to our presumption, we allow that if we were to assume a
 power of drawing a more perfect straight line or circle than any one
 else, by superior steadiness of hand or acuteness of eye, it would lead
 to a comparison of talent; but if one merely assert that he can draw
 a more perfect line or circle with a ruler or compasses, than another
 can by his unassisted hand or eye, he surely cannot be said to boast
 of much. Now this applies not only to our first original attempt, but
 also to those who shall hereafter apply themselves to the pursuit. For
 our method of discovering the sciences merely levels men's wits, and
 leaves but little to their superiority, since it achieves everything by
 the most certain rules and demonstrations. Whence (as we have often
 observed), our attempt is to be attributed to fortune rather than
 talent, and is the offspring of time rather than of wit. For a certain
 sort of chance has no less effect upon our thoughts than on our acts
 and deeds.
 
 CXXIII. We may, therefore, apply to ourselves the joke of him who said,
 that water and wine drinkers could not think alike,[67] especially as
 it hits the matter so well. For others, both ancients and moderns,
 have in the sciences drank a crude liquor like water, either flowing
 of itself from the understanding, or drawn up by logic as the wheel
 draws up the bucket. But we drink and pledge others with a liquor made
 of many well-ripened grapes, collected and plucked from particular
 branches, squeezed in the press, and at last clarified and fermented in
 a vessel. It is not, therefore, wonderful that we should not agree with
 others.
 
 CXXIV. Another objection will without doubt be made, namely, that we
 have not ourselves established a correct, or the best goal or aim
 of the sciences (the very defect we blame in others). For they will
 say that the contemplation of truth is more dignified and exalted
 than any utility or extent of effects; but that our dwelling so long
 and anxiously on experience and matter, and the fluctuating state of
 particulars, fastens the mind to earth, or rather casts it down into an
 abyss of confusion and disturbance, and separates and removes it from a
 much more divine state, the quiet and tranquillity of abstract wisdom.
 We willingly assent to their reasoning, and are most anxious to effect
 the very point they hint at and require. For we are founding a real
 model of the world in the understanding, such as it is found to be, not
 such as man's reason has distorted. Now this cannot be done without
 dissecting and anatomizing the world most diligently; but we declare it
 necessary to destroy completely the vain, little and, as it were, apish
 imitations of the world, which have been formed in various systems of
 philosophy by men's fancies. Let men learn (as we have said above) the
 difference that exists between the idols of the human mind and the
 ideas of the divine mind. The former are mere arbitrary abstractions;
 the latter the true marks of the Creator on his creatures, as they are
 imprinted on, and defined in matter, by true and exquisite touches.
 Truth, therefore, and utility, are here perfectly identical, and the
 effects are of more value as pledges of truth than from the benefit
 they confer on men.
 
 CXXV. Others may object that we are only doing that which has already
 been done, and that the ancients followed the same course as ourselves.
 They may imagine, therefore, that, after all this stir and exertion,
 we shall at last arrive at some of those systems that prevailed among
 the ancients: for that they, too, when commencing their meditations,
 laid up a great store of instances and particulars, and digested them
 under topics and titles in their commonplace books, and so worked out
 their systems and arts, and then decided upon what they discovered,
 and related now and then some examples to confirm and throw light upon
 their doctrine; but thought it superfluous and troublesome to publish
 their notes, minutes, and commonplaces, and therefore followed the
 example of builders who remove the scaffolding and ladders when the
 building is finished. Nor can we indeed believe the case to have been
 otherwise. But to any one, not entirely forgetful of our previous
 observations, it will be easy to answer this objection or rather
 scruple; for we allow that the ancients had a particular form of
 investigation and discovery, and their writings show it. But it was
 of such a nature, that they immediately flew from a few instances and
 particulars (after adding some common notions, and a few generally
 received opinions most in vogue) to the most general conclusions or the
 principles of the sciences, and then by their intermediate propositions
 deduced their inferior conclusions, and tried them by the test of the
 immovable and settled truth of the first, and so constructed their art.
 Lastly, if some new particulars and instances were brought forward,
 which contradicted their dogmas, they either with great subtilty
 reduced them to one system, by distinctions or explanations of their
 own rules, or got rid of them clumsily as exceptions, laboring most
 pertinaciously in the meantime to accommodate the causes of such as
 were not contradictory to their own principles. Their natural history
 and their experience were both far from being what they ought to have
 been, and their flying off to generalities ruined everything.
 
 CXXVI. Another objection will be made against us, that we prohibit
 decisions and the laying down of certain principles, till we arrive
 regularly at generalities by the intermediate steps, and thus keep the
 judgment in suspense and lead to uncertainty. But our object is not
 uncertainty but fitting certainty, for we derogate not from the senses
 but assist them, and despise not the understanding but direct it. It is
 better to know what is necessary, and not to imagine we are fully in
 possession of it, than to imagine that we are fully in possession of
 it, and yet in reality to know nothing which we ought.
 
 CXXVII. Again, some may raise this question rather than objection,
 whether we talk of perfecting natural philosophy alone according
 to our method, or the other sciences also, such as logic, ethics,
 politics. We certainly intend to comprehend them all. And as common
 logic, which regulates matters by syllogisms, is applied not only to
 natural, but also to every other science, so our inductive method
 likewise comprehends them all.[68] For we form a history and tables of
 invention for anger, fear, shame, and the like, and also for examples
 in civil life, and the mental operations of memory, composition,
 division, judgment, and the rest, as well as for heat and cold, light,
 vegetation, and the like. But since our method of interpretation,
 after preparing and arranging a history, does not content itself with
 examining the operations and disquisitions of the mind like common
 logic, but also inspects the nature of things, we so regulate the mind
 that it may be enabled to apply itself in every respect correctly to
 that nature. On that account we deliver numerous and various precepts
 in our doctrine of interpretation, so that they may apply in some
 measure to the method of discovering the quality and condition of the
 subject matter of investigation.
 
 CXXVIII. Let none even doubt whether we are anxious to destroy and
 demolish the philosophy, arts, and sciences, which are now in use.
 On the contrary, we readily cherish their practice, cultivation,
 and honor; for we by no means interfere to prevent the prevalent
 system from encouraging discussion, adorning discourses, or being
 employed serviceably in the chair of the professor or the practice
 of common life, and being taken, in short, by general consent as
 current coin. Nay, we plainly declare, that the system we offer will
 not be very suitable for such purposes, not being easily adapted
 to vulgar apprehensions, except by effects and works. To show our
 sincerity in professing our regard and friendly disposition toward
 the received sciences, we can refer to the evidence of our published
 writings (especially our books on the Advancement of Learning). We
 will not, therefore, endeavor to evince it any further by words; but
 content ourselves with steadily and professedly premising, that no
 great progress can be made by the present methods in the theory or
 contemplation of science, and that they cannot be made to produce any
 very abundant effects.
 
 CXXIX. It remains for us to say a few words on the excellence of our
 proposed end. If we had done so before, we might have appeared merely
 to express our wishes, but now that we have excited hope and removed
 prejudices, it will perhaps have greater weight. Had we performed and
 completely accomplished the whole, without frequently calling in others
 to assist in our labors, we should then have refrained from saying
 any more, lest we should be thought to extol our own deserts. Since,
 however, the industry of others must be quickened, and their courage
 roused and inflamed, it is right to recall some points to their memory.
 
 First, then, the introduction of great inventions appears one of the
 most distinguished of human actions, and the ancients so considered it;
 for they assigned divine honors to the authors of inventions, but only
 heroic honors to those who displayed civil merit (such as the founders
 of cities and empire legislators, the deliverers of their country from
 lasting misfortunes, the quellers of tyrants, and the like). And if any
 one rightly compare them, he will find the judgment of antiquity to be
 correct; for the benefits derived from inventions may extend to mankind
 in general, but civil benefits to particular spots alone; the latter,
 moreover, last but for a time, the former forever. Civil reformation
 seldom is carried on without violence and confusion, while inventions
 are a blessing and a benefit without injuring or afflicting any.
 
 Inventions are also, as it were, new creations and imitations of divine
 works, as was expressed by the poet:[69]
 
   "Primum frugiferos foetus mortalibus aegris
    Dididerant quondam praestanti nomine Athenae
    Et _recreaverunt_ vitam legesque rogarunt."
 
 And it is worthy of remark in Solomon, that while he flourished in the
 possession of his empire, in wealth, in the magnificence of his works,
 in his court, his household, his fleet, the splendor of his name, and
 the most unbounded admiration of mankind, he still placed his glory in
 none of these, but declared[70] that it is the glory of God to conceal
 a thing, but the glory of a king to search it out.
 
 Again, let any one but consider the immense difference between men's
 lives in the most polished countries of Europe, and in any wild and
 barbarous region of the new Indies, he will think it so great, that man
 may be said to be a god unto man, not only on account of mutual aid and
 benefits, but from their comparative states--the result of the arts,
 and not of the soil or climate.
 
 Again, we should notice the force, effect, and consequences of
 inventions, which are nowhere more conspicuous than in those three
 which were unknown to the ancients; namely, printing, gunpowder, and
 the compass. For these three have changed the appearance and state of
 the whole world: first in literature, then in warfare, and lastly in
 navigation; and innumerable changes have been thence derived, so that
 no empire, sect, or star, appears to have exercised a greater power and
 influence on human affairs than these mechanical discoveries.
 
 It will, perhaps, be as well to distinguish three species and degrees
 of ambition. First, that of men who are anxious to enlarge their own
 power in their country, which is a vulgar and degenerate kind; next,
 that of men who strive to enlarge the power and empire of their country
 over mankind, which is more dignified but not less covetous; but if one
 were to endeavor to renew and enlarge the power and empire of mankind
 in general over the universe, such ambition (if it may be so termed)
 is both more sound and more noble than the other two. Now the empire of
 man over things is founded on the arts and sciences alone, for nature
 is only to be commanded by obeying her.
 
 Besides this, if the benefit of any particular invention has had such
 an effect as to induce men to consider him greater than a man, who has
 thus obliged the whole race, how much more exalted will that discovery
 be, which leads to the easy discovery of everything else! Yet (to
 speak the truth) in the same manner as we are very thankful for light
 which enables us to enter on our way, to practice arts, to read, to
 distinguish each other, and yet sight is more excellent and beautiful
 than the various uses of light; so is the contemplation of things as
 they are, free from superstition or imposture, error or confusion, much
 more dignified in itself than all the advantage to be derived from
 discoveries.
 
 Lastly, let none be alarmed at the objection of the arts and sciences
 becoming depraved to malevolent or luxurious purposes and the like, for
 the same can be said of every worldly good; talent, courage, strength,
 beauty, riches, light itself, and the rest. Only let mankind regain
 their rights over nature, assigned to them by the gift of God, and
 obtain that power, whose exercise will be governed by right reason and
 true religion.
 
 CXXX. But it is time for us to lay down the art of interpreting nature,
 to which we attribute no absolute necessity (as if nothing could be
 done without it) nor perfection, although we think that our precepts
 are most useful and correct. For we are of opinion, that if men had
 at their command a proper history of nature and experience, and would
 apply themselves steadily to it, and could bind themselves to two
 things: 1, to lay aside received opinions and notions; 2, to restrain
 themselves, till the proper season, from generalization, they might,
 by the proper and genuine exertion of their minds, fall into our way
 of interpretation without the aid of any art. For interpretation is
 the true and natural act of the mind, when all obstacles are removed:
 certainly, however, everything will be more ready and better fixed by
 our precepts.
 
 Yet do we not affirm that no addition can be made to them; on the
 contrary, considering the mind in its connection with things, and not
 merely relatively to its own powers, we ought to be persuaded that the
 art of invention can be made to grow with the inventions themselves.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 
 [2] Bacon uses the term in its ancient sense, and means one who,
 knowing the occult properties of bodies, is able to startle the
 ignorant by drawing out of them wonderful and unforeseen changes. See
 the 85th aphorism of this book, and the 5th cap. book iii. of the De
 Augmentis Scientiarum, where he speaks more clearly.--_Ed._
 
 [3] By this term axiomata, Bacon here speaks of general principles, or
 universal laws. In the 19th aphorism he employs the term to express
 any proposition collected from facts by induction, and thus fitted to
 become the starting-point of deductive reasoning. In the last and more
 rigorous sense of the term, Bacon held they arose from experience. See
 Whewell's "Philosophy of the Inductive Sciences," vol. i. p. 74; and
 Mill's "Logic," vol. i. p. 311; and the June "Quarterly," 1841, for the
 modern phase of the discussion.--_Ed._
 
 [4] Bacon here attributes to the Aristotelian logic the erroneous
 consequences which sprung out of its abuse. The demonstrative forms it
 exhibits, whether verbally or mathematically expressed, are necessary
 to the support, verification, and extension of induction, and when
 the propositions they embrace are founded on an accurate and close
 observation of facts, the conclusions to which they lead, even in moral
 science, may be regarded as certain as the facts wrested out of nature
 by direct experiment. In physics such forms are absolutely required
 to generalize the results of experience, and to connect intermediate
 axioms with laws still more general, as is sufficiently attested by the
 fact, that no science since Bacon's day has ceased to be experimental
 by the mere method of induction, and that all become exact only so far
 as they rise above experience, and connect their isolated phenomena
 with general laws by the principles of deductive reasoning. So far,
 then, are these forms from being useless, that they are absolutely
 essential to the advancement of the sciences, and in no case can be
 looked on as detrimental, except when obtruded in the place of direct
 experiment, or employed as a means of deducing conclusions about nature
 from imaginary hypotheses and abstract conceptions. This had been
 unfortunately the practice of the Greeks. From the rapid development
 geometry received in their hands, they imagined the same method would
 lead to results equally brilliant in natural science, and snatching up
 some abstract principle, which they carefully removed from the test of
 experiment, imagined they could reason out from it all the laws and
 external appearances of the universe. The scholastics were impelled
 along the same path, not only by precedent, but by profession. Theology
 was the only science which received from them a consistent development,
 and the _a priori_ grounds on which it rested prevented them from
 employing any other method in the pursuit of natural phenomena. Thus,
 forms of demonstration, in themselves accurate, and of momentous value
 in their proper sphere, became confounded with fable, and led men into
 the idea they were exploring truth when they were only accurately
 deducing error from error. One principle ever so slightly deflected,
 like a false quantity in an equation, could be sufficient to infect the
 whole series of conclusions of which it was the base; and though the
 philosopher might subsequently deduce a thousand consecutive inferences
 with the utmost accuracy or precision, he would only succeed in drawing
 out very methodically nine hundred and ninety-nine errors.--_Ed._
 
 [5] It would appear from this and the two preceding aphorisms, that
 Bacon fell into the error of denying the utility of the syllogism in
 the very part of inductive science where it is essentially required.
 Logic, like mathematics, is purely a formal process, and must, as
 the scaffolding to the building, be employed to arrange facts in the
 structure of a science, and not to form any portion of its groundwork,
 or to supply the materials of which the system is to be composed. The
 word syllogism, like most other psychological terms, has no fixed or
 original signification, but is sometimes employed, as it was by the
 Greeks, to denote general reasoning, and at others to point out the
 formal method of deducing a particular inference from two or more
 general propositions. Bacon does not confine the term within the
 boundaries of express definition, but leaves us to infer that he took
 it in the latter sense, from his custom of associating the term with
 the wranglings of the schools. The scholastics, it is true, abused the
 deductive syllogism, by employing it in its naked, skeleton-like form,
 and confounding it with the whole breadth of logical theory; but their
 errors are not to be visited on Aristotle, who never dreamed of playing
 with formal syllogisms, and, least of all, mistook the descending for
 the ascending series of inference. In our mind we are of accord with
 the Stagyrite, who propounds, as far as we can interpret him, two modes
 of investigating truth--the one by which we ascend from particular and
 singular facts to general laws and axioms, and the other by which we
 descend from universal propositions to the individual cases which they
 virtually include. Logic, therefore, must equally vindicate the formal
 purity of the synthetic illation by which it ascends to the whole, as
 the analytic process by which it descends to the parts. The deductive
 and inductive syllogism are of equal significance in building up any
 body of truth, and whoever restricts logic to either process, mistakes
 one-half of its province for the whole; and if he acts upon his error,
 will paralyze his methods, and strike the noblest part of science with
 sterility.--_Ed._
 
 [6] The Latin is, _ad ea quae revera sunt naturae notiora_. This
 expression, _naturae notiora_, _naturae notior_, is so frequently
 employed by Bacon, that we may conclude it to point to some
 distinguishing feature in the Baconian physics. It properly refers
 to the most evident principles and laws of nature, and springs from
 that system which regards the material universe as endowed with
 intelligence, and acting according to rules either fashioned or clearly
 understood by itself.--_Ed._
 
 [7] This Borgia was Alexander VI., and the expedition alluded to that
 in which Charles VIII. overran the Italian peninsula in five months.
 Bacon uses the same illustration in concluding his survey of natural
 philosophy, in the second book of the "De Augmentis."--_Ed._
 
 [8] _Ratio eorum qui acatalepsiam tenuerunt._ Bacon alludes to
 the members of the later academy, who held the #akatalepsia#, or the
 impossibility of comprehending anything. His translator, however, makes
 him refer to the sceptics, who neither dogmatized about the known or
 the unknown, but simply held, that as all knowledge was relative, #pros
 panta ti#, man could never arrive at absolute truth, and therefore could
 not with certainty affirm or deny anything.--_Ed._
 
 [9] It is argued by Hallam, with some appearance of truth, that idols
 is not the correct translation of #eidola#, from which the original
 idola is manifestly derived; but that Bacon used it in the literal
 sense attached to it by the Greeks, as a species of illusion, or false
 appearance, and not as a species of divinity before which the mind bows
 down. If Hallam be right, Bacon is saved from the odium of an analogy
 which his foreign commentators are not far wrong in denouncing as
 barbarous; but this service is rendered at the expense of the men who
 have attached an opposite meaning to the word, among whom are Brown,
 Playfair and Dugald Stewart.--_Ed._
 
 [10] We cannot see how these idols have less to do with sophistical
 paralogisms than with natural philosophy. The process of scientific
 induction involves only the first elements of reasoning, and presents
 such a clear and tangible surface, as to allow no lurking-place for
 prejudice; while questions of politics and morals, to which the
 deductive method, or common logic, as Bacon calls it, is peculiarly
 applicable, are ever liable to be swayed or perverted by the prejudices
 he enumerates. After mathematics, physical science is the least
 amenable to the illusions of feeling; each portion having been already
 tested by experiment and observation, is fitted into its place in the
 system, with all the rigor of the geometrical method; affection or
 prejudice cannot, as in matters of taste, history or religion, select
 fragmentary pieces, and form a system of their own. The whole must be
 admitted, or the structure of authoritative reason razed to the ground.
 It is needless to say that the idols enumerated present only another
 interpretation of the substance of logical fallacies.--_Ed._
 
 [11] The propensity to this illusion may be viewed in the spirit of
 system, or hasty generalization, which is still one of the chief
 obstacles in the path of modern science.--_Ed._
 
 [12] Though Kepler had, when Bacon wrote this, already demonstrated his
 three great laws concerning the elliptical path of the planets, neither
 Bacon nor Descartes seems to have known or assented to his discoveries.
 Our author deemed the startling astronomical announcements of his time
 to be mere theoretic solutions of the phenomena of the heavens, not so
 perfect as those advanced by antiquity, but still deserving a praise
 for the ingenuity displayed in their contrivance. Bacon believed a
 hundred such systems might exist, and though true in their explanation
 of phenomena, yet might all more or less differ, according to the
 preconceived notions which their framers brought to the survey of the
 heavens. He even thought he might put in his claim to the notice of
 posterity for his astronomical ingenuity, and, as Ptolemy had labored
 by means of epicycles and eccentrics, and Kepler with ellipses, to
 explain the laws of planetary motion, Bacon thought the mystery would
 unfold itself quite as philosophically through spiral labyrinths and
 serpentine lines. What the details of his system were, we are left to
 conjecture, and that from a very meagre but naive account of one of his
 inventions which he has left in his Miscellany MSS.--_Ed._
 
 [13] _Hinc elementum ignis cum orbe suo introductum est._ Bacon saw
 in fire the mere result of a certain combination of action, and
 was consequently led to deny its elementary character. The ancient
 physicists attributed an orbit to each of the four elements, into which
 they resolved the universe, and supposed their spheres to involve each
 other. The orbit of the earth was in the centre, that of fire at the
 circumference. For Bacon's inquisition into the nature of heat, and its
 complete failure, see the commencement of the second book of the Novum
 Organum.--_Ed._
 
 [14] Robert Fludd is the theorist alluded to, who had supposed the
 gravity of the earth to be ten times heavier than water, that of water
 ten times heavier than air, and that of air ten times heavier than
 fire.--_Ed._
 
 [15] Diagoras. The same allusion occurs in the second part of the
 Advancement of Learning, where Bacon treats of the idols of the mind.
 
 [16] A scholastic term, to signify the two eternities of past and
 future duration, that stretch out on both sides of the narrow isthmus
 (time) occupied by man. It must be remembered that Bacon lived before
 the doctrine of limits gave rise to the higher calculus, and therefore
 could have no conception of different denominations of infinities:
 on the other hand he would have thought the man insane who should
 have talked to him about lines infinitely great, inclosing angles
 infinitely little; that a right line, which is a right line so long
 as it is finite, by changing infinitely little its direction, becomes
 an infinite curve, and that a curve may become infinitely less than
 another curve; that there are infinite squares and infinite cubes, and
 infinites of infinites, all greater than one another, and the last
 but one of which is nothing in comparison with the last. Yet half a
 century sufficed from Bacon's time, to make this nomenclature, which
 would have appeared to him the excess of frenzy, not only reasonable
 but necessary, to grasp the higher demonstrations of physical
 science.--_Ed._
 
 [17] Spinoza, in his letter to Oldenberg (Op. Posth. p. 398), considers
 this aphorism based on a wrong conception of the origin of error,
 and, believing it to be fundamental, was led to reject Bacon's method
 altogether. Spinoza refused to acknowledge in man any such thing as a
 will, and resolved all his volitions into particular acts, which he
 considered to be as fatally determined by a chain of physical causes as
 any effects in nature.--_Ed._
 
 [18] _Operatio spirituum in corporibus tangibilibus._ Bacon
 distinguished with the schools the gross and tangible parts of bodies,
 from such as were volatile and intangible. These, in conformity with
 the scholastic language, he terms spirits, and frequently returns to
 their operations in the 2d book.--_Ed._
 
 [19] Democritus, of Abdera, a disciple of Leucippus, born B.C. 470,
 died 360; all his works are destroyed. He is said to be the author of
 the doctrine of atoms: he denied the immortality of the soul, and first
 taught that the milky way was occasioned by a confused light from a
 multitude of stars. He may be considered as the parent of experimental
 philosophy, in the prosecution of which he was so ardent as to declare
 that he would prefer the discovery of one of the causes of natural
 phenomena, to the possession of the diadem of Persia. Democritus
 imposed on the blind credulity of his contemporaries, and, like Roger
 Bacon, astonished them by his inventions.--_Ed._
 
 [20] The Latin is _actus purus_, another scholastic expression to
 denote the action of the substance, which composes the essence of the
 body apart from its accidental qualities. For an exposition of the
 various kinds of motions he contemplates, the reader may refer to the
 48th aphorism of the 2d book.--_Ed._
 
 [21] The scholastics after Aristotle distinguished in a subject three
 modes of beings: viz., the power or faculty, the act, and the habitude,
 or in other words that which is able to exist, what exists actually,
 and what continues to exist. Bacon means that is necessary to fix our
 attention not on that which can or ought to be, but on that which
 actually is; not on the right, but on the fact.--_Ed._
 
 [22] The inference to be drawn from this is to suspect that kind of
 evidence which is most consonant to our inclinations, and not to admit
 any notion as real except we can base it firmly upon that kind of
 demonstration which is peculiar to the subject, not to our impression.
 Sometimes the mode of proof may be consonant to our inclinations, and
 to the subject at the same time, as in the case of Pythagoras, when he
 applied his beloved numbers to the solution of astronomical phenomena;
 or in that of Descartes, when he reasoned geometrically concerning the
 nature of the soul. Such examples cannot be censured with justice,
 inasmuch as the methods pursued were adapted to the end of the inquiry.
 The remark in the text can only apply to those philosophers who attempt
 to build up a moral or theological system by the instruments of
 induction alone, or who rush, with the geometrical axiom, and the _a
 priori_ syllogism, to the investigation of nature. The means in such
 cases are totally inadequate to the object in view.--_Ed._
 
 [23] Gilbert lived toward the close of the sixteenth century, and was
 court physician to both Elizabeth and James. In his work alluded to
 in the text he continually asserts the advantages of the experimental
 over the _a priori_ method in physical inquiry, and succeeded when
 his censor failed in giving a practical example of the utility of his
 precepts. His "De Magnete" contains all the fundamental parts of the
 science, and these so perfectly treated, that we have nothing to add to
 them at the present day.
 
 Gilbert adopted the Copernican system, and even spoke of the contrary
 theory as utterly absurd, grounding his argument on the vast velocities
 which such a supposition requires us to ascribe to the heavenly
 bodies.--_Ed._
 
 [24] The Latin text adds "without end"; but Bacon is scarcely right
 in supposing that the descent from complex ideas and propositions to
 those of simple nature, involve the analyst in a series of continuous
 and interminable definitions. For in the gradual and analytical scale,
 there is a bar beyond which we cannot go, as there is a summit bounded
 by the limited variations of our conceptions. Logical definitions, to
 fulfil their conditions, or indeed to be of any avail, must be given in
 simpler terms than the object which is sought to be defined; now this,
 in the case of primordial notions and objects of sense, is impossible;
 therefore we are obliged to rest satisfied with the mere names of our
 perceptions.--_Ed._
 
 [25] The ancients supposed the planets to describe an exact circle
 round the south. As observations increased and facts were disclosed,
 which were irreconcilable with this supposition, the earth was removed
 from the centre to some other point in the circle, and the planets were
 supposed to revolve in a smaller circle (epicycle) round an imaginary
 point, which in its turn described a circle of which the earth was
 the centre. In proportion as observation elicited fresh facts,
 contradictory to these representations, other epicycles and eccentrics
 were added, involving additional confusion. Though Kepler had swept
 away all these complicated theories in the preceding century, by the
 demonstration of his three laws, which established the elliptical
 course of the planets, Bacon regarded him and Copernicus in the same
 light as Ptolemy and Xenophanes.--_Ed._
 
 [26] Empedocles, of Agrigentum, flourished 444 B.C. He was the
 disciple of Telanges the Pythagorean, and warmly adopted the doctrine
 of transmigration. He resolved the universe into the four ordinary
 elements, the principles of whose composition were life and happiness,
 or concord and amity, but whose decomposition brought forth death and
 evil, or discord and hatred. Heraclitus held matter to be indifferent
 to any peculiar form, but as it became rarer or more dense, it took the
 appearance of fire, air, earth and water. Fire, however, he believed to
 be the elementary principle out of which the others were evolved. This
 was also the belief of Lucretius. See book i. 783, etc.
 
 [27] It is thus the Vulcanists and Neptunians have framed their
 opposite theories in geology. Phrenology is a modern instance of hasty
 generalization.--_Ed._
 
 [28] In Scripture everything which concerns the passing interests of
 the body is called dead; the only living knowledge having regard to the
 eternal interest of the soul.--_Ed._
 
 [29] In mechanics and the general sciences, causes compound their
 effects, or in other words, it is generally possible to deduce _a
 priori_ the consequence of introducing complex agencies into any
 experiment, by allowing for the effect of each of the simple causes
 which enter into their composition. In chemistry and physiology a
 contrary law holds; the causes which they embody generally uniting
 to form distinct substances, and to introduce unforeseen laws and
 combinations. The deductive method here is consequently inapplicable,
 and we are forced back upon experiment.
 
 Bacon in the text is hardly consistent with himself, as he admits in
 the second book the doctrine, to which modern discovery points, of the
 reciprocal transmutation of the elements. What seemed poetic fiction
 in the theories of Pythagoras and Seneca, assumes the appearance of
 scientific fact in the hands of Baron Caynard.--_Ed._
 
 [30] Galileo had recently adopted the notion that nature abhorred a
 vacuum for an axiomatic principle, and it was not till Torricelli, his
 disciple, had given practical proof of the utility of Bacon's method,
 by the discovery of the barometer (1643) that this error, as also that
 expressed below, and believed by Bacon, concerning the homoeopathic
 tendencies of bodies, was destroyed.--_Ed._
 
 [31] _Donec ad materiam potentialem et informem ventum fuerit._ Nearly
 all the ancient philosophers admitted the existence of a certain
 primitive and shapeless matter as the substratum of things which the
 creative power had reduced to fixed proportions, and resolved into
 specific substances. The expression potential matter refers to that
 substance forming the basis of the Peripatetic system, which virtually
 contained all the forms that it was in the power of the efficient cause
 to draw out of it.--_Ed._
 
 [32] An allusion to the humanity of the _Sultans_, who, in their
 earlier histories are represented as signalizing their accession to
 the throne by the destruction of their family, to remove the danger of
 rivalry and the terrors of civil war.--_Ed._
 
 [33] The text is "in odium veterum sophistarum, Protagorae, Hippiae,
 et reliquorum." Those were called sophists, who, _ostentationis aut
 questus causa philosophabantur_. (Acad. Prior. ii. 72.) They had
 corrupted and degraded philosophy before Socrates. Protagoras of
 Abdera (#Abdera#), the most celebrated, taught that man is the measure
 of all things, by which he meant not only that all which can be known
 is known only as it related to our faculties, but also that apart from
 our faculties nothing can be known. The sceptics equally held that
 knowledge was probable only as it related to our faculties, but they
 stopped there, and did not, like the sophist, dogmatize about the
 unknown. The works of Protagoras were condemned for their impiety, and
 publicly burned by the aediles of Athens, who appear to have discharged
 the office of common hangmen to the literary blasphemers of their
 day.--_Ed._
 
 [34] Bacon is hardly correct in implying that the _enumerationem
 per simplicem_ was the only light in which the ancients looked upon
 induction, as they appear to have regarded it as only one, and that
 the least important, of its species. Aristotle expressly considers
 induction in a perfect or dialectic sense, and in an imperfect or
 rhetorical sense. Thus if a genus (=G=), contains four species (=A=,
 =B=, =C=, =D=), the syllogism would lead us to infer, that what is true
 of =G=, is true of any one of the four. But perfect induction would
 reason, that what we can prove of =A=, =B=, =C=, =D=, separately, we
 may properly state as true of =G=, the whole genus. This is evidently
 a formal argument as demonstrative as the syllogism. In necessary
 matters, however, legitimate induction may claim a wider province,
 and infer of the whole genus what is only apparent in a part of
 the species. Such are those inductive inferences which concern the
 laws of nature, the immutability of forms, by which Bacon strove to
 erect his new system of philosophy. The Stagyrite, however, looked
 upon _enumerationem per simplicem_, without any regard to the nature
 of the matter, or to the completeness of the species, with as much
 reprehensive caution as Bacon, and guarded his readers against it as
 the source of innumerable errors.--_Ed._
 
 [35] See Ax. lxi. toward the end. This subject extends to Ax. lxxviii.
 
 [36] Gorgias of Leontium went to Athens in 424 B.C. He and Polus were
 disciples of Empedocles, whom we have already noticed (Aphorism 63),
 where he sustained the three famous propositions, that nothing exists,
 that nothing can be known, and that it is out of the power of man
 to transmit or communicate intelligence. He is reckoned one of the
 earliest writers on the art of rhetoric, and for that reason, Plato
 called his elegant dialogue on that subject after his name.
 
 [37] Chrysippus, a stoic philosopher of Soli in Cilicia, Campestris,
 born in 280, died in the 143d Olympiad, 208 B.C. He was equally
 distinguished for natural abilities and industry, seldom suffering
 a day to elapse without writing 500 lines. He wrote several hundred
 volumes, of which three hundred were on logical subjects; but in all,
 borrowed largely from others. He was very fond of the _sorites_ in
 argument, which is hence called by Persius the heap of Chrysippus.
 He was called the Column of the Portico, a name given to the Stoical
 School from Zeno, its founder, who had given his lessons under the
 portico.
 
 Carneades, born about 215, died in 130. He attached himself to
 Chrysippus, and sustained with _eclat_ the scepticism of the academy.
 The Athenians sent him with Critolaus and Diogenes as ambassador
 to Rome, where he attracted the attention of his new auditory by
 the subtilty of his reasoning, and the fluency and vehemence of his
 language. Before Galba and Cato the Censor, he harangued with great
 variety of thought and copiousness of diction in praise of justice.
 The next day, to establish his doctrine of the uncertainty of human
 knowledge, he undertook to refute all his arguments. He maintained
 with the New Academy, that the senses, the imagination, and the
 understanding frequently deceive us, and therefore cannot be infallible
 judges of truth, but that from the impressions produced on the mind by
 means of the senses, we infer appearances of truth or probabilities.
 Nevertheless, with respect to the conduct of life, Carneades held that
 probable opinions are a sufficient guide.
 
 Xenophanes, a Greek philosopher, of Colophon, born in 556, the founder
 of the Eleatic school, which owes its fame principally to Parmenides.
 Wild in his opinions about astronomy, he supposed that the stars were
 extinguished every morning, and rekindled at night; that eclipses were
 occasioned by the temporary extinction of the sun, and that there were
 several suns for the convenience of the different climates of the
 earth. Yet this man held the chair of philosophy at Athens for seventy
 years.
 
 Philolaus, a Pythagorean philosopher of Crotona, B.C. 374. He first
 supported the diurnal motion of the earth round its axis, and its
 annual motion round the sun. Cicero (Acad. iv. 39) has ascribed this
 opinion to the Syracusan philosopher Nicetas, and likewise to Plato.
 From this passage, it is most probable that Copernicus got the idea of
 the system he afterward established. Bacon, in the Advancement of Human
 Learning, charges Gilbert with restoring the doctrines of Philolaus,
 because he ventured to support the Copernican theory.--_Ed._
 
 [38] Bacon is equally conspicuous for the use and abuse of analogical
 illustrations. The levity, as Stuart Mill very properly observes, by
 which substances float on a stream, and the levity which is synonymous
 with worthlessness, have nothing beside the name in common; and to
 show how little value there is in the figure, we need only change the
 word into buoyancy, to turn the semblance of Bacon's argument against
 himself.--_Ed._
 
 [39] We have before observed, that the New Academy did not profess
 skepticism, but the #akatalepsia#, or incomprehensibility of the
 absolute essences of things. Even modern physicists are not wanting,
 to assert with this school that the utmost knowledge we can obtain
 is relative, and necessarily short of absolute certainty. It is not
 without an appearance of truth that these philosophers maintain that
 our ideas and perceptions do not express the nature of the things which
 they represent, but only the effects of the peculiar organs by which
 they are conveyed to the understanding, so that were these organs
 changed, we should have different conceptions of their nature. That
 constitution of air which is dark to man is luminous to bats and owls.
 
 [40] Owing to the universal prevalence of Aristotelism.
 
 [41] It must be remembered, that when Bacon wrote, algebra was in its
 infancy, and the doctrine of units and infinitesimals undiscovered.
 
 [42] Because the vulgar make up the overwhelming majority in such
 decisions, and generally allow their judgments to be swayed by passion
 or prejudice.
 
 [43] See end of Axiom lxi. The subject extends to Axiom xc.
 
 [44] If we adopt the statement of Herodotus, who places the Homeric
 era 400 years back from his time, Homer lived about 900 years before
 Christ. On adding this number to the sixteen centuries of the Christian
 era which had elapsed up to Bacon's time, we get the twenty-five
 centuries he mentions. The Homeric epoch is the furthest point in
 antiquity from which Bacon could reckon with any degree of certainty.
 Hesiod, if he were not contemporary, immediately preceded him.
 
 The epoch of Greek philosophy may be included between Thales and
 Plato, that is, from the 35th to the 88th Olympiad; that of the Roman,
 between Terence and Pliny. The modern revolution, in which Bacon is
 one of the central figures, took its rise from the time of Dante and
 Petrarch, who lived at the commencement of the fourteenth century; and
 to which, on account of the invention of printing, and the universal
 spread of literature, which has rendered a second destruction of
 learning impossible, it is difficult to foresee any other end than the
 extinction of the race of man.--_Ed._
 
 [45] The allusion is evidently to Roger Bacon and Rene Descartes.--_Ed._
 
 [46] From the abuse of the scholastics, who mistook the _a priori_
 method, the deductive syllogism, for the entire province of
 logic.--_Ed._
 
 [47] See Aphorism xcv.
 
 [48] The incongruity to which Bacon alludes appears to spring from
 confounding two things, which are not only distinct, but affect human
 knowledge in inverse proportion, viz., the experience which terminates
 with life, with that experience which one century transmits to
 another.--_Ed._
 
 [49] The Chinese characters resemble, in many respects, the
 hieroglyphics of the Egyptians, being adapted to represent ideas, not
 sounds.
 
 [50] See Axiom 75.
 
 [51] The methods by which Newton carried the rule and compass to the
 boundaries of creation is a sufficient comment on the sagacity of the
 text. The same cause which globulizes a bubble, has rounded the earth,
 and the same law which draws a stone to its surface, keeps the moon in
 her orbit. It was by calculating and ascertaining these principles upon
 substances entirely at his disposal that this great philosopher was
 enabled to give us a key to unlock the mysteries of the universe.--_Ed._
 
 [52] See the "Clouds" of Aristophanes, where Socrates is represented as
 chasing Jupiter out of the sky, by resolving thunderstorms into aerial
 concussions and whirlwinds.--_Ed._
 
 [53] Robespierre was the latest victim of this bigotry. In his younger
 days he attempted to introduce Franklin's lightning conductor into
 France, but was persecuted by those whose lives he sought to protect,
 as one audaciously striving to avert the designs of Providence.--_Ed._
 
 [54] We can hardly agree with the text. The scholastics, in building
 up a system of divinity, certainly had recourse to the deductive
 syllogism, because the inductive was totally inapplicable, except as
 a verificatory process. With regard to the technical form in which
 they marshalled their arguments, which is what our author aims at in
 his censure, they owed nothing at all to Aristotle, the conducting a
 dispute in naked syllogistic fashion having originated entirely with
 themselves.--_Ed._
 
 [55] Bacon cannot be supposed to allude to those divines who have
 attempted to show that the progress of physical science is confirmatory
 of revelation, but only to such as have built up a system of faith out
 of their own refinements on nature and revelation, as Patricius and
 Emanuel Swedenborg.--_Ed._
 
 [56] Daniel xii. 4.
 
 [57] Bacon, in this Aphorism, appears to have entertained a fair
 idea of the use of the inductive and deductive methods in scientific
 inquiry, though his want of geometrical knowledge must have hindered
 him from accurately determining the precise functions of each, as
 it certainly led him in other parts of the Organon (V. Aph. 82), to
 undervalue the deductive, and, as he calls it, the dogmatic method, and
 to rely too much upon empiricism.--_Ed._
 
 [58] The reader may consult the note of the 23d Aphorism for the fault
 which Bacon censures, and, if he wish to pursue the subject further,
 may read Plato's Timaeus, where that philosopher explains his system
 in detail. Bacon, however, is hardly consistent in one part of his
 censure, for he also talks about the spirit and appetites of inanimate
 substances, and that so frequently, as to preclude the supposition that
 he is employing metaphor.--_Ed._
 
 [59] Proclus flourished about the beginning of the fifth century,
 and was the successor of Plotinus, Porphyry and Iamblicus, who, in
 the two preceding centuries, had revived the doctrines of Plato, and
 assailed the Christian religion. The allusion in the text must be
 assigned to Iamblicus, who, in the fourth century, had republished
 the Pythagorean theology of numbers, and endeavored to construct the
 world out of arithmetic, thinking everything could be solved by the
 aid of proportions and geometry. Bacon must not be understood in the
 text to censure the use but the abuse of mathematics and physical
 investigations, as in the "De Augmentis" (lib. iv. c. 6), he enumerates
 the multiplicity of demonstration scientific facts admit of, from this
 source.--_Ed._
 
 [60] See Livy, lib. ix. c. 17, where, in a digression on the probable
 effect of a contest between Rome and Alexander the Great, he says: "Non
 cum Dario rem esse dixisset: quem mulierum ac spadonum agmen trahentem
 inter purpuram atque aurum, oneratum fortunae apparatibus, praedam
 verius quam hostem, nihil aliud quam ausus vana contemnere, incruentus
 devicit."
 
 [61] The lowest axioms are such as spring from simple experience--such
 as in chemistry, that animal substances yield no fixed salt by
 calcination; in music, that concords intermixed with discords make
 harmony, etc. Intermediate axioms advance a step further, being the
 result of reflection, which, applied to our experimental knowledge,
 deduces laws from them, such as in optics of the first degree of
 generality, that the angle of incidence is equal to the angle of
 reflection; and in mechanics, Kepler's three laws of motion, while
 his general law, that all bodies attract each other with forces
 proportional to their masses, and inversely as the squares of their
 distances, may be taken as one of the highest axioms. Yet so far is
 this principle from being only notional or abstract, it has presented
 us with a key which fits into the intricate wards of the heavens, and
 has laid bare to our gaze the principal mechanism of the universe.
 But natural philosophy in Bacon's day had not advanced beyond
 intermediate axioms, and the term notional or abstract is applied to
 those general axioms then current, not founded on the solid principles
 of inductive inquiry, but based upon _a priori_ reasoning and airy
 metaphysics.--_Ed._
 
 [62] This hope has been abundantly realized in the discovery of gravity
 and the decomposition of light, mainly by the inductive method. To a
 better philosophy we may also attribute the discovery of electricity,
 galvanism and their mutual connection with each other, and magnetism,
 the inventions of the air-pump, steam-engine and the chronometer.
 
 [63] As Bacon very frequently cites these authors, a slight notice
 of their labors may not be unacceptable to the reader. Bernardinus
 Telesius, born at Cosenza, in 1508, combated the Aristotelian system
 in a work entitled "De Rerum Natura juxta propria principia," _i.e._,
 according to principles of his own. The proem of the work announces his
 design was to show that "the construction of the world, the magnitude
 and nature of the bodies contained in it, are not to be investigated by
 reasoning, which was done by the ancients, but are to be apprehended
 by the senses, and collected from the things themselves." He had,
 however, no sooner laid down this principle than he departed from it
 in practice, and pursued the deductive method he so much condemned in
 his predecessors. His first step was an assumption of principles as
 arbitrary as any of the empirical notions of antiquity; at the outset
 of his book he very quietly takes it for granted that heat is the
 principle of motion, cold of immobility, matter being assumed as the
 corporeal substratum, in which these incorporeal and active agents
 carry on their operations. Out of these abstract and ill-defined
 conceptions Telesius builds up a system quite as complete, symmetrical,
 and imaginative as any of the structures of antiquity.
 
 Francis Patricius, born at Cherso, in Dalmatia, about 1529, was another
 physicist who rose up against Aristotle, and announced the dawn of a
 new philosophy. In 1593 appeared his "Nova de Universis Philosophia."
 He lays down a string of axioms, in which scholastic notions, physical
 discoveries, and theological dogmas, are strangely commingled, and
 erects upon them a system which represents all the grotesque features
 of theological empiricism.
 
 Severinus, born in Jutland, in 1529, published an attack on Aristotle's
 natural history, but adopted fantasies which the Stagyrite ridiculed
 in his own day. He was a follower of Paracelsus, a Swiss enthusiast
 of the fifteenth century, who ignored the ancient doctrine of the
 four elements for salt, sulphur and mercury, and allied chemistry and
 medicine with mysticism.--_Ed._
 
 [64] Bacon's apology is sound, and completely answers those German
 and French critics, who have refused him a niche in the philosophical
 pantheon. One German commentator, too modest to reveal his name,
 accuses Bacon of ignorance of the calculus, though, in his day, Wallis
 had not yet stumbled upon the laws of continuous fractions; while
 Count de Maistre, in a coarse attack upon his genius, expresses his
 astonishment at finding Bacon unacquainted with discoveries which were
 not heard of till a century after his death.--_Ed._
 
 [65] Philip of Macedon.
 
 [66] See Plato's Timaeus.
 
 [67] The saying of Philocrates when he differed from Demosthenes.--_Ed._
 
 [68] The old error of placing the deductive syllogism in antagonism to
 the inductive, as if they were not both parts of one system or refused
 to cohere together. So far from there being any radical opposition
 between them, it would not be difficult to show that Bacon's method
 was syllogistic in his sense of the term. For the suppressed premise
 of every Baconian enthymeme, viz., the acknowledged uniformity of the
 laws of nature as stated in the axiom, whatever has once occurred will
 occur again, must be assumed as the basis of every conclusion which he
 draws before we can admit its legitimacy. The opposition, therefore,
 of Bacon's method could not be directed against the old logic, for
 it assumed and exemplified its principles, but rather to the abusive
 application which the ancients made of this science, on turning its
 powers to the development of abstract principles which they imagined
 to be pregnant with the solution of the latent mysteries of the
 universe. Bacon justly overthrew these ideal notions, and accepted of
 no principle as a basis which was not guaranteed by actual experiment
 and observation; and so far he laid the foundations of a sound
 philosophy by turning the inductive logic to its proper account in the
 interpretation of nature.
 
 [69] This is the opening of the Sixth Book of Lucretius. Bacon probably
 quoted from memory; the lines are--
 
   "Primae frugiferos foetus mortalibus aegris
    Dididerunt quondam praeclaro nomine Athenae
    Et recreaverunt," etc.
 
    The teeming corn, that feeble mortals crave,
    First, and long since, renowned Athens gave,
    And cheered their life--then taught to frame their laws.
 
 [70] Prov. xxv. 2.
 
 
 
 
 APHORISMS--BOOK II
 
 ON THE INTERPRETATION OF NATURE, OR THE REIGN OF MAN
 
 
 I. To generate and superinduce a new nature or new natures, upon a
 given body, is the labor and aim of human power: while to discover the
 form or true difference of a given nature, or the nature[71] to which
 such nature is owing, or source from which it emanates (for these terms
 approach nearest to an explanation of our meaning), is the labor and
 discovery of human knowledge; and subordinate to these primary labors
 are two others of a secondary nature and inferior stamp. Under the
 first must be ranked the transformation of concrete bodies from one to
 another, which is possible within certain limits; under the second, the
 discovery, in every species of generation and motion, of the latent
 and uninterrupted process from the manifest efficient and manifest
 subject matter up to the given form: and a like discovery of the latent
 conformation of bodies which are at rest instead of being in motion.
 
 II. The unhappy state of man's actual knowledge is manifested even
 by the common assertions of the vulgar. It is rightly laid down that
 true knowledge is that which is deduced from causes. The division of
 four causes also is not amiss: matter, form, the efficient, and end
 or final cause.[72] Of these, however, the latter is so far from
 being beneficial, that it even corrupts the sciences, except in the
 intercourse of man with man. The discovery of form is considered
 desperate. As for the efficient cause and matter (according to the
 present system of inquiry and the received opinions concerning them,
 by which they are placed remote from, and without any latent process
 toward form), they are but desultory and superficial, and of scarcely
 any avail to real and active knowledge. Nor are we unmindful of our
 having pointed out and corrected above the error of the human mind, in
 assigning the first qualities of essence to forms.[73] For although
 nothing exists in nature except individual bodies,[74] exhibiting clear
 individual effects according to particular laws, yet in each branch of
 learning, that very law, its investigation, discovery, and development,
 are the foundation both of theory and practice. This law, therefore,
 and its parallel in each science, is what we understand by the term
 form,[75] adopting that word because it has grown into common use, and
 is of familiar occurrence.
 
 III. He who has learned the cause of a particular nature (such as
 whiteness or heat), in particular subjects only, has acquired but
 an imperfect knowledge: as he who can induce a certain effect upon
 particular substances only, among those which are susceptible of it,
 has acquired but an imperfect power. But he who has only learned the
 efficient and material cause (which causes are variable and mere
 vehicles conveying form to particular substances) may perhaps arrive
 at some new discoveries in matters of a similar nature, and prepared
 for the purpose, but does not stir the limits of things which are much
 more deeply rooted; while he who is acquainted with forms, comprehends
 the unity of nature in substances apparently most distinct from each
 other. He can disclose and bring forward, therefore (though it has
 never yet been done), things which neither the vicissitudes of nature,
 nor the industry of experiment, nor chance itself, would ever have
 brought about, and which would forever have escaped man's thoughts;
 from the discovery of forms, therefore, results genuine theory and free
 practice.
 
 IV. Although there is a most intimate connection, and almost an
 identity between the ways of human power and human knowledge, yet,
 on account of the pernicious and inveterate habit of dwelling upon
 abstractions, it is by far the safest method to commence and build
 up the sciences from those foundations which bear a relation to the
 practical division, and to let them mark out and limit the theoretical.
 We must consider, therefore, what precepts, or what direction or guide,
 a person would most desire, in order to generate and superinduce any
 nature upon a given body: and this not in abstruse, but in the plainest
 language.
 
 For instance, if a person should wish to superinduce the yellow color
 of gold upon silver, or an additional weight (observing always the laws
 of matter) or transparency on an opaque stone, or tenacity in glass,
 or vegetation on a substance which is not vegetable, we must (I say)
 consider what species of precept or guide this person would prefer.
 And, first, he will doubtless be anxious to be shown some method that
 will neither fail in effect, nor deceive him in the trial of it;
 secondly, he will be anxious that the prescribed method should not
 restrict him and tie him down to peculiar means, and certain particular
 methods of acting; for he will, perhaps, be at loss, and without the
 power or opportunity of collecting and procuring such means. Now if
 there be other means and methods (besides those prescribed) of creating
 such a nature, they will perhaps be of such a kind as are in his
 power, yet by the confined limits of the precept he will be deprived
 of reaping any advantage from them; thirdly, he will be anxious to be
 shown something not so difficult as the required effect itself, but
 approaching more nearly to practice.
 
 We will lay this down, therefore, as the genuine and perfect rule of
 practice, that it should be certain, free and preparatory, or having
 relation to practice. And this is the same thing as the discovery of a
 true form; for the form of any nature is such, that when it is assigned
 the particular nature infallibly follows. It is, therefore, always
 present when that nature is present, and universally attests such
 presence, and is inherent in the whole of it. The same form is of such
 a character, that if it be removed the particular nature infallibly
 vanishes. It is, therefore, absent, whenever that nature is absent,
 and perpetually testifies such absence, and exists in no other nature.
 Lastly, the true form is such, that it deduces the particular nature
 from some source of essence existing in many subjects, and more known
 (as they term it) to nature, than the form itself. Such, then, is our
 determination and rule with regard to a genuine and perfect theoretical
 axiom, that a nature be found convertible with a given nature, and yet
 such as to limit the more known nature, in the manner of a real genus.
 But these two rules, the practical and theoretical, are in fact the
 same, and that which is most useful in practice is most correct in
 theory.
 
 V. But the rule or axiom for the transformation of bodies is of two
 kinds. The first regards the body as an aggregate or combination of
 simple natures. Thus, in gold are united the following circumstances:
 it is yellow, heavy, of a certain weight, malleable and ductile to a
 certain extent; it is not volatile, loses part of its substance by
 fire, melts in a particular manner, is separated and dissolved by
 particular methods, and so of the other natures observable in gold.
 An axiom, therefore, of this kind deduces the subject from the forms
 of simple natures; for he who has acquired the forms and methods of
 superinducing yellowness, weight, ductility, stability, deliquescence,
 solution, and the like, and their degrees and modes, will consider and
 contrive how to unite them in any body, so as to transform[76] it into
 gold. And this method of operating belongs to primary action; for it is
 the same thing to produce one or many simple natures, except that man
 is more confined and restricted in his operations, if many be required,
 on account of the difficulty of uniting many natures together. It must,
 however, be observed, that this method of operating (which considers
 natures as simple though in a concrete body) sets out from what is
 constant, eternal, and universal in nature, and opens such broad paths
 to human power, as the thoughts of man can in the present state of
 things scarcely comprehend or figure to itself.
 
 The second kind of axiom (which depends on the discovery of the latent
 process) does not proceed by simple natures, but by concrete bodies,
 as they are found in nature and in its usual course. For instance,
 suppose the inquiry to be, from what beginnings, in what manner, and by
 what process gold or any metal or stone is generated from the original
 menstruum, or its elements, up to the perfect mineral: or, in like
 manner, by what process plants are generated, from the first concretion
 of juices in the earth, or from seeds, up to the perfect plant, with
 the whole successive motion, and varied and uninterrupted efforts of
 nature; and the same inquiry be made as to a regularly deduced system
 of the generation of animals from coition to birth, and so on of other
 bodies.
 
 Nor is this species of inquiry confined to the mere generation of
 bodies, but it is applicable to other changes and labors of nature.
 For instance, where an inquiry is made into the whole series and
 continued operation of the nutritive process, from the first reception
 of the food to its complete assimilation to the recipient;[77] or
 into the voluntary motion of animals, from the first impression of
 the imagination, and the continuous effects of the spirits, up to the
 bending and motion of the joints; or into the free motion of the tongue
 and lips, and other accessories which give utterance to articulate
 sounds. For all these investigations relate to concrete or associated
 natures artificially brought together, and take into consideration
 certain particular and special habits of nature, and not those
 fundamental and general laws which constitute forms. It must, however,
 be plainly owned, that this method appears more prompt and easy, and of
 greater promise than the primary one.
 
 In like manner the operative branch, which answers to this
 contemplative branch, extends and advances its operation from that
 which is usually observed in nature, to other subjects immediately
 connected with it, or not very remote from such immediate connection.
 But the higher and radical operations upon nature depend entirely
 on the primary axioms. Besides, even where man has not the means
 of acting, but only of acquiring knowledge, as in astronomy (for
 man cannot act upon, change, or transform the heavenly bodies), the
 investigation of facts or truth, as well as the knowledge of causes
 and coincidences, must be referred to those primary and universal
 axioms that regard simple natures; such as the nature of spontaneous
 rotation, attraction, or the magnetic force, and many others which
 are more common than the heavenly bodies themselves. For let no one
 hope to determine the question whether the earth or heaven revolve in
 the diurnal motion, unless he have first comprehended the nature of
 spontaneous rotation.
 
 VI. But the latent process of which we speak, is far from being obvious
 to men's minds, beset as they now are. For we mean not the measures,
 symptoms, or degrees of any process which can be exhibited in the
 bodies themselves, but simply a continued process, which, for the most
 part, escapes the observation of the senses.
 
 For instance, in all generations and transformations of bodies, we must
 inquire, what is in the act of being lost and escaping, what remains,
 what is being added, what is being diluted, what is being contracted,
 what is being united, what is being separated, what is continuous, what
 is broken off, what is urging forward, what impedes, what predominates,
 what is subservient, and many other circumstances.
 
 Nor are these inquiries again to be made in the mere generation
 and transformation of bodies only, but in all other alterations and
 fluctuations we must in like manner inquire; what precedes, what
 succeeds, what is quick, what is slow, what produces and what governs
 motion, and the like. All which matters are unknown and unattempted by
 the sciences, in their present heavy and inactive state. For, since
 every natural act is brought about by the smallest efforts,[78] or at
 least such as are too small to strike our senses, let no one hope that
 he will be able to direct or change nature unless he have properly
 comprehended and observed these efforts.
 
 VII. In like manner, the investigation and discovery of the latent
 conformation in bodies is no less new, than the discovery of the
 latent process and form. For we as yet are doubtless only admitted to
 the antechamber of nature, and do not prepare an entrance into her
 presence-room. But nobody can endue a given body with a new nature, or
 transform it successfully and appropriately into a new body, without
 possessing a complete knowledge of the body so to be changed or
 transformed. For he will run into vain, or, at least, into difficult
 and perverse methods, ill adapted to the nature of the body upon which
 he operates. A clear path, therefore, toward this object also must be
 thrown open, and well supported.
 
 Labor is well and usefully bestowed upon the anatomy of organized
 bodies, such as those of men and animals, which appears to be a subtile
 matter, and a useful examination of nature. The species of anatomy,
 however, is that of first sight, open to the senses, and takes place
 only in organized bodies. It is obvious, and of ready access, when
 compared with the real anatomy of latent conformation in bodies which
 are considered similar, particularly in specific objects and their
 parts; as those of iron, stone, and the similar parts of plants and
 animals, as the root, the leaf, the flower, the flesh, the blood,
 and bones, etc. Yet human industry has not completely neglected this
 species of anatomy; for we have an instance of it in the separation of
 similar bodies by distillation, and other solutions, which shows the
 dissimilarity of the compound by the union of the homogeneous parts.
 These methods are useful, and of importance to our inquiry, although
 attended generally with fallacy: for many natures are assigned and
 attributed to the separate bodies, as if they had previously existed in
 the compound, which, in reality, are recently bestowed and superinduced
 by fire and heat, and the other modes of separation. Besides, it is,
 after all, but a small part of the labor of discovering the real
 conformation in the compound, which is so subtile and nice, that it is
 rather confused and lost by the operation of the fire, than discovered
 and brought to light.
 
 A separation and solution of bodies, therefore, is to be effected, not
 by fire indeed, but rather by reasoning and true induction, with the
 assistance of experiment, and by a comparison with other bodies, and a
 reduction to those simple natures and their forms which meet, and are
 combined in the compound; and we must assuredly pass from Vulcan to
 Minerva, if we wish to bring to light the real texture and conformation
 of bodies, upon which every occult and (as it is sometimes called)
 specific property and virtue of things depends, and whence also every
 rule of powerful change and transformation is deduced.
 
 For instance, we must examine what spirit is in every body,[79]
 what tangible essence; whether that spirit is copious and exuberant,
 or meagre and scarce, fine or coarse, aeriform or igniform, active
 or sluggish, weak or robust, progressive or retrograde, abrupt or
 continuous, agreeing with external and surrounding objects, or
 differing from them, etc. In like manner must we treat tangible essence
 (which admits of as many distinctions as the spirit), and its hairs,
 fibres, and varied texture. Again, the situation of the spirit in
 the corporeal mass, its pores, passages, veins, and cells, and the
 rudiments or first essays of the organic body, are subject to the
 same examination. In these, however, as in our former inquiries, and
 therefore in the whole investigation of latent conformation, the only
 genuine and clear light which completely dispels all darkness and
 subtile difficulties, is admitted by means of the primary axioms.
 
 VIII. This method will not bring us to atoms,[80] which takes for
 granted the vacuum, and immutability of matter (neither of which
 hypotheses is correct), but to the real particles such as we discover
 them to be. Nor is there any ground for alarm at this refinement
 as if it were inexplicable, for, on the contrary, the more inquiry
 is directed to simple natures, the more will everything be placed
 in a plain and perspicuous light, since we transfer our attention
 from the complicated to the simple, from the incommensurable to
 the commensurable, from surds to rational quantities, from the
 indefinite and vague to the definite and certain; as when we arrive
 at the elements of letters, and the simple tones of concords. The
 investigation of nature is best conducted when mathematics are applied
 to physics. Again, let none be alarmed at vast numbers and fractions,
 for in calculation it is as easy to set down or to reflect upon a
 thousand as a unit, or the thousandth part of an integer as an integer
 itself.
 
 IX.[81] From the two kinds of axioms above specified, arise the two
 divisions of philosophy and the sciences, and we will use the commonly
 adopted terms which approach the nearest to our meaning, in our own
 sense. Let the investigation of forms, which (in reasoning at least,
 and after their own laws), are eternal and immutable, constitute
 metaphysics,[82] and let the investigation of the efficient cause of
 matter, latent process, and latent conformation (which all relate
 merely to the ordinary course of nature, and not to her fundamental and
 eternal laws), constitute physics. Parallel to these, let there be two
 practical divisions; to physics that of mechanics, and to metaphysics
 that of magic, in the purest sense of the term, as applied to its ample
 means, and its command over nature.
 
 X. The object of our philosophy being thus laid down, we proceed to
 precepts, in the most clear and regular order. The signs for the
 interpretation of nature comprehend two divisions; the first regards
 the eliciting or creating of axioms from experiment, the second the
 deducing or deriving of new experiments from axioms. The first admits
 of three subdivisions into ministrations. 1. To the senses. 2. To the
 memory. 3. To the mind or reason.
 
 For we must first prepare as a foundation for the whole, a complete
 and accurate natural and experimental history. We must not imagine or
 invent, but discover the acts and properties of nature.
 
 But natural and experimental history is so varied and diffuse, that
 it confounds and distracts the understanding unless it be fixed
 and exhibited in due order. We must, therefore, form tables and
 co-ordinations of instances, upon such a plan, and in such order that
 the understanding may be enabled to act upon them.
 
 Even when this is done, the understanding, left to itself and to its
 own operation, is incompetent and unfit to construct its axioms without
 direction and support. Our third ministration, therefore, must be true
 and legitimate induction, the very key of interpretation. We must
 begin, however, at the end, and go back again to the others.
 
 XI. The investigation of forms proceeds thus: a nature being given, we
 must first present to the understanding all the known instances which
 agree in the same nature, although the subject matter be considerably
 diversified. And this collection must be made as a mere history, and
 without any premature reflection, or too great degree of refinement.
 For instance; take the investigation of the form of heat.
 
 _Instances agreeing in the Form of Heat_
 
 1. The rays of the sun, particularly in summer, and at noon.
 
 2. The same reflected and condensed, as between mountains, or along
 walls, and particularly in burning mirrors.
 
 3. Ignited meteors.
 
 4. Burning lightning.
 
 5. Eruptions of flames from the cavities of mountains, etc.
 
 6. Flame of every kind.
 
 7. Ignited solids.
 
 8. Natural warm baths.
 
 9. Warm or heated liquids.
 
 10. Warm vapors and smoke; and the air itself, which admits a most
 powerful and violent heat if confined, as in reverberating furnaces.
 
 11. Damp hot weather, arising from the constitution of the air, without
 any reference to the time of the year.
 
 12. Confined and subterraneous air in some caverns, particularly in
 winter.
 
 13. All shaggy substances, as wool, the skins of animals, and the
 plumage of birds, contain some heat.
 
 14. All bodies, both solid and liquid, dense and rare (as the air
 itself), placed near fire for any time.
 
 15. Sparks arising from the violent percussion of flint and steel.
 
 16. All bodies rubbed violently, as stone, wood, cloth, etc., so that
 rudders, and axles of wheels, sometimes catch fire, and the West
 Indians obtain fire by attrition.
 
 17. Green and moist vegetable matter confined and rubbed together,
 as roses, peas in baskets; so hay, if it be damp when stacked, often
 catches fire.
 
 18. Quicklime sprinkled with water.
 
 19. Iron, when first dissolved by acids in a glass, and without any
 application to fire; the same of tin, but not so intensely.
 
 20. Animals, particularly internally; although the heat is not
 perceivable by the touch in insects, on account of their small size.
 
 21. Horse dung, and the like excrement from other animals, when fresh.
 
 22. Strong oil of sulphur and of vitriol exhibit the operation of heat
 in burning linen.
 
 23. As does the oil of marjoram, and like substances, in burning the
 bony substance of the teeth.
 
 24. Strong and well rectified spirits of wine exhibit the same effects;
 so that white of eggs when thrown into it grows hard and white, almost
 in the same manner as when boiled, and bread becomes burned and brown
 as if toasted.
 
 25. Aromatic substances and warm plants, as the dracunculus [arum], old
 nasturtium, etc., which, though they be not warm to the touch (whether
 whole or pulverized), yet are discovered by the tongue and palate to be
 warm and almost burning when slightly masticated.
 
 26. Strong vinegar and all acids, on any part of the body not clothed
 with the epidermis, as the eye, tongue, or any wounded part, or where
 the skin is removed, excite a pain differing but little from that
 produced by heat.
 
 27. Even a severe and intense cold produces a sensation of burning.[83]
 
   "Nec Boreae penetrabile frigus adurit."
 
 28. Other instances.
 
 We are wont to call this a table of existence and presence.
 
 XII. We must next present to the understanding instances which do not
 admit of the given nature, for form (as we have observed) ought no less
 to be absent where the given nature is absent, than to be present where
 it is present. If, however, we were to examine every instance, our
 labor would be infinite.
 
 Negatives, therefore, must be classed under the affirmatives, and the
 want of the given nature must be inquired into more particularly in
 objects which have a very close connection with those others in which
 it is present and manifest. And this we are wont to term a table of
 deviation or of absence in proximity.
 
 _Proximate Instances wanting the Nature of Heat_
 
 The rays of the moon, stars, and comets, are not found to be warm to
 the touch, nay, the severest cold has been observed to take place
 at the full of the moon. Yet the larger fixed stars are supposed to
 increase and render more intense the heat of the sun, as he approaches
 them, when the sun is in the sign of the Lion, for instance, and in the
 dog-days.[84]
 
 The rays of the sun in what is called the middle region of the air
 give no heat, to account for which the commonly assigned reason is
 satisfactory; namely, that that region is neither sufficiently near to
 the body of the sun whence the rays emanate, nor to the earth whence
 they are reflected. And the fact is manifested by snow being perpetual
 on the tops of mountains, unless extremely lofty. But it is observed,
 on the other hand, by some, that at the Peak of Teneriffe, and also
 among the Andes of Peru, the tops of the mountains are free from snow,
 which only lies in the lower part as you ascend. Besides, the air on
 the summit of these mountains is found to be by no means cold, but only
 thin and sharp; so much so, that in the Andes it pricks and hurts the
 eyes from its extreme sharpness, and even excites the orifice of the
 stomach and produces vomiting. The ancients also observed, that the
 rarity of the air on the summit of Olympus was such, that those who
 ascended it were obliged to carry sponges moistened with vinegar and
 water, and to apply them now and then to their nostrils, as the air was
 not dense enough for their respiration; on the summit of which mountain
 it is also related, there reigned so great a serenity and calm, free
 from rain, snow, or wind, that the letters traced upon the ashes of the
 sacrifices on the altar of Jupiter, by the fingers of those who had
 offered them, would remain undisturbed till the next year. Those even,
 who at this day go to the top of the Peak of Teneriffe, walk by night
 and not in the daytime, and are advised and pressed by their guides, as
 soon as the sun rises, to make haste in their descent, on account of
 the danger (apparently arising from the rarity of the atmosphere), lest
 their breathing should be relaxed and suffocated.[85]
 
 The reflection of the solar rays in the polar regions is found to
 be weak and inefficient in producing heat, so that the Dutch, who
 wintered in Nova Zembla, and expected that their vessel would be
 freed about the beginning of July from the obstruction of the mass of
 ice which had blocked it up, were disappointed and obliged to embark
 in their boat. Hence the direct rays of the sun appear to have but
 little power even on the plain, and when reflected, unless they are
 multiplied and condensed, which takes place when the sun tends more
 to the perpendicular; for, then, the incidence of the rays occurs at
 more acute angles, so that the reflected rays are nearer to each other,
 while, on the contrary, when the sun is in a very oblique position,
 the angles of incidence are very obtuse, and the reflected rays at a
 greater distance. In the meantime it must be observed, that there may
 be many operations of the solar rays, relating, too, to the nature of
 heat, which are not proportioned to our touch, so that, with regard to
 us, they do not tend to produce warmth, but, with regard to some other
 bodies, have their due effect in producing it.
 
 Let the following experiment be made. Take a lens the reverse of a
 burning-glass, and place it between the hand and the solar rays, and
 observe whether it diminish the heat of the sun as a burning-glass
 increases it. For it is clear, with regard to the visual rays, that in
 proportion as the lens is made of unequal thickness in the middle and
 at its sides, the images appear either more diffused or contracted. It
 should be seen, therefore, if the same be true with regard to heat.
 
 Let the experiment be well tried, whether the lunar rays can be
 received and collected by the strongest and best burning-glasses, so as
 to produce even the least degree of heat.[86] But if that degree be,
 perhaps, so subtile and weak, as not to be perceived or ascertained
 by the touch, we must have recourse to those glasses which indicate
 the warm or cold state of the atmosphere, and let the lunar rays fall
 through the burning-glass on the top of this thermometer, and then
 notice if the water be depressed by the heat.[87]
 
 Let the burning-glass be tried on warm objects which emit no luminous
 rays, as heated but not ignited iron or stone, or hot water, or the
 like; and observe whether the heat become increased and condensed, as
 happens with the solar rays.
 
 Let it be tried on common flame.
 
 The effect of comets (if we can reckon them among meteors[88]) in
 augmenting the heat of the season is not found to be constant or
 clear, although droughts have generally been observed to follow them.
 However, luminous lines, and pillars, and openings, and the like,
 appear more often in winter than in summer, and especially with the
 most intense cold but joined with drought. Lightning, and coruscations,
 and thunder, however, rarely happen in winter; and generally at the
 time of the greatest heats. The appearances we term falling stars are
 generally supposed to consist of some shining and inflamed viscous
 substance, rather than of violently hot matter; but let this be further
 investigated.
 
 Some coruscations emit light without burning, but are never accompanied
 by thunder.
 
 Eructations and eruptions of flame are to be found in cold climates
 as well as in hot, as in Iceland and Greenland; just as the trees of
 cold countries are sometimes inflammable and more pitchy and resinous
 than in warm, as the fir, pine, and the like. But the position and
 nature of the soil, where such eruptions are wont to happen, is not yet
 sufficiently investigated to enable us to subjoin a negative instance
 to the affirmative.
 
 All flame is constantly more or less warm, and this instance is not
 altogether negative; yet it is said that the ignis fatuus (as it is
 called), and which sometimes is driven against walls, has but little
 heat; perhaps it resembles that of spirits of wine, which is mild and
 gentle. That flame, however, appears yet milder, which in some well
 authenticated and serious histories is said to have appeared round the
 head and hair of boys and virgins, and instead of burning their hair,
 merely to have played about it. And it is most certain that a sort of
 flash, without any evident heat, has sometimes been seen about a horse
 when sweating at night, or in damp weather. It is also a well known
 fact,[89] and it was almost considered as a miracle, that a few years
 since a girl's apron sparkled when a little shaken or rubbed, which
 was, perhaps, occasioned by the alum or salts with which the apron
 was imbued, and which, after having been stuck together and incrusted
 rather strongly, were broken by the friction. It is well known that
 all sugar, whether candied or plain, if it be hard, will sparkle when
 broken or scraped in the dark. In like manner sea and salt water is
 sometimes found to shine at night when struck violently by the oar. The
 foam of the sea when agitated by tempests also sparkles at night, and
 the Spaniards call this appearance the sea's lungs. It has not been
 sufficiently ascertained what degree of heat attends the flame which
 the ancient sailors called Castor and Pollux, and the moderns call
 St. Ermus' fire.
 
 Every ignited body that is red-hot is always warm, although without
 flame, nor is any negative instance subjoined to this affirmative.
 Rotten wood, however, approaches nearly to it, for it shines at night,
 and yet is not found to be warm; and the putrefying scales of fish
 which shine in the same manner are not warm to the touch, nor the body
 of the glowworm, or of the fly called Lucciola.[90]
 
 The situation and nature of the soil of natural warm baths has not been
 sufficiently investigated, and therefore a negative instance is not
 subjoined.
 
 To the instances of warm liquids we may subjoin the negative one of the
 peculiar nature of liquids in general; for no tangible liquid is known
 that is at once warm in its nature and constantly continues warm; but
 their heat is only superinduced as an adventitious nature for a limited
 time, so that those which are extremely warm in their power and effect,
 as spirits of wine, chemical aromatic oils, the oils of vitriol and
 sulphur, and the like, and which speedily burn, are yet cold at first
 to the touch, and the water of natural baths, poured into any vessel
 and separated from its source, cools down like water heated by the
 fire. It is, however, true that oily substances are rather less cold
 to the touch than those that are aqueous, oil for instance than water,
 silk than linen; but this belongs to the table of degrees of cold.
 
 In like manner we may subjoin a negative instance to that of warm
 vapor, derived from the nature of vapor itself, as far as we are
 acquainted with it. For exhalations from oily substances, though easily
 inflammable, are yet never warm unless recently exhaled from some warm
 substance.
 
 The same may be said of the instance of air; for we never perceive that
 air is warm unless confined or pressed, or manifestly heated by the
 sun, by fire, or some other warm body.
 
 A negative instance is exhibited in weather by its coldness with an
 east or north wind, beyond what the season would lead us to expect,
 just as the contrary takes place with the south or west winds. An
 inclination to rain (especially in winter) attends warm weather, and to
 frost cold weather.
 
 A negative instance as to air confined in caverns may be observed in
 summer. Indeed, we should make a more diligent inquiry into the nature
 of confined air. For in the first place the qualities of air in its own
 nature with regard to heat and cold may reasonably be the subject of
 doubt; for air evidently derives its heat from the effects of celestial
 bodies, and possibly its cold from the exhalation of the earth, and
 in the mid region of air (as it is termed) from cold vapors and snow,
 so that no judgment can be formed of the nature of air by that which
 is out of doors and exposed, but a more correct one might be derived
 from confined air. It is necessary, however, that the air should be
 inclosed in a vessel of such materials as would not imbue it with heat
 or cold of themselves, nor easily admit the influence of the external
 atmosphere. The experiment should be made, therefore, with an earthen
 jar, covered with folds of leather to protect it from the external
 air, and the air should be kept three or four days in this vessel well
 closed. On opening the jar, the degree of heat may be ascertained
 either by the hand or a graduated glass tube.
 
 There is a similar doubt as to whether the warmth of wool, skins,
 feathers, and the like, is derived from a slight inherent heat, since
 they are animal excretions, or from their being of a certain fat and
 oily nature that accords with heat, or merely from the confinement and
 separation of air which we spoke of in the preceding paragraph;[91] for
 all air appears to possess a certain degree of warmth when separated
 from the external atmosphere. Let an experiment be made, therefore,
 with fibrous substances of linen, and not of wool, feathers, or silk,
 which are animal excretions. For it is to be observed that all powders
 (where air is manifestly inclosed) are less cold than the substances
 when whole, just as we imagine froth (which contains air) to be less
 cold than the liquid itself.
 
 We have here no exactly negative instance, for we are not acquainted
 with any body tangible or spirituous which does not admit of heat when
 exposed to the fire. There is, however, this difference, that some
 admit it more rapidly, as air, oil, and water, others more slowly, as
 stone and metals.[92] This, however, belongs to the table of degrees.
 
 No negative is here subjoined, except the remark that sparks are not
 kindled by flint and steel, or any other hard substance, unless some
 small particles of the stone or metal are struck off, and that the air
 never forms them by friction, as is commonly supposed; besides, the
 sparks from the weight of the ignited substance have a tendency to
 descend rather than to rise, and when extinguished become a sort of
 dark ash.
 
 We are of opinion that here again there is no negative; for we are not
 acquainted with any tangible body which does not become decidedly warm
 by friction, so that the ancients feigned that the gods had no other
 means or power of creating heat than the friction of air, by rapid
 and violent rotation. On this point, however, further inquiry must be
 made, whether bodies projected by machines (as balls from cannon) do
 not derive some degree of heat from meeting the air, which renders
 them somewhat warm when they fall. The air in motion rather cools
 than heats, as in the winds, the bellows, or breath when the mouth is
 contracted. The motion, however, in such instances is not sufficiently
 rapid to excite heat, and is applied to a body of air, and not to its
 component parts, so that it is not surprising that heat should not be
 generated.
 
 We must make a more diligent inquiry into this instance; for herbs and
 green and moist vegetables appear to possess a latent heat, so small,
 however, as not to be perceived by the touch in single specimens, but
 when they are united and confined, so that their spirit cannot exhale
 into the air, and they rather warm each other, their heat is at once
 manifested, and even flame occasionally in suitable substances.
 
 Here, too, we must make a more diligent inquiry; for quicklime, when
 sprinkled with water, appears to conceive heat, either from its being
 collected into one point (as we observed of herbs when confined), or
 from the irritation and exasperation of the fiery spirit by water,
 which occasions a conflict and struggle. The true reason will more
 readily be shown if oil be used instead of water, for oil will
 equally tend to collect the confined spirit, but not to irritate.
 The experiment may be made more general, both by using the ashes and
 calcined products of different bodies and by pouring different liquids
 upon them.
 
 A negative instance may be subjoined of other metals which are more
 soft and soluble; for leaf gold dissolved by aqua regia, or lead by
 aqua fortis, are not warm to the touch while dissolving, no more is
 quicksilver (as far as I remember), but silver excites a slight heat,
 and so does copper, and tin yet more plainly, and most of all iron and
 steel, which excite not only a powerful heat, but a violent bubbling.
 The heat, therefore, appears to be occasioned by the struggle which
 takes place when these strong dissolvents penetrate, dig into, and tear
 asunder the parts of those substances, while the substances themselves
 resist. When, however, the substances yield more easily, scarcely any
 heat is excited.
 
 There is no negative instance with regard to the heat of animals,
 except in insects (as has been observed), owing to their small size;
 for in fishes, as compared with land animals, a lower degree rather
 than a deprivation of heat is observable. In plants and vegetables,
 both as to their exudations and pith when freshly exposed, there is no
 sensible degree of heat. But in animals there is a great difference
 in the degree, both in particular parts (for the heat varies near the
 heart, the brain, and the extremities) and in the circumstances in
 which they are placed, such as violent exercise and fevers.
 
 Here, again, there is scarcely a negative instance. I might add that
 the excrements of animals, even when they are no longer fresh, possess
 evidently some effective heat, as is shown by their enriching the soil.
 
 Such liquids (whether oily or watery) as are intensely acrid exhibit
 the effects of heat, by the separation and burning of bodies after
 some little action upon them, yet they are not at first warm to the
 touch, but they act according to their affinity and the pores of the
 substances to which they are applied; for aqua regia dissolves gold but
 not silver--on the contrary, aqua fortis dissolves silver but not gold;
 neither of them dissolves glass, and so of the rest.
 
 Let spirits of wine be tried on wood, or butter, wax, or pitch, to see
 if this will melt them at all by their heat; for the twenty-fourth
 instance shows that they possess properties resembling those of heat in
 causing incrustation. Let an experiment also be made with a graduated
 glass or calendar,[93] concave at the top, by pouring well-rectified
 spirits of wine into the cavity, and covering it up in order that they
 may the better retain their heat, then observe whether their heat make
 the water descend.
 
 Spices and acrid herbs are sensibly warm to the palate, and still
 more so when taken internally; one should see, therefore, on what
 other substances they exhibit the effects of heat. Now, sailors tell
 us that when large quantities of spices are suddenly opened, after
 having been shut up for some time, there is some danger of fever and
 inflammation to those who stir them or take them out. An experiment
 might, therefore, be made whether such spices and herbs, when produced,
 will, like smoke, dry fish and meat hung up over them.
 
 There is an acrid effect and a degree of penetration in cold liquids,
 such as vinegar and oil of vitriol, as well as in warm, such as oil of
 marjoram and the like; they have, therefore, an equal effect in causing
 animated substances to smart, and separating and consuming inanimate
 parts. There is not any negative instance as to this, nor does there
 exist any animal pain unaccompanied by the sensation of heat.
 
 There are many effects common to cold and heat, however different
 in their process; for snowballs appear to burn boys' hands after
 a little time, and cold no less than fire preserves bodies from
 putrefaction--besides both heat and cold contract bodies. But it is
 better to refer these instances and the like to the investigation of
 cold.
 
 XIII. In the third place we must exhibit to the understanding the
 instances in which that nature, which is the object of our inquiries,
 is present in a greater or less degree, either by comparing its
 increase and decrease in the same object, or its degree in different
 objects; for since the form of a thing is its very essence, and the
 thing only differs from its form as the apparent from the actual
 object, or the exterior from the interior, or that which is considered
 with relation to man from that which is considered with relation to the
 universe; it necessarily follows that no nature can be considered a
 real form which does not uniformly diminish and increase with the given
 nature. We are wont to call this our Table of Degrees, or Comparative
 Instances.
 
 _Table of the Degrees or Comparative Instances of Heat_
 
 We will first speak of those bodies which exhibit no degree of heat
 sensible to the touch, but appear rather to possess a potential heat,
 or disposition and preparation for it. We will then go on to others,
 which are actually warm to the touch, and observe the strength and
 degree of it.
 
 1. There is no known solid or tangible body which is by its own nature
 originally warm; for neither stone, metal, sulphur, fossils, wood,
 water, nor dead animal carcasses are found warm. The warm springs in
 baths appear to be heated accidentally, by flame, subterraneous fire
 (such as is thrown up by Etna and many other mountains), or by the
 contact of certain bodies, as heat is exhibited in the dissolution of
 iron and tin. The degree of heat, therefore, in inanimate objects is
 not sensible to our touch; but they differ in their degrees of cold,
 for wood and metal are not equally cold.[94] This, however, belongs to
 the Table of Degrees of Cold.
 
 2. But with regard to potential heat and predisposition to flame, we
 find many inanimate substances wonderfully adapted to it, as sulphur,
 naphtha, and saltpetre.
 
 3. Bodies which have previously acquired heat, as horse dung from the
 animal, or lime, and perhaps ashes and soot from fire, retain some
 latent portion of it. Hence distillations and separations of substances
 are effected by burying them in horse dung, and heat is excited in
 lime by sprinkling it with water (as has been before observed).
 
 4. In the vegetable world we know of no plant, nor part of any plant
 (as the exudations or pith) that is warm to man's touch. Yet (as we
 have before observed) green weeds grow warm when confined, and some
 vegetables are warm and others cold to our internal touch, _i.e._, the
 palate and stomach, or even after a while to our external skin (as is
 shown in plasters and ointments).
 
 5. We know of nothing in the various parts of animals, when dead or
 detached from the rest, that is warm to the touch; for horse dung
 itself does not retain its heat, unless it be confined and buried. All
 dung, however, appears to possess a potential heat, as in manuring
 fields; so also dead bodies are endued with this latent and potential
 heat to such a degree, that in cemeteries where people are interred
 daily the earth acquires a secret heat, which consumes any recently
 deposited body much sooner than pure earth; and they tell you that the
 people of the East are acquainted with a fine soft cloth, made of the
 down of birds, which can melt butter wrapped gently up in it by its own
 warmth.
 
 6. Manures, such as every kind of dung, chalk, sea-sand, salt and the
 like, have some disposition toward heat.
 
 7. All putrefaction exhibits some slight degree of heat, though not
 enough to be perceptible by the touch; for neither the substances which
 by putrefaction are converted into animalculae,[95] as flesh and cheese,
 nor rotten wood which shines in the dark, are warm to the touch. The
 heat, however, of putrid substances displays itself occasionally in a
 disgusting and strong scent.
 
 8. The first degree of heat, therefore, in substances which are warm
 to the human touch appears to be that of animals, and this admits of a
 great variety of degrees, for the lowest (as in insects) is scarcely
 perceptible, the highest scarcely equals that of the sun's rays in
 warm climates and weather, and is not so acute as to be insufferable
 to the hand. It is said, however, of Constantius, and some others of
 a very dry constitution and habit of body, that when attacked with
 violent fevers, they became so warm as to appear almost to burn the
 hand applied to them.
 
 9. Animals become more warm by motion and exercise, wine and feasting,
 venery, burning fevers, and grief.
 
 10. In the paroxysm of intermittent fevers the patients are at first
 seized with cold and shivering, but soon afterward become more heated
 than at first--in burning and pestilential fevers they are hot from the
 beginning.
 
 11. Let further inquiry be made into the comparative heat of different
 animals, as fishes, quadrupeds, serpents, birds, and also of the
 different species, as the lion, the kite, or man; for, according to the
 vulgar opinion, fishes are the least warm internally, and birds the
 most, particularly doves, hawks, and ostriches.
 
 12. Let further inquiry be made as to the comparative heat in different
 parts and limbs of the same animal; for milk, blood, seed, and eggs are
 moderately warm, and less hot than the outward flesh of the animal when
 in motion or agitated. The degree of heat of the brain, stomach, heart,
 and the rest, has not yet been equally well investigated.
 
 13. All animals are externally cold in winter and cold weather, but are
 thought to be internally warmer.
 
 14. The heat of the heavenly bodies, even in the warmest climates and
 seasons, never reaches such a pitch as to light or burn the driest wood
 or straw, or even tinder without the aid of burning-glasses. It can,
 however, raise vapor from moist substances.
 
 15. Astronomers tell us that some stars are hotter than others. Mars
 is considered the warmest after the Sun, then Jupiter, then Venus. The
 Moon and, above all, Saturn, are considered to be cold. Among the fixed
 stars Sirius is thought the warmest, then Cor Leonis or Regulus, then
 the lesser Dog-star.
 
 16. The sun gives out more heat as it approaches toward the
 perpendicular or zenith, which may be supposed to be the case with the
 other planets, according to their degree of heat; for instance, that
 Jupiter gives out more heat when situated beneath Cancer or Leo than
 when he is beneath Capricorn and Aquarius.
 
 17. It is to be supposed that the sun and other planets give more
 heat in perigee, from their approximation to the earth, than when in
 apogee. But if in any country the sun should be both in its perigee
 and nearer to the perpendicular at the same time, it must necessarily
 give out more heat than in a country where it is also in perigee,
 but situated more obliquely; so that the comparative altitude of the
 planets should be observed, and their approach to or declination from
 the perpendicular in different countries.
 
 18. The sun and other planets are thought also to give out more heat in
 proportion as they are nearer to the larger fixed stars, as when the
 sun is in Leo he is nearer Cor Leonis, Cauda Leonis, Spica Virginis,
 Sirius, and the lesser Dog-star, than when he is in Cancer, where,
 however, he approaches nearer to the perpendicular. It is probable,
 also, that the quarters of the heavens produce a greater heat (though
 not perceptibly), in proportion as they are adorned with a greater
 number of stars, particularly those of the first magnitude.
 
 19. On the whole, the heat of the heavenly bodies is augmented in three
 ways: 1. The approach to the perpendicular; 2. Proximity or their
 perigee; 3. The conjunction or union of stars.
 
 20. There is a very considerable difference between the degree of heat
 in animals, and even in the rays of the heavenly bodies (as they reach
 us), and the heat of the most gentle flame, and even of all ignited
 substances, nay, liquids, or the air itself when unusually heated by
 fire. For the flame of spirit of wine, though diffused and uncollected,
 is yet able to set straw, linen, or paper on fire, which animal heat,
 or that of the sun, will never accomplish without a burning-glass.
 
 21. There are, however, many degrees of strength and weakness in flame
 and ignited bodies: but no diligent inquiry has been made in this
 respect, and we must, therefore, pass it hastily over. Of all flames,
 that of spirits of wine appears to be the most gentle, except perhaps
 the ignis fatuus, or the flashes from the perspiration of animals.
 After this we should be inclined to place the flame of light and porous
 vegetables, such as straw, reeds, and dried leaves; from which the
 flame of hair or feathers differs but little. Then, perhaps, comes
 the flame of wood, particularly that which contains but little rosin
 or pitch; that of small wood, however (such as is usually tied up in
 fagots), is milder than that of the trunks or roots of trees. This can
 be easily tried in iron furnaces, where a fire of fagots or branches
 of trees is of little service. Next follows the flame of oil, tallow,
 wax, and the like oily and fat substances, which are not very violent.
 But a most powerful heat is found in pitch and rosin, and a still
 greater in sulphur, camphor, naphtha, saltpetre, and salts (after they
 have discharged their crude matter), and in their compounds; as in
 gunpowder, Greek fire (vulgarly called wild fire), and its varieties,
 which possess such a stubborn heat as scarcely to be extinguished by
 water.
 
 22. We consider that the flame which results from some imperfect metals
 is very strong and active; but on all these points further inquiry
 should be made.
 
 23. The flame of vivid lightning appears to exceed all the above, so as
 sometimes to have melted even wrought iron into drops, which the other
 flames cannot accomplish.
 
 24. In ignited bodies there are different degrees of heat, concerning
 which, also, a diligent inquiry has not been made. We consider the
 faintest heat to be that of tinder, touchwood, and dry rope match,
 such as is used for discharging cannon. Next follows that of ignited
 charcoal or cinders, and even bricks, and the like; but the most
 violent is that of ignited metals, as iron, copper, and the like.
 Further inquiry, however, must be made into this also.
 
 25. Some ignited bodies are found to be much warmer than some flames;
 for instance, red hot iron is much warmer, and burns more than the
 flame of spirits of wine.
 
 26. Some bodies even not ignited, but only heated by the fire, as
 boiling water, and the air confined in reverberatories, surpass in heat
 many flames and ignited substances.
 
 27. Motion increases heat,[96] as is shown in the bellows and the
 blowpipe; for the harder metals are not dissolved or melted by steady
 quiet fire, without the aid of the blowpipe.
 
 28. Let an experiment be made with burning-glasses; in which respect I
 have observed, that if a glass be placed at the distance of ten inches,
 for instance, from the combustible object, it does not kindle or burn
 it so readily, as if the glass be placed at the distance of five inches
 (for instance), and be then gradually and slowly withdrawn to the
 distance of ten inches. The cone and focus of the rays, however, are
 the same, but the mere motion increases the effect of the heat.
 
 29. Conflagrations, which take place with a high wind, are thought to
 make greater way against than with the wind, because when the wind
 slackens, the flame recoils more rapidly than it advances when the wind
 is favorable.
 
 30. Flame does not burst out or arise unless it have some hollow
 space to move and exert itself in, except in the exploding flame of
 gunpowder, and the like, where the compression and confinement of the
 flame increase its fury.
 
 31. The anvil becomes so hot by the hammer, that if it were a thin
 plate it might probably grow red, like ignited iron by repeated
 strokes. Let the experiment be tried.
 
 32. But in ignited bodies that are porous, so as to leave room for the
 fire to move itself, if its motion be prevented by strong compression,
 the fire is immediately extinguished; thus it is with tinder, or the
 burning snuff of a candle or lamp, or even hot charcoal or cinders;
 for when they are squeezed by snuffers, or the foot, and the like, the
 effect of the fire instantly ceases.
 
 33. The approach toward a hot body increases heat in proportion to the
 approximation; a similar effect to that of light, for the nearer any
 object is placed toward the light, the more visible it becomes.
 
 34. The[97] union of different heats increases heat, unless the
 substances be mixed; for a large and small fire in the same spot tend
 mutually to increase each other's heat, but lukewarm water poured into
 boiling water cools it.
 
 35. The continued neighborhood of a warm body increases heat. For the
 heat, which perpetually passes and emanates from it, being mixed with
 that which preceded it, multiplies the whole. A fire, for instance,
 does not warm a room in half an hour as much as the same fire would in
 an hour. This does not apply to light, for a lamp or candle placed in
 a spot gives no more light by remaining there, than it did at first.
 
 36. The irritation of surrounding cold increases heat, as may be seen
 in fires during a sharp frost. We think that this is owing not merely
 to the confinement and compression of the heat (which forms a sort
 of union), but also by the exasperation of it, as when the air or a
 stick are violently compressed or bent, they recoil, not only to the
 point they first occupied, but still further back. Let an accurate
 experiment, therefore, be made with a stick, or something of the kind,
 put into the flame, in order to see whether it be not sooner burned at
 the sides than in the middle of it.[98]
 
 37. There are many degrees in the susceptibility of heat. And, first,
 it must be observed how much a low gentle heat changes and partially
 warms even the bodies least susceptible of it. For even the heat of the
 hand imparts a little warmth to a ball of lead or other metal held a
 short time in it; so easily is heat transmitted and excited, without
 any apparent change in the body.
 
 38. Of all bodies that we are acquainted with, air admits and loses
 heat the most readily, which is admirably seen in weather-glasses,
 whose construction is as follows: Take a glass with a hollow belly, and
 a thin and long neck; turn it upside down, and place it with its mouth
 downward into another glass vessel containing water; the end of the
 tube touching the bottom of the vessel, and the tube itself leaning a
 little on the edge, so as to be fixed upright. In order to do this more
 readily, let a little wax be applied to the edge, not, however, so as
 to block up the orifice, lest, by preventing the air from escaping, the
 motion, which we shall presently speak of, and which is very gentle and
 delicate, should be impeded.
 
 Before the first glass be inserted in the other, its upper part (the
 belly) should be warmed at the fire. Then upon placing it as we have
 described, the air (which was dilated by the heat), after a sufficient
 time has been allowed for it to lose the additional temperature, will
 restore and contract itself to the same dimensions as that of the
 external or common atmosphere at the moment of immersion, and the water
 will be attracted upward in the tube to a proportionate extent. A long
 narrow slip of paper should be attached to the tube, divided into as
 many degrees as you please. You will then perceive, as the weather
 grows warmer or colder, that the air contracts itself into a narrower
 space in cold weather and dilates in the warm, which will be exhibited
 by the rising of the water as the air contracts itself, and its
 depression as the air dilates. The sensibility of the air with regard
 to heat or cold is so delicate and exquisite, that it far exceeds the
 human touch, so that a ray of sunshine, the heat of the breath, and
 much more, that of the hand placed on the top of the tube, immediately
 causes an evident depression of the water. We think, however, that the
 spirit of animals possesses a much more delicate susceptibility of heat
 and cold, only that it is impeded and blunted by the grossness of their
 bodies.
 
 39. After air, we consider those bodies to be most sensible of heat,
 which have been recently changed and contracted by cold, as snow and
 ice; for they begin to be dissolved and melt with the first mild
 weather. Next, perhaps, follows quicksilver; then greasy substances,
 as oil, butter, and the like; then wood; then water; lastly, stones
 and metals, which do not easily grow hot, particularly toward their
 centre.[99] When heated, however, they retain their temperature for
 a very long time; so that a brick or stone, or hot iron, plunged in
 a basin of cold water, and kept there for a quarter of an hour or
 thereabout, retains such a heat as not to admit of being touched.
 
 40. The less massive the body is, the more readily it grows warm at the
 approach of a heated body, which shows that heat with us is somewhat
 averse to a tangible mass.[100]
 
 41. Heat with regard to the human senses and touch is various and
 relative, so that lukewarm water appears hot if the hand be cold, and
 cold if the hand be hot.
 
 XIV. Any one may readily see how poor we are in history, since in the
 above tables, besides occasionally inserting traditions and report
 instead of approved history and authentic instances (always, however,
 adding some note if their credit or authority be doubtful), we are
 often forced to subjoin, "Let the experiment be tried--Let further
 inquiry be made."
 
 XV. We are wont to term the office and use of these three tables the
 presenting a review of instances to the understanding; and when this
 has been done, induction itself is to be brought into action. For on an
 individual review of all the instances a nature is to be found, such
 as always to be present and absent with the given nature, to increase
 and decrease with it, and, as we have said, to form a more common
 limit of the nature. If the mind attempt this affirmatively from the
 first (which it always will when left to itself), there will spring up
 phantoms, mere theories and ill-defined notions, with axioms requiring
 daily correction. These will, doubtless, be better or worse, according
 to the power and strength of the understanding which creates them. But
 it is only for God (the bestower and creator of forms), and perhaps
 for angels and intelligences, at once to recognize forms affirmatively
 at the first glance of contemplation: man, at lest, is unable to do so,
 and is only allowed to proceed first by negatives, and then to conclude
 with affirmatives, after every species of exclusion.
 
 XVI. We must, therefore, effect a complete solution and separation of
 nature; not by fire, but by the mind, that divine fire. The first work
 of legitimate induction, in the discovery of forms, is rejection, or
 the exclusive instances of individual natures, which are not found in
 some one instance where the given nature is present, or are found in
 any one instance where it is absent, or are found to increase in any
 one instance where the given nature decreases, or the reverse. After an
 exclusion correctly effected, an affirmative form will remain as the
 residuum, solid, true, and well defined, while all volatile opinions
 go off in smoke. This is readily said; but we must arrive at it by a
 circuitous route. We shall perhaps, however, omit nothing that can
 facilitate our progress.
 
 XVII. The first and almost perpetual precaution and warning which
 we consider necessary is this; that none should suppose from the
 great part assigned by us to forms, that we mean such forms as the
 meditations and thoughts of men have hitherto been accustomed to. In
 the first place, we do not at present mean the concrete forms, which
 (as we have observed) are in the common course of things compounded
 of simple natures, as those of a lion, an eagle, a rose, gold, or the
 like. The moment for discussing these will arrive when we come to treat
 of the latent process and latent conformation, and the discovery of
 them as they exist in what are called substances, or concrete natures.
 
 Nor again, would we be thought to mean (even when treating of simple
 natures) any abstract forms or ideas, either undefined or badly defined
 in matter. For when we speak of forms, we mean nothing else than those
 laws and regulations of simple action which arrange and constitute any
 simple nature, such as heat, light, weight, in every species of matter,
 and in a susceptible subject. The form of heat or form of light,
 therefore, means no more than the law of heat or the law of light.
 Nor do we ever abstract or withdraw ourselves from things, and the
 operative branch of philosophy. When, therefore, we say (for instance)
 in our investigation of the form of heat, Reject rarity, or, Rarity is
 not of the form of heat, it is the same as if we were to say, Man can
 superinduce heat on a dense body, or the reverse, Man can abstract or
 ward off heat from a rare body.
 
 But if our forms appear to any one to be somewhat abstracted, from
 their mingling and uniting heterogeneous objects (the heat, for
 instance, of the heavenly bodies appears to be very different from that
 of fire; the fixed red of the rose and the like, from that which is
 apparent in the rainbow, or the radiation of opal or the diamond;[101]
 death by drowning, from that by burning, the sword, apoplexy, or
 consumption; and yet they all agree in the common natures of heat,
 redness, and death), let him be assured that his understanding is
 inthralled by habit, by general appearances and hypotheses. For it
 is most certain that, however heterogeneous and distinct, they agree
 in the form or law which regulates heat, redness, or death; and that
 human power cannot be emancipated and freed from the common course
 of nature, and expanded and exalted to new efficients and new modes
 of operation, except by the revelation and invention of forms of this
 nature. But after this[102] union of nature, which is the principal
 point, we will afterward, in its proper place, treat of the divisions
 and ramifications of nature, whether ordinary or internal and more real.
 
 XVIII. We must now offer an example of the exclusion or rejection
 of natures found by the tables of review, not to be of the form of
 heat; first premising that not only each table is sufficient for the
 rejection of any nature, but even each single instance contained in
 them. For it is clear from what has been said that every contradictory
 instance destroys a hypothesis as to the form. Still, however, for the
 sake of clearness, and in order to show more plainly the use of the
 tables, we redouble or repeat the exclusive.
 
 _An Example of the Exclusive Table, or of the Rejection of Natures
 from the Form of Heat_
 
 1. On account of the sun's rays, reject elementary (or terrestrial)
 nature.
 
 2. On account of common fire, and particularly subterranean fires
 (which are the most remote and secluded from the rays of the heavenly
 bodies), reject celestial nature.
 
 3. On account of the heat acquired by every description of substances
 (as minerals, vegetables, the external parts of animals, water, oil,
 air, etc.) by mere approximation to the fire or any warm body, reject
 all variety and delicate texture of bodies.
 
 4. On account of iron and ignited metals, which warm other bodies, and
 yet neither lose their weight nor substance, reject the imparting or
 mixing of the substance of the heating body.
 
 5. On account of boiling water and air, and also those metals and other
 solid bodies which are heated, but not to ignition, or red heat, reject
 flame or light.
 
 6. On account of the rays of the moon and other heavenly bodies (except
 the sun), again reject flame or light.
 
 7. On account of the comparison between red-hot iron and the flame of
 spirits of wine (for the iron is more hot and less bright, while the
 flame of spirits of wine is more bright and less hot), again reject
 flame and light.
 
 8. On account of gold and other ignited metals, which are of the
 greatest specific density, reject rarity.
 
 9. On account of air, which is generally found to be cold and yet
 continues rare, reject rarity.
 
 10. On account of ignited iron,[103] which does not swell in bulk, but
 retains the same apparent dimension, reject the absolute expansive
 motion of the whole.
 
 11. On account of the expansion of the air in thermometers and the
 like, which is absolutely moved and expanded to the eye, and yet
 acquires no manifest increase of heat, again reject absolute or
 expansive motion of the whole.
 
 12. On account of the ready application of heat to all substances
 without any destruction or remarkable alteration of them, reject
 destructive nature or the violent communication of any new nature.
 
 13. On account of the agreement and conformity of the effects produced
 by cold and heat, reject both expansive and contracting motion as
 regards the whole.
 
 14. On account of the heat excited by friction, reject principal
 nature, by which we mean that which exists positively, and is not
 caused by a preceding nature.
 
 There are other natures to be rejected; but we are merely offering
 examples, and not perfect tables.
 
 None of the above natures are of the form of heat; and man is freed
 from them all in his operation upon heat.
 
 XIX. In the exclusive table are laid the foundations of true induction,
 which is not, however, completed until the affirmative be attained. Nor
 is the exclusive table perfect, nor can it be so at first. For it is
 clearly a rejection of simple natures; but if we have not as yet good
 and just notions of simple natures, how can the exclusive table be made
 correct? Some of the above, as the notion of elementary and celestial
 nature, and rarity, are vague and ill defined. We, therefore, who are
 neither ignorant nor forgetful of the great work which we attempt, in
 rendering the human understanding adequate to things and nature, by
 no means rest satisfied with what we have hitherto enforced, but push
 the matter further, and contrive and prepare more powerful aid for the
 use of the understanding, which we will next subjoin. And, indeed, in
 the interpretation of nature the mind is to be so prepared and formed,
 as to rest itself on proper degrees of certainty, and yet to remember
 (especially at first) that what is present depends much upon what
 remains behind.
 
 XX. Since, however, truth emerges more readily from error than
 confusion, we consider it useful to leave the understanding at liberty
 to exert itself and attempt the interpretation of nature in the
 affirmative, after having constructed and weighed the three tables of
 preparation, such as we have laid them down, both from the instances
 there collected, and others occurring elsewhere. Which attempt we are
 wont to call the liberty of the understanding, or the commencement of
 interpretation, or the first vintage.
 
 _The First Vintage of the Form of Heat_
 
 It must be observed that the form of anything is inherent (as appears
 clearly from our premises) in each individual instance in which the
 thing itself is inherent, or it would not be a form. No contradictory
 instance, therefore, can be alleged. The form, however, is found
 to be much more conspicuous and evident in some instances than in
 others; in those (for example) where its nature is less restrained
 and embarrassed, and reduced to rule by other natures. Such instances
 we are wont to term coruscations, or conspicuous instances. We must
 proceed, then, to the first vintage of the form of heat.
 
 From the instances taken collectively, as well as singly, the nature
 whose limit is heat appears to be motion. This is chiefly exhibited in
 flame, which is in constant motion, and in warm or boiling liquids,
 which are likewise in constant motion. It is also shown in the
 excitement or increase of heat by motion, as by bellows and draughts:
 for which see Inst. 29, Tab. 3, and by other species of motion, as in
 Inst. 28 and 31, Tab. 3. It is also shown by the extinction of fire
 and heat upon any strong pressure, which restrains and puts a stop to
 motion; for which see Inst. 30 and 32, Tab. 3. It is further shown
 by this circumstance, namely, that every substance is destroyed, or
 at least materially changed, by strong and powerful fire and heat:
 whence it is clear that tumult and confusion are occasioned by heat,
 together with a violent motion in the internal parts of bodies; and
 this gradually tends to their dissolution.
 
 What we have said with regard to motion must be thus understood, when
 taken as the genus of heat: it must not be thought that heat generates
 motion, or motion heat (though in some respects this be true), but
 that the very essence of heat, or the substantial self[104] of heat,
 is motion and nothing else, limited, however, by certain differences
 which we will presently add, after giving some cautions for avoiding
 ambiguity.
 
 Sensible heat is relative, and regards man, not universe; and is
 rightly held to be merely the effect of heat on animal spirit. It is
 even variable in itself, since the same body (in different states of
 sensation) excites the feeling of heat and of cold; this is shown by
 Inst. 41, Tab. 3.
 
 Nor should we confound the communication of heat or its transitive
 nature, by which a body grows warm at the approach of a heated body,
 with the form of heat; for heat is one thing and heating another. Heat
 can be excited by friction without any previous heating body, and,
 therefore, heating is excluded from the form of heat. Even when heat is
 excited by the approach of a hot body, this depends not on the form of
 heat, but on another more profound and common nature; namely, that of
 assimilation and multiplication, about which a separate inquiry must be
 made.
 
 The notion of fire is vulgar, and of no assistance; it is merely
 compounded of the conjunction of heat and light in any body, as in
 ordinary flame and red-hot substances.
 
 Laying aside all ambiguity, therefore, we must lastly consider the true
 differences which limit motion and render it the form of heat.
 
 I. The first difference is, that heat is an expansive motion, by which
 the body strives to dilate itself, and to occupy a greater space than
 before. This difference is principally seen in flame, where the smoke
 or thick vapor is clearly dilated and bursts into flame.
 
 It is also shown in all boiling liquids, which swell, rise, and boil
 up to the sight, and the process of expansion is urged forward till
 they are converted into a much more extended and dilated body than the
 liquid itself, such as steam, smoke, or air.
 
 It is also shown in wood and combustibles where exudation sometimes
 takes place, and evaporation always.
 
 It is also shown in the melting of metals, which, being very compact,
 do not easily swell and dilate, but yet their spirit, when dilated
 and desirous of further expansion, forces and urges its thicker parts
 into dissolution, and if the heat be pushed still further, reduces a
 considerable part of them into a volatile state.
 
 It is also shown in iron or stones, which though not melted or
 dissolved, are however softened. The same circumstance takes place in
 sticks of wood, which become flexible when a little heated in warm
 ashes.
 
 It is most readily observed in air, which instantly and manifestly
 expands with a small degree of heat, as in Inst. 38, Tab. 3.
 
 It is also shown in the contrary nature of cold; for cold contracts
 and narrows every substance;[105] so that in intense frosts nails fall
 out of the wall and brass cracks, and heated glass exposed suddenly to
 the cold cracks and breaks. So the air, by a slight degree of cold,
 contracts itself, as in Inst. 38, Tab. 3. More will be said of this in
 the inquiry into cold.
 
 Nor is it to be wondered at if cold and heat exhibit many common
 effects (for which see Inst. 32, Tab. 2), since two differences, of
 which we shall presently speak, belong to each nature: although in
 the present difference the effects be diametrically opposed to each
 other. For heat occasions an expansive and dilating motion, but cold a
 contracting and condensing motion.
 
 II. The second difference is a modification of the preceding, namely,
 that heat is an expansive motion, tending toward the exterior, but at
 the same time bearing the body upward. For there is no doubt that there
 be many compound motions, as an arrow or dart, for instance, has both a
 rotatory and progressive motion. In the same way the motion of heat is
 both expansive and tending upward.
 
 This difference is shown by putting the tongs or poker into the fire.
 If placed perpendicularly with the hand above, they soon burn it, but
 much less speedily if the hand hold them sloping or from below.
 
 It is also conspicuous in distillations _per descensum_, which men are
 wont to employ with delicate flowers, whose scent easily evaporates.
 Their industry has devised placing the fire above instead of below,
 that it may scorch less; for not only flame but all heat has an upward
 tendency.
 
 Let an experiment be made on the contrary nature of cold, whether its
 contraction be downward, as the expansion of heat is upward. Take,
 therefore, two iron rods or two glass tubes, alike in other respects,
 and warm them a little, and place a sponge, dipped in cold water, or
 some snow, below the one and above the other. We are of opinion that
 the extremities will grow cold in that rod first where it is placed
 beneath, as the contrary takes place with regard to heat.
 
 III. The third difference is this; that heat is not a uniform expansive
 motion of the whole, but of the small particles of the body; and this
 motion being at the same time restrained, repulsed, and reflected,
 becomes alternating, perpetually hurrying, striving, struggling, and
 irritated by the repercussion, which is the source of the violence of
 flame and heat.
 
 But this difference is chiefly shown in flame and boiling liquids,
 which always hurry, swell, and subside again in detached parts.
 
 It is also shown in bodies of such hard texture as not to swell or
 dilate in bulk, such as red-hot iron, in which the heat is most violent.
 
 It is also shown by the fires burning most briskly in the coldest
 weather.
 
 It is also shown by this, that when the air is dilated in the
 thermometer uniformly and equably, without any impediment or repulsion,
 the heat is not perceptible. In confined draughts also, although they
 break out very violently, no remarkable heat is perceived, because
 the motion affects the whole, without any alternating motion in the
 particles; for which reason try whether flame do not burn more at the
 sides than in its centre.
 
 It is also shown in this, that all burning proceeds by the minute pores
 of bodies--undermining, penetrating, piercing, and pricking them as if
 with an infinite number of needle-points. Hence all strong acids (if
 adapted to the body on which they act) exhibit the effects of fire,
 from their corroding and pungent nature.
 
 The difference of which we now speak is common also to the nature of
 cold, in which the contracting motion is restrained by the resistance
 of expansion, as in heat the expansive motion is restrained by the
 resistance of contraction.
 
 Whether, therefore, the particles of matter penetrate inward or
 outward, the reasoning is the same, though the power be very different,
 because we have nothing on earth which is intensely cold.
 
 IV. The fourth difference is a modification of the preceding, namely,
 that this stimulating or penetrating motion should be rapid and never
 sluggish, and should take place not in the very minutest particles, but
 rather in those of some tolerable dimensions.
 
 It is shown by comparing the effects of fire with those of time. Time
 dries, consumes, undermines, and reduces to ashes as well as fire, and
 perhaps to a much finer degree; but as its motion is very slow, and
 attacks very minute particles, no heat is perceived.
 
 It is also shown in a comparison of the dissolution of iron and gold;
 for gold is dissolved without the excitement of any heat, but iron with
 a vehement excitement of it, although most in the same time, because in
 the former the penetration of the separating acid is mild, and gently
 insinuates itself, and the particles of gold yield easily, but the
 penetration of iron is violent, and attended with some struggle, and
 its particles are more obstinate.
 
 It is partially shown, also, in some gangrenes and mortifications of
 flesh, which do not excite great heat or pain, from the gentle nature
 of the putrefaction.
 
 Let this suffice for a first vintage, or the commencement of the
 interpretation of the form of heat by the liberty of the understanding.
 
 From this first vintage the form or true definition of heat (considered
 relatively to the universe and not to the sense) is briefly thus--Heat
 is an expansive motion restrained, and striving to exert itself in the
 smaller particles.[106] The expansion is modified by its tendency to
 rise, though expanding toward the exterior; and the effort is modified
 by its not being sluggish, but active and somewhat violent.
 
 With regard to the operative definition, the matter is the same. If you
 are able to excite a dilating or expansive motion in any natural body,
 and so to repress that motion and force it on itself as not to allow
 the expansion to proceed equally, but only to be partially exerted and
 partially repressed, you will beyond all doubt produce heat, without
 any consideration as to whether the body be of earth (or elementary, as
 they term it), or imbued with celestial influence, luminous or opaque,
 rare or dense, locally expanded or contained within the bounds of its
 first dimensions, verging to dissolution or remaining fixed, animal,
 vegetable, or mineral, water, or oil, or air, or any other substance
 whatever susceptible of such motion. Sensible heat is the same, but
 considered relatively to the senses. Let us now proceed to further
 helps.
 
 XXI. After our tables of first review, our rejection or exclusive
 table, and the first vintage derived from them, we must advance to the
 remaining helps of the understanding with regard to the interpretation
 of nature, and a true and perfect induction, in offering which we
 will take the examples of cold and heat where tables are necessary,
 but where fewer instances are required we will go through a variety
 of others, so as neither to confound investigation nor to narrow our
 doctrine.
 
 In the first place, therefore, we will treat of prerogative
 instances;[107] 2. Of the supports of induction; 3. Of the correction
 of induction; 4. Of varying the investigation according to the
 nature of the subject; 5. Of the prerogative natures with respect to
 investigation, or of what should be the first or last objects of our
 research; 6. Of the limits of investigation, or a synopsis of all
 natures that exist in the universe; 7. Of the application to practical
 purposes, or of what relates to man; 8. Of the preparations for
 investigation; 9. And lastly, of the ascending and descending scale of
 axioms.[108]
 
 XXII. Among the prerogative instances we will first mention solitary
 instances. Solitary instances are those which exhibit the required
 nature in subjects that have nothing in common with any other subject
 than the nature in question, or which do not exhibit the required
 nature in subjects resembling others in every respect except that
 of the nature in question; for these instances manifestly remove
 prolixity, and accelerate and confirm exclusion, so that a few of them
 are of as much avail as many.
 
 For instance, let the inquiry be the nature of color. Prisms,
 crystalline gems, which yield colors not only internally but on the
 wall, dews, etc., are solitary instances; for they have nothing in
 common with the fixed colors in flowers and colored gems, metals,
 woods, etc., except the color itself. Hence we easily deduce that
 color is nothing but a modification of the image of the incident and
 absorbed light, occasioned in the former case by the different degrees
 of incidence, in the latter by the various textures and forms of
 bodies.[109] These are solitary instances as regards similitude.
 
 Again, in the same inquiry the distinct veins of white and black in
 marble, and the variegated colors of flowers of the same species, are
 solitary instances; for the black and white of marble, and the spots of
 white and purple in the flowers of the stock, agree in every respect
 but that of color. Thence we easily deduce that color has not much to
 do with the intrinsic natures of any body, but depends only on the
 coarser and as it were mechanical arrangement of the parts. These are
 solitary instances as regards difference. We call them both solitary or
 wild, to borrow a word from the astronomers.
 
 XXIII. In the second rank of prerogative instances we will consider
 migrating instances. In these the required nature passes toward
 generation, having no previous existence, or toward corruption, having
 first existed. In each of these divisions, therefore, the instances
 are always twofold, or rather it is one instance, first in motion or
 on its passage, and then brought to the opposite conclusion. These
 instances not only hasten and confirm exclusion, but also reduce
 affirmation, or the form itself, to a narrow compass; for the form
 must be something conferred by this migration, or, on the contrary,
 removed and destroyed by it; and although all exclusion advances
 affirmation, yet this takes place more directly in the same than in
 different subjects; but if the form (as it is quite clear from what
 has been advanced) exhibit itself in one subject, it leads to all. The
 more simple the migration is, the more valuable is the instance. These
 migrating instances are, moreover, very useful in practice, for since
 they manifest the form, coupled with that which causes or destroys it,
 they point out the right practice in some subjects, and thence there
 is an easy transition to those with which they are most allied. There
 is, however, a degree of danger which demands caution, namely, lest
 they should refer the form too much to its efficient cause, and imbue,
 or at least tinge, the understanding with a false notion of the form
 from the appearance of such cause, which is never more than a vehicle
 or conveyance of the form. This may easily be remedied by a proper
 application of exclusion.
 
 Let us then give an example of a migrating instance. Let whiteness be
 the required nature. An instance which passes toward generation is
 glass in its entire and in its powdered state, or water in its natural
 state, and when agitated to froth; for glass when entire, and water in
 its natural state, are transparent and not white, but powdered glass
 and the froth of water are white and not transparent. We must inquire,
 therefore, what has happened to the glass or water in the course of
 this migration; for it is manifest that the form of whiteness is
 conveyed and introduced by the bruising of the glass and the agitation
 of the water; but nothing is found to have been introduced but a
 diminishing of the parts of the glass and water and the insertion
 of air. Yet this is no slight progress toward discovering the form
 of whiteness, namely, that two bodies, in themselves more or less
 transparent (as air and water, or air and glass), when brought into
 contact in minute portions, exhibit whiteness from the unequal
 refraction of the rays of light.
 
 But here we must also give an example of the danger and caution of
 which we spoke; for instance, it will readily occur to an understanding
 perverted by efficients, that air is always necessary for producing the
 form of whiteness, or that whiteness is only generated by transparent
 bodies, which suppositions are both false, and proved to be so by
 many exclusions; nay, it will rather appear (without any particular
 regard to air or the like), that all bodies which are even in such of
 their parts as affect the sight exhibit transparency, those which are
 uneven and of simple texture whiteness, those which are uneven and of
 compound but regular texture all the other colors except black, but
 those which are uneven and of a compound irregular and confused texture
 exhibit blackness. An example has been given, therefore, of an instance
 migrating toward generation in the required nature of whiteness. An
 instance migrating toward corruption in the same nature is that of
 dissolving froth or snow, for they lose their whiteness and assume the
 transparency of water in its pure state without air.
 
 Nor should we by any means omit to state, that under migrating
 instances we must comprehend not only those which pass toward
 generation and destruction, but also those which pass toward increase
 or decrease, for they, too, assist in the discovery of the form, as is
 clear from our definition of a form and the Table of Degrees. Hence
 paper, which is white when dry, is less white when moistened (from
 the exclusion of air and admission of water), and tends more to
 transparency. The reason is the same as in the above instances.[110]
 
 XXIV. In the third rank of prerogative instances we will class
 conspicuous instances, of which we spoke in our first vintage of the
 form of heat, and which we are also wont to call coruscations, or free
 and predominant instances. They are such as show the required nature
 in its bare substantial shape, and at its height or greatest degree
 of power, emancipated and free from all impediments, or at least
 overcoming, suppressing, and restraining them by the strength of its
 qualities; for since every body is susceptible of many united forms of
 natures in the concrete, the consequence is that they mutually deaden,
 depress, break, and confine each other, and the individual forms are
 obscured. But there are some subjects in which the required nature
 exists in its full vigor rather than in others, either from the absence
 of any impediment, or the predominance of its quality. Such instances
 are eminently conspicuous. But even in these care must be taken, and
 the hastiness of the understanding checked, for whatever makes a show
 of the form, and forces it forward, is to be suspected, and recourse
 must be had to severe and diligent exclusion.
 
 For example, let heat be the required nature. The thermometer is a
 conspicuous instance of the expansive motion, which (as has been
 observed) constitutes the chief part of the form of heat; for although
 flame clearly exhibits expansion, yet from its being extinguished every
 moment, it does not exhibit the progress of expansion. Boiling water
 again, from its rapid conversion into vapor, does not so well exhibit
 the expansion of water in its own shape, while red-hot iron and the
 like are so far from showing this progress, that, on the contrary, the
 expansion itself is scarcely evident to the senses, on account of its
 spirit being repressed and weakened by the compact and coarse particles
 which subdue and restrain it. But the thermometer strikingly exhibits
 the expansion of the air as being evident and progressive, durable and
 not transitory.[111]
 
 Take another example. Let the required nature be weight. Quicksilver
 is a conspicuous instance of weight; for it is far heavier than any
 other substance except gold, which is not much heavier, and it is a
 better instance than gold for the purpose of indicating the form of
 weight; for gold is solid and consistent, which qualities must be
 referred to density, but quicksilver is liquid and teeming with spirit,
 yet much heavier than the diamond and other substances considered to
 be most solid; whence it is shown that the form of gravity or weight
 predominates only in the quantity of matter, and not in the close
 fitting of it.[112]
 
 XXV. In the fourth rank of prerogative instances we will class
 clandestine instances, which we are also wont to call twilight
 instances; they are as it were opposed to the conspicuous instances,
 for they show the required nature in its lowest state of efficacy, and
 as it were its cradle and first rudiments, making an effort and a sort
 of first attempt, but concealed and subdued by a contrary nature. Such
 instances are, however, of great importance in discovering forms, for
 as the conspicuous tend easily to differences, so do the clandestine
 best lead to genera, that is, to those common natures of which the
 required natures are only the limits.
 
 As an example, let consistency, or that which confines itself, be
 the required nature, the opposite of which is a liquid or flowing
 state. The clandestine instances are such as exhibit some weak and low
 degree of consistency in fluids, as a water bubble, which is a sort
 of consistent and bounded pellicle formed out of the substance of the
 water. So eaves' droppings, if there be enough water to follow them,
 draw themselves out into a thin thread, not to break the continuity
 of the water, but if there be not enough to follow, the water forms
 itself into a round drop, which is the best form to prevent a breach
 of continuity; and at the moment the thread ceases, and the water
 begins to fall in drops, the thread of water recoils upward to avoid
 such a breach. Nay, in metals, which when melted are liquid but more
 tenacious, the melted drops often recoil and are suspended. There is
 something similar in the instance of the child's looking-glass, which
 little boys will sometimes form of spittle between rushes, and where
 the same pellicle of water is observable; and still more in that other
 amusement of children, when they take some water rendered a little
 more tenacious by soap, and inflate it with a pipe, forming the water
 into a sort of castle of bubbles, which assumes such consistency, by
 the interposition of the air, as to admit of being thrown some little
 distance without bursting. The best example is that of froth and snow,
 which assume such consistency as almost to admit of being cut, although
 composed of air and water, both liquids. All these circumstances
 clearly show that the terms liquid and consistent are merely vulgar
 notions adapted to the sense, and that in reality all bodies have a
 tendency to avoid a breach of continuity, faint and weak in bodies
 composed of homogeneous parts (as is the case with liquids), but more
 vivid and powerful in those composed of heterogeneous parts, because
 the approach of heterogeneous matter binds bodies together, while the
 insinuation of homogeneous matter loosens and relaxes them.
 
 Again, to take another example, let the required nature be attraction
 or the cohesion of bodies. The most remarkable conspicuous instance
 with regard to its form is the magnet. The contrary nature to
 attraction is non-attraction, though in a similar substance. Thus
 iron does not attract iron, lead lead, wood wood, nor water water.
 But the clandestine instance is that of the magnet armed with iron,
 or rather that of iron in the magnet so armed. For its nature is such
 that the magnet when armed does not attract iron more powerfully at
 any given distance than when unarmed; but if the iron be brought in
 contact with the armed magnet, the latter will sustain a much greater
 weight than the simple magnet, from the resemblance of substance in the
 two portions of iron, a quality altogether clandestine and hidden in
 the iron until the magnet was introduced. It is manifest, therefore,
 that the form of cohesion is something which is vivid and robust in
 the magnet, and hidden and weak in the iron. It is to be observed,
 also, that small wooden arrows without an iron point, when discharged
 from large mortars, penetrate further into wooden substances (such
 as the ribs of ships or the like), than the same arrows pointed with
 iron,[113] owing to the similarity of substance, though this quality
 was previously latent in the wood. Again, although in the mass air does
 not appear to attract air, nor water water, yet when one bubble is
 brought near another, they are both more readily dissolved, from the
 tendency to contact of the water with the water, and the air with the
 air.[114] These clandestine instances (which are, as has been observed,
 of the most important service) are principally to be observed in small
 portions of bodies, for the larger masses observe more universal and
 general forms, as will be mentioned in its proper place.[115]
 
 XXVI. In the fifth rank of prerogative instances we will class
 constitutive instances, which we are wont also to call collective
 instances. They constitute a species or lesser form, as it were, of the
 required nature. For since the real forms (which are always convertible
 with the given nature) lie at some depth, and are not easily
 discovered, the necessity of the case and the infirmity of the human
 understanding require that the particular forms, which collect certain
 groups of instances (but by no means all) into some common notion,
 should not be neglected, but most diligently observed. For whatever
 unites nature, even imperfectly, opens the way to the discovery of the
 form. The instances, therefore, which are serviceable in this respect
 are of no mean power, but endowed with some degree of prerogative.
 
 Here, nevertheless, great care must be taken that, after the discovery
 of several of these particular forms, and the establishing of certain
 partitions or divisions of the required nature derived from them, the
 human understanding do not at once rest satisfied, without preparing
 for the investigation of the great or leading form, and taking it for
 granted that nature is compound and divided from its very root, despise
 and reject any further union as a point of superfluous refinement, and
 tending to mere abstraction.
 
 For instance, let the required nature be memory, or that which
 excites and assists memory. The constitutive instances are order or
 distribution, which manifestly assists memory: topics or commonplaces
 in artificial memory, which may be either places in their literal
 sense, as a gate, a corner, a window, and the like, or familiar persons
 and marks, or anything else (provided it be arranged in a determinate
 order), as animals, plants, and words, letters, characters, historical
 persons, and the like, of which, however, some are more convenient than
 others. All these commonplaces materially assist memory, and raise it
 far above its natural strength. Verse, too, is recollected and learned
 more easily than prose. From this group of three instances--order,
 the commonplaces of artificial memory, and verses--is constituted
 one species of aid for the memory,[116] which may be well termed a
 separation from infinity. For when a man strives to recollect or recall
 anything to memory, without a preconceived notion or perception of
 the object of his search, he inquires about, and labors, and turns
 from point to point, as if involved in infinity. But if he have any
 preconceived notion, this infinity is separated off, and the range of
 his memory is brought within closer limits. In the three instances
 given above, the preconceived notion is clear and determined. In the
 first, it must be something that agrees with order; in the second, an
 image which has some relation or agreement with the fixed commonplaces;
 in the third, words which fall into a verse: and thus infinity is
 divided off. Other instances will offer another species, namely,
 that whatever brings the intellect into contact with something that
 strikes the sense (the principal point of artificial memory), assists
 the memory. Others again offer another species, namely, whatever
 excites an impression by any powerful passion, as fear, shame, wonder,
 delight, assists the memory. Other instances will afford another
 species: thus those impressions remain most fixed in the memory which
 are taken from the mind when clear and least occupied by preceding
 or succeeding notions, such as the things we learn in childhood, or
 imagine before sleep, and the first time of any circumstance happening.
 Other instances afford the following species: namely, that a multitude
 of circumstances or handles assist the memory, such as writing in
 paragraphs, reading aloud, or recitation. Lastly, other instances
 afford still another species: thus the things we anticipate, and which
 rouse our attention, are more easily remembered than transient events;
 as if you read any work twenty times over, you will not learn it by
 heart so readily as if you were to read it but ten times, trying each
 time to repeat it, and when your memory fails you looking into the
 book. There are, therefore, six lesser forms, as it were, of things
 which assist the memory: namely--1, the separation of infinity; 2, the
 connection of the mind with the senses; 3, the impression in strong
 passion; 4, the impression on the mind when pure; 5, the multitude of
 handles; 6, anticipation.
 
 Again, for example's sake, let the required nature be taste or the
 power of tasting. The following instances are constitutive: 1. Those
 who do not smell, but are deprived by nature of that sense, do not
 perceive or distinguish rancid or putrid food by their taste, nor
 garlic from roses, and the like. 2. Again, those whose nostrils are
 obstructed by accident (such as a cold) do not distinguish any putrid
 or rancid matter from anything sprinkled with rose-water. 3. If those
 who suffer from a cold blow their noses violently at the very moment
 in which they have anything fetid or perfumed in their mouth, or on
 their palate, they instantly have a clear perception of the fetor or
 perfume. These instances afford and constitute this species or division
 of taste, namely, that it is in part nothing else than an internal
 smelling, passing and descending through the upper passages of the
 nostrils to the mouth and palate. But, on the other hand, those whose
 power of smelling is deficient or obstructed, perceive what is salt,
 sweet, pungent, acid, rough, and bitter, and the like, as well as any
 one else: so that the taste is clearly something compounded of the
 internal smelling, and an exquisite species of touch which we will not
 here discuss.
 
 Again, as another example, let the required nature be the communication
 of quality, without intermixture of substance. The instance of light
 will afford or constitute one species of communication, heat and
 the magnet another. For the communication of light is momentary and
 immediately arrested upon the removal of the original light. But heat,
 and the magnetic force, when once transmitted to or excited in another
 body, remain fixed for a considerable time after the removal of the
 source.
 
 In fine, the prerogative of constitutive instances is considerable,
 for they materially assist the definitions (especially in detail) and
 the divisions or partitions of natures, concerning which Plato has
 well said, "He who can properly define and divide is to be considered
 a god."[117]
 
 XXVII. In the sixth rank of prerogative instances we will place similar
 or proportionate instances, which we are also wont to call physical
 parallels, or resemblances. They are such as exhibit the resemblances
 and connection of things, not in minor forms (as the constitutive do),
 but at once in the concrete. They are, therefore, as it were, the first
 and lowest steps toward the union of nature; nor do they immediately
 establish any axiom, but merely indicate and observe a certain relation
 of bodies to each other. But although they be not of much assistance
 in discovering forms, yet they are of great advantage in disclosing
 the frame of parts of the universe, upon whose members they practice
 a species of anatomy, and thence occasionally lead us gently on to
 sublime and noble axioms, especially such as relate to the construction
 of the world, rather than to simple natures and forms.
 
 As an example, take the following similar instances: a mirror and the
 eye; the formation of the ear, and places which return an echo. From
 such similarity, besides observing the resemblance (which is useful
 for many purposes), it is easy to collect and form this axiom. That
 the organs of the senses, and bodies which produce reflections to the
 senses, are of a similar nature. Again, the understanding once informed
 of this, rises easily to a higher and nobler axiom; namely, that the
 only distinction between sensitive and inanimate bodies, in those
 points in which they agree and sympathize, is this: in the former,
 animal spirit is added to the arrangement of the body, in the latter it
 is wanting. So that there might be as many senses in animals as there
 are points of agreement with inanimate bodies, if the animated body
 were perforated, so as to allow the spirit to have access to the limb
 properly disposed for action, as a fit organ. And, on the other hand,
 there are, without doubt, as many motions in an inanimate as there are
 senses in the animated body, though the animal spirit be absent. There
 must, however, be many more motions in inanimate bodies than senses in
 the animated, from the small number of organs of sense. A very plain
 example of this is afforded by pains. For, as animals are liable to
 many kinds and various descriptions of pains (such as those of burning,
 of intense cold, of pricking, squeezing, stretching, and the like),
 so is it most certain, that the same circumstances, as far as motion
 is concerned, happen to inanimate bodies, such as wood or stone when
 burned, frozen, pricked, cut, bent, bruised, and the like; although
 there be no sensation, owing to the absence of animal spirit.
 
 Again, wonderful as it may appear, the roots and branches of trees
 are similar instances. For every vegetable swells and throws out its
 constituent parts toward the circumference, both upward and downward.
 And there is no difference between the roots and branches, except that
 the root is buried in the earth, and the branches are exposed to the
 air and sun. For if one take a young and vigorous shoot, and bend it
 down to a small portion of loose earth, although it be not fixed to
 the ground, yet will it immediately produce a root, and not a branch.
 And, _vice versa_, if earth be placed above, and so forced down with a
 stone or any hard substance, as to confine the plant and prevent its
 branching upward, it will throw out branches into the air downward.
 
 The gums of trees, and most rock gems, are similar instances; for both
 of them are exudations and filtered juices, derived in the former
 instance from trees, in the latter from stones; the brightness and
 clearness of both arising from a delicate and accurate filtering. For
 nearly the same reason, the hair of animals is less beautiful and vivid
 in its color than the plumage of most birds, because the juices are
 less delicately filtered through the skin than through the quills.
 
 The scrotum of males and matrix of females are also similar instances;
 so that the noble formation which constitutes the difference of the
 sexes appears to differ only as to the one being internal and the other
 external; a greater degree of heat causing the genitals to protrude in
 the male, while the heat of the female being too weak to effect this,
 they are retained internally.
 
 The fins of fishes and the feet of quadrupeds, or the feet and wings of
 birds, are similar instances; to which Aristotle adds the four folds in
 the motion of serpents;[118] so that in the formation of the universe,
 the motion of animals appears to be chiefly effected by four joints or
 bendings.
 
 The teeth of land animals, and the beaks of birds, are similar
 instances, whence it is clear, that in all perfect animals there is a
 determination of some hard substance toward the mouth.
 
 Again, the resemblance and conformity of man to an inverted plant
 is not absurd. For the head is the root of the nerves and animal
 faculties, and the seminal parts are the lowest, not including the
 extremities of the legs and arms. But in the plant, the root (which
 resembles the head) is regularly placed in the lowest, and the seeds in
 the highest part.[119]
 
 Lastly, we must particularly recommend and suggest, that man's present
 industry in the investigation and compilation of natural history be
 entirely changed, and directed to the reverse of the present system.
 For it has hitherto been active and curious in noting the variety of
 things, and explaining the accurate differences of animals, vegetables,
 and minerals, most of which are the mere sport of nature, rather
 than of any real utility as concerns the sciences. Pursuits of this
 nature are certainly agreeable, and sometimes of practical advantage,
 but contribute little or nothing to the thorough investigation of
 nature. Our labor must therefore be directed toward inquiring into and
 observing resemblances and analogies, both in the whole and its parts,
 for they unite nature, and lay the foundation of the sciences.
 
 Here, however, a severe and rigorous caution must be observed, that we
 only consider as similar and proportionate instances, those which (as
 we first observed) point out physical resemblances; that is, real and
 substantial resemblances, deeply founded in nature, and not casual and
 superficial, much less superstitious or curious; such as those which
 are constantly put forward by the writers on natural magic (the most
 idle of men, and who are scarcely fit to be named in connection with
 such serious matters as we now treat of), who, with much vanity and
 folly, describe, and sometimes too, invent, unmeaning resemblances and
 sympathies.
 
 But leaving such to themselves, similar instances are not to be
 neglected, in the greater portions of the world's conformation; such
 as Africa and the Peruvian continent, which reaches to the Straits of
 Magellan; both of which possess a similar isthmus and similar capes, a
 circumstance not to be attributed to mere accident.
 
 Again, the New and Old World are both of them broad and expanded toward
 the north, and narrow and pointed toward the south.
 
 Again, we have very remarkable similar instances in the intense cold,
 toward the middle regions (as it is termed) of the air, and the violent
 fires which are often found to burst from subterraneous spots, the
 similarity consisting in both being ends and extremes; the extreme of
 the nature of cold, for instance, is toward the boundary of heaven,
 and that of the nature of heat toward the centre of the earth, by a
 similar species of opposition or rejection of the contrary nature.
 
 Lastly, in the axioms of the sciences, there is a similarity of
 instances worthy of observation. Thus the rhetorical trope which is
 called surprise, is similar to that of music termed the declining of
 a cadence. Again--the mathematical postulate, that things which are
 equal to the same are equal to one another, is similar to the form of
 the syllogism in logic, which unites things agreeing in the middle
 term.[120] Lastly, a certain degree of sagacity in collecting and
 searching for physical points of similarity, is very useful in many
 respects.[121]
 
 XXVIII. In the seventh rank of prerogative instances, we will place
 singular instances, which we are also wont to call irregular or
 heteroclite (to borrow a term from the grammarians). They are such
 as exhibit bodies in the concrete, of an apparently extravagant and
 separate nature, agreeing but little with other things of the same
 species. For, while the similar instances resemble each other, those
 we now speak of are only like themselves. Their use is much the same
 with that of clandestine instances: they bring out and unite nature,
 and discover genera or common natures, which must afterward be limited
 by real differences. Nor should we desist from inquiry, until the
 properties and qualities of those things, which may be deemed miracles,
 as it were, of nature, be reduced to, and comprehended in, some form or
 certain law; so that all irregularity or singularity may be found to
 depend on some common form; and the miracle only consists in accurate
 differences, degree, and rare coincidence, not in the species itself.
 Man's meditation proceeds no further at present, than just to consider
 things of this kind as the secrets and vast efforts of nature, without
 an assignable cause, and, as it were, exceptions to general rules.
 
 As examples of singular instances, we have the sun and moon among
 the heavenly bodies; the magnet among minerals; quicksilver among
 metals; the elephant among quadrupeds; the venereal sensation among
 the different kinds of touch; the scent of sporting dogs among those
 of smell. The letter S, too, is considered by the grammarians as sui
 generis, from its easily uniting with double or triple consonants,
 which no other letter will. These instances are of great value, because
 they excite and keep alive inquiry, and correct an understanding
 depraved by habit and the common course of things.
 
 XXIX. In the eighth rank of prerogative instances, we will place
 deviating instances, such as the errors of nature, or strange and
 monstrous objects, in which nature deviates and turns from her
 ordinary course. For the errors of nature differ from singular
 instances, inasmuch as the latter are the miracles of species, the
 former of individuals. Their use is much the same, for they rectify the
 understanding in opposition to habit, and reveal common forms. For with
 regard to these, also, we must not desist from inquiry, till we discern
 the cause of the deviation. The cause does not, however, in such cases
 rise to a regular form, but only to the latent process toward such a
 form. For he who is acquainted with the paths of nature, will more
 readily observe her deviations; and, _vice versa_, he who has learned
 her deviations will be able more accurately to describe her paths.
 
 They differ again from singular instances, by being much more apt for
 practice and the operative branch. For it would be very difficult to
 generate new species, but less so to vary known species, and thus
 produce many rare and unusual results.[122] The passage from the
 miracles of nature to those of art is easy; for if nature be once
 seized in her variations, and the cause be manifest, it will be easy to
 lead her by art to such deviation as she was at first led to by chance;
 and not only to that but others, since deviations on the one side
 lead and open the way to others in every direction. Of this we do not
 require any examples, since they are so abundant. For a compilation, or
 particular natural history, must be made of all monsters and prodigious
 births of nature; of everything, in short, which is new, rare and
 unusual in nature. This should be done with a rigorous selection, so as
 to be worthy of credit. Those are most to be suspected which depend
 upon superstition, as the prodigies of Livy, and those perhaps, but
 little less, which are found in the works of writers on natural magic,
 or even alchemy, and the like; for such men, as it were, are the very
 suitors and lovers of fables; but our instances should be derived from
 some grave and credible history, and faithful narration.
 
 XXX. In the ninth rank of prerogative instances, we will place
 bordering instances, which we are also wont to term participants. They
 are such as exhibit those species of bodies which appear to be composed
 of two species, or to be the rudiments between the one and the other.
 They may well be classed with the singular or heteroclite instances;
 for in the whole system of things, they are rare and extraordinary. Yet
 from their dignity, they must be treated of and classed separately,
 for they point out admirably the order and constitution of things, and
 suggest the causes of the number and quality of the more common species
 in the universe, leading the understanding from that which is, to that
 which is possible.
 
 We have examples of them in moss, which is something between
 putrescence and a plant;[123] in some comets, which hold a place
 between stars and ignited meteors; in flying fishes, between fishes and
 birds; and in bats, between birds and quadrupeds.[124] Again,
 
   Simia quam similis turpissima bestia nobis.
 
 We have also biformed foetus, mingled species and the like.
 
 XXXI. In the tenth rank of prerogative instances, we will place the
 instances of power, or the fasces (to borrow a term from the insignia
 of empire), which we are also wont to call the wit or hands of man.
 These are such works as are most noble and perfect, and, as it were,
 the masterpieces in every art. For since our principal object is to
 make nature subservient to the state and wants of man, it becomes us
 well to note and enumerate the works, which have long since been in the
 power of man, especially those which are most polished and perfect:
 because the passage from these to new and hitherto undiscovered
 works, is more easy and feasible. For if any one, after an attentive
 contemplation of such works as are extant, be willing to push forward
 in his design with alacrity and vigor, he will undoubtedly either
 advance them, or turn them to something within their immediate reach,
 or even apply and transfer them to some more noble purpose.
 
 Nor is this all: for as the understanding is elevated and raised by
 rare and unusual works of nature, to investigate and discover the forms
 which include them also, so is the same effect frequently produced by
 the excellent and wonderful works of art; and even to a greater degree,
 because the mode of effecting and constructing the miracles of art is
 generally plain, while that of effecting the miracles of nature is more
 obscure. Great care, however, must be taken, that they do not depress
 the understanding, and fix it, as it were, to earth.
 
 For there is some danger, lest the understanding should be astonished
 and chained down, and as it were bewitched, by such works of art, as
 appear to be the very summit and pinnacle of human industry, so as not
 to become familiar with them, but rather to suppose that nothing of
 the kind can be accomplished, unless the same means be employed, with
 perhaps a little more diligence, and more accurate preparation.
 
 Now, on the contrary, it may be stated as a fact, that the ways and
 means hitherto discovered and observed, of effecting any matter or
 work, are for the most part of little value, and that all really
 efficient power depends, and is really to be deduced from the sources
 of forms, none of which have yet been discovered.
 
 Thus (as we have before observed), had any one meditated on ballistic
 machines, and battering rams, as they were used by the ancients,
 whatever application he might have exerted, and though he might have
 consumed a whole life in the pursuit, yet would he never have hit upon
 the invention of flaming engines, acting by means of gunpowder; nor
 would any person, who had made woollen manufactories and cotton the
 subject of his observation and reflection, have ever discovered thereby
 the nature of the silkworm or of silk.
 
 Hence all the most noble discoveries have (if you observe) come to
 light, not by any gradual improvement and extension of the arts, but
 merely by chance; while nothing imitates or anticipates chance (which
 is wont to act at intervals of ages) but the invention of forms.
 
 There is no necessity for adducing any particular examples of these
 instances, since they are abundant. The plan to be pursued is this:
 all the mechanical, and even the liberal arts (as far as they are
 practical), should be visited and thoroughly examined, and thence there
 should be formed a compilation or particular history of the great
 masterpieces, or most finished works in each, as well as of the mode
 of carrying them into effect.
 
 Nor do we confine the diligence to be used in such a compilation to the
 leading works and secrets only of every art, and such as excite wonder;
 for wonder is engendered by rarity, since that which is rare, although
 it be compounded of ordinary natures, always begets wonder.
 
 On the contrary, that which is really wonderful, from some specific
 difference distinguishing it from other species, is carelessly
 observed, if it be but familiar. Yet the singular instances of art
 should be observed no less than those of nature, which we have before
 spoken of: and as in the latter we have classed the sun, the moon, the
 magnet, and the like, all of them most familiar to us, but yet in their
 nature singular, so should we proceed with the singular instances of
 art.
 
 For example: paper, a very common substance, is a singular instance
 of art; for if you consider the subject attentively, you will find
 that artificial substances are either woven by straight and transverse
 lines, as silk, woollen, or linen cloth, and the like; or coagulated
 from concrete juices, such as brick, earthenware, glass, enamel,
 porcelain and the like, which admit of a polish if they be compact, but
 if not, become hard without being polished; all which latter substances
 are brittle, and not adherent or tenacious. On the contrary, paper is
 a tenacious substance, which can be cut and torn, so as to resemble
 and almost rival the skin of any animal, or the leaf of vegetables,
 and the like works of nature; being neither brittle like glass, nor
 woven like cloth, but having fibres and not distinct threads, just as
 natural substances, so that scarcely anything similar can be found
 among artificial substances, and it is absolutely singular. And in
 artificial works we should certainly prefer those which approach the
 nearest to an imitation of nature, or, on the other hand, powerfully
 govern and change her course.
 
 Again, in these instances which we term the wit and hands of man,
 charms and conjuring should not be altogether despised, for although
 mere amusements, and of little use, yet they may afford considerable
 information.
 
 Lastly, superstition and magic (in its common acceptation) are not to
 be entirely omitted; for although they be overwhelmed by a mass of lies
 and fables, yet some investigation should be made, to see if there be
 really any latent natural operation in them; as in fascination, and the
 fortifying of the imagination, the sympathy of distant objects, the
 transmission of impressions from spirit to spirit no less than from
 body to body, and the like.
 
 XXXII. From the foregoing remarks, it is clear that the last five
 species of instances (the similar, singular, deviating and bordering
 instances, and those of power) should not be reserved for the
 investigation of any given nature, as the preceding and many of the
 succeeding instances must, but a collection of them should be made at
 once, in the style of a particular history, so that they may arrange
 the matter which enters the understanding, and correct its depraved
 habit, for it is necessarily imbued, corrupted, perverted and distorted
 by daily and habitual impressions.
 
 They are to be used, therefore, as a preparative, for the purpose of
 rectifying and purifying the understanding; for whatever withdraws it
 from habit, levels and planes down its surface for the reception of the
 dry and pure light of true notions.
 
 These instances, moreover, level and prepare the way for the operative
 branch, as we will mention in its proper place when speaking of the
 practical deductions.
 
 XXXIII. In the eleventh rank of prerogative instances we will place
 accompanying and hostile instances. These are such as exhibit any body
 or concrete, where the required nature is constantly found, as an
 inseparable companion, or, on the contrary, where the required nature
 is constantly avoided, and excluded from attendance, as an enemy. From
 these instances may be formed certain and universal propositions,
 either affirmative or negative; the subject of which will be the
 concrete body, and the predicate the required nature. For particular
 propositions are by no means fixed, when the required nature is found
 to fluctuate and change in the concrete, either approaching and
 acquired, or receding and laid aside. Hence particular propositions
 have no great prerogative, except in the case of migration, of which we
 have spoken above. Yet such particular propositions are of great use,
 when compared with the universal, as will be mentioned in its proper
 place. Nor do we require absolute affirmation or negation, even in
 universal propositions, for if the exceptions be singular or rare, it
 is sufficient for our purpose.
 
 The use of accompanying instances is to narrow the affirmative of
 form; for as it is narrowed by the migrating instances, where the form
 must necessarily be something communicated or destroyed by the act of
 migration, so it is narrowed by accompanying instances, where the form
 must necessarily be something which enters into the concretion of the
 body, or, on the contrary, is repugnant to it; and one who is well
 acquainted with the constitution or formation of the body, will not be
 far from bringing to light the form of the required nature.
 
 For example: let the required nature be heat. Flame is an accompanying
 instance; for in water, air, stone, metal, and many other substances,
 heat is variable, and can approach or retire; but all flame is hot,
 so that heat always accompanies the concretion of flame. We have no
 hostile instance of heat; for the senses are unacquainted with the
 interior of the earth, and there is no concretion of any known body
 which is not susceptible of heat.
 
 Again, let solidity be the required nature. Air is a hostile instance;
 for metals may be liquid or solid, so may glass; even water may become
 solid by congelation, but air cannot become solid or lose its fluidity.
 
 With regard to these instances of fixed propositions, there are
 two points to be observed, which are of importance. First, that
 if there be no universal affirmative or negative, it be carefully
 noted as not existing. Thus, in heat, we have observed that there
 exists no universal negative, in such substances, at least, as have
 come to our knowledge. Again, if the required nature be eternity or
 incorruptibility, we have no universal affirmative within our sphere,
 for these qualities cannot be predicated of any bodies below the
 heavens, or above the interior of the earth. Secondly, to our general
 propositions as to any concrete, whether affirmative or negative, we
 should subjoin the concretes which appear to approach nearest to the
 non-existing substances; such as the most gentle or least-burning
 flames in heat, or gold in incorruptibility, since it approaches
 nearest to it. For they all serve to show the limit of existence and
 non-existence, and circumscribe forms, so that they cannot wander
 beyond the conditions of matter.
 
 XXXIV. In the twelfth rank of prerogative instances, we will class
 those subjunctive instances, of which we spoke in the last aphorism,
 and which we are also wont to call instances of extremity or limits;
 for they are not only serviceable when subjoined to fixed propositions,
 but also of themselves and from their own nature. They indicate with
 sufficient precision the real divisions of nature, and measures of
 things, and the "how far" nature effects or allows of anything, and
 her passage thence to something else. Such are gold in weight, iron in
 hardness, the whale in the size of animals, the dog in smell, the flame
 of gunpowder in rapid expansion, and others of a like nature. Nor are
 we to pass over the extremes in defect, as well as in abundance, as
 spirits of wine in weight, the touchstone in softness, the worms upon
 the skin in the size of animals, and the like.
 
 XXXV. In the thirteenth rank of prerogative instances we will place
 those of alliance or union. They are such as mingle and unite natures
 held to be heterogeneous, and observed and marked as such in received
 classifications.
 
 These instances show that the operation and effect, which is considered
 peculiar to some one of such heterogeneous natures, may also be
 attributed to another nature styled heterogeneous, so as to prove that
 the difference of the natures is not real nor essential, but a mere
 modification of a common nature. They are very serviceable, therefore,
 in elevating and carrying on the mind, from differences to genera,
 and in removing those phantoms and images of things, which meet it in
 disguise in concrete substances.
 
 For example: let the required nature be heat. The classification
 of heat into three kinds, that of the celestial bodies, that of
 animals, and that of fire, appears to be settled and admitted; and
 these kinds of heat, especially one of them compared with the other
 two, are supposed to be different, and clearly heterogeneous in
 their essence and species, or specific nature, since the heat of the
 heavenly bodies and of animals generates and cherishes, while that of
 fire corrupts and destroys. We have an instance of alliance, then,
 in a very common experiment, that of a vine branch admitted into a
 building where there is a constant fire, by which the grapes ripen a
 whole month sooner than in the air; so that fruit upon the tree can
 be ripened by fire, although this appear the peculiar effect of the
 sun. From this beginning, therefore, the understanding rejects all
 essential difference, and easily ascends to the investigation of the
 real differences between the heat of the sun and that of fire, by which
 their operation is rendered dissimilar, although they partake of a
 common nature.
 
 These differences will be found to be four in number. 1. The heat of
 the sun is much milder and gentler in degree than that of fire. 2. It
 is much more moist in quality, especially as it is transmitted to us
 through the air. 3. Which is the chief point, it is very unequal,
 advancing and increased at one time, retiring and diminished at
 another, which mainly contributes to the generation of bodies. For
 Aristotle rightly asserted, that the principal cause of generation and
 corruption on the surface of the earth was the oblique path of the sun
 in the zodiac, whence its heat becomes very unequal, partly from the
 alternation of night and day, partly from the succession of summer and
 winter. Yet must he immediately corrupt and pervert his discovery,
 by dictating to nature according to his habit, and dogmatically
 assigning the cause of generation to the approach of the sun, and
 that of corruption to its retreat; while, in fact, each circumstance
 indifferently and not respectively contributes both to generation and
 corruption; for unequal heat tends to generate and corrupt, as equable
 heat does to preserve. 4. The fourth difference between the heat of the
 sun and fire is of great consequence; namely, that the sun, gradually,
 and for a length of time, insinuates its effects, while those of fire
 (urged by the impatience of man) are brought to a termination in a
 shorter space of time. But if any one were to pay attention to the
 tempering of fire, and reducing it to a more moderate and gentle degree
 (which may be done in various ways), and then were to sprinkle and mix
 a degree of humidity with it; and, above all, were to imitate the sun
 in its inequality; and, lastly, were patiently to suffer some delay
 (not such, however, as is proportioned to the effects of the sun,
 but more than men usually admit of in those of fire), he would soon
 banish the notion of any difference, and would attempt, or equal, or
 perhaps sometimes surpass the effect of the sun, by the heat of fire.
 A like instance of alliance is that of reviving butterflies, benumbed
 and nearly dead from cold, by the gentle warmth of fire; so that fire
 is no less able to revive animals than to ripen vegetables. We may
 also mention the celebrated invention of Fracastorius, of applying a
 pan considerably heated to the head in desperate cases of apoplexy,
 which clearly expands the animal spirits, when compressed and almost
 extinguished by the humors and obstructions of the brain, and excites
 them to action, as the fire would operate on water or air, and in the
 result produces life. Eggs are sometimes hatched by the heat of fire,
 an exact imitation of animal heat; and there are many instances of the
 like nature, so that no one can doubt that the heat of fire, in many
 cases, can be modified till it resemble that of the heavenly bodies and
 of animals.
 
 Again, let the required natures be motion and rest. There appears to
 be a settled classification, grounded on the deepest philosophy, that
 natural bodies either revolve, move in a straight line, or stand still
 and rest. For there is either motion without limit, or continuance
 within a certain limit, or a translation toward a certain limit. The
 eternal motion of revolution appears peculiar to the heavenly bodies,
 rest to this our globe, and the other bodies (heavy and light, as they
 are termed, that is to say, placed out of their natural position) are
 borne in a straight line to masses or aggregates which resemble them,
 the light toward the heaven, the heavy toward the earth; and all this
 is very fine language.
 
 But we have an instance of alliance in low comets, which revolve,
 though far below the heavens; and the fiction of Aristotle, of the
 comet being fixed to, or necessarily following some star, has been
 long since exploded; not only because it is improbable in itself, but
 from the evident fact of the discursive and irregular motion of comets
 through various parts of the heavens.[125]
 
 Another instance of alliance is that of the motion of air, which
 appears to revolve from east to west within the tropics, where the
 circles of revolution are the greatest.
 
 The flow and ebb of the sea would perhaps be another instance, if the
 water were once found to have a motion of revolution, though slow and
 hardly perceptible, from east to west, subject, however, to a reaction
 twice a day. If this be so, it is clear that the motion of revolution
 is not confined to the celestial bodies, but is shared, also, by air
 and water.
 
 Again--the supposed peculiar disposition of light bodies to rise is
 rather shaken; and here we may find an instance of alliance in a water
 bubble. For if air be placed under water, it rises rapidly toward
 the surface by that striking motion (as Democritus terms it) with
 which the descending water strikes the air and raises it, not by any
 struggle or effort of the air itself; and when it has reached the
 surface of the water, it is prevented from ascending any further, by
 the slight resistance it meets with in the water, which does not allow
 an immediate separation of its parts, so that the tendency of the air
 to rise must be very slight.
 
 Again, let the required nature be weight. It is certainly a received
 classification, that dense and solid bodies are borne toward the centre
 of the earth, and rare and light bodies to the circumference of the
 heavens, as their appropriate places. As far as relates to places
 (though these things have much weight in the schools), the notion of
 there being any determinate place is absurd and puerile. Philosophers
 trifle, therefore, when they tell you, that if the earth were
 perforated, heavy bodies would stop on their arrival at the centre.
 This centre would indeed be an efficacious nothing, or mathematical
 point, could it affect bodies or be sought by them, for a body is not
 acted upon except by a body.[126] In fact, this tendency to ascend
 and descend is either in the conformation of the moving body, or in
 its harmony and sympathy with another body. But if any dense and solid
 body be found, which does not, however, tend toward the earth, the
 classification is at an end. Now, if we allow of Gilbert's opinion,
 that the magnetic power of the earth, in attracting heavy bodies, is
 not extended beyond the limit of its peculiar virtue (which operates
 always at a fixed distance and no further),[127] and this be proved by
 some instance, such an instance will be one of alliance in our present
 subject. The nearest approach to it is that of waterspouts, frequently
 seen by persons navigating the Atlantic toward either of the Indies.
 For the force and mass of the water suddenly effused by waterspouts,
 appears to be so considerable, that the water must have been collected
 previously, and have remained fixed where it was formed, until it was
 afterward forced down by some violent cause, rather than made to fall
 by the natural motion of gravity: so that it may be conjectured that
 a dense and compact mass, at a great distance from the earth, may be
 suspended as the earth itself is, and would not fall, unless forced
 down. We do not, however, affirm this as certain. In the meanwhile,
 both in this respect and many others, it will readily be seen how
 deficient we are in natural history, since we are forced to have
 recourse to suppositions for examples, instead of ascertained instances.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the discursive power of the mind.
 The classification of human reason and animal instinct appears to be
 perfectly correct. Yet there are some instances of the actions of
 brutes which seem to show that they, too, can syllogize. Thus it is
 related, that a crow, which had nearly perished from thirst in a great
 drought, saw some water in the hollow trunk of a tree, but as it was
 too narrow for him to get into it, he continued to throw in pebbles,
 which made the water rise till he could drink; and it afterward became
 a proverb.
 
 Again, let the required nature be vision. The classification
 appears real and certain, which considers light as that which is
 originally visible, and confers the power of seeing; and color, as
 being secondarily visible, and not capable of being seen without
 light, so as to appear a mere image or modification of light. Yet
 there are instances of alliance in each respect; as in snow when in
 great quantities, and in the flame of sulphur; the one being a color
 originally and in itself light, the other a light verging toward
 color.[128]
 
 XXXVI. In the fourteenth rank of prerogative instances, we will place
 the instances of the cross, borrowing our metaphor from the crosses
 erected where two roads meet, to point out the different directions.
 We are wont also to call them decisive and judicial instances, and in
 some cases instances of the oracle and of command. Their nature is as
 follows: When in investigating any nature the understanding is, as it
 were, balanced, and uncertain to which of two or more natures the cause
 of the required nature should be assigned, on account of the frequent
 and usual concurrence of several natures, the instances of the cross
 show that the union of one nature with the required nature is firm
 and indissoluble, while that of the other is unsteady and separable;
 by which means the question is decided, and the first is received as
 the cause, while the other is dismissed and rejected. Such instances,
 therefore, afford great light, and are of great weight, so that the
 course of interpretation sometimes terminates, and is completed in
 them. Sometimes, however, they are found among the instances already
 observed, but they are generally new, being expressly and purposely
 sought for and applied, and brought to light only by attentive and
 active diligence.
 
 For example: let the required nature be the flow and ebb of the sea,
 which is repeated twice a day, at intervals of six hours between each
 advance and retreat, with some little difference, agreeing with the
 motion of the moon. We have here the following crossways:
 
 This motion must be occasioned either by the advancing and the retiring
 of the sea, like water shaken in a basin, which leaves one side while
 it washes the other; or by the rising of the sea from the bottom,
 and its again subsiding, like boiling water. But a doubt arises, to
 which of these causes we should assign the flow and ebb. If the first
 assertion be admitted, it follows, that when there is a flood on
 one side, there must at the same time be an ebb on another, and the
 question therefore is reduced to this. Now Acosta, and some others,
 after a diligent inquiry, have observed that the flood tide takes place
 on the coast of Florida, and the opposite coasts of Spain and Africa,
 at the same time, as does also the ebb; and that there is not, on the
 contrary, a flood tide at Florida when there is an ebb on the coasts
 of Spain and Africa. Yet if one consider the subject attentively,
 this does not prove the necessity of a rising motion, nor refute the
 notion of a progressive motion. For the motion may be progressive, and
 yet inundate the opposite shores of a channel at the same time; as if
 the waters be forced and driven together from some other quarter, for
 instance, which takes place in rivers, for they flow and ebb toward
 each bank at the same time, yet their motion is clearly progressive,
 being that of the waters from the sea entering their mouths. So it may
 happen, that the waters coming in a vast body from the eastern Indian
 Ocean are driven together, and forced into the channel of the Atlantic,
 and therefore inundate both coasts at once. We must inquire, therefore,
 if there be any other channel by which the waters can at the same time
 sink and ebb; and the Southern Ocean at once suggests itself, which is
 not less than the Atlantic, but rather broader and more extensive than
 is requisite for this effect.
 
 We at length arrive, then, at an instance of the cross, which is this.
 If it be positively discovered, that when the flood sets in toward
 the opposite coasts of Florida and Spain in the Atlantic, there is at
 the same time a flood tide on the coasts of Peru and the back part
 of China, in the Southern Ocean, then assuredly, from this decisive
 instance, we must reject the assertion, that the flood and ebb of the
 sea, about which we inquire, takes place by progressive motion; for
 no other sea or place is left where there can be an ebb. But this may
 most easily be learned, by inquiring of the inhabitants of Panama and
 Lima (where the two oceans are separated by a narrow isthmus), whether
 the flood and ebb takes place on the opposite sides of the isthmus
 at the same time, or the reverse. This decision or rejection appears
 certain, if it be granted that the earth is fixed; but if the earth
 revolves, it may perhaps happen, that from the unequal revolution (as
 regards velocity) of the earth and the waters of the sea, there may
 be a violent forcing of the waters into a mass, forming the flood,
 and a subsequent relaxation of them (when they can no longer bear the
 accumulation), forming the ebb. A separate inquiry must be made into
 this. Even with this hypothesis, however, it remains equally true, that
 there must be an ebb somewhere, at the same time that there is a flood
 in another quarter.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the latter of the two motions we
 have supposed; namely, that of a rising and subsiding motion, if it
 should happen that upon diligent examination the progressive motion
 be rejected. We have, then, three ways before us, with regard to this
 nature. The motion, by which the waters raise themselves, and again
 fall back, in the floods and ebbs, without the addition of any other
 water rolled toward them, must take place in one of the three following
 ways: Either the supply of water emanates from the interior of the
 earth, and returns back again; or there is really no greater quantity
 of water, but the same water (without any augmentation of its quantity)
 is extended or rarefied, so as to occupy a greater space and dimension,
 and again contracts itself; or there is neither an additional supply
 nor any extension, but the same waters (with regard to quantity,
 density, or rarity) raise themselves and fall from sympathy, by some
 magnetic power attracting and calling them up, as it were, from
 above. Let us then (passing over the first two motions) reduce the
 investigation to the last, and inquire if there be any such elevation
 of the water by sympathy or a magnetic force; and it is evident, in the
 first place, that the whole mass of water being placed in the trench
 or cavity of the sea, cannot be raised at once, because there would
 not be enough to cover the bottom, so that if there be any tendency of
 this kind in the water to raise itself, yet it would be interrupted
 and checked by the cohesion of things, or (as the common expression
 is) that there may be no vacuum. The water, therefore, must rise on
 one side, and for that reason be diminished and ebb on another. But it
 will again necessarily follow that the magnetic power not being able to
 operate on the whole, operates most intensely on the centre, so as to
 raise the waters there, which, when thus raised successively, desert
 and abandon the sides.[129]
 
 We at length arrive, then, at an instance of the cross, which is this:
 if it be found that during the ebb the surface of the waters at sea
 is more curved and round, from the waters rising in the middle, and
 sinking at the sides or coast, and if, during a flood, it be more even
 and level, from the waters returning to their former position, then
 assuredly, by this decisive instance, the raising of them by a magnetic
 force can be admitted; if otherwise, it must be entirely rejected.
 It is not difficult to make the experiment (by sounding in straits),
 whether the sea be deeper toward the middle in ebbs, than in floods.
 But it must be observed, if this be the case, that (contrary to common
 opinion) the waters rise in ebbs, and only return to their former
 position in floods, so as to bathe and inundate the coast.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the spontaneous motion of revolution,
 and particularly, whether the diurnal motion, by which the sun and
 stars appear to us to rise and set, be a real motion of revolution in
 the heavenly bodies, or only apparent in them, and real in the earth.
 There may be an instance of the cross of the following nature. If there
 be discovered any motion in the ocean from east to west, though very
 languid and weak, and if the same motion be discovered rather more
 swift in the air (particularly within the tropics, where it is more
 perceptible from the circles being greater). If it be discovered also
 in the low comets, and be already quick and powerful in them; if it
 be found also in the planets, but so tempered and regulated as to be
 slower in those nearest the earth, and quicker in those at the greatest
 distance, being quickest of all in the heavens, then the diurnal motion
 should certainly be considered as real in the heavens, and that of the
 earth must be rejected; for it will be evident that the motion from
 east to west is part of the system of the world and universal; since it
 is most rapid in the height of the heavens, and gradually grows weaker,
 till it stops and is extinguished in rest at the earth.
 
 Again, let the required nature be that other motion of revolution,
 so celebrated among astronomers, which is contrary to the diurnal,
 namely, from west to east--and which the ancient astronomers assign
 to the planets, and even to the starry sphere, but Copernicus and his
 followers to the earth also--and let it be examined whether any such
 motion be found in nature, or it be rather a fiction and hypothesis
 for abridging and facilitating calculation, and for promoting that
 fine notion of effecting the heavenly motions by perfect circles; for
 there is nothing which proves such a motion in heavenly objects to be
 true and real, either in a planet's not returning in its diurnal motion
 to the same point of the starry sphere, or in the pole of the zodiac
 being different from that of the world, which two circumstances have
 occasioned this notion. For the first phenomenon is well accounted for
 by the spheres overtaking or falling behind each other, and the second
 by spiral lines; so that the inaccuracy of the return and declination
 to the tropics may be rather modifications of the one diurnal motion
 than contrary motions, or about different poles. And it is most
 certain, if we consider ourselves for a moment as part of the vulgar
 (setting aside the fictions of astronomers and the school, who are
 wont undeservedly to attack the senses in many respects, and to affect
 obscurity), that the apparent motion is such as we have said, a model
 of which we have sometimes caused to be represented by wires in a sort
 of a machine.
 
 We may take the following instances of the cross upon this subject. If
 it be found in any history worthy of credit, that there has existed any
 comet, high or low, which has not revolved in manifest harmony (however
 irregularly) with the diurnal motion, then we may decide so far as to
 allow such a motion to be possible in nature. But if nothing of the
 sort be found, it must be suspected, and recourse must be had to other
 instances of the cross.
 
 Again, let the required nature be weight or gravity. Heavy and
 ponderous bodies must, either of their own nature, tend toward the
 centre of the earth by their peculiar formation, or must be attracted
 and hurried by the corporeal mass of the earth itself, as being an
 assemblage of similar bodies, and be drawn to it by sympathy. But if
 the latter be the cause, it follows that the nearer bodies approach to
 the earth, the more powerfully and rapidly they must be borne toward
 it, and the further they are distant, the more faintly and slowly (as
 is the case in magnetic attractions), and that this must happen within
 a given distance; so that if they be separated at such a distance from
 the earth that the power of the earth cannot act upon them, they will
 remain suspended like the earth, and not fall at all.[130]
 
 The following instance of the cross may be adopted. Take a clock moved
 by leaden weights,[131] and another by a spring, and let them be set
 well together, so that one be neither quicker nor slower than the
 other; then let the clock moved by weights be placed on the top of
 a very high church, and the other be kept below, and let it be well
 observed, if the former move slower than it did, from the diminished
 power of the weights. Let the same experiment be made at the bottom
 of mines worked to a considerable depth, in order to see whether the
 clock move more quickly from the increased power of the weights. But
 if this power be found to diminish at a height, and to increase in
 subterraneous places, the attraction of the corporeal mass of the earth
 may be taken as the cause of weight.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the polarity of the steel needle when
 touched with the magnet. We have these two ways with regard to this
 nature--Either the touch of the magnet must communicate polarity to
 the steel toward the north and south, or else it may only excite and
 prepare it, while the actual motion is occasioned by the presence of
 the earth, which Gilbert considers to be the case, and endeavors to
 prove with so much labor. The particulars he has inquired into with
 such ingenious zeal amount to this--1. An iron bolt placed for a long
 time toward the north and south acquires polarity from this habit,
 without the touch of the magnet, as if the earth itself operating
 but weakly from its distance (for the surface or outer crust of the
 earth does not, in his opinion, possess the magnetic power), yet, by
 long continued motion, could supply the place of the magnet, excite
 the iron, and convert and change it when excited. 2. Iron, at a red
 or white heat, when quenched in a direction parallel to the north
 and south, also acquires polarity without the touch of the magnet, as
 if the parts of iron being put in motion by ignition, and afterward
 recovering themselves, were, at the moment of being quenched, more
 susceptible and sensitive of the power emanating from the earth, than
 at other times, and therefore as it were excited. But these points,
 though well observed, do not completely prove his assertion.
 
 An instance of the cross on this point might be as follows: Let a small
 magnetic globe be taken, and its poles marked, and placed toward the
 east and west, not toward the north and south, and let it continue
 thus. Then let an untouched needle be placed over it, and suffered
 to remain so for six or seven days. Now, the needle (for this is not
 disputed), while it remains over the magnet, will leave the poles of
 the world and turn to those of the magnet, and therefore, as long as it
 remains in the above position, will turn to the east and west. But if
 the needle, when removed from the magnet and placed upon a pivot, be
 found immediately to turn to the north and south, or even by degrees
 to return thither, then the presence of the earth must be considered
 as the cause, but if it remains turned as at first, toward the east
 and west, or lose its polarity, then that cause must be suspected, and
 further inquiry made.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the corporeal substance of the
 moon, whether it be rare, fiery, and aerial (as most of the ancient
 philosophers have thought), or solid and dense (as Gilbert and many
 of the moderns, with some of the ancients, hold).[132] The reasons
 for this latter opinion are grounded chiefly upon this, that the
 moon reflects the sun's rays, and that light does not appear capable
 of being reflected except by solids. The instances of the cross will
 therefore (if any) be such as to exhibit reflection by a rare body,
 such as flame, if it be but sufficiently dense. Now, certainly, one
 of the reasons of twilight is the reflection[133] of the rays of the
 sun by the upper part of the atmosphere. We see the sun's rays also
 reflected on fine evenings by streaks of moist clouds, with a splendor
 not less, but perhaps more bright and glorious than that reflected
 from the body of the moon, and yet it is not clear that those clouds
 have formed into a dense body of water. We see, also, that the dark
 air behind the windows at night reflects the light of a candle in the
 same manner as a dense body would do.[134] The experiment should also
 be made of causing the sun's rays to fall through a hole upon some dark
 and bluish flame. The unconfined rays of the sun, when falling on faint
 flames, do certainly appear to deaden them, and render them more like
 white smoke than flames. These are the only instances which occur at
 present of the nature of those of the cross, and better perhaps can
 be found. But it must always be observed that reflection is not to
 be expected from flame, unless it be of some depth, for otherwise it
 becomes nearly transparent. This at least may be considered certain,
 that light is always either received and transmitted or reflected by an
 even surface.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the motion of projectiles (such
 as darts, arrows, and balls) through the air. The school, in its
 usual manner, treats this very carelessly, considering it enough to
 distinguish it by the name of violent motion, from that which they
 term natural, and as far as regards the first percussion or impulse,
 satisfies itself by its axiom, that two bodies cannot exist in one
 place, or there would be a penetration of dimensions. With regard to
 this nature we have these two crossways--The motion must arise either
 from the air carrying the projected body, and collecting behind it,
 like a stream behind boats, or the wind behind straws; or from the
 parts of the body itself not supporting the impression, but pushing
 themselves forward in succession to ease it. Fracastorius, and nearly
 all those who have entered into any refined inquiry upon the subject,
 adopt the first. Nor can it be doubted that the air has some effect,
 yet the other motion is without doubt real, as is clear from a vast
 number of experiments. Among others we may take this instance of the
 cross, namely, that a thin plate or wire of iron rather stiff, or even
 a reed or pen split in two, when drawn up and bent between the finger
 and thumb, will leap forward; for it is clear that this cannot be
 attributed to the air's being collected behind the body, because the
 source of motion is in the centre of the plate or pen, and not in its
 extremities.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the rapid and powerful motion of the
 explosion of gunpowder, by which such vast masses are upheaved, and
 such weights discharged as we observe in large mines and mortars, there
 are two crossways before us with regard to this nature. This motion
 is excited either by the mere effort of the body expanding itself when
 inflamed, or by the assisting effort of the crude spirit, which escapes
 rapidly from fire, and bursts violently from the surrounding flame as
 from a prison. The school, however, and common opinion only consider
 the first effort; for men think that they are great philosophers when
 they assert that flame, from the form of the element, is endowed with
 a kind of necessity of occupying a greater space than the same body
 had occupied when in the form of powder, and that thence proceeds the
 motion in question. In the meantime they do not observe, that although
 this may be true, on the supposition of flame being generated, yet the
 generation may be impeded by a weight of sufficient force to compress
 and suffocate it, so that no such necessity exists as they assert. They
 are right, indeed, in imagining that the expansion and the consequent
 emission or removal of the opposing body, is necessary if flame be once
 generated, but such a necessity is avoided if the solid opposing mass
 suppress the flame before it be generated; and we in fact see that
 flame, especially at the moment of its generation, is mild and gentle,
 and requires a hollow space where it can play and try its force. The
 great violence of the effect, therefore, cannot be attributed to this
 cause; but the truth is, that the generation of these exploding flames
 and fiery blasts arises from the conflict of two bodies of a decidedly
 opposite nature--the one very inflammable, as is the sulphur, the
 other having an antipathy to flame, namely, the crude spirit of the
 nitre; so that an extraordinary conflict takes place while the sulphur
 is becoming inflamed as far as it can (for the third body, the willow
 charcoal, merely incorporates and conveniently unites the two others),
 and the spirit of nitre is escaping, as far also as it can, and at
 the same time expanding itself (for air, and all crude substances,
 and water are expanded by heat), fanning thus, in every direction,
 the flame of the sulphur by its escape and violence, just as if by
 invisible bellows.
 
 Two kinds of instances of the cross might here be used--the one of
 very inflammable substances, such as sulphur and camphor, naphtha and
 the like, and their compounds, which take fire more readily and easily
 than gunpowder if left to themselves (and this shows that the effort
 to catch fire does not of itself produce such a prodigious effect);
 the other of substances which avoid and repel flame, such as all
 salts; for we see that when they are cast into the fire, the aqueous
 spirit escapes with a crackling noise before flame is produced, which
 also happens in a less degree in stiff leaves, from the escape of
 the aqueous part before the oily part has caught fire. This is more
 particularly observed in quicksilver, which is not improperly called
 mineral water, and which, without any inflammation, nearly equals the
 force of gunpowder by simple explosion and expansion, and is said, when
 mixed with gunpowder, to increase its force.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the transitory nature of flame and
 its momentaneous extinction; for to us the nature of flame does not
 appear to be fixed or settled, but to be generated from moment to
 moment, and to be every instant extinguished; it being clear that
 those flames which continue and last, do not owe their continuance to
 the same mass of flame, but to a continued succession of new flame
 regularly generated, and that the same identical flame does not
 continue. This is easily shown by removing the food or source of the
 flame, when it at once goes out. We have the two following crossways
 with regard to this nature:
 
 This momentary nature either arises from the cessation of the cause
 which first produced it, as in light, sounds, and violent motions,
 as they are termed, or flame may be capable, by its own nature, of
 duration, but is subjected to some violence from the contrary natures
 which surround it, and is destroyed.
 
 We may therefore adopt the following instance of the cross. We see
 to what a height the flames rise in great conflagrations; for as the
 base of the flame becomes more extensive, its vertex is more lofty.
 It appears, then, that the commencement of the extinction takes place
 at the sides, where the flame is compressed by the air, and is ill
 at ease; but the centre of the flame, which is untouched by the air
 and surrounded by flame, continues the same, and is not extinguished
 until compressed by degrees by the air attacking it from the sides.
 All flame, therefore, is pyramidal, having its base near the source,
 and its vertex pointed from its being resisted by the air, and not
 supplied from the source. On the contrary, the smoke, which is narrow
 at the base, expands in its ascent, and resembles an inverted pyramid,
 because the air admits the smoke, but compresses the flame; for let
 no one dream that the lighted flame is air, since they are clearly
 heterogeneous.
 
 The instance of the cross will be more accurate, if the experiment can
 be made by flames of different colors. Take, therefore, a small metal
 sconce, and place a lighted taper in it, then put it in a basin, and
 pour a small quantity of spirits of wine round the sconce, so as not to
 reach its edge, and light the spirit. Now the flame of the spirit will
 be blue, and that of the taper yellow; observe, therefore, whether the
 latter (which can easily be distinguished from the former by its color,
 for flames do not mix immediately, as liquids do) continue pyramidal,
 or tend more to a globular figure, since there is nothing to destroy or
 compress it. If the latter result be observed, it must be considered
 as settled, that flame continues positively the same, while inclosed
 within another flame, and not exposed to the resisting force of the air.
 
 Let this suffice for the instances of the cross. We have dwelt the
 longer upon them in order gradually to teach and accustom mankind to
 judge of nature by these instances, and enlightening experiments, and
 not by probable reasons.[135]
 
 XXXVII. We will treat of the instances of divorce as the fifteenth of
 our prerogative instances. They indicate the separation of natures of
 the most common occurrence. They differ, however, from those subjoined
 to the accompanying instances; for the instances of divorce point out
 the separation of a particular nature from some concrete substance with
 which it is usually found in conjunction, while the hostile instances
 point out the total separation of one nature from another. They differ,
 also, from the instances of the cross, because they decide nothing, but
 only inform us that the one nature is capable of being separated from
 the other. They are of use in exposing false forms, and dissipating
 hasty theories derived from obvious facts; so that they add ballast and
 weight, as it were, to the understanding.
 
 For instance, let the acquired natures be those four which Telesius
 terms associates, and of the same family, namely, heat, light, rarity,
 and mobility, or promptitude to motion; yet many instances of divorce
 can be discovered between them. Air is rare and easily moved, but
 neither hot nor light; the moon is light but not hot; boiling water is
 warm but not light; the motion of the needle in the compass is swift
 and active, and yet its substance is cold, dense, and opaque; and there
 are many similar examples.
 
 Again, let the required natures be corporeal nature and natural action.
 The latter appears incapable of subsisting without some body, yet may
 we, perhaps, even here find an instance of divorce, as in the magnetic
 motion, which draws the iron to the magnet, and heavy bodies to the
 globe of the earth; to which we may add other actions which operate at
 a distance. For such action takes place in time, by distinct moments,
 not in an instant; and in space, by regular degrees and distances.
 There is, therefore, some one moment of time and some interval of
 space, in which the power or action is suspended between the two bodies
 creating the motion. Our consideration, then, is reduced to this,
 whether the bodies which are the extremes of motion prepare or alter
 the intermediate bodies, so that the power advances from one extreme
 to the other by succession and actual contact, and in the meantime
 exists in some intermediate body; or whether there exists in reality
 nothing but the bodies, the power, and the space? In the case of the
 rays of light, sounds, and heat, and some other objects which operate
 at a distance, it is indeed probable that the intermediate bodies
 are prepared and altered, the more so because a qualified medium is
 required for their operation. But the magnetic or attractive power
 admits of an indifferent medium, and it is not impeded in any. But
 if that power or action is independent of the intermediate body, it
 follows that it is a natural power or action existing in a certain time
 and space without any body, since it exists neither in the extreme nor
 in the intermediate bodies. Hence the magnetic action may be taken as
 an instance of divorce of corporeal nature and natural action; to which
 we may add, as a corollary and an advantage not to be neglected, that
 it may be taken as a proof of essence and substance being separate and
 incorporeal, even by those who philosophize according to the senses.
 For if natural power and action emanating from a body can exist at any
 time and place entirely without any body, it is nearly a proof that
 it can also emanate originally from an incorporeal substance; for a
 corporeal nature appears to be no less necessary for supporting and
 conveying, than for exciting or generating natural action.
 
 XXXVIII. Next follow five classes of instances which we are wont to
 call by the general term of instances of the lamp, or of immediate
 information. They are such as assist the senses; for since every
 interpretation of nature sets out from the senses, and leads, by a
 regular fixed and well-established road, from the perceptions of
 the senses to those of the understanding (which are true notions
 and axioms), it necessarily follows, that in proportion as the
 representatives or ministerings of the senses are more abundant and
 accurate, everything else must be more easy and successful.
 
 The first of these five sets of instances of the lamp, strengthen,
 enlarge, and correct the immediate operations of the senses; the second
 reduce to the sphere of the senses such matters as are beyond it; the
 third indicate the continued process or series of such things and
 motions, as for the most part are only observed in their termination,
 or in periods; the fourth supply the absolute wants of the senses; the
 fifth excite their attention and observation, and at the same time
 limit the subtilty of things. We will now proceed to speak of them
 singly.
 
 XXXIX. In the sixteenth rank, then, of prerogative instances, we will
 place the instances of the door or gate, by which name we designate
 such as assist the immediate action of the senses. It is obvious,
 that sight holds the first rank among the senses, with regard to
 information, for which reason we must seek principally helps for that
 sense. These helps appear to be threefold, either to enable it to
 perceive objects not naturally seen, or to see them from a greater
 distance, or to see them more accurately and distinctly.
 
 We have an example of the first (not to speak of spectacles and the
 like, which only correct and remove the infirmity of a deficient
 sight, and therefore give no further information) in the lately
 invented microscopes, which exhibit the latent and invisible minutiae
 of substances, and their hidden formation and motion, by wonderfully
 increasing their apparent magnitude. By their assistance we behold
 with astonishment the accurate form and outline of a flea, moss, and
 animalculae, as well as their previously invisible color and motion.
 It is said, also, that an apparently straight line, drawn with a
 pen or pencil, is discovered by such a microscope to be very uneven
 and curved, because neither the motion of the hand, when assisted
 by a ruler, nor the impression of ink or color, are really regular,
 although the irregularities are so minute as not to be perceptible
 without the assistance of the microscope. Men have (as is usual in
 new and wonderful discoveries) added a superstitious remark, that
 the microscope sheds a lustre on the works of nature, and dishonor
 on those of art, which only means that the tissue of nature is much
 more delicate than that of art. For the microscope is only of use for
 minute objects, and Democritus, perhaps, if he had seen it, would have
 exulted in the thought of a means being discovered for seeing his atom,
 which he affirmed to be entirely invisible. But the inadequacy of these
 microscopes, for the observation of any but the most minute bodies, and
 even of those if parts of a larger body, destroys their utility; for
 if the invention could be extended to greater bodies, or the minute
 parts of greater bodies, so that a piece of cloth would appear like a
 net, and the latent minutiae and irregularities of gems, liquids, urine,
 blood, wounds, and many other things could be rendered visible, the
 greatest advantage would, without doubt, be derived.
 
 We have an instance of the second kind in the telescope, discovered
 by the wonderful exertions of Galileo; by the assistance of which a
 nearer intercourse may be opened (as by boats or vessels) between
 ourselves and the heavenly objects. For by its aid we are assured
 that the Milky Way is but a knot or constellation of small stars,
 clearly defined and separate, which the ancients only conjectured to
 be the case; whence it appears to be capable of demonstration, that
 the spaces of the planetary orbits (as they are termed) are not quite
 destitute of other stars, but that the heaven begins to glitter with
 stars before we arrive at the starry sphere, although they may be too
 small to be visible without the telescope. By the telescope, also, we
 can behold the revolutions of smaller stars round Jupiter, whence it
 may be conjectured that there are several centres of motion among the
 stars. By its assistance, also, the irregularity of light and shade on
 the moon's surface is more clearly observed and determined, so as to
 allow of a sort of selenography.[136] By the telescope we see the spots
 in the sun, and other similar phenomena; all of which are most noble
 discoveries, as far as credit can be safely given to demonstrations
 of this nature, which are on this account very suspicious, namely,
 that experiment stops at these few, and nothing further has yet
 been discovered by the same method, among objects equally worthy of
 consideration.
 
 We have instances of the third kind in measuring-rods, astrolabes,
 and the like, which do not enlarge, but correct and guide the sight.
 If there be other instances which assist the other senses in their
 immediate and individual action, yet if they add nothing further to
 their information they are not apposite to our present purpose, and we
 have therefore said nothing of them.
 
 XL. In the seventeenth rank of prerogative instances we will place
 citing instances (to borrow a term from the tribunals), because they
 cite those things to appear, which have not yet appeared. We are wont
 also to call them invoking instances, and their property is that of
 reducing to the sphere of the senses objects which do not immediately
 fall within it.
 
 Objects escape the senses either from their distance, or the
 intervention of other bodies, or because they are not calculated
 to make an impression upon the senses, or because they are not in
 sufficient quantity to strike the senses, or because there is not
 sufficient time for their acting upon the senses, or because the
 impression is too violent, or because the senses are previously filled
 and possessed by the object, so as to leave no room for any new motion.
 These remarks apply principally to sight, and next to touch, which two
 senses act extensively in giving information, and that too upon general
 objects, while the remaining three inform us only, as it were, by their
 immediate action, and as to specific objects.
 
 There can be no reduction to the sphere of the senses in the first
 case, unless in the place of the object, which cannot be perceived
 on account of the distance, there be added or substituted some other
 object, which can excite and strike the sense from a greater distance,
 as in the communication of intelligence by fires, bells, and the like.
 
 In the second case we effect this reduction by rendering those things
 which are concealed by the interposition of other bodies, and which
 cannot easily be laid open, evident to the senses by means of that
 which lies at the surface, or proceeds from the interior; thus the
 state of the body is judged of by the pulse, urine, etc.
 
 The third and fourth cases apply to many subjects, and the reduction
 to the sphere of the senses must be obtained from every quarter in the
 investigation of things. There are many examples. It is obvious that
 air, and spirit, and the like, whose whole substance is extremely rare
 and delicate, can neither be seen nor touched--a reduction, therefore,
 to the senses becomes necessary in every investigation relating to such
 bodies.
 
 Let the required nature, therefore, be the action and motion of the
 spirit inclosed in tangible bodies; for every tangible body with which
 we are acquainted contains an invisible and intangible spirit, over
 which it is drawn, and which it seems to clothe. This spirit being
 emitted from a tangible substance, leaves the body contracted and dry;
 when retained, it softens and melts it; when neither wholly emitted nor
 retained, it models it, endows it with limbs, assimilates, manifests,
 organizes it, and the like. All these points are reduced to the sphere
 of the senses by manifest effects.
 
 For in every tangible and inanimate body the inclosed spirit at first
 increases, and as it were feeds on the tangible parts which are most
 open and prepared for it; and when it has digested and modified them,
 and turned them into spirit, it escapes with them. This formation and
 increase of spirit is rendered sensible by the diminution of weight;
 for in every desiccation something is lost in quantity, not only of
 the spirit previously existing in the body, but of the body itself,
 which was previously tangible, and has been recently changed, for the
 spirit itself has no weight. The departure or emission of spirit is
 rendered sensible in the rust of metals, and other putrefactions of a
 like nature, which stop before they arrive at the rudiments of life,
 which belong to the third species of process.[137] In compact bodies
 the spirit does not find pores and passages for its escape, and is
 therefore obliged to force out, and drive before it, the tangible parts
 also, which consequently protrude, whence arises rust and the like. The
 contraction of the tangible parts, occasioned by the emission of part
 of the spirit (whence arises desiccation), is rendered sensible by the
 increased hardness of the substance, and still more by the fissures,
 contractions, shrivelling, and folds of the bodies thus produced. For
 the parts of wood split and contract, skins become shrivelled, and not
 only that, but, if the spirit be emitted suddenly by the heat of the
 fire, become so hastily contracted as to twist and roll themselves up.
 
 On the contrary, when the spirit is retained, and yet expanded and
 excited by heat or the like (which happens in solid and tenacious
 bodies), then the bodies are softened, as in hot iron; or flow, as in
 metals; or melt, as in gums, wax, and the like. The contrary effects
 of heat, therefore (hardening some substances and melting others), are
 easily reconciled,[138] because the spirit is emitted in the former,
 and agitated and retained in the latter; the latter action is that of
 heat and the spirit, the former that of the tangible parts themselves,
 after the spirit's emission.
 
 But when the spirit is neither entirely retained nor emitted, but
 only strives and exercises itself, within its limits, and meets with
 tangible parts, which obey and readily follow it wherever it leads
 them, then follows the formation of an organic body, and of limbs, and
 the other vital actions of vegetables and animals. These are rendered
 sensible chiefly by diligent observation of the first beginnings, and
 rudiments or effects of life in animalculae sprung from putrefaction, as
 in the eggs of ants, worms, mosses, frogs after rain, etc. Both a mild
 heat and a pliant substance, however, are necessary for the production
 of life, in order that the spirit may neither hastily escape, nor be
 restrained by the obstinacy of the parts, so as not to be able to bend
 and model them like wax.
 
 Again, the difference of spirit which is important and of effect
 in many points (as unconnected spirit, branching spirit, branching
 and cellular spirit, the first of which is that of all inanimate
 substances, the second of vegetables, and the third of animals), is
 placed, as it were, before the eyes by many reducing instances.
 
 Again, it is clear that the more refined tissue and conformation of
 things (though forming the whole body of visible or tangible objects)
 are neither visible nor tangible. Our information, therefore, must
 here also be derived from reduction to the sphere of the senses. But
 the most radical and primary difference of formation depends on the
 abundance or scarcity of matter within the same space or dimensions.
 For the other formations which regard the dissimilarity of the parts
 contained in the same body, and their collocation and position, are
 secondary in comparison with the former.
 
 Let the required nature then be the expansion or coherence of matter in
 different bodies, or the quantity of matter relative to the dimensions
 of each. For there is nothing in nature more true than the twofold
 proposition--that nothing proceeds from nothing and that nothing is
 reduced to nothing, but that the quantum, or sum total of matter, is
 constant, and is neither increased nor diminished. Nor is it less true,
 that out of this given quantity of matter, there is a greater or less
 quantity, contained within the same space or dimensions according to
 the difference of bodies; as, for instance, water contains more than
 air. So that if any one were to assert that a given content of water
 can be changed into an equal content of air, it is the same as if he
 were to assert that something can be reduced into nothing. On the
 contrary, if any one were to assert that a given content of air can be
 changed into an equal content of water, it is the same as if he were
 to assert that something can proceed from nothing. From this abundance
 or scarcity of matter are properly derived the notions of density and
 rarity, which are taken in various and promiscuous senses.
 
 This third assertion may be considered as being also sufficiently
 certain; namely, that the greater or less quantity of matter in this or
 that body, may, by comparison, be reduced to calculation, and exact, or
 nearly exact, proportion. Thus, if one should say that there is such
 an accumulation of matter in a given quantity of gold, that it would
 require twenty-one times the quantity in dimension of spirits of wine,
 to make up the same quantity of matter, it would not be far from the
 truth.
 
 The accumulation of matter, however, and its relative quantity, are
 rendered sensible by weight; for weight is proportionate to the
 quantity of matter, as regards the parts of a tangible substance, but
 spirit and its quantity of matter are not to be computed by weight,
 which spirit rather diminishes than augments.
 
 We have made a tolerably accurate table of weight, in which we have
 selected the weights and size of all the metals, the principal
 minerals, stones, liquids, oils, and many other natural and artificial
 bodies: a very useful proceeding both as regards theory and practice,
 and which is capable of revealing many unexpected results. Nor is this
 of little consequence, that it serves to demonstrate that the whole
 range of the variety of tangible bodies with which we are acquainted
 (we mean tolerably close, and not spongy, hollow bodies, which are for
 a considerable part filled with air), does not exceed the ratio of one
 to twenty-one. So limited is nature, or at least that part of it to
 which we are most habituated.
 
 We have also thought it deserving our industry, to try if we could
 arrive at the ratio of intangible or pneumatic bodies to tangible
 bodies, which we attempted by the following contrivance. We took a
 vial capable of containing about an ounce, using a small vessel in
 order to effect the subsequent evaporation with less heat. We filled
 this vial, almost to the neck, with spirits of wine, selecting it as
 the tangible body which, by our table, was the rarest, and contained a
 less quantity of matter in a given space than all other tangible bodies
 which are compact and not hollow. Then we noted exactly the weight
 of the liquid and vial. We next took a bladder, containing about two
 pints, and squeezed all the air out of it, as completely as possible,
 and until the sides of the bladder met. We first, however, rubbed the
 bladder gently with oil, so as to make it air-tight, by closing its
 pores with the oil. We tied the bladder tightly round the mouth of the
 vial, which we had inserted in it, and with a piece of waxed thread
 to make it fit better and more tightly, and then placed the vial on
 some hot coals in a brazier. The vapor or steam of the spirit, dilated
 and become aeriform by the heat, gradually swelled out the bladder,
 and stretched it in every direction like a sail. As soon as that was
 accomplished, we removed the vial from the fire and placed it on a
 carpet, that it might not be cracked by the cold; we also pricked the
 bladder immediately, that the steam might not return to a liquid state
 by the cessation of heat, and confound the proportions. We then removed
 the bladder, and again took the weight of the spirit which remained;
 and so calculated the quantity which had been converted into vapor, or
 an aeriform shape, and then examined how much space had been occupied
 by the body in its form of spirits of wine in the vial, and how much,
 on the other hand, had been occupied by it in its aeriform shape in the
 bladder, and subtracted the results; from which it was clear that the
 body, thus converted and changed, acquired an expansion of one hundred
 times beyond its former bulk.
 
 Again, let the required nature be heat or cold, of such a degree as
 not to be sensible from its weakness. They are rendered sensible by
 the thermometer, as we described it above;[139] for the cold and heat
 are not actually perceived by the touch, but heat expands and cold
 contracts the air. Nor, again, is that expansion or contraction of the
 air in itself visible, but the air when expanded depresses the water,
 and when contracted raises it, which is the first reduction to sight.
 
 Again, let the required nature be the mixture of bodies; namely,
 how much aqueous, oleaginous or spirituous, ashy or salt parts they
 contain; or, as a particular example, how much butter, cheese, and whey
 there is in milk, and the like. These things are rendered sensible by
 artificial and skilful separations in tangible substances; and the
 nature of the spirit in them, though not immediately perceptible, is
 nevertheless discovered by the various motions and efforts of bodies.
 And, indeed, in this branch men have labored hard in distillations
 and artificial separations, but with little more success than in
 their other experiments now in use; their methods being mere guesses
 and blind attempts, and more industrious than intelligent; and what
 is worst of all, without any imitation or rivalry of nature, but
 rather by violent heats and too energetic agents, to the destruction
 of any delicate conformation, in which principally consist the
 hidden virtues and sympathies. Nor do men in these separations ever
 attend to or observe what we have before pointed out; namely, that
 in attacking bodies by fire, or other methods, many qualities are
 superinduced by the fire itself, and the other bodies used to effect
 the separation, which were not originally in the compound. Hence arise
 most extraordinary fallacies; for the mass of vapor which is emitted
 from water by fire, for instance, did not exist as vapor or air in the
 water, but is chiefly created by the expansion of the water by the heat
 of the fire.
 
 So, in general, all delicate experiments on natural or artificial
 bodies, by which the genuine are distinguished from the adulterated,
 and the better from the more common, should be referred to this
 division; for they bring that which is not the object of the senses
 within their sphere. They are therefore to be everywhere diligently
 sought after.
 
 With regard to the fifth cause of objects escaping our senses, it is
 clear that the action of the sense takes place by motion, and this
 motion is time. If, therefore, the motion of any body be either so slow
 or so swift as not to be proportioned to the necessary momentum which
 operates on the senses, the object is not perceived at all; as in the
 motion of the hour hand, and that, again, of a musket-ball. The motion
 which is imperceptible by the senses from its slowness, is readily and
 usually rendered sensible by the accumulation of motion; that which is
 imperceptible from its velocity, has not as yet been well measured; it
 is necessary, however, that this should be done in some cases, with a
 view to a proper investigation of nature.
 
 The sixth case, where the sense is impeded by the power of the object,
 admits of a reduction to the sensible sphere, either by removing the
 object to a greater distance, or by deadening its effects by the
 interposition of a medium, which may weaken and not destroy the object;
 or by the admission of its reflection where the direct impression is
 too strong, as that of the sun in a basin of water.
 
 The seventh case, where the senses are so overcharged with the object
 as to leave no further room, scarcely occurs except in the smell or
 taste, and is not of much consequence as regards our present subject.
 Let what we have said, therefore, suffice with regard to the reduction
 to the sensible sphere of objects not naturally within its compass.
 
 Sometimes, however, this reduction is not extended to the senses of
 man, but to those of some other animal, whose senses, in some points,
 exceed those of man; as (with regard to some scents) to that of the
 dog, and with regard to light existing imperceptibly in the air, when
 not illuminated from any extraneous source, to the sense of the cat,
 the owl, and other animals which see by night. For Telesius has well
 observed, that there appears to be an original portion of light even
 in the air itself,[140] although but slight and meagre, and of no use
 for the most part to the eyes of men, and those of the generality
 of animals; because those animals to whose senses this light is
 proportioned can see by night, which does not, in all probability,
 proceed from their seeing either without light or by any internal light.
 
 Here, too, we would observe, that we at present discuss only the
 wants of the senses, and their remedies; for their deceptions must be
 referred to the inquiries appropriated to the senses, and sensible
 objects; except that important deception, which makes them define
 objects in their relation to man, and not in their relation to the
 universe, and which is only corrected by universal reasoning and
 philosophy.[141]
 
 XLI. In the eighteenth rank of prerogative instances we will class the
 instances of the road, which we are also wont to call itinerant and
 jointed instances. They are such as indicate the gradually continued
 motions of nature. This species of instances escapes rather our
 observation than our senses; for men are wonderfully indolent upon
 this subject, consulting nature in a desultory manner, and at periodic
 intervals, when bodies have been regularly finished and completed,
 and not during her work. But if any one were desirous of examining
 and contemplating the talents and industry of an artificer, he would
 not merely wish to see the rude materials of his art, and then his
 work when finished, but rather to be present while he is at labor,
 and proceeding with his work. Something of the same kind should be
 done with regard to nature. For instance, if any one investigate the
 vegetation of plants, he should observe from the first sowing of any
 seed (which can easily be done, by pulling up every day seeds which
 have been two, three, or four days in the ground, and examining them
 diligently), how and when the seed begins to swell and break, and be
 filled, as it were, with spirit; then how it begins to burst the bark
 and push out fibres, raising itself a little at the same time, unless
 the ground be very stiff; then how it pushes out these fibres, some
 downward for roots, others upward for the stem, sometimes also creeping
 laterally, if it find the earth open and more yielding on one side, and
 the like. The same should be done in observing the hatching of eggs,
 where we may easily see the process of animation and organization, and
 what parts are formed of the yolk, and what of the white of the egg,
 and the like. The same may be said of the inquiry into the formation
 of animals from putrefaction; for it would not be so humane to inquire
 into perfect and terrestrial animals, by cutting the foetus from the
 womb; but opportunities may perhaps be offered of abortions, animals
 killed in hunting, and the like. Nature, therefore, must, as it were,
 be watched, as being more easily observed by night than by day: for
 contemplations of this kind may be considered as carried on by night,
 from the minuteness and perpetual burning of our watch-light.
 
 The same must be attempted with inanimate objects, which we have
 ourselves done by inquiring into the opening of liquids by fire.
 For the mode in which water expands is different from that observed
 in wine, vinegar, or verjuice, and very different, again, from that
 observed in milk and oil, and the like; and this was easily seen by
 boiling them with slow heat, in a glass vessel, through which the
 whole may be clearly perceived. But we merely mention this, intending
 to treat of it more at large and more closely when we come to the
 discovery of the latent process; for it should always be remembered
 that we do not here treat of things themselves, but merely propose
 examples.[142]
 
 XLII. In the nineteenth rank of prerogative instances we will class
 supplementary or substitutive instances, which we are also wont to call
 instances of refuge. They are such as supply information, where the
 senses are entirely deficient, and we therefore have recourse to them
 when appropriate instances cannot be obtained. This substitution is
 twofold, either by approximation or by analogy. For instance, there is
 no known medium which entirely prevents the effect of the magnet in
 attracting iron--neither gold, nor silver, nor stone, nor glass, wood,
 water, oil, cloth, or fibrous bodies, air, flame, or the like. Yet by
 accurate experiment, a medium may perhaps be found which would deaden
 its effect, more than another comparatively and in degree; as, for
 instance, the magnet would not perhaps attract iron through the same
 thickness of gold as of air, or the same quantity of ignited as of cold
 silver, and so on; for we have not ourselves made the experiment, but
 it will suffice as an example. Again, there is no known body which is
 not susceptible of heat, when brought near the fire; yet air becomes
 warm much sooner than stone. These are examples of substitution by
 approximation.
 
 Substitution by analogy is useful, but less sure, and therefore to be
 adopted with some judgment. It serves to reduce that which is not the
 object of the senses to their sphere, not by the perceptible operations
 of the imperceptible body, but by the consideration of some similar
 perceptible body. For instance, let the subject for inquiry be the
 mixture of spirits, which are invisible bodies. There appears to be
 some relation between bodies and their sources or support. Now, the
 source of flame seems to be oil and fat; that of air, water, and watery
 substances; for flame increases over the exhalation of oil, and air
 over that of water. One must therefore consider the mixture of oil and
 water, which is manifest to the senses, since that of air and flame in
 general escapes the senses. But oil and water mix very imperfectly by
 composition or stirring, while they are exactly and nicely mixed in
 herbs, blood, and the parts of animals. Something similar, therefore,
 may take place in the mixture of flame and air in spirituous
 substances, not bearing mixture very well by simple collision, while
 they appear, however, to be well mixed in the spirits of plants and
 animals.
 
 Again, if the inquiry do not relate to perfect mixtures of spirits,
 but merely to their composition, as whether they easily incorporate
 with each other, or there be rather (as an example) certain winds and
 exhalations, or other spiritual bodies, which do not mix with common
 air, but only adhere to and float in it in globules and drops, and
 are rather broken and pounded by the air, than received into, and
 incorporated with it; this cannot be perceived in common air, and other
 aeriform substances, on account of the rarity of the bodies, but an
 image, as it were, of this process may be conceived in such liquids
 as quicksilver, oil, water, and even air, when broken and dissipated
 it ascends in small portions through water, and also in the thicker
 kinds of smoke; lastly, in dust, raised and remaining in the air, in
 all of which there is no incorporation: and the above representation
 in this respect is not a bad one, if it be first diligently
 investigated, whether there can be such a difference of nature between
 spirituous substances, as between liquids, for then these images might
 conveniently be substituted by analogy.
 
 And although we have observed of these supplementary instances, that
 information is to be derived from them, when appropriate instances are
 wanting, by way of refuge, yet we would have it understood, that they
 are also of great use, when the appropriate instances are at hand, in
 order to confirm the information afforded by them; of which we will
 speak more at length, when our subject leads us, in due course, to the
 support of induction.
 
 XLIII. In the twentieth rank of prerogative instances we will place
 lancing instances, which we are also wont (but for a different reason)
 to call twitching instances. We adopt the latter name, because they
 twitch the understanding, and the former because they pierce nature,
 whence we style them occasionally the instances of Democritus.[143]
 They are such as warn the understanding of the admirable and
 exquisite subtilty of nature, so that it becomes roused and awakened
 to attention, observation, and proper inquiry; as, for instance,
 that a little drop of ink should be drawn out into so many letters;
 that silver merely gilt on its surface should be stretched to such a
 length of gilt wire; that a little worm, such as you may find on the
 skin, should possess both a spirit and a varied conformation of its
 parts; that a little saffron should imbue a whole tub of water with
 its color; that a little musk or aroma should imbue a much greater
 extent of air with its perfume; that a cloud of smoke should be
 raised by a little incense; that such accurate differences of sounds
 as articulate words should be conveyed in all directions through the
 air, and even penetrate the pores of wood and water (though they
 become much weakened), that they should be, moreover, reflected, and
 that with such distinctness and velocity; that light and color should
 for such an extent and so rapidly pass through solid bodies, such as
 glass and water, with so great and so exquisite a variety of images,
 and should be refracted and reflected; that the magnet should attract
 through every description of body, even the most compact; but (what
 is still more wonderful) that in all these cases the action of one
 should not impede that of another in a common medium, such as air;
 and that there should be borne through the air, at the same time, so
 many images of visible objects, so many impulses of articulation, so
 many different perfumes, as of the violet, rose, etc., besides cold and
 heat, and magnetic attractions; all of them, I say, at once, without
 any impediment from each other, as if each had its paths and peculiar
 passage set apart for it, without infringing against or meeting each
 other.
 
 To these lancing instances, however, we are wont, not without some
 advantage, to add those which we call the limits of such instances.
 Thus, in the cases we have pointed out, one action does not disturb or
 impede another of a different nature, yet those of a similar nature
 subdue and extinguish each other; as the light of the sun does that of
 the candle, the sound of a cannon that of the voice, a strong perfume a
 more delicate one, a powerful heat a more gentle one, a plate of iron
 between the magnet and other iron the effect of the magnet. But the
 proper place for mentioning these will be also among the supports of
 induction.
 
 XLIV. We have now spoken of the instances which assist the senses,
 and which are principally of service as regards information; for
 information begins from the senses. But our whole labor terminates in
 practice, and as the former is the beginning, so is the latter the
 end of our subject. The following instances, therefore, will be those
 which are chiefly useful in practice. They are comprehended in two
 classes, and are seven in number. We call them all by the general name
 of practical instances. Now there are two defects in practice, and as
 many divisions of important instances. Practice is either deceptive or
 too laborious. It is generally deceptive (especially after a diligent
 examination of natures), on account of the power and actions of
 bodies being ill defined and determined. Now the powers and actions
 of bodies are defined and determined either by space or by time, or
 by the quantity at a given period, or by the predominance of energy;
 and if these four circumstances be not well and diligently considered,
 the sciences may indeed be beautiful in theory, but are of no effect
 in practice. We call the four instances referred to this class,
 mathematical instances and instances of measure.
 
 Practice is laborious either from the multitude of instruments, or
 the bulk of matter and substances requisite for any given work. Those
 instances, therefore, are valuable, which either direct practice to
 that which is of most consequence to mankind, or lessen the number of
 instruments or of matter to be worked upon. We assign to the three
 instances relating to this class, the common name of propitious or
 benevolent instances. We will now separately discuss these seven
 instances, and conclude with them that part of our work which relates
 to the prerogative or illustrious instances.
 
 XLV. In the twenty-first rank of prerogative instances we will place
 the instances of the rod or rule, which we are also wont to call the
 instances of completion or _non ultra_. For the powers and motions of
 bodies do not act and take effect through indefinite and accidental,
 but through limited and certain spaces; and it is of great importance
 to practice that these should be understood and noted in every nature
 which is investigated, not only to prevent deception, but to render
 practice more extensive and efficient. For it is sometimes possible to
 extend these powers, and bring the distance, as it were, nearer, as in
 the example of telescopes.
 
 Many powers act and take effect only by actual touch, as in the
 percussion of bodies, where the one does not remove the other, unless
 the impelling touch the impelled body. External applications in
 medicine, as ointment and plasters, do not exercise their efficacy
 except when in contact with the body. Lastly, the objects of touch and
 taste only strike those senses when in contact with their organs.
 
 Other powers act at a distance, though it be very small, of which but
 few have as yet been noted, although there be more than men suspect;
 this happens (to take everyday instances) when amber or jet attracts
 straws, bubbles dissolve bubbles, some purgative medicines draw humors
 from above, and the like. The magnetic power by which iron and the
 magnet, or two magnets, are attracted together, acts within a definite
 and narrow sphere, but if there be any magnetic power emanating from
 the earth a little below its surface, and affecting the needle in its
 polarity, it must act at a great distance.
 
 Again, if there be any magnetic force which acts by sympathy between
 the globe of the earth and heavy bodies, or between that of the moon
 and the waters of the sea (as seems most probable from the particular
 floods and ebbs which occur twice in the month), or between the starry
 sphere and the planets, by which they are summoned and raised to their
 apogees, these must all operate at very great distances.[144]
 
 Again, some conflagrations and the kindling of flames take place
 at very considerable distances with particular substances, as they
 report of the naphtha of Babylon. Heat, too, insinuates itself at wide
 distances, as does also cold, so that the masses of ice which are
 broken off and float upon the Northern Ocean, and are borne through the
 Atlantic to the coast of Canada, become perceptible by the inhabitants,
 and strike them with cold from a distance. Perfumes also (though here
 there appears to be always some corporeal emission) act at remarkable
 distances, as is experienced by persons sailing by the coast of
 Florida, or parts of Spain, where there are whole woods of lemons,
 oranges, and other odoriferous plants, or rosemary and marjoram bushes,
 and the like. Lastly, the rays of light and the impressions of sound
 act at extensive distances.
 
 Yet all these powers, whether acting at a small or great distance,
 certainly act within definite distances, which are well ascertained
 by nature, so that there is a limit depending either on the mass or
 quantity of the bodies, the vigor or faintness of the powers, or the
 favorable or impeding nature of the medium, all of which should be
 taken into account and observed. We must also note the boundaries of
 violent motions, such as missiles, projectiles, wheels and the like,
 since they are also manifestly confined to certain limits.
 
 Some motions and virtues are to be found of a directly contrary nature
 to these, which act in contact but not at a distance; namely, such as
 operate at a distance and not in contact, and again act with less force
 at a less distance, and the reverse. Sight, for instance, is not easily
 effective in contact, but requires a medium and distance; although I
 remember having heard from a person deserving of credit, that in being
 cured of a cataract (which was done by putting a small silver needle
 within the first coat of the eye, to remove the thin pellicle of the
 cataract, and force it into a corner of the eye), he had distinctly
 seen the needle moving across the pupil. Still, though this may be
 true, it is clear that large bodies cannot be seen well or distinctly,
 unless at the vertex of a cone, where the rays from the object meet
 at some distance from the eye. In old persons the eye sees better if
 the object be moved a little further, and not nearer. Again, it is
 certain that in projectiles the impact is not so violent at too short
 a distance as a little afterward.[145] Such are the observations to be
 made on the measure of motions as regards distance.
 
 There is another measure of motion in space which must not be passed
 over, not relating to progressive but spherical motion--that is,
 the expansion of bodies into a greater, or their contraction into a
 lesser sphere. For in our measure of this motion we must inquire what
 degree of compression or extension bodies easily and readily admit of,
 according to their nature, and at what point they begin to resist it,
 so as at last to bear it no further--as when an inflated bladder is
 compressed, it allows a certain compression of the air, but if this be
 increased, the air does not suffer it, and the bladder is burst.
 
 We have proved this by a more delicate experiment. We took a metal
 bell, of a light and thin sort, such as is used for salt-cellars, and
 immersed it in a basin of water, so as to carry the air contained in
 its interior down with it to the bottom of the basin. We had first,
 however, placed a small globe at the bottom of the basin, over which
 we placed the bell. The result was, that if the globe were small
 compared with the interior of the bell, the air would contract itself,
 and be compressed without being forced out, but if it were too large
 for the air readily to yield to it, the latter became impatient of the
 pressure, raised the bell partly up, and ascended in bubbles.
 
 To prove, also, the extension (as well as the compression) which air
 admits of, we adopted the following method:--We took a glass egg, with
 a small hole at one end; we drew out the air by violent suction at
 this hole, and then closed the hole with the finger, immersed the egg
 in water, and then removed the finger. The air being constrained by
 the effort made in suction, and dilated beyond its natural state, and
 therefore striving to recover and contract itself (so that if the egg
 had not been immersed in water, it would have drawn in the air with a
 hissing sound), now drew in a sufficient quantity of water to allow
 the air to recover its former dimensions.[146]
 
 It is well ascertained that rare bodies (such as air) admit of
 considerable contraction, as has been before observed; but tangible
 bodies (such as water) admit of it much less readily, and to a less
 extent. We investigated the latter point by the following experiment:
 
 We had a leaden globe made, capable of containing about two pints, wine
 measure, and of tolerable thickness, so as to support considerable
 pressure. We poured water into it through an aperture, which we
 afterward closed with melted lead, as soon as the globe was filled with
 water, so that the whole became perfectly solid. We next flattened the
 two opposite sides with a heavy hammer, which necessarily caused the
 water to occupy a less space, since the sphere is the solid of greatest
 content; and when hammering failed from the resistance of the water,
 we made use of a mill or press, till at last the water, refusing to
 submit to a greater pressure, exuded like a fine dew through the solid
 lead. We then computed the extent to which the original space had been
 reduced, and concluded that water admitted such a degree of compression
 when constrained by great violence.
 
 The more solid, dry or compact bodies, such as stones, wood and metals,
 admit of much less, and indeed scarcely any perceptible compression or
 expansion, but escape by breaking, slipping forward, or other efforts;
 as appears in bending wood, or steel for watch-springs, in projectiles,
 hammering and many other motions, all of which, together with their
 degrees, are to be observed and examined in the investigation of
 nature, either to a certainty, or by estimation, or comparison, as
 opportunity permits.
 
 XLVI. In the twenty-second rank of prerogative instances we will
 place the instances of the course, which we are also wont to call
 water instances, borrowing our expression from the water hour-glasses
 employed by the ancients instead of those with sand. They are such as
 measure nature by the moments of time, as the last instances do by the
 degrees of space. For all motion or natural action takes place in time,
 more or less rapidly, but still in determined moments well ascertained
 by nature. Even those actions which appear to take effect suddenly, and
 in the twinkling of an eye (as we express it), are found to admit of
 greater or less rapidity.
 
 In the first place, then, we see that the return of the heavenly bodies
 to the same place takes place in regular times, as does the flood and
 ebb of the sea. The descent of heavy bodies toward the earth, and
 the ascent of light bodies toward the heavenly sphere, take place in
 definite times,[147] according to the nature of the body, and of the
 medium through which it moves. The sailing of ships, the motions of
 animals, the transmission of projectiles, all take place in times
 the sums of which can be computed. With regard to heat, we see that
 boys in winter bathe their hands in the flame without being burned;
 and conjurers, by quick and regular movements, overturn vessels filled
 with wine or water, and replace them without spilling the liquid, with
 several similar instances. The compression, expansion and eruption
 of several bodies, take place more or less rapidly, according to the
 nature of the body and its motion, but still in definite moments.
 
 In the explosion of several cannon at once (which are sometimes heard
 at the distance of thirty miles), the sound of those nearest to the
 spot is heard before that of the most distant. Even in sight (whose
 action is most rapid), it is clear that a definite time is necessary
 for its exertion, which is proved by certain objects being invisible
 from the velocity of their motion, such as a musket-ball; for the
 flight of the ball is too swift to allow an impression of its figure to
 be conveyed to the sight.
 
 This last instance, and others of a like nature, have sometimes excited
 in us a most marvellous doubt, no less than whether the image of the
 sky and stars is perceived as at the actual moment of its existence,
 or rather a little after, and whether there is not (with regard to the
 visible appearance of the heavenly bodies) a true and apparent time,
 as well as a true and apparent place, which is observed by astronomers
 in parallaxes. It appeared so incredible to us, that the images or
 radiations of heavenly bodies could suddenly be conveyed through such
 immense spaces to the sight, and it seemed that they ought rather to be
 transmitted in a definite time.[148] That doubt, however (as far as
 regards any great difference between the true and apparent time), was
 subsequently completely set at rest, when we considered the infinite
 loss and diminution of size as regards the real and apparent magnitude
 of a star, occasioned by its distance, and at the same time observed
 at how great a distance (at least sixty miles) bodies which are merely
 white can be suddenly seen by us. For there is no doubt, that the light
 of the heavenly bodies not only far surpasses the vivid appearance of
 white, but even the light of any flame (with which we are acquainted)
 in the vigor of its radiation. The immense velocity of the bodies
 themselves, which is perceived in their diurnal motion, and has so
 astonished thinking men, that they have been more ready to believe in
 the motion of the earth, renders the motion of radiation from them
 (marvellous as it is in its rapidity) more worthy of belief. That
 which has weighed most with us, however, is, that if there were any
 considerable interval of time between the reality and the appearance,
 the images would often be interrupted and confused by clouds formed in
 the meantime, and similar disturbances of the medium. Let this suffice
 with regard to the simple measures of time.
 
 It is not merely the absolute, but still more the relative measure of
 motions and actions which must be inquired into, for this latter is
 of great use and application. We perceive that the flame of firearms
 is seen sooner than the sound is heard, although the ball must have
 struck the air before the flame, which was behind it, could escape:
 the reason of which is, that light moves with greater velocity than
 sound. We perceive, also, that visible images are received by the sight
 with greater rapidity than they are dismissed, and for this reason, a
 violin string touched with the finger appears double or triple, because
 the new image is received before the former one is dismissed. Hence,
 also, rings when spinning appear globular, and a lighted torch, borne
 rapidly along at night, appears to have a tail. Upon the principle of
 the inequality of motion, also, Galileo attempted an explanation of
 the flood and ebb of the sea, supposing the earth to move rapidly, and
 the water slowly, by which means the water, after accumulating, would
 at intervals fall back, as is shown in a vessel of water made to move
 rapidly. He has, however, imagined this on data which cannot be granted
 (namely, the earth's motion), and besides, does not satisfactorily
 account for the tide taking place every six hours.
 
 An example of our present point (the relative measure of motion), and,
 at the same time, of its remarkable use of which we have spoken, is
 conspicuous in mines filled with gunpowder, where immense weights of
 earth, buildings, and the like, are overthrown and prostrated by a
 small quantity of powder; the reason of which is decidedly this, that
 the motion of the expansion of the gunpowder is much more rapid than
 that of gravity,[149] which would resist it, so that the former has
 terminated before the latter has commenced. Hence, also, in missiles,
 a strong blow will not carry them so far as a sharp and rapid one.
 Nor could a small portion of animal spirit in animals, especially in
 such vast bodies as those of the whale and elephant, have ever bent or
 directed such a mass of body, were it not owing to the velocity of the
 former, and the slowness of the latter in resisting its motion.
 
 In short, this point is one of the principal foundations of the magic
 experiments (of which we shall presently speak), where a small mass
 of matter overcomes and regulates a much larger, if there but be an
 anticipation of motion, by the velocity of one before the other is
 prepared to act.
 
 Finally, the point of the first and last should be observed in all
 natural actions. Thus, in an infusion of rhubarb the purgative property
 is first extracted, and then the astringent; we have experienced
 something of the same kind in steeping violets in vinegar, which first
 extracts the sweet and delicate odor of the flower, and then the
 more earthy part, which disturbs the perfume; so that if the violets
 be steeped a whole day, a much fainter perfume is extracted than if
 they were steeped for a quarter of an hour only, and then taken out;
 and since the odoriferous spirit in the violet is not abundant, let
 other and fresh violets be steeped in the vinegar every quarter of an
 hour, as many as six times, when the infusion becomes so strengthened,
 that although the violets have not altogether remained there for more
 than one hour and a half, there remains a most pleasing perfume, not
 inferior to the flower itself, for a whole year. It must be observed,
 however, that the perfume does not acquire its full strength till
 about a month after the infusion. In the distillation of aromatic
 plants macerated in spirits of wine, it is well known that an aqueous
 and useless phlegm rises first, then water containing more of the
 spirit, and, lastly, water containing more of the aroma; and many
 observations of the like kind, well worthy of notice, are to be made in
 distillations. But let these suffice as examples.[150]
 
 XLVII. In the twenty-third rank of prerogative instances we will place
 instances of quantity, which we are also wont to call the doses of
 nature (borrowing a word from medicine). They are such as measure the
 powers by the quantity of bodies, and point out the effect of the
 quantity in the degree of power. And in the first place, some powers
 only subsist in the universal quantity, or such as bears a relation to
 the confirmation and fabric of the universe. Thus the earth is fixed,
 its parts fall. The waters in the sea flow and ebb, but not in the
 rivers, except by the admission of the sea. Then, again, almost all
 particular powers act according to the greater or less quantity of the
 body. Large masses of water are not easily rendered foul, small are.
 New wine and beer become ripe and drinkable in small skins much more
 readily than in large casks. If a herb be placed in a considerable
 quantity of liquid, infusion takes place rather than impregnation;
 if in less, the reverse. A bath, therefore, and a light sprinkling,
 produce different effects on the human body. Light dew, again, never
 falls, but is dissipated and incorporated with the air; thus we see
 that in breathing on gems, the slight quantity of moisture, like a
 small cloud in the air, is immediately dissolved. Again, a piece of
 the same magnet does not attract so much iron as the whole magnet did.
 There are some powers where the smallness of the quantity is of more
 avail; as in boring, a sharp point pierces more readily than a blunt
 one; the diamond, when pointed, makes an impression on glass, and the
 like.
 
 Here, too, we must not rest contented with a vague result, but inquire
 into the exact proportion of quantity requisite for a particular
 exertion of power; for one would be apt to suppose that the power bears
 an exact proportion to the quantity; that if a leaden bullet of one
 ounce, for instance, would fall in a given time, one of two ounces
 ought to fall twice as rapidly, which is most erroneous. Nor does the
 same ratio prevail in every kind of power, their difference being
 considerable. The measure, therefore, must be determined by experiment,
 and not by probability or conjecture.
 
 Lastly, we must in all our investigations of nature observe what
 quantity, or dose, of the body is requisite for a given effect, and
 must at the same time be guarded against estimating it at too much or
 too little.
 
 XLVIII. In the twenty-fourth rank of prerogative instances we will
 place wrestling instances, which we are also wont to call instances
 of predominance. They are such as point out the predominance and
 submission of powers compared with each other, and which of them is the
 more energetic and superior, or more weak and inferior. For the motions
 and effects of bodies are compounded, decomposed, and combined, no less
 than the bodies themselves. We will exhibit, therefore, the principal
 kinds of motions or active powers, in order that their comparative
 strength, and thence a demonstration and definition of the instances in
 question, may be rendered more clear.
 
 Let the first motion be that of the resistance of matter, which exists
 in every particle, and completely prevents its annihilation; so that
 no conflagration, weight, pressure, violence, or length of time can
 reduce even the smallest portion of matter to nothing, or prevent it
 from being something, and occupying some space, and delivering itself
 (whatever straits it be put to), by changing its form or place, or, if
 that be impossible, remaining as it is; nor can it ever happen that it
 should either be nothing or nowhere. This motion is designated by the
 schools (which generally name and define everything by its effects and
 inconveniences rather than by its inherent cause) by the axiom, that
 two bodies cannot exist in the same place, or they call it a motion to
 prevent the penetration of dimensions. It is useless to give examples
 of this motion, since it exists in every body.
 
 Let the second motion be that which we term the motion of connection,
 by which bodies do not allow themselves to be separated at any point
 from the contact of another body, delighting, as it were, in the
 mutual connection and contact. This is called by the schools a motion
 to prevent a vacuum. It takes place when water is drawn up by suction
 or a syringe, the flesh by cupping, or when the water remains without
 escaping from perforated jars, unless the mouth be opened to admit the
 air, and innumerable instances of a like nature.
 
 Let the third be that which we term the motion of liberty, by which
 bodies strive to deliver themselves from any unnatural pressure or
 tension, and to restore themselves to the dimensions suited to their
 mass; and of which, also, there are innumerable examples. Thus, we have
 examples of their escaping from pressure, in the water in swimming, in
 the air in flying, in the water again in rowing, and in the air in the
 undulation of the winds, and in springs of watches. An exact instance
 of the motion of compressed air is seen in children's popguns, which
 they make by scooping out elder-branches or some such matter, and
 forcing in a piece of some pulpy root or the like, at each end; then
 they force the root or other pellet with a ramrod to the opposite end,
 from which the lower pellet is emitted and projected with a report,
 and that before it is touched by the other piece of root or pellet,
 or by the ramrod. We have examples of their escape from tension, in
 the motion of the air that remains in glass eggs after suction, in
 strings, leather, and cloth, which recoil after tension, unless it be
 long continued. The schools define this by the term of motion from the
 form of the element; injudiciously enough, since this motion is to be
 found not only in air, water, or fire, but in every species of solid,
 as wood, iron, lead, cloth, parchment, etc., each of which has its own
 proper size, and is with difficulty stretched to any other. Since,
 however, this motion of liberty is the most obvious of all, and to be
 seen in an infinite number of cases, it will be as well to distinguish
 it correctly and clearly; for some most carelessly confound this with
 the two others of resistance and connection; namely, the freedom from
 pressure with the former, and that from tension with the latter, as if
 bodies when compressed yielded or expanded to prevent a penetration of
 dimensions, and when stretched rebounded and contracted themselves to
 prevent a vacuum. But if the air, when compressed, could be brought to
 the density of water, or wood to that of stone, there would be no need
 of any penetration of dimensions, and yet the compression would be much
 greater than they actually admit of. So if water could be expanded till
 it became as rare as air, or stone as rare as wood, there would be no
 need of a vacuum, and yet the expansion would be much greater than they
 actually admit of.
 
 We do not, therefore, arrive at a penetration of dimensions or a vacuum
 before the extremes of condensation and rarefaction, while the motion
 we speak of stops and exerts itself much within them, and is nothing
 more than a desire of bodies to preserve their specific density (or,
 if it be preferred, their form), and not to desert them suddenly, but
 only to change by degrees, and of their own accord. It is, however,
 much more necessary to intimate to mankind (because many other points
 depend upon this), that the violent motion which we call mechanical,
 and Democritus (who, in explaining his primary motions, is to be ranked
 even below the middling class of philosophers) termed the motion of a
 blow, is nothing else than this motion of liberty, namely, a tendency
 to relaxation from compression. For in all simple impulsion or flight
 through the air, the body is not displaced or moved in space, until its
 parts are placed in an unnatural state, and compressed by the impelling
 force. When that takes place, the different parts urging the other in
 succession, the whole is moved, and that with a rotatory as well as
 progressive motion, in order that the parts may, by this means also,
 set themselves at liberty, or more readily submit. Let this suffice for
 the motion in question.
 
 Let the fourth be that which we term the motion of matter, and which
 is opposed to the last; for in the motion of liberty, bodies abhor,
 reject, and avoid, a new size or volume, or any new expansion or
 contraction (for these different terms have the same meaning), and
 strive, with all their power, to rebound and resume their former
 density; on the contrary, in the motion of matter, they are anxious
 to acquire a new volume or dimension, and attempt it willingly and
 rapidly, and occasionally by a most vigorous effort, as in the example
 of gunpowder. The most powerful, or at least most frequent, though not
 the only instruments of this motion, are heat and cold. For instance,
 the air, if expanded by tension (as by suction in the glass egg),
 struggles anxiously to restore itself; but if heat be applied, it
 strives, on the contrary, to dilate itself, and longs for a larger
 volume, regularly passing and migrating into it, as into a new form (as
 it is termed); nor after a certain degree of expansion is it anxious
 to return, unless it be invited to do so by the application of cold,
 which is not indeed a return, but a fresh change. So also water, when
 confined by compression, resists, and wishes to become as it was
 before, namely, more expanded; but if there happen an intense and
 continued cold, it changes itself readily, and of its own accord, into
 the condensed state of ice; and if the cold be long continued, without
 any intervening warmth (as in grottoes and deep caves), it is changed
 into crystal or similar matter, and never resumes its form.
 
 Let the fifth be that which we term the motion of continuity. We do
 not understand by this simple and primary continuity with any other
 body (for that is the motion of connection), but the continuity of
 a particular body in itself; for it is most certain that all bodies
 abhor a solution of continuity, some more and some less, but all
 partially. In hard bodies (such as steel and glass) the resistance to
 an interruption of continuity is most powerful and efficacious, while
 although in liquids it appears to be faint and languid, yet it is not
 altogether null, but exists in the lowest degree, and shows itself in
 many experiments, such as bubbles, the round form of drops, the thin
 threads which drip from roofs, the cohesion of glutinous substances,
 and the like. It is most conspicuous, however, if an attempt be made to
 push this separation to still smaller particles. Thus, in mortars, the
 pestle produces no effect after a certain degree of contusion, water
 does not penetrate small fissures, and the air itself, notwithstanding
 its subtilty, does not penetrate the pores of solid vessels at once,
 but only by long-continued insinuation.
 
 Let the sixth be that which we term the motion of acquisition, or the
 motion of need.[151] It is that by which bodies placed among others
 of a heterogeneous and, as it were, hostile nature, if they meet with
 the means or opportunity of avoiding them, and uniting themselves with
 others of a more analogous nature, even when these latter are not
 closely allied to them, immediately seize and, as it were, select them,
 and appear to consider it as something acquired (whence we derive the
 name), and to have need of these latter bodies. For instance, gold, or
 any other metal in leaf, does not like the neighborhood of air; if,
 therefore, they meet with any tangible and thick substance (such as the
 finger, paper, or the like), they immediately adhere to it, and are
 not easily torn from it. Paper, too, and cloth, and the like, do not
 agree with the air, which is inherent and mixed in their pores. They
 readily, therefore, imbibe water or other liquids, and get rid of the
 air. Sugar, or a sponge, dipped in water or wine, and though part of
 it be out of the water or wine, and at some height above it, will yet
 gradually absorb them.[152]
 
 Hence an excellent rule is derived for the opening and dissolution of
 bodies; for (not to mention corrosive and strong waters, which force
 their way) if a body can be found which is more adapted, suited, and
 friendly to a given solid, than that with which it is by some necessity
 united, the given solid immediately opens and dissolves itself to
 receive the former, and excludes or removes the latter.[153] Nor is the
 effect or power of this motion confined to contact, for the electric
 energy (of which Gilbert and others after him have told so many fables)
 is only the energy excited in a body by gentle friction, and which does
 not endure the air, but prefers some tangible substance if there be any
 at hand.
 
 Let the seventh be that which we term the motion of greater
 congregation, by which bodies are borne toward masses of a similar
 nature, for instance, heavy bodies toward the earth, light to the
 sphere of heaven. The schools termed this natural motion, by a
 superficial consideration of it, because produced by no external
 visible agent, which made them consider it innate in the substances; or
 perhaps because it does not cease, which is little to be wondered at,
 since heaven and earth are always present, while the causes and sources
 of many other motions are sometimes absent and sometimes present.
 They therefore called this perpetual and proper, because it is never
 interrupted, but instantly takes place when the others are interrupted,
 and they called the others adscititious. The former, however, is in
 reality weak and slow, since it yields, and is inferior to the others
 as long as they act, unless the mass of the body be great; and although
 this motion have so filled men's minds, as almost to have obscured all
 others, yet they know but little about it, and commit many errors in
 its estimate.
 
 Let the eighth be that which we term the motion of lesser congregation,
 by which the homogeneous parts in any body separate themselves from
 the heterogeneous and unite together, and whole bodies of a similar
 substance coalesce and tend toward each other, and are sometimes
 congregated, attracted, and meet, from some distance; thus in milk the
 cream rises after a certain time, and in wine the dregs and tartar
 sink; which effects are not to be attributed to gravity and levity
 only, so as to account for the rising of some parts and the sinking
 of others, but much more to the desire of the homogeneous bodies to
 meet and unite. This motion differs from that of need in two points:
 1st, because the latter is the stimulus of a malignant and contrary
 nature, while in this of which we treat (if there be no impediment or
 restraint), the parts are united by their affinity, although there be
 no foreign nature to create a struggle; 2dly, because the union is
 closer and more select. For in the other motion, bodies which have no
 great affinity unite, if they can but avoid the hostile body, while in
 this, substances which are connected by a decided kindred resemblance
 come together and are molded into one. It is a motion existing in all
 compound bodies, and would be readily seen in each, if it were not
 confined and checked by the other affections and necessities of bodies
 which disturb the union.
 
 This motion is usually confined in the three following manners: by
 the torpor of the bodies; by the power of the predominating body; by
 external motion. With regard to the first, it is certain that there
 is more or less sluggishness in tangible bodies, and an abhorrence of
 locomotion; so that unless excited they prefer remaining contented with
 their actual state, to placing themselves in a better position. There
 are three means of breaking through this sluggishness--heat; the active
 power of a similar body; vivid and powerful motion. With regard to
 the first, heat is, on this account, defined as that which separates
 heterogeneous, and draws together homogeneous substances; a definition
 of the Peripatetics which is justly ridiculed by Gilbert, who says it
 is as if one were to define man to be that which sows wheat and plants
 vineyards; being only a definition deduced from effects, and those but
 partial. But it is still more to be blamed, because those effects, such
 as they are, are not a peculiar property of heat, but a mere accident
 (for cold, as we shall afterward show, does the same), arising from
 the desire of the homogeneous parts to unite; the heat then assists
 them in breaking through that sluggishness which before restrained
 their desire. With regard to the assistance derived from the power of
 a similar body, it is most conspicuous in the magnet when armed with
 steel, for it excites in the steel a power of adhering to steel, as a
 homogeneous substance, the power of the magnet breaking through the
 sluggishness of the steel. With regard to the assistance of motion,
 it is seen in wooden arrows or points, which penetrate more deeply
 into wood than if they were tipped with iron, from the similarity
 of the substance, the swiftness of the motion breaking through the
 sluggishness of the wood; of which two last experiments we have spoken
 above in the aphorism on clandestine instances.[154]
 
 The confinement of the motion of lesser congregation, which arises
 from the power of the predominant body, is shown in the decomposition
 of blood and urine by cold. For as long as these substances are filled
 with the active spirit, which regulates and restrains each of their
 component parts, as the predominant ruler of the whole, the several
 different parts do not collect themselves separately on account of the
 check; but as soon as that spirit has evaporated, or has been choked by
 the cold, then the decomposed parts unite, according to their natural
 desire. Hence it happens, that all bodies which contain a sharp spirit
 (as salts and the like), last without decomposition, owing to the
 permanent and durable power of the predominating and imperious spirit.
 
 The confinement of the motion of lesser congregation, which arises from
 external motion, is very evident in that agitation of bodies which
 preserves them from putrefaction. For all putrefaction depends on the
 congregation of the homogeneous parts, whence, by degrees, there ensues
 a corruption of the first form (as it is called), and the generation of
 another. For the decomposition of the original form, which is itself
 the union of the homogeneous parts, precedes the putrefaction, which
 prepares the way for the generation of another. This decomposition,
 if not interrupted, is simple; but if there be various obstacles,
 putrefactions ensue, which are the rudiments of a new generation. But
 if (to come to our present point) a frequent agitation be excited by
 external motion, the motion toward union (which is delicate and gentle,
 and requires to be free from all external influence) is disturbed, and
 ceases; which we perceive to be the case in innumerable instances.
 Thus, the daily agitation or flowing of water prevents putrefaction;
 winds prevent the air from being pestilent; corn turned about and
 shaken in granaries continues clean: in short, everything which is
 externally agitated will with difficulty rot internally.
 
 We must not omit that union of the parts of bodies which is the
 principal cause of induration and desiccation. When the spirit or
 moisture, which has evaporated into spirit, has escaped from a porous
 body (such as wood, bone, parchment, and the like), the thicker parts
 are drawn together, and united with a greater effort, and induration
 or desiccation is the consequence; and this we attribute not so much
 to the motion of connection (in order to prevent a vacuum), as to this
 motion of friendship and union.
 
 Union from a distance is rare, and yet is to be met with in more
 instances than are generally observed. We perceive it when one bubble
 dissolves another, when medicines attract humors from a similarity of
 substance, when one string moves another in unison with it on different
 instruments, and the like. We are of opinion that this motion is very
 prevalent also in animal spirits, but are quite ignorant of the fact.
 It is, however, conspicuous in the magnet, and magnetized iron. While
 speaking of the motions of the magnet, we must plainly distinguish
 them, for there are four distinct powers or effects of the magnet which
 should not be confounded, although the wonder and astonishment of
 mankind has classed them together. 1. The attraction of the magnet to
 the magnet, or of iron to the magnet, or of magnetized iron to iron.
 2. Its polarity toward the north and south, and its variation. 3. Its
 penetration through gold, glass, stone, and all other substances.
 4. The communication of power from the mineral to iron, and from iron
 to iron, without any communication of the substances. Here, however, we
 only speak of the first. There is also a singular motion of attraction
 between quicksilver and gold, so that the gold attracts quicksilver
 even when made use of in ointment; and those who work surrounded by
 the vapors of quicksilver, are wont to hold a piece of gold in their
 mouths, to collect the exhalations, which would otherwise attack their
 heads and bones, and this piece soon grows white.[155] Let this suffice
 for the motion of lesser congregation.
 
 Let the ninth be the magnetic motion, which, although of the nature of
 that last mentioned, yet, when operating at great distances, and on
 great masses, deserves a separate inquiry, especially if it neither
 begin in contact, as most motions of congregation do, nor end by
 bringing the substances into contact, as all do, but only raise them,
 and make them swell without any further effect. For if the moon raise
 the waters, or cause moist substances to swell, or if the starry
 sphere attract the planets toward their apogees, or the sun confine
 the planets Mercury and Venus to within a certain distance of his
 mass;[156] these motions do not appear capable of being classed under
 either of those of congregation, but to be, as it were, intermediately
 and imperfectly congregative, and thus to form a distinct species.
 
 Let the tenth motion be that of avoidance, or that which is opposed
 to the motion of lesser congregation, by which bodies, with a kind of
 antipathy, avoid and disperse, and separate themselves from, or refuse
 to unite themselves with others of a hostile nature. For although this
 may sometimes appear to be an accidental motion, necessarily attendant
 upon that of the lesser congregation, because the homogeneous parts
 cannot unite, unless the heterogeneous be first removed and excluded,
 yet it is still to be classed separately,[157] and considered as a
 distinct species, because, in many cases, the desire of avoidance
 appears to be more marked than that of union.
 
 It is very conspicuous in the excrements of animals, nor less, perhaps,
 in objects odious to particular senses, especially the smell and
 taste; for a fetid smell is rejected by the nose, so as to produce a
 sympathetic motion of expulsion at the mouth of the stomach; a bitter
 and rough taste is rejected by the palate or throat, so as to produce
 a sympathetic concussion and shivering of the head. This motion is
 visible also in other cases. Thus it is observed in some kinds of
 antiperistasis, as in the middle region of the air, the cold of which
 appears to be occasioned by the rejection of cold from the regions
 of the heavenly bodies; and also in the heat and combustion observed
 in subterranean spots, which appear to be owing to the rejection of
 heat from the centre of the earth. For heat and cold, when in small
 quantities, mutually destroy each other, while in larger quantities,
 like armies equally matched, they remove and eject each other in
 open conflict. It is said, also that cinnamon and other perfumes
 retain their odor longer when placed near privies and foul places,
 because they will not unite and mix with stinks. It is well known that
 quicksilver, which would otherwise reunite into a complete mass, is
 prevented from so doing by man's spittle, pork lard, turpentine and
 the like, from the little affinity of its parts with those substances,
 so that when surrounded by them it draws itself back, and its
 avoidance of these intervening obstacles is greater than its desire of
 reuniting itself to its homogeneous parts; which is what they term the
 mortification of quicksilver. Again, the difference in weight of oil
 and water is not the only reason for their refusing to mix, but it is
 also owing to the little affinity of the two; for spirits of wine,
 which are lighter than oil, mix very well with water. A very remarkable
 instance of the motion in question is seen in nitre, and crude bodies
 of a like nature, which abhor flame, as may be observed in gunpowder,
 quicksilver and gold. The avoidance of one pole of the magnet by iron
 is not (as Gilbert has well observed), strictly speaking, an avoidance,
 but a conformity, or attraction to a more convenient situation.
 
 Let the eleventh motion be that of assimilation, or self-multiplication,
 or simple generation, by which latter term we do not mean the simple
 generation of integral bodies, such as plants or animals, but of
 homogeneous bodies. By this motion homogeneous bodies convert those
 which are allied to them, or at least well disposed and prepared, into
 their own substance and nature. Thus flame multiplies itself over
 vapors and oily substances and generates fresh flame; the air over
 water and watery substances multiplies itself and generates fresh air;
 the vegetable and animal spirit, over the thin particles of a watery
 or oleaginous spirit contained in its food, multiplies itself and
 generates fresh spirit; the solid parts of plants and animals, as the
 leaf, flower, the flesh, bone and the like, each of them assimilate
 some part of the juices contained in their food, and generate a
 successive and daily substance. For let none rave with Paracelsus, who
 (blinded by his distillations) would have it, that nutrition takes
 place by mere separation, and that the eye, nose, brain and liver lie
 concealed in bread and meat, the root, leaf and flower, in the juice of
 the earth; asserting that just as the artist brings out a leaf, flower,
 eye, nose, hand, foot and the like, from a rude mass of stone or wood
 by the separation and rejection of what is superfluous; so the great
 artist within us brings out our several limbs and parts by separation
 and rejection. But to leave such trifling, it is most certain that
 all the parts of vegetables and animals, as well the homogeneous as
 organic, first of all attract those juices contained in their food,
 which are nearly common, or at least not very different, and then
 assimilate and convert them into their own nature. Nor does this
 assimilation, or simple generation, take place in animated bodies only,
 but the inanimate also participate in the same property (as we have
 observed of flame and air), and that languid spirit, which is contained
 in every tangible animated substance, is perpetually working upon the
 coarser parts, and converting them into spirit, which afterward is
 exhaled, whence ensues a diminution of weight, and a desiccation of
 which we have spoken elsewhere.[158]
 
 Nor should we, in speaking of assimilation, neglect to mention the
 accretion which is usually distinguished from aliment, and which is
 observed when mud grows into a mass between stones, and is converted
 into a stony substance, and the scaly substance round the teeth is
 converted into one no less hard than the teeth themselves; for we are
 of opinion that there exists in all bodies a desire of assimilation,
 as well as of uniting with homogeneous masses. Each of these powers,
 however, is confined, although in different manners, and should be
 diligently investigated, because they are connected with the revival
 of old age. Lastly, it is worthy of observation, that in the nine
 preceding motions, bodies appear to aim at the mere preservation of
 their nature, while in this they attempt its propagation.
 
 Let the twelfth motion be that of excitement, which appears to be
 a species of the last, and is sometimes mentioned by us under that
 name. It is, like that, a diffusive, communicative, transitive and
 multiplying motion; and they agree remarkably in their effect, although
 they differ in their mode of action, and in their subject matter. The
 former proceeds imperiously and with authority; it orders and compels
 the assimilated to be converted and changed into the assimilating
 body. The latter proceeds by art, insinuation and stealth, inviting
 and disposing the excited toward the nature of the exciting body. The
 former both multiplies and transforms bodies and substances; thus a
 greater quantity of flame, air, spirit and flesh is formed; but in
 the latter, the powers only are multiplied and changed, and heat,
 the magnetic power, and putrefaction, in the above instances, are
 increased. Heat does not diffuse itself when heating other bodies
 by any communication of the original heat, but only by exciting the
 parts of the heated body to that motion which is the form of heat, and
 of which we spoke in the first vintage of the nature of heat. Heat,
 therefore, is excited much less rapidly and readily in stone or metal
 than in air, on account of the inaptitude and sluggishness of those
 bodies in acquiring that motion, so that it is probable, that there may
 be some substances, toward the centre of the earth, quite incapable of
 being heated, on account of their density, which may deprive them of
 the spirit by which the motion of excitement is usually commenced. Thus
 also the magnet creates in the iron a new disposition of its parts, and
 a conformable motion, without losing any of its virtue. So the leaven
 of bread, yeast, rennet and some poisons, excite and invite successive
 and continued motion in dough, beer, cheese or the human body; not so
 much from the power of the exciting, as the predisposition and yielding
 of the excited body.
 
 Let the thirteenth motion be that of impression, which is also a
 species of motion of assimilation, and the most subtile of diffusive
 motions. We have thought it right, however, to consider it as a
 distinct species, on account of its remarkable difference from the
 last two; for the simple motion of assimilation transforms the bodies
 themselves, so that if you remove the first agent, you diminish not
 the effect of those which succeed; thus, neither the first lighting
 of flame, nor the first conversion into air, are of any importance to
 the flame or air next generated. So, also, the motion of excitement
 still continues for a considerable time after the removal of the first
 agent, as in a heated body on the removal of the original heat, in the
 excited iron on the removal of the magnet, and in the dough on the
 removal of the leaven. But the motion of impression, although diffusive
 and transitive, appears, nevertheless, to depend on the first agent,
 so that upon the removal of the latter the former immediately fails
 and perishes; for which reason also it takes effect in a moment, or at
 least a very short space of time. We are wont to call the two former
 motions the motions of the generation of Jupiter, because when born
 they continue to exist; and the latter, the motion of the generation
 of Saturn, because it is immediately devoured and absorbed. It may be
 seen in three instances: 1, in the rays of light; 2, in the percussions
 of sounds; 3, in magnetic attractions as regards communication. For,
 on the removal of light, colors and all its other images disappear,
 as on the cessation of the first percussion and the vibration of the
 body, sound soon fails, and although sounds are agitated by the wind,
 like waves, yet it is to be observed, that the same sound does not
 last during the whole time of the reverberation. Thus, when a bell is
 struck, the sound appears to be continued for a considerable time, and
 one might easily be led into the mistake of supposing it to float and
 remain in the air during the whole time, which is most erroneous.[159]
 For the reverberation is not one identical sound, but the repetition
 of sounds, which is made manifest by stopping and confining the
 sonorous body; thus, if a bell be stopped and held tightly, so as to
 be immovable, the sound fails, and there is no further reverberation,
 and if a musical string be touched after the first vibration, either
 with the finger (as in the harp), or a quill (as in the harpsichord),
 the sound immediately ceases. If the magnet be removed the iron falls.
 The moon, however, cannot be removed from the sea, nor the earth from
 a heavy falling body, and we can, therefore, make no experiment upon
 them; but the case is the same.
 
 Let the fourteenth motion be that configuration or position, by
 which bodies appear to desire a peculiar situation, collocation, and
 configuration with others, rather than union or separation. This is
 a very abstruse notion, and has not been well investigated; and, in
 some instances, appears to occur almost without any cause, although
 we be mistaken in supposing this to be really the case. For if it be
 asked, why the heavens revolve from east to west, rather than from
 west to east, or why they turn on poles situate near the Bears, rather
 than round Orion or any other part of the heaven, such a question
 appears to be unreasonable, since these phenomena should be received
 as determinate and the objects of our experience. There are, indeed,
 some ultimate and self-existing phenomena in nature, but those which
 we have just mentioned are not to be referred to that class: for we
 attribute them to a certain harmony and consent of the universe, which
 has not yet been properly observed. But if the motion of the earth from
 west to east be allowed, the same question may be put, for it must also
 revolve round certain poles, and why should they be placed where they
 are, rather than elsewhere? The polarity and variation of the needle
 come under our present head. There is also observed in both natural and
 artificial bodies, especially solids rather than fluids, a particular
 collocation and position of parts, resembling hairs or fibres, which
 should be diligently investigated, since, without a discovery of them,
 bodies cannot be conveniently controlled or wrought upon. The eddies
 observable in liquids by which, when compressed, they successively
 raise different parts of their mass before they can escape, so as to
 equalize the pressure, is more correctly assigned to the motion of
 liberty.
 
 Let the fifteenth motion be that of transmission or of passage, by
 which the powers of bodies are more or less impeded or advanced by
 the medium, according to the nature of the bodies and their effective
 powers, and also according to that of the medium. For one medium is
 adapted to light, another to sound, another to heat and cold, another
 to magnetic action, and so on with regard to the other actions.
 
 Let the sixteenth be that which we term the royal or political motion,
 by which the predominant and governing parts of any body check,
 subdue, reduce, and regulate the others, and force them to unite,
 separate, stand still, move, or assume a certain position, not from any
 inclination of their own, but according to a certain order, and as best
 suits the convenience of the governing part, so that there is a sort
 of dominion and civil government exercised by the ruling part over its
 subjects. The motion is very conspicuous in the spirits of animals,
 where, as long as it is in force, it tempers all the motions of the
 other parts. It is found in a less degree in other bodies, as we have
 observed in blood and urine, which are not decomposed until the spirit,
 which mixed and retained their parts, has been emitted or extinguished.
 Nor is this motion peculiar to spirits only, although in most bodies
 the spirit predominates, owing to its rapid motion and penetration;
 for the grosser parts predominate in denser bodies, which are not
 filled with a quick and active spirit (such as exists in quicksilver
 or vitriol), so that unless this check or yoke be thrown off by some
 contrivance, there is no hope of any transformation of such bodies. And
 let not any one suppose that we have forgotten our subject, because
 we speak of predominance in this classification of motions, which is
 made entirely with the view of assisting the investigation of wrestling
 instances, or instances of predominance. For we do not now treat of
 the general predominance of motions or powers, but of that of parts in
 whole bodies, which constitutes the particular species here considered.
 
 Let the seventeenth motion be the spontaneous motion of revolution,
 by which bodies having a tendency to move, and placed in a favorable
 situation, enjoy their peculiar nature, pursuing themselves and nothing
 else, and seeking, as it were, to embrace themselves. For bodies seem
 either to move without any limit, or to tend toward a limit, arrived at
 which they either revolve according to their peculiar nature, or rest.
 Those which are favorably situated, and have a tendency to motion,
 move in a circle with an eternal and unlimited motion; those which
 are favorably situated and abhor motion, rest. Those which are not
 favorably situated move in a straight line (as their shortest path),
 in order to unite with others of a congenial nature. This motion of
 revolution admits of nine differences: 1, with regard to the centre
 about which the bodies move; 2, the poles round which they move; 3,
 the circumference or orbit relatively to its distance from the centre;
 4, the velocity, or greater or less speed with which they revolve;
 5, the direction of the motion as from east to west, or the reverse;
 6, the deviation from a perfect circle, by spiral lines at a greater
 or less distance from the centre; 7, the deviation from the circle,
 by spiral lines at a greater or less distance from the poles; 8, the
 greater or less distance of these spirals from each other; 9, and
 lastly, the variation of the poles if they be movable; which, however,
 only affects revolution when circular. The motion in question is,
 according to common and long-received opinion, considered to be that
 of the heavenly bodies. There exists, however, with regard to this, a
 considerable dispute between some of the ancients as well as moderns,
 who have attributed a motion of revolution to the earth. A much more
 reasonable controversy, perhaps, exists (if it be not a matter beyond
 dispute), whether the motion in question (on the hypothesis of the
 earth's being fixed) is confined to the heavens, or rather descends and
 is communicated to the air and water. The rotation of missiles, as in
 darts, musket-balls, and the like, we refer entirely to the motion of
 liberty.
 
 Let the eighteenth motion be that of trepidation,[160] to which (in
 the sense assigned to it by astronomers) we do not give much credit;
 but in our serious and general search after the tendencies of natural
 bodies, this motion occurs, and appears worthy of forming a distinct
 species. It is the motion of an (as it were) eternal captivity; when
 bodies, for instance, being placed not altogether according to their
 nature, and yet not exactly ill, constantly tremble, and are restless,
 not contented with their position, and yet not daring to advance.
 Such is the motion of the heart and pulse of animals, and it must
 necessarily occur in all bodies which are situated in a mean state,
 between conveniences and inconveniences; so that being removed from
 their proper position, they strive to escape, are repulsed, and again
 continue to make the attempt.
 
 Let the nineteenth and last motion be one which can scarcely be termed
 a motion, and yet is one; and which we may call the motion of repose,
 or of abhorrence of motion. It is by this motion that the earth stands
 by its own weight, while its extremes move toward the middle, not
 to an imaginary centre, but in order to unite. It is owing to the
 same tendency, that all bodies of considerable density abhor motion,
 and their only tendency is not to move, which nature they preserve,
 although excited and urged in a variety of ways to motion. But if they
 be compelled to move, yet do they always appear anxious to recover
 their former state, and to cease from motion, in which respect they
 certainly appear active, and attempt it with sufficient swiftness and
 rapidity, as if fatigued, and impatient of delay. We can only have a
 partial representation of this tendency, because with us every tangible
 substance is not only not condensed to the utmost, but even some spirit
 is added, owing to the action and concocting influence of the heavenly
 bodies.
 
 We have now, therefore, exhibited the species, or simple elements of
 the motions, tendencies, and active powers, which are most universal
 in nature; and no small portion of natural science has been thus
 sketched out. We do not, however, deny that other instances can perhaps
 be added, and our divisions changed according to some more natural
 order of things, and also reduced to a less number; in which respect
 we do not allude to any abstract classification, as if one were to
 say, that bodies desire the preservation, exaltation, propagation, or
 fruition of their nature; or, that motion tends to the preservation and
 benefit either of the universe (as in the case of those of resistance
 and connection), or of extensive wholes, as in the case of those of
 the greater congregation, revolution, and abhorrence of motion, or
 of particular forms, as in the case of the others. For although such
 remarks be just, yet, unless they terminate in matter and construction,
 according to true definitions, they are speculative, and of little use.
 In the meantime, our classification will suffice, and be of much use
 in the consideration of the predominance of powers, and examining the
 wrestling instances which constitute our present subject.
 
 For of the motions here laid down, some are quite invincible, some more
 powerful than others, which they confine, check, and modify; others
 extend to a greater distance, others are more immediate and swift,
 others strengthen, increase, and accelerate the rest.
 
 The motion of resistance is most adamantine and invincible. We are
 yet in doubt whether such be the nature of that of connection; for
 we cannot with certainty determine whether there be a vacuum, either
 extensive or intermixed with matter. Of one thing, however, we are
 satisfied, that the reason assigned by Leucippus and Democritus for
 the introduction of a vacuum (namely, that the same bodies could not
 otherwise comprehend, and fill greater and less spaces) is false. For
 there is clearly a folding of matter, by which it wraps and unwraps
 itself in space within certain limits, without the intervention of a
 vacuum. Nor is there two thousand times more of vacuum in air than in
 gold, as there should be on this hypothesis; a fact demonstrated by
 the very powerful energies of fluids (which would otherwise float like
 fine dust _in vacuo_), and many other proofs. The other motions direct,
 and are directed by each other, according to their strength, quantity,
 excitement, emission, or the assistance or impediments they meet with.
 
 For instance; some armed magnets hold and support iron of sixty times
 their own weight; so far does the motion of lesser congregation
 predominate over that of the greater; but if the weight be increased,
 it yields. A lever of a certain strength will raise a given weight,
 and so far the motion of liberty predominates over that of the greater
 congregation, but if the weight be greater, the former motion yields.
 A piece of leather stretched to a certain point does not break, and
 so far the motion of continuity predominates over that of tension,
 but if the tension be greater, the leather breaks, and the motion of
 continuity yields. A certain quantity of water flows through a chink,
 and so far the motion of greater congregation predominates over that
 of continuity, but if the chink be smaller it yields. If a musket be
 charged with ball and powdered sulphur alone, and fire be applied,
 the ball is not discharged, in which case the motion of greater
 congregation overcomes that of matter; but when gunpowder is used, the
 motion of matter in the sulphur predominates, being assisted by that
 motion, and the motion of avoidance in the nitre; and so of the rest.
 For wrestling instances (which show the predominance of powers, and in
 what manner and proportion they predominate and yield) must be searched
 for with active and industrious diligence.
 
 The methods and nature of this yielding must also be diligently
 examined, as for instance, whether the motions completely cease, or
 exert themselves, but are constrained. For in the bodies with which
 we are acquainted, there is no real but an apparent rest, either in
 the whole or in parts. This apparent rest is occasioned either by
 equilibrium, or the absolute predominance of motions. By equilibrium,
 as in the scales of the balance, which rest if the weights be equal. By
 predominance, as in perforated jars, in which the water rests, and is
 prevented from falling by the predominance of the motion of connection.
 It is, however, to be observed (as we have said before), how far the
 yielding motions exert themselves. For if a man be held stretched out
 on the ground against his will, with arms and legs bound down, or
 otherwise confined, and yet strive with all his power to get up, the
 struggle is not the less, although ineffectual. The real state of the
 case (namely, whether the yielding motion be, as it were, annihilated
 by the predominance, or there be rather a continued, although an
 invisible effort) will, perhaps, appear in the concurrence of motions,
 although it escape our notice in their conflict. For instance: let an
 experiment be made with muskets; whether a musket-ball, at its utmost
 range in a straight line, or (as it is commonly called) point-blank,
 strike with less force when projected upward, where the motion of the
 blow is simple, than when projected downward, where the motion of
 gravity concurs with the blow.
 
 The rules of such instances of predominance as occur should be
 collected: such as the following; the more general the desired
 advantage is, the stronger will be the motion; the motion of
 connection, for instance, which relates to the intercourse of the parts
 of the universe, is more powerful than that of gravity, which relates
 to the intercourse of dense bodies only. Again, the desire of a private
 good does not in general prevail against that of a public one, except
 where the quantities are small. Would that such were the case in civil
 matters!
 
 XLIX. In the twenty-fifth rank of prerogative instances we will place
 suggesting instances; such as suggest, or point out, that which is
 advantageous to mankind; for bare power and knowledge in themselves
 exalt rather than enrich human nature. We must, therefore, select from
 the general store such things as are most useful to mankind. We shall
 have a better opportunity of discussing these when we treat of the
 application to practice; besides, in the work of interpretation, we
 leave room, on every subject, for the human or optative chart; for it
 is a part of science to make judicious inquiries and wishes.
 
 L. In the twenty-sixth rank of prerogative instances we will place the
 generally useful instances. They are such as relate to various points,
 and frequently occur, sparing by that means considerable labor and new
 trials. The proper place for treating of instruments and contrivances,
 will be that in which we speak of the application to practice, and the
 methods of experiment. All that has hitherto been ascertained, and
 made use of, will be described in the particular history of each art.
 At present, we will subjoin a few general examples of the instances in
 question.
 
 Man acts, then, upon natural bodies (besides merely bringing them
 together or removing them) by seven principal methods: 1, by the
 exclusion of all that impedes and disturbs; 2, by compression,
 extension, agitation, and the like; 3, by heat and cold; 4, by
 detention in a suitable place; 5, by checking or directing motion;
 6, by peculiar harmonies; 7, by a seasonable and proper alternation,
 series, and succession of all these, or, at least, of some of them.
 
 1. With regard to the first--common air, which is always at hand, and
 forces its admission, as also the rays of the heavenly bodies, create
 much disturbance. Whatever, therefore, tends to exclude them may
 well be considered as generally useful. The substance and thickness
 of vessels in which bodies are placed when prepared for operations
 may be referred to this head. So also may the accurate methods of
 closing vessels by consolidation, or the _lutum sapientiae_, as the
 chemists call it. The exclusion of air by means of liquids at the
 extremity is also very useful, as when they pour oil on wine, or the
 juices of herbs, which by spreading itself upon the top like a cover,
 preserves them uninjured from the air. Powders, also, are serviceable,
 for although they contain air mixed up in them, yet they ward off
 the power of the mass of circumambient air, which is seen in the
 preservation of grapes and other fruits in sand or flour. Wax, honey,
 pitch, and other resinous bodies, are well used in order to make the
 exclusion more perfect, and to remove the air and celestial influence.
 We have sometimes made an experiment by placing a vessel or other
 bodies in quicksilver, the most dense of all substances capable of
 being poured round others. Grottoes and subterraneous caves are of
 great use in keeping off the effects of the sun, and the predatory
 action of air, and in the north of Germany are used for granaries.
 The depositing of bodies at the bottom of water may be also mentioned
 here; and I remember having heard of some bottles of wine being let
 down into a deep well in order to cool them, but left there by chance,
 carelessness, and forgetfulness for several years, and then taken out;
 by which means the wine not only escaped becoming flat or dead, but
 was much more excellent in flavor, arising (as it appears) from a more
 complete mixture of its parts. But if the case require that bodies
 should be sunk to the bottom of water, as in rivers or the sea, and
 yet should not touch the water, nor be inclosed in sealed vessels, but
 surrounded only by air, it would be right to use that vessel which has
 been sometimes employed under water above ships that have sunk, in
 order to enable the divers to remain below and breathe occasionally
 by turns. It was of the following nature: A hollow tub of metal was
 formed, and sunk so as to have its bottom parallel with the surface of
 the water; it thus carried down with it to the bottom of the sea all
 the air contained in the tub. It stood upon three feet (like a tripod),
 being of rather less height than a man, so that, when the diver was
 in want of breath, he could put his head into the hollow of the tub,
 breathe, and then continue his work. We hear that some sort of boat
 or vessel has now been invented, capable of carrying men some distance
 under water. Any bodies, however, can easily be suspended under some
 such vessel as we have mentioned, which has occasioned our remarks upon
 the experiment.
 
 Another advantage of the careful and hermetical closing of bodies is
 this--not only the admission of external air is prevented (of which we
 have treated), but the spirit of bodies also is prevented from making
 its escape, which is an internal operation. For any one operating on
 natural bodies must be certain as to their quantity, and that nothing
 has evaporated or escaped, since profound alterations take place in
 bodies, when art prevents the loss or escape of any portion, while
 nature prevents their annihilation. With regard to this circumstance,
 a false idea has prevailed (which if true would make us despair of
 preserving quantity without diminution), namely, that the spirit of
 bodies, and air when rarefied by a great degree of heat, cannot be so
 kept in by being inclosed in any vessel as not to escape by the small
 pores. Men are led into this idea by the common experiments of a cup
 inverted over water, with a candle or piece of lighted paper in it,
 by which the water is drawn up, and of those cups which, when heated,
 draw up the flesh. For they think that in each experiment the rarefied
 air escapes, and that its quantity is therefore diminished, by which
 means the water or flesh rises by the motion of connection. This is,
 however, most incorrect. For the air is not diminished in quantity, but
 contracted in dimensions,[161] nor does this motion of the rising of
 the water begin till the flame is extinguished, or the air cooled, so
 that physicians place cold sponges, moistened with water, on the cups,
 in order to increase their attraction. There is, therefore, no reason
 why men should fear much from the ready escape of air: for although it
 be true that the most solid bodies have their pores, yet neither air,
 nor spirit, readily suffers itself to be rarefied to such an extreme
 degree; just as water will not escape by a small chink.
 
 2. With regard to the second of the seven above-mentioned methods, we
 must especially observe, that compression and similar violence have a
 most powerful effect either in producing locomotion, and other motions
 of the same nature, as may be observed in engines and projectiles, or
 in destroying the organic body, and those qualities, which consist
 entirely in motion (for all life, and every description of flame and
 ignition are destroyed by compression, which also injures and deranges
 every machine); or in destroying those qualities which consist in
 position and a coarse difference of parts, as in colors; for the color
 of a flower when whole, differs from that it presents when bruised, and
 the same may be observed of whole and powdered amber; or in tastes,
 for the taste of a pear before it is ripe, and of the same pear when
 bruised and softened, is different, since it becomes perceptibly
 more sweet. But such violence is of little avail in the more noble
 transformations and changes of homogeneous bodies, for they do not,
 by such means, acquire any constantly and permanently new state, but
 one that is transitory, and always struggling to return to its former
 habit and freedom. It would not, however, be useless to make some
 more diligent experiments with regard to this; whether, for instance,
 the condensation of a perfectly homogeneous body (such as air, water,
 oil, and the like) or their rarefaction, when effected by violence,
 can become permanent, fixed, and, as it were, so changed, as to become
 a nature. This might at first be tried by simple perseverance, and
 then by means of helps and harmonies. It might readily have been
 attempted (if we had but thought of it), when we condensed water (as
 was mentioned above), by hammering and compression, until it burst
 out. For we ought to have left the flattened globe untouched for some
 days, and then to have drawn off the water, in order to try whether it
 would have immediately occupied the same dimensions as it did before
 the condensation. If it had not done so, either immediately, or soon
 afterward, the condensation would have appeared to have been rendered
 constant; if not, it would have appeared that a restitution took place,
 and that the condensation had been transitory. Something of the same
 kind might have been tried with the glass eggs; the egg should have
 been sealed up suddenly and firmly, after a complete exhaustion of
 the air, and should have been allowed to remain so for some days, and
 it might then have been tried whether, on opening the aperture, the
 air would be drawn in with a hissing noise, or whether as much water
 would be drawn into it when immersed, as would have been drawn into it
 at first, if it had not continued sealed. For it is probable (or, at
 least, worth making the experiment) that this might have happened, or
 might happen, because perseverance has a similar effect upon bodies
 which are a little less homogeneous. A stick bent together for some
 time does not rebound, which is not owing to any loss of quantity in
 the wood during the time, for the same would occur (after a larger
 time) in a plate of steel, which does not evaporate. If the experiment
 of simple perseverance should fail, the matter should not be given up,
 but other means should be employed. For it would be no small advantage,
 if bodies could be endued with fixed and constant natures by violence.
 Air could then be converted into water by condensation, with other
 similar effects; for man is more the master of violent motions than of
 any other means.
 
 3. The third of our seven methods is referred to that great practical
 engine of nature, as well as of art, cold and heat. Here, man's power
 limps, as it were, with one leg. For we possess the heat of fire, which
 is infinitely more powerful and intense than that of the sun (as it
 reaches us), and that of animals. But we want cold,[162] except such
 as we can obtain in winter, in caverns, or by surrounding objects
 with snow and ice, which, perhaps, may be compared in degree with
 the noontide heat of the sun in tropical countries, increased by the
 reflection of mountains and walls. For this degree of heat and cold can
 be borne for a short period only by animals, yet it is nothing compared
 with the heat of a burning furnace, or the corresponding degree of
 cold.[163] Everything with us has a tendency to become rarefied,
 dry and wasted, and nothing to become condensed or soft, except
 by mixtures, and, as it were, spurious methods. Instances of cold,
 therefore, should be searched for most diligently, such as may be found
 by exposing bodies upon buildings in a hard frost, in subterraneous
 caverns, by surrounding bodies with snow and ice in deep places
 excavated for that purpose, by letting bodies down into wells, by
 burying bodies in quicksilver and metals, by immersing them in streams
 which petrify wood, by burying them in the earth (which the Chinese
 are reported to do with their china, masses of which, made for that
 purpose, are said to remain in the ground for forty or fifty years, and
 to be transmitted to their heirs as a sort of artificial mine) and the
 like. The condensations which take place in nature, by means of cold,
 should also be investigated, that by learning their causes, they may
 be introduced into the arts; such as are observed in the exudation of
 marble and stones, in the dew upon the panes of glass in a room toward
 morning after a frosty night, in the formation and the gathering of
 vapors under the earth into water, whence spring fountains and the like.
 
 Besides the substances which are cold to the touch, there are others
 which have also the effect of cold, and condense; they appear, however,
 to act only upon the bodies of animals, and scarcely any further. Of
 these we have many instances, in medicines and plasters. Some condense
 the flesh and tangible parts, such as astringent and inspissating
 medicines, others the spirits, such as soporifics. There are two modes
 of condensing the spirits, by soporifics or provocatives to sleep;
 the one by calming the motion, the other by expelling the spirit. The
 violet, dried roses, lettuces, and other benign or mild remedies,
 by their friendly and gently cooling vapors, invite the spirits to
 unite, and restrain their violent and perturbed motion. Rose-water,
 for instance, applied to the nostrils in fainting fits, causes the
 resolved and relaxed spirits to recover themselves, and, as it were,
 cherishes them. But opiates, and the like, banish the spirits by
 their malignant and hostile quality. If they be applied, therefore,
 externally, the spirits immediately quit the part and no longer readily
 flow into it; but if they be taken internally, their vapor, mounting
 to the head, expels, in all directions, the spirits contained in the
 ventricles of the brain, and since these spirits retreat, but cannot
 escape, they consequently meet and are condensed, and are sometimes
 completely extinguished and suffocated; although the same opiates, when
 taken in moderation, by a secondary accident (the condensation which
 succeeds their union), strengthen the spirits, render them more robust,
 and check their useless and inflammatory motion, by which means they
 contribute not a little to the cure of diseases, and the prolongation
 of life.
 
 The preparations of bodies, also, for the reception of cold should not
 be omitted, such as that water a little warmed is more easily frozen
 than that which is quite cold, and the like.
 
 Moreover, since nature supplies cold so sparingly, we must act like the
 apothecaries, who, when they cannot obtain any simple ingredient, take
 a succedaneum, or _quid pro quo_, as they term it, such as aloes for
 xylobalsamum, cassia for cinnamon. In the same manner we should look
 diligently about us, to ascertain whether there may be any substitutes
 for cold, that is to say, in what other manner condensation can be
 effected, which is the peculiar operation of cold. Such condensations
 appear hitherto to be of four kinds only. 1. By simple compression,
 which is of little avail toward permanent condensation, on account
 of the elasticity of substances, but may still, however, be of some
 assistance. 2. By the contraction of the coarser, after the escape
 or departure of the finer parts of a given body; as is exemplified
 in induration by fire, and the repeated heating and extinguishing of
 metals, and the like. 3. By the cohesion of the most solid homogeneous
 parts of a given body, which were previously separated, and mixed with
 others less solid, as in the return of sublimated mercury to its simple
 state, in which it occupies much less space than it did in powder, and
 the same may be observed of the cleansing of all metals from their
 dross. 4. By harmony, or the application of substances which condense
 by some latent power. These harmonies are as yet but rarely observed,
 at which we cannot be surprised, since there is little to hope for from
 their investigation, unless the discovery of forms and confirmation
 be attained. With regard to animal bodies, it is not to be questioned
 that there are many internal and external medicines which condense
 by harmony, as we have before observed, but this action is rare in
 inanimate bodies. Written accounts, as well as report, have certainly
 spoken of a tree in one of the Tercera or Canary Islands (for I do
 not exactly recollect which) that drips perpetually, so as to supply
 the inhabitants, in some degree, with water; and Paracelsus says that
 the herb called _ros solis_ is filled with dew at noon, while the sun
 gives out its greatest heat, and all other herbs around it are dry. We
 treat both these accounts as fables; they would, however, if true, be
 of the most important service, and most worthy of examination. As to
 the honey-dew, resembling manna, which is found in May on the leaves
 of the oak, we are of opinion that it is not condensed by any harmony
 or peculiarity of the oak leaf, but that while it falls equally upon
 other leaves it is retained and continues on those of the oak, because
 their texture is closer, and not so porous as that of most of the other
 leaves.[164]
 
 With regard to heat, man possesses abundant means and power; but his
 observation and inquiry are defective in some respects, and those of
 the greatest importance, notwithstanding the boasting of quacks. For
 the effects of intense heat are examined and observed, while those of
 a more gentle degree of heat, being of the most frequent occurrence
 in the paths of nature, are, on that very account, least known. We
 see, therefore, the furnaces, which are most esteemed, employed in
 increasing the spirits of bodies to a great extent, as in the strong
 acids, and some chemical oils; while the tangible parts are hardened,
 and, when the volatile part has escaped, become sometimes fixed; the
 homogeneous parts are separated, and the heterogeneous incorporated and
 agglomerated in a coarse lump; and (what is chiefly worthy of remark)
 the junction of compound bodies, and the more delicate conformations
 are destroyed and confounded. But the operation of a less violent heat
 should be tried and investigated, by which more delicate mixtures and
 regular conformations may be produced and elicited, according to the
 example of nature, and in imitation of the effect of the sun, which we
 have alluded to in the aphorism on the instances of alliance. For the
 works of nature are carried on in much smaller portions, and in more
 delicate and varied positions than those of fire, as we now employ
 it. But man will then appear to have really augmented his power, when
 the works of nature can be imitated in species, perfected in power,
 and varied in quantity; to which should be added the acceleration in
 point of time. Rust, for instance, is the result of a long process, but
 _crocus martis_ is obtained immediately; and the same may be observed
 of natural verdigris and ceruse. Crystal is formed slowly, while glass
 is blown immediately: stones increase slowly, while bricks are baked
 immediately, etc. In the meantime (with regard to our present subject)
 every different species of heat should, with its peculiar effects, be
 diligently collected and inquired into; that of the heavenly bodies,
 whether their rays be direct, reflected, or refracted, or condensed by
 a burning-glass; that of lightning, flame, and ignited charcoal; that
 of fire of different materials, either open or confined, straitened or
 overflowing, qualified by the different forms of the furnaces, excited
 by the bellows, or quiescent, removed to a greater or less distance,
 or passing through different media; moist heats, such as the _balneum
 Mariae_, and the dunghill; the external and internal heat of animals;
 dry heats, such as the heat of ashes, lime, warm sand; in short, the
 nature of every kind of heat, and its degrees.
 
 We should, however, particularly attend to the investigation and
 discovery of the effects and operations of heat, when made to approach
 and retire by degrees, regularly, periodically, and by proper intervals
 of space and time. For this systematical inequality is in truth the
 daughter of heaven and mother of generation, nor can any great result
 be expected from a vehement, precipitate, or desultory heat. For this
 is not only most evident in vegetables, but in the wombs of animals
 also there arises a great inequality of heat, from the motion, sleep,
 food, and passions of the female. The same inequality prevails in
 those subterraneous beds where metals and fossils are perpetually
 forming, which renders yet more remarkable the ignorance of some of the
 reformed alchemists, who imagined they could attain their object by the
 equable heat of lamps, or the like, burning uniformly. Let this suffice
 concerning the operation and effects of heat; nor is it time for us
 to investigate them thoroughly before the forms and conformations
 of bodies have been further examined and brought to light. When we
 have determined upon our models, we may seek, apply, and arrange our
 instruments.
 
 4. The fourth mode of action is by continuance, the very steward and
 almoner, as it were, of nature. We apply the term continuance to the
 abandonment of a body to itself for an observable time, guarded and
 protected in the meanwhile from all external force. For the internal
 motion then commences to betray and exert itself when the external and
 adventitious is removed. The effects of time, however, are far more
 delicate than those of fire. Wine, for instance, cannot be clarified
 by fire as it is by continuance. Nor are the ashes produced by
 combustion so fine as the particles dissolved or wasted by the lapse
 of ages. The incorporations and mixtures, which are hurried by fire,
 are very inferior to those obtained by continuance; and the various
 conformations assumed by bodies left to themselves, such as mouldiness,
 etc., are put a stop to by fire or a strong heat. It is not, in the
 meantime, unimportant to remark that there is a certain degree of
 violence in the motion of bodies entirely confined; for the confinement
 impedes the proper motion of the body. Continuance in an open vessel,
 therefore, is useful for separations, and in one hermetically sealed
 for mixtures, that in a vessel partly closed, but admitting the air,
 for putrefaction. But instances of the operation and effect of
 continuance must be collected diligently from every quarter.
 
 5. The direction of motion (which is the fifth method of action) is
 of no small use. We adopt this term, when speaking of a body which,
 meeting with another, either arrests, repels, allows, or directs
 its original motion. This is the case principally in the figure and
 position of vessels. An upright cone, for instance, promotes the
 condensation of vapor in alembics, but when reversed, as in inverted
 vessels, it assists the refining of sugar. Sometimes a curved form,
 or one alternately contracted and dilated, is required. Strainers may
 be ranged under this head, where the opposed body opens a way for
 one portion of another substance and impedes the rest. Nor is this
 process or any other direction of motion carried on externally only,
 but sometimes by one body within another. Thus, pebbles are thrown
 into water to collect the muddy particles, and syrups are refined by
 the white of an egg, which glues the grosser particles together so as
 to facilitate their removal. Telesius, indeed, rashly and ignorantly
 enough attributes the formation of animals to this cause, by means of
 the channels and folds of the womb. He ought to have observed a similar
 formation of the young in eggs which have no wrinkles or inequalities.
 One may observe a real result of this direction of motion in casting
 and modelling.
 
 6. The effects produced by harmony and aversion (which is the
 sixth method) are frequently buried in obscurity; for these occult
 and specific properties (as they are termed), the sympathies and
 antipathies, are for the most part but a corruption of philosophy. Nor
 can we form any great expectation of the discovery of the harmony which
 exists between natural objects, before that of their forms and simple
 conformations, for it is nothing more than the symmetry between these
 forms and conformations.
 
 The greater and more universal species of harmony are not, however,
 so wholly obscure, and with them, therefore, we must commence. The
 first and principal distinction between them is this; that some bodies
 differ considerably in the abundance and rarity of their substance, but
 correspond in their conformation; others, on the contrary, correspond
 in the former and differ in the latter. Thus the chemists have well
 observed, that in their trial of first principles sulphur and mercury,
 as it were, pervade the universe; their reasoning about salt, however,
 is absurd, and merely introduced to comprise earthy dry fixed bodies.
 In the other two, indeed, one of the most universal species of natural
 harmony manifests itself. Thus there is a correspondence between
 sulphur, oil, greasy exhalations, flame, and, perhaps, the substance of
 the stars. On the other hand, there is a like correspondence between
 mercury, water, aqueous vapor, air, and, perhaps, pure inter-sidereal
 ether. Yet do these two quaternions, or great natural tribes (each
 within its own limits), differ immensely in quantity and density of
 substance, while they generally agree in conformation, as is manifest
 in many instances. On the other hand, the metals agree in such quantity
 and density (especially when compared with vegetables, etc.), but
 differ in many respects in conformation. Animals and vegetables, in
 like manner, vary in their almost infinite modes of conformation, but
 range within very limited degrees of quantity and density of substance.
 
 The next most general correspondence is that between individual bodies
 and those which supply them by way of menstruum or support. Inquiry,
 therefore, must be made as to the climate, soil, and depth at which
 each metal is generated, and the same of gems, whether produced in
 rocks or mines, also as to the soil in which particular trees, shrubs,
 and herbs, mostly grow and, as it were, delight; and as to the best
 species of manure, whether dung, chalk, sea sand, or ashes, etc., and
 their different propriety and advantage according to the variety of
 soils. So also the grafting and setting of trees and plants (as regards
 the readiness of grafting one particular species on another) depends
 very much upon harmony, and it would be amusing to try an experiment
 I have lately heard of, in grafting forest trees (garden trees alone
 having hitherto been adopted), by which means the leaves and fruit
 are enlarged, and the trees produce more shade. The specific food of
 animals again should be observed, as well as that which cannot be used.
 Thus the carnivorous cannot be fed on herbs, for which reason the order
 of feuilletans, the experiment having been made, has nearly vanished;
 human nature being incapable of supporting their regimen, although the
 human will has more power over the bodily frame than that of other
 animals. The different kinds of putrefaction from which animals are
 generated should be noted.
 
 The harmony of principal bodies with those subordinate to them (such
 indeed may be deemed those we have alluded to above) are sufficiently
 manifest, to which may be added those that exist between different
 bodies and their objects, and, since these latter are more apparent,
 they may throw great light when well observed and diligently examined
 upon those which are more latent.
 
 The more internal harmony and aversion, or friendship and enmity
 (for superstition and folly have rendered the terms of sympathy and
 antipathy almost disgusting), have been either falsely assigned,
 or mixed with fable, or most rarely discovered from neglect. For if
 one were to allege that there is an enmity between the vine and the
 cabbage, because they will not come up well when sown together, there
 is a sufficient reason for it in the succulent and absorbent nature
 of each plant, so that the one defrauds the other. Again, if one were
 to say that there is a harmony and friendship between the corn and
 the corn-flower, or the wild poppy, because the latter seldom grow
 anywhere but in cultivated soils, he ought rather to say, there is an
 enmity between them, for the poppy and the corn-flower are produced and
 created by those juices which the corn has left and rejected, so that
 the sowing of the corn prepares the ground for their production. And
 there are a vast number of similar false assertions. As for fables,
 they must be totally exterminated. There remains, then, but a scanty
 supply of such species of harmony as has borne the test of experiment,
 such as that between the magnet and iron, gold and quicksilver, and
 the like. In chemical experiments on metals, however, there are some
 others worthy of notice, but the greatest abundance (where the whole
 are so few in numbers) is discovered in certain medicines, which,
 from their occult and specific qualities (as they are termed), affect
 particular limbs, humors, diseases, or constitutions. Nor should we
 omit the harmony between the motion and phenomena of the moon, and
 their effects on lower bodies, which may be brought together by an
 accurate and honest selection from the experiments of agriculture,
 navigation, and medicine, or of other sciences. By as much as these
 general instances, however, of more latent harmony, are rare, with
 so much the more diligence are they to be inquired after, through
 tradition, and faithful and honest reports, but without rashness
 and credulity, with an anxious and, as it were, hesitating degree of
 reliance. There remains one species of harmony which, though simple in
 its mode of action, is yet most valuable in its use, and must by no
 means be omitted, but rather diligently investigated. It is the ready
 or difficult coition or union of bodies in composition, or simple
 juxtaposition. For some bodies readily and willingly mix, and are
 incorporated, others tardily and perversely; thus powders mix best with
 water, chalk and ashes with oils, and the like. Nor are these instances
 of readiness and aversion to mixture to be alone collected, but others,
 also, of the collocation, distribution, and digestion of the parts when
 mingled, and the predominance after the mixture is complete.
 
 7. Lastly, there remains the seventh, and last of the seven, modes
 of action; namely, that by the alternation and interchange of the
 other six; but of this, it will not be the right time to offer any
 examples, until some deeper investigation shall have taken place of
 each of the others. The series, or chain of this alternation, in its
 mode of application to separate effects, is no less powerful in its
 operation than difficult to be traced. But men are possessed with the
 most extreme impatience, both of such inquiries, and their practical
 application, although it be the clew of the labyrinth in all greater
 works. Thus far of the generally useful instances.
 
 LI. The twenty-seventh and last place we will assign to the magical
 instances, a term which we apply to those where the matter or efficient
 agent is scanty or small, in comparison with the grandeur of the work
 or effect produced; so that even when common they appear miraculous,
 some at first sight, others even upon more attentive observation.
 Nature, however, of herself, supplies these but sparingly. What she
 will do when her whole store is thrown open, and after the discovery
 of forms, processes, and conformation, will appear hereafter. As far
 as we can yet conjecture, these magic effects are produced in three
 ways, either by self-multiplication, as in fire, and the poisons termed
 specific, and the motions transferred and multiplied from wheel to
 wheel; or by the excitement, or, as it were, invitation of another
 substance, as in the magnet, which excites innumerable needles without
 losing or diminishing its power; and again in leaven, and the like; or
 by the excess of rapidity of one species of motion over another, as
 has been observed in the case of gunpowder, cannon, and mines. The two
 former require an investigation of harmonies, the latter of a measure
 of motion. Whether there be any mode of changing bodies _per minima_
 (as it is termed), and transferring the delicate conformations of
 matter, which is of importance in all transformations of bodies, so as
 to enable art to effect, in a short time, that which nature works out
 by divers expedients, is a point of which we have as yet no indication.
 But, as we aspire to the extremest and highest results in that which is
 solid and true, so do we ever detest, and, as far as in us lies, expel
 all that is empty and vain.
 
 LII. Let this suffice as to the respective dignity of prerogatives of
 instances. But it must be noted, that in this our organ, we treat of
 logic, and not of philosophy. Seeing, however, that our logic instructs
 and informs the understanding, in order that it may not, with the small
 hooks, as it were, of the mind, catch at, and grasp mere abstractions,
 but rather actually penetrate nature, and discover the properties and
 effects of bodies, and the determinate laws of their substance (so
 that this science of ours springs from the nature of things, as well as
 from that of the mind); it is not to be wondered at, if it have been
 continually interspersed and illustrated with natural observations and
 experiments, as instances of our method. The prerogative instances are,
 as appears from what has preceded, twenty-seven in number, and are
 termed, solitary instances, migrating instances, conspicuous instances,
 clandestine instances, constitutive instances, similar instances,
 singular instances, deviating instances, bordering instances,
 instances of power, accompanying and hostile instances, subjunctive
 instances, instances of alliance, instances of the cross, instances
 of divorce, instances of the gate, citing instances, instances of the
 road, supplementary instances, lancing instances, instances of the
 rod, instances of the course, doses of nature, wrestling instances,
 suggesting instances, generally useful instances, and magical
 instances. The advantage, by which these instances excel the more
 ordinary, regards specifically either theory or practice, or both. With
 regard to theory, they assist either the senses or the understanding;
 the senses, as in the five instances of the lamp; the understanding,
 either by expediting the exclusive mode of arriving at the form, as in
 solitary instances, or by confining, and more immediately indicating
 the affirmative, as in the migrating, conspicuous, accompanying, and
 subjunctive instances; or by elevating the understanding, and leading
 it to general and common natures, and that either immediately, as in
 the clandestine and singular instances, and those of alliance; or very
 nearly so, as in the constitutive; or still less so, as in the similar
 instances; or by correcting the understanding of its habits, as in
 the deviating instances; or by leading to the grand form or fabric of
 the universe, as in the bordering instances; or by guarding it from
 false forms and causes, as in those of the cross and of divorce. With
 regard to practice, they either point it out, or measure, or elevate
 it. They point it out, either by showing where we must commence in
 order not to repeat the labors of others, as in the instances of power;
 or by inducing us to aspire to that which may be possible, as in the
 suggesting instances; the four mathematical instances measure it. The
 generally useful and the magical elevate it.
 
 Again, out of these twenty-seven instances, some must be collected
 immediately, without waiting for a particular investigation of
 properties. Such are the similar, singular, deviating, and bordering
 instances, those of power, and of the gate, and suggesting, generally
 useful, and magical instances; for these either assist and cure
 the understanding and senses, or furnish our general practice. The
 remainder are to be collected when we finish our synoptical tables for
 the work of the interpreter, upon any particular nature; for these
 instances, honored and gifted with such prerogatives, are like the
 soul amid the vulgar crowd of instances, and (as we from the first
 observed) a few of them are worth a multitude of the others. When,
 therefore, we are forming our tables they must be searched out with the
 greatest zeal, and placed in the table. And, since mention must be made
 of them in what follows, a treatise upon their nature has necessarily
 been prefixed. We must next, however, proceed to the supports and
 corrections of induction, and thence to concretes, the latent process,
 and latent conformations, and the other matters, which we have
 enumerated in their order in the twenty-first aphorism, in order that,
 like good and faithful guardians, we may yield up their fortune to
 mankind upon the emancipation and majority of their understanding;
 from which must necessarily follow an improvement of their estate, and
 an increase of their power over nature. For man, by the fall, lost
 at once his state of innocence, and his empire over creation, both
 of which can be partially recovered even in this life, the first by
 religion and faith, the second by the arts and sciences. For creation
 did not become entirely and utterly rebellious by the curse, but in
 consequence of the Divine decree, "in the sweat of thy brow shalt
 thou eat bread," she is compelled by our labors (not assuredly by our
 disputes or magical ceremonies), at length, to afford mankind in some
 degree his bread, that is to say, to supply man's daily wants.
 
 END OF "NOVUM ORGANUM"
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 
 [71] #To ti en einai#, or #en ousia# of Aristotle.--See lib. iii. Metap.
 
 [72] These divisions are from Aristotle's Metaphysics, where they are
 termed, 1. #hyle e to hypokeimenon#. 2. #to ti en einai#. 3. #hothen he
 arche tes kineseos#. 4. #to hou heneken--kai to agathon#.
 
 [73] See Aphorism li. and second paragraph of Aphorism lxv. in the
 first book.
 
 [74] Bacon means, that although there exist in nature only
 individualities, yet a certain number of these may have common
 properties, and be controlled by the same laws. Now, these homogeneous
 qualities which distinguish them from other individuals, lead us to
 class them under one expression, and sometimes under a single term. Yet
 these classes are only pure conceptions in Bacon's opinion, and cannot
 be taken for distinct substances. He evidently here aims a blow at the
 Realists, who concluded that the essence which united individualities
 in a class was the only real and immutable existence in nature,
 inasmuch as it entered into their ideas of individual substances as
 a distinct and essential property, and continued in the mind as the
 mold, type or pattern of the class, while its individual forms were
 undergoing perpetual renovation and decay.--_Ed._
 
 [75] Bacon's definition is obscure. All the idea we have of a law of
 nature consists in invariable sequence between certain classes of
 phenomena; but this cannot be the complete sense attached by Bacon to
 the term form, as he employs it in the fourth aphorism as convertible
 with the nature of any object; and again, in the first aphorism, as
 the _natura naturans_, or general law or condition in any substance
 or quality--_natura naturata_--which is whatever its form is, or that
 particular combination of forces which impresses a certain nature upon
 matter subject to its influence. Thus, in the Newtonian sense, the
 form of whiteness would be that combination of the seven primitive
 rays of light which give rise to that color. In combination with this
 word, and affording a still further insight into its meaning, we have
 the phrases, _latens processus ad formam, et latens schematismus
 corporum_. Now, the _latens schematismus_ signifies the internal
 texture, structure, or configuration of bodies, or the result of the
 respective situation of all the parts of a body; while the _latens
 processus ad formam_ points out the gradation of movements which takes
 place among the molecula of bodies when they either conserve or change
 their figure. Hence we may consider the form of any quality in body
 as something convertible with that quality, _i.e._, when it exists
 the quality is present, and _vice versa_. In this sense, the form of
 a thing differs only from its efficient cause in being permanent,
 whereas we apply cause to that which exists in order of time. The
 _latens processus_ and _latens schematismus_ are subordinate to form,
 as concrete exemplifications of its essence. The former is the secret
 and invisible process by which change is effected, and involves the
 principle since called the law of continuity. Thus, the succession of
 events between the application of the match to the expulsion of the
 bullet is an instance of latent progress which we can now trace with
 some degree of accuracy. It also more directly refers to the operation
 by which one form or condition of being is induced upon another. For
 example, when the surface of iron becomes rusty, or when water is
 converted into steam, some change has taken place, or latent process
 from one form to another. Mechanics afford many exemplifications of
 the first latent process we have denoted, and chemistry of the second.
 The _latens schematismus_ is that visible structure of bodies on
 which so many of their properties depend. When we inquire into the
 constitution of crystals, and into the internal structure of plants, we
 are examining into their latent schematism.--_Ed._
 
 [76] By the recent discoveries in electric magnetism, copper wires,
 or, indeed, wires of any metal, may be transformed into magnets; the
 magnetic law, or form, having been to that extent discovered.
 
 [77] Haller has pursued this investigation in his "Physiology,"
 and has left his successors little else to do than repeat his
 discoveries.--_Ed._
 
 [78] Bacon here first seems pregnant with the important development of
 the higher calculus, which, in the hands of Newton and Descartes, was
 to effect as great a revolution in philosophy as his method.--_Ed._
 
 [79] By spirit, Bacon here plainly implies material fluid too fine to
 be grasped by the unassisted sense, which rather operates than reasons.
 We sometimes adopt the same mode of expression, as in the words spirits
 of nitre, spirits of wine. Some such agency has been assumed by nearly
 all the modern physicists, a few of whom, along with Bacon, would leave
 us to gather from their expressions, that they believe such bodies
 endowed with the sentient powers of perception. As another specimen
 of his sentiment on this subject, we may refer to a paragraph on the
 decomposition of compounds, in his essay on death, beginning--"The
 spirit which exists in all living bodies, keeps all the parts in due
 subjection; when it escapes, the body decomposes, or the similar parts
 unite."--_Ed._
 
 [80] The theory of the Epicureans and others. The atoms are supposed
 to be invisible, unalterable particles, endued with all the properties
 of the given body, and forming that body by their union. They must
 be separated, of course, which either takes a vacuum for granted, or
 introduces a tertium quid into the composition of the body.
 
 [81] Compare the three following aphorisms with the last three chapters
 of the third book of the "De Augmentis Scientiarum."
 
 [82] Bacon gives this unfortunate term its proper signification; #meta#,
 in composition, with the Greeks signifying change or mutation. Most of
 our readers, no doubt, are aware that the obtrusion of this word into
 technical philosophy was purely capricious, and is of no older date
 than the publication of Aristotle's works by Andronicus of Rhodes, one
 of the learned men into whose hands the manuscripts of that philosopher
 fell, after they were brought by Sylla from Athens to Rome. To fourteen
 books in these MSS. with no distinguishing title, Andronicus is said to
 have prefixed the words #ta meta ta physika#, to denote the place which
 they ought to hold either in the order of Aristotle's arrangement, or
 in that of study. These books treat first of those subjects which are
 common to matter and mind; secondly, of things separate from matter,
 _i.e._ of God, and of the subordinate spirits, which were supposed by
 the Peripatetics to watch over particular portions of the universe. The
 followers of Aristotle accepted the whimsical title of Andronicus, and
 in their usual manner allowed a word to unite things into one science
 which were plainly heterogeneous. Their error was adopted by the
 Peripatetics of the Christian Church. The schoolmen added to the notion
 of ontology, the science of the mind, or pneumatology, and as that
 genus of being has since become extinct with the schools, metaphysics
 thus in modern parlance comes to be synonymous with psychology. It were
 to be wished that Bacon's definition of the term had been accepted, and
 mental science delivered from one of the greatest monstrosities in its
 nomenclature, yet Bacon whimsically enough in his De Augmentis includes
 mathematics in metaphysics.--_Ed._
 
 [83]
 
   "Ne tenues pluviae, rapidive potentia solis
    Acrior, aut Boreae penetrabile frigus adurat."
                                  --Virg. Georg. i. 92, 93.
 
 [84] This notion, which he repeats again, and particularizes in the
 18th aph. of this book, is borrowed from the ancients, and we need not
 say is as wise as their other astronomical conjectures. The sun also
 approaches stars quite as large in other quarters of the zodiac, when
 it looks down upon the earth through the murky clouds of winter. When
 that luminary is in Leo, the heat of the earth is certainly greater
 than at any other period, but this arises from the accumulation of heat
 after the solstice, for the same reason that the maximum heat of the
 day is at two o'clock instead of noon.--_Ed._
 
 [85] Bouguer, employed by Louis XIV. in philosophical researches,
 ascended the Andes to discover the globular form of the earth, and
 published an account of his passage, which verifies the statement of
 Bacon.
 
 [86] Montanari asserts in his book against the astrologers that he
 had satisfied himself by numerous and oft-repeated experiments, that
 the lunar rays gathered to a focus produced a sensible degree of
 heat. Muschenbroeck, however, adopts the opposite opinion, and asserts
 that himself, De la Hire, Villet, and Tschirnhausen had tried with
 that view the strongest burning-glasses in vain. (Opera de Igne.) De
 la Lande makes a similar confession in his Astronomy (vol. ii. vii.
 Sec. 1413). Bouguer, whom we have just quoted, demonstrated that the
 light of the moon was 300,000 degrees less than that of the sun; it
 would consequently be necessary to invent a glass with an absorbing
 power 300,000 degrees greater than those ordinarily in use, to try the
 experiment Bacon speaks of.--_Ed._
 
 [87] In this thermometer, mercury was not dilated by heat or contracted
 by cold, as the one now in use, but a mass of air employed instead,
 which filled the cavity of the bulb. This being placed in an inverted
 position to ours, that is to say, with the bulb uppermost, pressed
 down the liquor when the air became dilated by heat, as ours press
 it upward; and when the heat diminished, the liquor rose to occupy
 the place vacated by the air, as the one now in use descends. It
 consequently was liable to be affected by a change in the temperature,
 as by the weight of air, and could afford only a rude standard of
 accuracy in scientific investigations. This thermometer was not Bacon's
 own contrivance, as is commonly supposed, but that of Drebbel.--_Ed._
 
 [88] La Lande is indignant that the Chaldeans should have more correct
 notions of the nature of comets than the modern physicists, and charges
 Bacon with entertaining the idea that they were the mere effects of
 vapor and heat. This passage, with two others more positive, in the
 "De Aug." (cap. xl.) and the "Descript. Globi Intellect." (cap. vi.)
 certainly afford ground for the assertion; but if Bacon erred, he erred
 with Galileo, and with the foremost spirits of the times. It is true
 that Pythagoras and Seneca had asserted their belief in the solidity
 of these bodies, but the wide dominion which Aristotle subsequently
 exercised, threw their opinions into the shade, and made the opposite
 doctrine everywhere paramount.--_Ed._
 
 [89] Was it a silk apron which exhibited electric sparks? Silk was then
 scarce.
 
 [90] The Italian fire-fly.
 
 [91] This last is found to be the real reason, air not being a good
 conductor, and therefore not allowing the escape of heat. The confined
 air is disengaged when these substances are placed under an exhausted
 receiver.
 
 [92] This is erroneous. Air, in fact, is one of the worst, and metals
 are the best conductors of heat.
 
 [93] See No. 28 in the table of the degrees of heat.
 
 [94] Bacon here mistakes sensation confined to ourselves for an
 internal property of distinct substances. Metals are denser than wood,
 and our bodies consequently coming into contact with more particles of
 matter when we touch them, lose a greater quantity of heat than in the
 case of lighter substances.--_Ed._
 
 [95] This was the ancient opinion, but the moderns incline to the
 belief that these insects are produced by generation or fecundity
 from seeds deposited by their tribes in bodies on the verge of
 putrefaction.--_Ed._
 
 [96] The correct measure of the activity of flame may be obtained by
 multiplying its natural force into the square of its velocity. On this
 account the flame of vivid lightning mentioned in No. 23 contains so
 much vigor, its velocity being greater than that arising from other
 heat.--_Ed._
 
 [97] The fires supply fresh heat, the water has only a certain quantity
 of heat, which being diffused over a fresh supply of cooler water, must
 be on the whole lowered.
 
 [98] If condensation were the cause of the greater heat, Bacon
 concludes the centre of the flame would be the hotter part, and _vice
 versa_. The fact is, neither of the causes assigned by Bacon is the
 true one; for the fire burns more quickly only because the draught of
 air is more rapid, the cold dense air pressing rapidly into the heated
 room and toward the chimney.--_Ed._
 
 [99] Bacon appears to have confounded combustibility and fusibility
 with susceptibility of heat; for though the metals will certainly
 neither dissolve as soon as ice or butter, nor be consumed as soon
 as wood, that only shows that different degrees of heat are required
 to produce similar effects on different bodies; but metals much more
 readily acquire and transmit the same degree of heat than any of the
 above substances. The rapid transmission renders them generally cold
 to the touch. The convenience of fixing wooden handles to vessels
 containing hot water illustrates these observations.
 
 [100] Another singular error, the truth being, that solid bodies are
 the best conductors; but of course where heat is diffused over a large
 mass, it is less in each part, than if that part alone absorbed the
 whole quantum of heat.--_Ed._
 
 [101] This general law or form has been well illustrated by Newton's
 discovery of the decomposition of colors.
 
 [102] _I.e._, the common link or form which connects the various
 kinds of natures, such as the different hot or red natures enumerated
 above.--See Aphorism iii. part 2.
 
 [103] This is erroneous--all metals expand considerably when heated.
 
 [104] "Quid ipsum," the #to ti en einai# of Aristotle.
 
 [105] To show the error of the text, we need only mention the case
 of water, which, when confined in corked vases, and exposed to the
 action of a freezing atmosphere, is sure to swell out and break those
 vessels which are not sufficiently large to contain its expanded
 volume. Megalotti narrates a hundred other instances of a similar
 character.--_Ed._
 
 [106] Bacon's inquisition into the nature of heat, as an example of
 the mode of interpreting nature, cannot be looked upon otherwise than
 as a complete failure. Though the exact nature of this phenomenon is
 still an obscure and controverted matter, the science of thermotics
 now consists of many important truths, and to none of these truths is
 there so much as an approximation in Bacon's process. The steps by
 which this science really advanced were the discovery of a measure of
 a heat or temperature, the establishment of the laws of conduction and
 radiation, of the laws of specific heat, latent heat, and the like.
 Such advances have led to Ampere's hypothesis, that heat consists in
 the vibrations of an imponderable fluid; and to Laplace's theory, that
 temperature consists in the internal radiation of a similar medium.
 These hypotheses cannot yet be said to be even probable, but at least
 they are so modified as to include some of the preceding laws which
 are firmly established, whereas Bacon's "form," or true definition of
 heat, as stated in the text, includes no laws of phenomena, explains no
 process, and is indeed itself an example of illicit generalization.
 
 In all the details of his example of heat he is unfortunate. He
 includes in his collection of instances, the _hot_ tastes of aromatic
 plants, the caustic effects of acids, and many other facts which
 cannot be ascribed to heat without a studious laxity in the use of the
 word.--_Ed._
 
 [107] By this term Bacon understands general phenomena, taken in order
 from the great mass of indiscriminative facts, which, as they lie in
 nature, are apt to generate confusion by their number, indistinctness
 and complication. Such classes of phenomena, as being peculiarly
 suggestive of causation, he quaintly classes under the title of
 prerogative inquiries, either seduced by the fanciful analogy, which
 such instances bore to the _prerogativa centuria_ in the Roman Comitia,
 or justly considering them as Herschel supposes to hold a kind of
 prerogative dignity from being peculiarly suggestive of causation.
 
 Two high authorities in physical science (v. Herschel, Nat. Phil.,
 art. 192; Whewell's Philosophy of the Inductive Sciences, vol. ii.
 p. 243) pronounce these instances of little service in the task of
 induction, being for the most part classed not according to the ideas
 which they involve, or to any obvious circumstance in the facts of
 which they consist, but according to the extent and manner of their
 influence upon the inquiry in which they are employed. Thus we
 have solitary instances, migrating instances, ostensive instances,
 clandestine instances, so termed according to the degree in which
 they exhibit, or seem to exhibit, the property, whose nature we would
 examine. We have guide-post instances, crucial instances, instances of
 the parted road, of the doorway, of the lamp, according to the guidance
 they supply to our advance. Whewell remarks that such a classification
 is much of the same nature as if, having to teach the art of building,
 we were to describe tools with reference to the amount and place of the
 work which they must do, instead of pointing out their construction
 and use; as if we were to inform the pupil that we must have tools for
 lifting a stone up, tools for moving it sidewise, tools for laying it
 square, and tools for cementing it firmly. The means are thus lost
 in the end, and we reap the fruits of unmethodical arrangement in
 the confusion of cross division. In addition, all the instances are
 leavened with the error of confounding the laws with the causes of
 phenomena, and we are urged to adopt the fundamental error of seeking
 therein the universal agents, or general causes of phenomena, without
 ascending the gradual steps of intermediate laws.--_Ed._
 
 [108] Of these nine general heads no more than the first is prosecuted
 by the author.
 
 [109] This very nearly approaches to Sir I. Newton's discovery of the
 decomposition of light by the prism.
 
 [110] The mineral kingdom, as displaying the same nature in all its
 gradations, from the shells so perfect in structure in limestone to the
 finer marbles in which their nature gradually disappears, is the great
 theatre for instances of migration.--_Ed._
 
 [111] Bacon was not aware of the fact since brought to light by
 Roemer, that down to fourteen fathoms from the earth's mean level
 the thermometer remains fixed at the tenth degree, but that as the
 thermometer descends below that depth the heat increases in a ratio
 proportionate to the descent, which happens with little variation in
 all climates. Buffon considers this a proof of a central fire in our
 planet.--_Ed._
 
 [112] All the diversities of bodies depend upon two principles, _i.e._,
 the quantity and the position of the elements that enter into their
 composition. The primary difference is not that which depends on the
 greatest or least quantity of material elements, but that which depends
 on their position. It was the quick perception of this truth that made
 Leibnitz say that to complete mathematics it was necessary to join to
 the analysis of quantity the analysis of position.--_Ed._
 
 [113] Query?
 
 [114] The real cause of this phenomenon is the attraction of the
 surface-water in the vessel by the sides of the bubbles. When the
 bubbles approach, the sides nearest each other both tend to raise the
 small space of water between them, and consequently less water is
 raised by each of these nearer sides than by the exterior part of the
 bubble, and the greater weight of the water raised on the exterior
 parts pushes the bubbles together. In the same manner a bubble near
 the side of a vessel is pushed toward it; the vessel and bubble both
 drawing the water that is between them. The latter phenomenon cannot be
 explained on Bacon's hypothesis.
 
 [115] Modern discoveries appear to bear out the sagacity of Bacon's
 remark, and the experiments of Baron Cagnard may be regarded as a first
 step toward its full demonstration. After the new facts elicited by
 that philosopher, there can be little doubt that the solid, liquid
 and aeriform state of bodies are merely stages in a progress of
 gradual transition from one extreme to the other, and that however
 strongly marked the distinctions between them may appear, they will
 ultimately turn out to be separated by no sudden or violent line of
 demarcation, but slide into each other by imperceptible gradations.
 Bacon's suggestion, however, is as old as Pythagoras, and perhaps
 simultaneous with the first dawn of philosophic reason. The doctrine of
 the reciprocal transmutation of the elements underlies all the physical
 systems of the ancients, and was adopted by the Epicureans as well as
 the Stoics. Ovid opens his last book of the Metamorphoses with the
 poetry of the subject, where he expressly points to the hint of Bacon:--
 
                           ----"Tenuatus in auras
   Aeraque humor abit, etc., etc.
   *       *       *       *       *       *
   Inde retro redeunt, idemque retexitur ordo."--xv. 246-249.
 
 and Seneca, in the third book of his Natural Philosophy, quest. iv.,
 states the opinion in more precise language than either the ancient
 bard or the modern philosopher.--_Ed._
 
 [116] The author's own system of Memoria Technica may be found in
 the De Augmentis, chap. xv. We may add that, notwithstanding Bacon's
 assertion that he intended his method to apply to religion, politics,
 and morals, this is the only lengthy illustration he has adduced of any
 subject out of the domain of physical science.--_Ed._
 
 [117] The collective instances here meant are no other than general
 facts or laws of some degree of generality, and are themselves the
 result of induction. For example, the system of Jupiter, or Saturn
 with its satellites, is a collective instance, and materially assisted
 in securing the admission of the Copernican system. We have here in
 miniature, and displayed at one view, a system analogous to that of the
 planets about the sun, of which, from the circumstance of our being
 involved in it, and unfavorably situated for seeing it otherwise than
 in detail, we are incapacitated from forming a general idea, but by
 slow and progressive efforts of reason.
 
 But there is a species of collective instance which Bacon does not seem
 to have contemplated, in which particular phenomena are presented in
 such numbers at once, as to make the induction of their law a matter
 of ocular inspection. For example, the parabolic form assumed by a
 jet of water spouted out of a hole is a collective instance of the
 velocities and directions of the motions of all the particles which
 compose it seen together, and which thus leads us without trouble to
 recognize the law of the motion of a projectile. Again, the beautiful
 figures exhibited by sand strewed on regular plates of glass or metal
 set in vibration, are collective instances of an infinite number of
 points which remain at rest while the remainder of the plate vibrates,
 and in consequence afford us an insight into the law which regulates
 their arrangement and sequence throughout the whole surface. The richly
 colored lemniscates seen around the optic axis of crystals exposed to
 polarized light afford a striking instance of the same kind, pointing
 at once to the general mathematical expression of the law which
 regulates their production. Such collective instances as these lead us
 to a general law by an induction which offers itself spontaneously,
 and thus furnish advanced posts in philosophical exploration. The laws
 of Kepler, which Bacon ignored on account of his want of mathematical
 taste, may be cited as a collective instance. The first is, that the
 planets move in elliptical orbits, having the sun for their common
 focus. The second, that about this focus the _radius vector_ of each
 planet describes equal areas in equal times. The third, that the
 squares of the periodic times of the planets are as the cubes of their
 mean distance from the sun. This collective instance "opened the way"
 to the discovery of the Newtonian law of gravitation.--_Ed._
 
 [118] Is not this very hasty generalization? Do serpents move with four
 folds only? Observe also the motion of centipedes and other insects.
 
 [119] Shaw states another point of difference between the objects cited
 in the text--animals having their roots within, while plants have
 theirs without; for their lacteals nearly correspond with the fibres of
 the roots in plants; so that animals seem nourished within themselves
 as plants are without.--_Ed._
 
 [120] Bacon falls into an error here in regarding the syllogism as
 something distinct from the reasoning faculty, and only one of its
 forms. It is not generally true that the syllogism is only a form of
 reasoning by which we unite ideas which accord with the middle term.
 This agreement is not even essential to accurate syllogisms; when the
 relation of the two things compared to the third is one of equality or
 similitude, it of course follows that the two things compared may be
 pronounced equal, or like to each other. But if the relation between
 these terms exist in a different form, then it is not true that the
 two extremes stand in the same relation to each other as to the middle
 term. For instance, if =A= is double of =B=, and =B= double of =C=,
 then =A= is quadruple of =C=. But then the relation of =A= to =C= is
 different from that of =A= to =B= and of =B= to =C=.--_Ed._
 
 [121] Comparative anatomy is full of analogies of this kind. Those
 between natural and artificial productions are well worthy of
 attention, and sometimes lead to important discoveries. By observing
 an analogy of this kind between the plan used in hydraulic engines for
 preventing the counter-current of a fluid, and a similar contrivance in
 the blood vessels, Harvey was led to the discovery of the circulation
 of the blood.--_Ed._
 
 [122] This is well illustrated in plants, for the gardener can produce
 endless varieties of any known species, but can never produce a new
 species itself.
 
 [123] The discoveries of Tournefort have placed moss in the class
 of plants. The fish alluded to below are to be found only in the
 tropics.--_Ed._
 
 [124] There is, however, no real approximation to birds in either the
 flying fish or bat, any more than a man approximates to a fish because
 he can swim. The wings of the flying fish and bat are mere expansions
 of skin, bearing no resemblance whatever to those of birds.--_Ed._
 
 [125] Seneca was a sounder astronomer than Bacon. He ridiculed the idea
 of the motion of any heavenly bodies being irregular, and predicted
 that the day would come, when the laws which guided the revolution
 of these bodies would be proved to be identical with those which
 controlled the motions of the planets. The anticipation, was realized
 by Newton.--_Ed._
 
 [126] But see Bacon's own corollary at the end of the Instances of
 Divorce, Aphorism xxxvii. If Bacon's remark be accepted, the censure
 will fall upon Newton and the system so generally received at the
 present day. It is, however, unjust, as the centre of which Newton so
 often speaks is not a point with an active inherent force, but only
 the result of all the particular and reciprocal attractions of the
 different parts of the planet acting upon one spot. It is evident, that
 if all these forces were united in this centre, that the sum would be
 equal to all their partial effects.--_Ed._
 
 [127] Since Newton's discovery of the law of gravitation, we find that
 the attractive force of the earth must extend to an infinite distance.
 Bacon himself alludes to the operation of this attractive force at
 great distances in the Instances of the Rod, Aphorism xlv.
 
 [128] Snow reflects light, but is not a source of light.
 
 [129] Bacon's sagacity here foreshadows Newton's theory of the tides.
 
 [130] The error in the text arose from Bacon's impression that
 the earth was immovable. It is evident, since gravitation acts at
 an infinite distance, that no such point could be found; and even
 supposing the impossible point of equilibrium discovered, the body
 could not maintain its position an instant, but would be hurried, at
 the first movement of the heavenly bodies, in the direction of the
 dominant gravitating power.--_Ed._
 
 [131] Fly clocks are referred to in the text, not pendulum clocks,
 which were not known in England till 1662. The former, though clumsy
 and rude in their construction, still embodied sound mechanical
 principles. The comparison of the effect of a spring with that of a
 weight in producing certain motions in certain times on altitudes and
 in mines, has recently been tried by Professors Airy and Whewell in
 Dalcoath mine, by means of a pendulum, which is only a weight moved by
 gravity, and a chronometer balance moved and regulated by a spring.
 In his thirty-seventh Aphorism, Bacon also speaks of gravity as an
 incorporeal power, acting at a distance, and requiring time for its
 transmission; a consideration which occurred at a later period to
 Laplace in one of his most delicate investigations.
 
 Crucial instances, as Herschel remarks, afford the readiest and
 securest means of eliminating extraneous causes, and deciding between
 the claims of rival hypotheses; especially when these, running parallel
 to each other, in the explanation of great classes of phenomena, at
 length come to be placed at issue upon a single fact. A curious example
 is given by M. Fresnel, as decisive in his mind of the question between
 the two great theories on the nature of light, which, since the time
 of Newton and Huyghens, have divided philosophers. When two very clean
 glasses are laid one on the other, if they be not perfectly flat, but
 one or both, in an almost imperceptible degree, convex or prominent,
 beautiful and vivid colors will be seen between them; and if these be
 viewed through a red glass, their appearance will be that of alternate
 dark and bright stripes. These stripes are formed between the two
 surfaces in apparent contact, and being applicable on both theories,
 are appealed to by their respective supporters as strong confirmatory
 facts; but there is a difference in one circumstance, according as
 one or other theory is employed to explain them. In the case of the
 Huyghenian theory, the intervals between the bright stripes ought to
 appear absolutely black, when a prism is used for the upper glass, in
 the other half bright. This curious case of difference was tried, as
 soon as the opposing consequences of the two theories were noted by
 M. Fresnel, and the result is stated by him to be decisive in favor
 of that theory which makes light to consist in the vibrations of an
 elastic medium.--_Ed._
 
 [132] Bacon plainly, from this passage, was inclined to believe that
 the moon, like the comets, was nothing more than illuminated vapor. The
 Newtonian law, however, has not only established its solidity, but its
 density and weight. A sufficient proof of the former is afforded by the
 attraction of the sea, and the moon's motion round the earth.--_Ed._
 
 [133] Rather the refraction; the sky or air, however, _reflects_ the
 blue rays of light.
 
 [134] The polished surface of the glass causes the reflection in this
 case, and not the air; and a hat or other black surface put behind the
 window in the daytime will enable the glass to reflect distinctly for
 the same reason, namely, that the reflected rays are not mixed and
 confused with those transmitted from the other side of the window.
 
 [135] These instances, which Bacon seems to consider as a great
 discovery, are nothing more than disjunctive propositions combined
 with dilemmas. In proposing to explain an effect, we commence with
 the enumeration of the different causes which seem connected with
 its production; then with the aid of one or more dilemmas, we
 eliminate each of the phenomena accidental to its composition, and
 conclude with attributing the effect to the residue. For instance, a
 certain phenomenon (_a_) is produced either by phenomenon (=B=) or
 phenomenon (=C=); but =C= cannot be the cause of _a_, for it is found
 in =D=, =E=, =F=, neither of which are connected with _a_. Then the
 true cause of phenomenon (_a_) must be phenomenon (=B=).
 
 This species of reasoning is liable to several paralogisms, against
 which Bacon has not guarded his readers, from the very fact that he
 stumbled into them unwittingly himself. The two principal ones are
 false exclusions and defective enumerations. Bacon, in his survey of
 the causes which are able to concur in producing the phenomena of the
 tides, takes no account of the periodic melting of the Polar ice, or
 the expansion of water by the solar heat; nor does he fare better in
 his exclusions. For the attraction of the planets and the progression
 and retrograde motion communicated by the earth's diurnal revolution,
 can plainly affect the sea together, and have a simultaneous influence
 on its surface.
 
 Bacon is hardly just or consistent in his censure of Ramus; the end of
 whose dichotomy was only to render reasoning by dilemma, and crucial
 instances, more certain in their results, by reducing the divisions
 which composed their parts to two sets of contradictory propositions.
 The affirmative or negative of one would then necessarily have led to
 the acceptance or rejection of the other.--_Ed._
 
 [136] Pere Shenier first pointed out the spots on the sun's disk, and
 by the marks which they afforded him, computed its revolution to be
 performed in twenty-five days and some hours.--_Ed._
 
 [137] Rust is now well known to be a chemical combination of oxygen
 with the metal, and the metal when rusty acquires additional weight.
 His theory as to the generation of animals, is deduced from the
 erroneous notion of the possibility of spontaneous generation (as it
 was termed). See the next paragraph but one.
 
 [138]
 
   "Limus ut hic durescit, et haec ut cera liquescit
    Uno eodemque igni."--Virg. Ecl. viii.
 
 [139] See Table of Degrees, No. 38.
 
 [140] Riccati, and all modern physicists, discover some portion of
 light in every body, which seems to confirm the passage in Genesis that
 assigns to this substance priority in creation.--_Ed._
 
 [141] As instances of this kind, which the progress of science since
 the time of Bacon affords, we may cite the air-pump and the barometer,
 for manifesting the weight and elasticity of air: the measurement
 of the velocity of light, by means of the occultation of Jupiter's
 satellites and the aberration of the fixed stars: the experiments
 in electricity and galvanism, and in the greater part of pneumatic
 chemistry. In all these cases scientific facts are elicited, which
 sense could never have revealed to us.--_Ed._
 
 [142] The itinerant instances, as well as frontier instances, are
 cases in which we are enabled to trace the general law of continuity
 which seems to pervade all nature, and which has been aptly embodied
 in the sentence, "natura non agit per saltum." The pursuit of this law
 into phenomena where its application is not at first sight obvious,
 has opened a mine of physical discovery, and led us to perceive an
 intimate connection between facts which at first seemed hostile to each
 other. For example, the transparency of gold-leaf, which permits a
 bluish-green light to pass through it, is a frontier instance between
 transparent and opaque bodies, by exhibiting a body of the glass
 generally regarded the most opaque in nature, as still possessed of
 some slight degree of transparency. It thus proves that the quality
 of opacity is not a contrary or antagonistic quality to that of
 transparency, but only its extreme lowest degree.
 
 [143] Alluding to his theory of atoms.
 
 [144] Observe the approximation to Newton's theory. The same notion
 repeated still more clearly in the ninth motion. Newton believed
 that the planets might so conspire as to derange the earth's annual
 revolution, and to elongate the line of the apsides and ellipsis that
 the earth describes in its annual revolution round the sun. In the
 supposition that all the planets meet on the same straight line, Venus
 and Mercury on one side of the sun, and the earth, moon, Mars, Jupiter
 and Saturn on the side diametrically opposite; then Saturn would
 attract Jupiter, Jupiter Mars, Mars the moon, which must in its turn
 attract the earth in proportion to the force with which it was drawn
 out of its orbit. The result of this combined action on our planet
 would elongate its ecliptic orbit, and so far draw it from the source
 of heat, as to produce an intensity of cold destructive to animal
 life. But this movement would immediately cease with the planetary
 concurrence which produced it, and the earth, like a compressed spring,
 bound almost as near to the sun as she had been drawn from it, the
 reaction of the heat on its surface being about as intense as the cold
 caused by the first removal was severe. The earth, until it gained its
 regular track, would thus alternately vibrate between each side of
 its orbit, with successive changes in its atmosphere, proportional to
 the square of the variation of its distance from the sun. In no place
 is Bacon's genius more conspicuous than in these repeated guesses at
 truth. He would have been a strong Copernican, had not Gilbert defended
 the system.--_Ed._
 
 [145] This is not true except when the projectile acquires greater
 velocity at every successive instant of its course, which is never
 the case except with falling bodies. Bacon appears to have been led
 into the opinion from observing that gunshots pierce many objects
 at a distance from which they rebound when brought within a certain
 proximity of contact. This apparent inconsistency, however, arises from
 the resistance of the parts of the object, which velocity combined with
 force is necessary to overcome.--_Ed._
 
 [146] This passage shows that the pressure of the external atmosphere,
 which forces the water into the egg, was not in Bacon's time
 understood.--_Ed._
 
 [147] We have already alluded, in a note prefixed to the same aphorism
 of the first book, to Newton's error of the absolute lightness of
 bodies. In speaking again of the volatile or spiritual substances
 (Aph. xl. b. ii.) which he supposed with the Platonists and some of the
 schoolmen to enter into the composition of every body, he ascribes to
 them a power of lessening the weight of the material coating in which
 he supposes them inclosed. It would appear from these passages and the
 text that Bacon had no idea of the relative density of bodies, and the
 capability which some have to diminish the specific gravity of the
 heavier substances by the dilation of their parts; or if he had, the
 reveries in which Aristotle indulged in treating of the soul, about the
 appetency of bodies to fly to kindred substances--flame and spirit to
 the sky, and solid opaque substances to the earth, must have vitiated
 his mind.--_Ed._
 
 [148] Roemer, a Danish astronomer, was the first to demonstrate, by
 connecting the irregularities of the eclipses of Jupiter's satellites
 with their distances from the earth, the necessity of time for the
 propagation of light. The idea occurred to Dominic Cassini as well as
 Bacon, but both allowed the discovery to slip out of their hands.--_Ed._
 
 [149] The author in the text confounds inertness, which is a simple
 indifference of bodies to action, with gravity, which is a force acting
 always in proportion to their density. He falls into the same error
 further on.--_Ed._
 
 [150] The experiments of the last two classes of instances are
 considered only in relation to practice, and Bacon does not so much as
 mention their infinitely greater importance in the theoretical part of
 induction. The important law of gravitation in physical astronomy could
 never have been demonstrated but by such observations and experiments
 as assigned accurate geometrical measures to the quantities compared.
 It was necessary to determine with precision the demi-diameter of the
 earth, the velocity of falling bodies at its surface, the distance of
 the moon, and the speed with which she describes her orbit, before the
 relation could be discovered between the force which draws a stone to
 the ground and that which retains the moon in her sphere.
 
 In many cases the result of a number of particular facts, or the
 collective instances rising out of them, can only be discovered by
 geometry, which so far becomes necessary to complete the work of
 induction. For instance, in the case of optics, when light passes from
 one transparent medium to another, it is refracted, and the angle
 which the ray of incidence makes with the superficies which bounds the
 two media determines that which the refracted ray makes with the same
 superficies. Now, all experiment can do for us in this case is, to
 determine for any particular angle of incidence the corresponding angle
 of refraction. But with respect to the general rule which in every
 possible case deduces one of these angles from the other, or expresses
 the constant and invariable relation which subsists between them,
 experiment gives no direct information. Geometry must, consequently,
 be called in, which, when a constant though unknown relation subsists
 between two angles, or two variable qualities of any kind, and when
 an indefinite number of values of those quantities are assigned,
 furnishes infallible means of discovering that unknown relation either
 accurately or by approximation. In this way it has been found, when
 the two media remain the same, the cosines of the above-mentioned
 angles have a constant ratio to each other. Hence, when the relations
 of the simple elements of phenomena are discovered to afford a general
 rule which will apply to any concrete case, the deductive method must
 be applied, and the elementary principles made through its agency to
 account for the laws of their more complex combinations. The reflection
 and refraction of light by the rain falling from a cloud opposite to
 the sun was thought, even before Newton's day, to contain the _form_ of
 the rainbow. This philosopher transformed a probable conjecture into
 a certain fact when he deduced from the known laws of reflection and
 refraction the breadth of the colored arch, the diameter of the circle
 of which it is a part, and the relation of the latter to the place
 of the spectator and the sun. Doubt was at once silenced when there
 came out of his calculus a combination of the same laws of the simple
 elements of optics answering to the phenomena in nature.--_Ed._
 
 [151] As far as this motion results from attraction and repulsion, it
 is only a simple consequence of the last two.--_Ed._
 
 [152] These two cases are now resolved into the property of the
 capillary tubes and present only another feature of the law of
 attraction.--_Ed._
 
 [153] This is one of the most useful practical methods in chemistry at
 the present day.
 
 [154] See Aphorism xxv.
 
 [155] Query?
 
 [156] Observe this approximation to Newton's theory.
 
 [157] Those differences which are generated by the masses and
 respective distances of bodies are only differences of quantity, and
 not specific; consequently those three classes are only one.--_Ed._
 
 [158] See the citing instances, Aphorism xl.
 
 [159] Aristotle's doctrine, that sound takes place when bodies
 strike the air, which the modern science of acoustics has completely
 established, was rejected by Bacon in a treatise upon the same subject:
 "The collision or thrusting of air," he says, "which they will have to
 be the cause of sound, neither denotes the form nor the latent process
 of sound, but is a term of ignorance and of superficial contemplation."
 To get out of the difficulty, he betook himself to his theory of
 spirits, a species of phenomena which he constantly introduces to give
 himself the air of explaining things he could not understand, or would
 not admit upon the hypothesis of his opponents.--_Ed._
 
 [160] The motion of trepidation, as Bacon calls it, was attributed
 by the ancient astronomers to the eight spheres, relative to the
 precession of the equinoxes. Galileo was the first to observe this kind
 of lunar motion.--_Ed._
 
 [161] Part of the air is expanded and escapes, and part is consumed
 by the flame. When condensed, therefore, by the cold application,
 it cannot offer sufficient resistance to the external atmosphere to
 prevent the liquid or flesh from being forced into the glass.
 
 [162] Heat can now be abstracted by a very simple process, till the
 degree of cold be of almost any required intensity.--_Ed._
 
 [163] It is impossible to compare a degree of heat with a degree of
 cold, without the assumption of some arbitrary test, to which the
 degrees are to be referred. In the next sentence Bacon appears to have
 taken the power of animal life to support heat or cold as the test, and
 then the comparison can only be between the degree of heat or of cold
 that will produce death.
 
 The zero must be arbitrary which divides equally a certain degree of
 heat from a certain degree of cold.--_Ed._
 
 [164] It may often be observed on the leaves of the lime and other
 trees.
 
 
 
 
 [Transcriber's Notes:
 
   Punctuation errors were corrected.
   Inconsistent hyphenation was retained.
   "De la Lande" and "La Lande" both appear in text and were retained.
   "Shenier", editor's spelling of "Scheiner", was retained.
   On p. 37, a paragraph break was inserted before "There is a clear
     example ...".
   On p. 44, "the" was changed from "The" (the usual method).
   On p. 85, "that" was changed from "That" (that a species).
   On p. 86, "that" was changed from "That" (that an instrument).
   On p. 178, "borrow" was changed from "brorrow" (to borrow a term
     from the grammarians).
   On p. 204, "sufficiently" was changed from "sufficietly" (but
     sufficiently dense).
   On p. 219, "quantity" was changed from "quanity" (quantity of gold).
   In footnote [5], "psychological" was changed from "pyschological"
     (most other psychological).
   In footnote [23], "that" was changed from "tha" (that we have
     nothing).
   In footnote [33], "72" was changed from "22" (Acad. Prior. ii. 72.).
   In footnote [60], "ix." was changed from "x." (Livy, lib. ix.).
   In footnote [71], "ousia" was changed from "oudia".
   In footnote [86], "necessary" was changed from "necesary" (necessary
     to invent).
   In footnote [87], "liquor" was changed from "liqour" (the liquor
     rose).
   In footnote [161], "the" was changed from "th" (by the flame).]
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Turgut Dincer (This file was produced from
 images generously made available by The Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   OF GARDENS.
   AN ESSAY, BY FRANCIS
   BACON.
 
 
   LONDON
   HACON AND RICKETTS
   CRAVEN ST., STRAND.
 
   MCMII.
 
 
 [Illustration: A Garden with two ladies]
 
 
 [Illustration: Row of flowers and border ornaments with flowers]
 
 
 
 
   OF GARDENS.
   AN ESSAY BY FRANCIS
   LORD BACON.
 
 
 God almighty first planted a garden: and indeed it is the purest of
 human pleasures. It is the greatest refreshment of the spirits of man;
 without which, buildings or palaces are but gross handy-works: and a
 man shall ever see, that when ages grow to civility or elegancy, men
 come to build stately, sooner than to garden finely, as if gardening
 were the greater perfection. I do hold it, in the royal ordering of
 gardens, there ought to be gardens for all the months in the year: in
 which, severally, things of beauty may be then in season. For December
 and January, or the latter part of November, you must take such things
 as are green all winter; holly, ivy, bays, juniper, cypress-trees,
 yew, pine-apple trees, fir trees, rosemary, lavender, periwinkle (the
 white, the purple, and the blue), germander, flags, orange trees,
 lemon trees, and myrtles, if they be stoved, and sweet marjoram, warm
 set. There followeth, for the latter part of January and February, the
 mezereon tree, which then blossoms; crocus vernus, both the yellow and
 the gray; primroses, anemonies, the early tulip, hyacinthus orientalis,
 chamairis, fritellaria. For March there come violets, especially the
 single blue, which are the earliest; the yellow daffodil, the daisy,
 the almond tree in blossom, the peach tree in blossom, the cornelian
 tree in blossom, sweet briar. In April follow the double white violet,
 the wallflower the stock-gilliflower, the cowslip, flower-de-luces,
 and lilies of all natures, rosemary-flowers, the tulip, the double
 piony, the pale daffodil, the French honeysuckle, the cherry tree in
 blossom, the damascene and plum trees in blossom, the white-thorn
 in leaf, the lilach-tree. In May and June come pinks of all sorts,
 especially the blush pink; roses of all kinds, except the musk, which
 comes later; honeysuckles, strawberries, bugloss, columbine, the French
 marygold, flos Africanus, cherry-tree in fruit, ribes, figs in fruit,
 rasps, vine-flowers, lavender in flowers, the sweet satyrian, with
 the white flower; herba muscaria, lilium convalium, the apple tree
 in blossom. In July come gilliflowers of all varieties, musk roses,
 the lime tree in blossom, early pears and plums in fruit, gennitings,
 codlins. In August come plums of all sorts in fruit, pears, apricots,
 berberries, filberds, musk melons, monks-hoods, of all colours. In
 September comes grapes, apples, poppies of all colours, peaches,
 melo-cotones, nectarines, cornelians, wardens, quinces. In October, and
 the beginning of November, come services, medlars, bullaces, roses cut
 or removed to come late, holly oaks, and such-like. These particulars
 are for the climate of London: but my meaning is perceived, that you
 may have 'ver perpetuum,' as the place affords.
 
 [Illustration: Row of flowers]
 
 
 And because the breath of flowers is far sweeter in the air, where it
 comes and goes, like the warbling of music, than in the hand, therefore
 nothing is more fit for that delight, than to know what be the flowers
 and plants that do best perfume the air. Roses, damask and red, are
 fast flowers of their smells; so that you may walk by a whole row of
 them, and find nothing of their sweetness: yea, though it be in a
 morning's dew. Bays likewise yield no smell as they grow; rosemary
 little; nor sweet marjoram. That which above all others yields the
 sweetest smell in the air, is the violet; especially the white double
 violet, which comes twice a year, about the middle of April, and about
 Bartholomew-tide. Next to that is the muskrose; then the strawberry
 leaves dying, with a most excellent cordial smell; then the flower of
 the vines--it is a little dust, like the dust of a bent, which grows
 upon the cluster, in the first coming forth; then sweet-brier; then
 wallflowers, which are very delightful, to be set under a parlour,
 or lower chamber window; then pinks and gilliflowers, especially the
 matted pink and clove-gilli-flower; then the flowers of the lime tree;
 then the honeysuckles, so they be somewhat afar off. Of bean flowers
 I speak not, because they are field flowers; but those which perfume
 the air most delightfully, not passed by as the rest, but being trodden
 upon and crushed, are three; that is, burnet, wild thyme, and water
 mints. Therefore you are to set whole alleys of them, to have the
 pleasure when you walk or tread.
 
 [Illustration: Row of leaves]
 
 
 For gardens, speaking of those which are indeed princelike, as we have
 done of buildings, the contents ought not well to be under thirty
 acres of ground, and to be divided into three parts: a green in the
 entrance; a heath or desert in the going forth; and the main garden in
 the midst; besides alleys on both sides. And I like well, that four
 acres of ground be assigned to the green, six to the heath, four and
 four to either side, and twelve to the main garden. The green hath
 two pleasures: the one, because nothing is more pleasant to the eye
 than green grass kept finely shorn; the other, because it will give
 you a fair alley in the midst; by which you may go in front upon a
 stately hedge, which is to inclose the garden. But because the alley
 will be long, and in great heat of the year or day, you ought not to
 buy the shade in the garden by going in the sun through the green;
 therefore, you are, of either side the green, to plant a covert alley,
 upon carpenter's work, about twelve foot in height, by which you may
 go in shade into the garden. As for the making of knots or figures,
 with divers coloured earths, that they may lie under the windows of
 the house, on that side which the garden stands, they be but toys; you
 may see as good sights, many times, in tarts. The garden is best to be
 square, encompassed on all the four sides with a stately arched hedge:
 the arches to be upon pillars of carpenter's work, of some ten foot
 high, and six foot broad; and the spaces between of the same dimension
 with the breadth of the arch. Over the arches let there be an entire
 hedge, of some four foot high, framed also upon carpenter's work; and
 upon the upper hedge, over every arch, a little turret, with a belly
 enough to receive a cage of birds; and over every space between the
 arches, some other little figure, with broad plates of round coloured
 glass, gilt, for the sun to play upon. But this hedge I intend to be
 raised upon a bank, not steep, but gently slope, of some six foot, set
 all with flowers. Also I understand, that this square of the garden
 should not be the whole breadth of the ground, but to leave on either
 side ground enough for diversity of side alleys; into which the two
 covert alleys of the green may deliver you; but there must be no
 alleys with hedges at either end of this great enclosure; not at the
 hither end, for letting your prospect upon the fair hedge from the
 green; nor at the further end, for letting your prospect from the
 hedge, through the arches, upon the heath.
 
 [Illustration: Row of flowers]
 
 
 For the ordering of the ground within the great hedge, I leave it to
 variety of device; advising nevertheless, that whatsoever form you cast
 it into, first it be not too busy, or full of work; wherein I, for my
 part, do not like images cut out in juniper or other garden stuff;
 they be for children. Little low hedges round, like welts, with some
 pretty pyramids, I like well; and in some places, fair columns upon
 frames of carpenter's work. I would also have the alleys spacious and
 fair. You may have closer alleys upon the side grounds, but none in
 the main garden. I wish also, in the very middle, a fair mount, with
 three ascents and alleys, enough for four to walk a-breast; which I
 would have to be perfect circles, without any bulwarks or embossments;
 and the whole amount to be thirty foot high; and some fine banqueting
 house, with some chimneys neatly cast, and without too much glass.
 
 [Illustration: Row of leaves]
 
 
 For fountains, they are a great beauty and refreshment; but pools mar
 all, and make the garden unwholesome, and full of flies and frogs.
 Fountains I intend to be of two natures: the one that sprinkleth or
 spouteth water; the other a fair receipt of water, of some thirty or
 forty foot square, but without fish, or slime, or mud. For the first,
 the ornaments of images gilt, or of marble, which are in use, do well:
 but the main matter is so to convey the water, as it never stay either
 in the bowls, or in the cistern; that the water be never by rest
 discoloured, green or red, or the like; or gather any mossiness or
 putrefaction. Besides that, it is to be cleansed every day by the hand.
 Also some steps up to it, and some fine pavement about it doth well.
 As for the other kind of fountain, which we may call a bathing pool,
 it may admit much curiosity and beauty, wherewith we will not trouble
 ourselves; as, that the bottom be finely paved, and with images; the
 sides likewise: and withal embellished with coloured glass, and such
 things of lustre; encompassed also with fine rails of low statues. But
 the main point is the same which we mentioned in the former kind of
 fountain; which is, that the water be in perpetual motion, fed by a
 water higher than the pool, and delivered into it by fair spouts, and
 then discharged away under ground by some equality of bores, that it
 stay little. And for fine devices of arching water without spilling,
 and making it rise in several forms, of feathers, drinking glasses,
 canopies, and the like, they be pretty things to look on, but nothing
 to health and sweetness.
 
 [Illustration: Row of flowers]
 
 
 For the health, which was the third part of our plot, I wish it to be
 framed as much as may be to a natural wildness. Trees I would have none
 in it, but some thickets made only of sweet-brier and honeysuckle, and
 some wild vine amongst; and the ground set with violets, strawberries,
 and primroses. For these are sweet, and prosper in the shade. And
 these to be in the heath here & there, not in any order. I like
 also little heaps, in the nature of mole-hills, such as are in wild
 heaths, to be set, some with wild thyme, some with pinks, some with
 germander, that gives a good flower to the eye, some with periwinkle,
 some with violets, some with strawberries, some with cowslips, some
 with daisies, some with red roses, some with lilium convallium, some
 with sweet-williams red, some with bears-foot, and the like low
 flowers, being withal sweet and sightly. Part of which heaps to be
 with standards of little bushes, pricked upon their top, and part
 without. The standards to be roses, juniper, holly, berberries, but
 here and there, because of the smell of their blossom, red currants,
 gooseberries, rosemary, bays, sweet-brier, and such-like. But these
 standards to be kept with cutting, that they may not grow out of course.
 
 [Illustration: Row of flowers]
 
 
 For the side grounds, you are to fill them with variety of alleys,
 private, to give a full shade, some of them, wheresoever the sun be.
 You are to frame some of them likewise for shelter, that when the wind
 blows sharp, you may walk as in a gallery. And those alleys must be
 likewise hedged at both ends, to keep out the wind; and these closer
 alleys must be ever finely gravelled, and no grass, because of going
 wet. In many of these alleys likewise, you are to set fruit trees of
 all sorts; as well upon the walls as in ranges. And this would be
 generally observed, that the borders wherein you plant your fruit trees
 be fair and large, and low, and not steep; and set with fine flowers,
 but thin and sparingly, lest they deceive the trees. At the end of both
 the side grounds, I would have a mount of some pretty height, leaving
 the wall of the inclosure breast high, to look abroad into the fields.
 
 [Illustration: Row of leaves]
 
 
 For the main garden, I do not deny but there should be some fair
 alleys, ranged on both sides, with fruit trees, and some pretty tufts
 of fruit trees, and arbours with seats, set in some decent order; but
 these to be by no means set too thick, but to leave the main garden
 so as it be not close, but the air open and free. For as for shade,
 I would have you rest upon the alleys of the side grounds, there to
 walk, if you be disposed, in the heat of the year or day; but to
 make account, that the main garden is for the more temperate parts
 of the year; and in the heat of summer, for the morning and the evening,
 or overcast days.
 
 [Illustration: Flock of birds]
 
 
 For aviaries, I like them not, except they be of that largeness, as
 they may be turfed, and have living plants and bushes set in them;
 that the birds may have more scope, and natural nestling, and that no
 foulness appear in the floor of the aviary.
 
 [Illustration: Row of leaves]
 
 
 So I have made a platform of a princely garden, partly by precept,
 partly by drawing; not a model, but some general lines of it; and in
 this I have spared for no cost. But it is nothing for great princes,
 that for the most part, taking advice with workmen, with no less cost
 set their things together; and sometimes add statues, and such things,
 for state and magnificence, but nothing to the true pleasure of a
 garden.
 
 
 THE END.
 
 
   THE FRONTISPIECE has
   BEEN DESIGNED AND
   ENGRAVED BY
   LUCIEN PISSARRO.
 
   THE DOUBLE BORDER
   AND INITIAL LETTERS
   DESIGNED BY L.
   PISSARRO AND ENGRAVED BY
   ESTHER PISSARRO.
 
 [Illustration: PISSARO, E.E.T.L. LONDON N. ERAGNY PRESS]
 
   THIS EDITION IS
   STRICTLY LIMITED
   TO 226 COPIES OF
   WHICH 200 ARE
   FOR SALE.
 
 [Illustration: Bouquet of flowers]
 
 
 
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the 1893 Cassell & Company edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
                        CASSELLS NATIONAL LIBRARY.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
 
 
 
 
                                    THE
                                ADVANCEMENT
                                     OF
                                 LEARNING.
 
 
                                     BY
                               FRANCIS BACON.
 
                       [Picture: Decorative graphic]
 
                        CASSELL & COMPANY, Limited:
                       _LONDON_, _PARIS & MELBOURNE_.
                                   1893.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 THE TVVOO Bookes of Francis Bacon.  Of the proficience and aduancement
 of Learning, divine and humane.  To the King.  At London.  Printed for
 Henrie Tomes, and are to be sould at his shop at Graies Inne Gate in
 Holborne. 1605.   That was the original title-page of the book now in
 the readers handa living book that led the way to a new world of
 thought.  It was the book in which Bacon, early in the reign of James the
 First, prepared the way for a full setting forth of his New Organon, or
 instrument of knowledge.
 
 The Organon of Aristotle was a set of treatises in which Aristotle had
 written the doctrine of propositions.  Study of these treatises was a
 chief occupation of young men when they passed from school to college,
 and proceeded from Grammar to Logic, the second of the Seven Sciences.
 Francis Bacon as a youth of sixteen, at Trinity College, Cambridge, felt
 the unfruitfulness of this method of search after truth.  He was the son
 of Sir Nicholas Bacon, Queen Elizabeths Lord Keeper, and was born at
 York House, in the Strand, on the 22nd of January, 1561.  His mother was
 the Lord Keepers second wife, one of two sisters, of whom the other
 married Sir William Cecil, afterwards Lord Burleigh.  Sir Nicholas Bacon
 had six children by his former marriage, and by his second wife two sons,
 Antony and Francis, of whom Antony was about two years the elder.  The
 family home was at York Place, and at Gorhambury, near St. Albans, from
 which town, in its ancient and its modern style, Bacon afterwards took
 his titles of Verulam and St. Albans.
 
 Antony and Francis Bacon went together to Trinity College, Cambridge,
 when Antony was fourteen years old and Francis twelve.  Francis remained
 at Cambridge only until his sixteenth year; and Dr. Rawley, his chaplain
 in after-years, reports of him that whilst he was commorant in the
 University, about sixteen years of age (as his lordship hath been pleased
 to impart unto myself), he first fell into dislike of the philosophy of
 Aristotle; not for the worthlessness of the author, to whom he would
 ascribe all high attributes, but for the unfruitfulness of the way, being
 a philosophy (as his lordship used to say) only strong for disputatious
 and contentions, but barren of the production of works for the benefit of
 the life of man; in which mind he continued to his dying day.  Bacon was
 sent as a youth of sixteen to Paris with the ambassador Sir Amyas Paulet,
 to begin his training for the public service; but his fathers death, in
 February, 1579, before he had completed the provision he was making for
 his youngest children, obliged him to return to London, and, at the age
 of eighteen, to settle down at Grays Inn to the study of law as a
 profession.  He was admitted to the outer bar in June, 1582, and about
 that time, at the age of twenty-one, wrote a sketch of his conception of
 a New Organon that should lead man to more fruitful knowledge, in a
 little Latin tract, which he called Temporis Partus Maximus (The
 Greatest Birth of Time).
 
 In November, 1584, Bacon took his seat in the House of Commons as member
 for Melcombe Regis, in Dorsetshire.  In October, 1586, he sat for
 Taunton.  He was member afterwards for Liverpool; and he was one of those
 who petitioned for the speedy execution of Mary Queen of Scots.  In
 October, 1589, he obtained the reversion of the office of Clerk of the
 Council in the Star Chamber, which was worth 1,600 or 2,000 a year; but
 for the succession to this office he had to wait until 1608.  It had not
 yet fallen to him when he wrote his Two Books of the Advancement of
 Learning.  In the Parliament that met in February, 1593, Bacon sat as
 member for Middlesex.  He raised difficulties of procedure in the way of
 the grant of a treble subsidy, by just objection to the joining of the
 Lords with the Commons in a money grant, and a desire to extend the time
 allowed for payment from three years to six; it was, in fact, extended to
 four years.  The Queen was offended.  Francis Bacon and his brother
 Antony had attached themselves to the young Earl of Essex, who was their
 friend and patron.  The office of Attorney-General became vacant.  Essex
 asked the Queen to appoint Francis Bacon.  The Queen gave the office to
 Sir Edward Coke, who was already Solicitor-General, and by nine years
 Bacons senior.  The office of Solicitor-General thus became vacant, and
 that was sought for Francis Bacon.  The Queen, after delay and
 hesitation, gave it, in November, 1595, to Serjeant Fleming.  The Earl of
 Essex consoled his friend by giving him a piece of landTwickenham
 Parkwhich Bacon afterwards sold for 1,800equal, say, to 12,000 in
 present buying power.  In 1597 Bacon was returned to Parliament as member
 for Ipswich, and in that year he was hoping to marry the rich widow of
 Sir William Hatton, Essex helping; but the lady married, in the next
 year, Sir Edward Coke.  It was in 1597 that Bacon published the First
 Edition of his Essays.  That was a little book containing only ten essays
 in English, with twelve Meditationes Sacr, which were essays in Latin
 on religious subjects.  From 1597 onward to the end of his life, Bacons
 Essays were subject to continuous addition and revision.  The authors
 Second Edition, in which the number of the Essays was increased from ten
 to thirty-eight, did not appear until November or December, 1612, seven
 years later than these two books on the Advancement of Learning; and
 the final edition of the Essays, in which their number was increased from
 thirty-eight to fifty-eight, appeared only in 1625; and Bacon died on the
 9th of April, 1626.  The edition of the Essays published in 1597, under
 Elizabeth, marked only the beginning of a course of thought that
 afterwards flowed in one stream with his teachings in philosophy.
 
 In February, 1601, there was the rebellion of Essex.  Francis Bacon had
 separated himself from his patron after giving him advice that was
 disregarded.  Bacon, now Queens Counsel, not only appeared against his
 old friend, but with excess of zeal, by which, perhaps, he hoped to win
 back the Queens favour, he twice obtruded violent attacks upon Essex
 when he was not called upon to speak.  On the 25th of February, 1601,
 Essex was beheaded.  The genius of Bacon was next employed to justify
 that act by A Declaration of the Practices and Treasons attempted and
 committed by Robert late Earle of Essex and his Complices.  But James of
 Scotland, on whose behalf Essex had intervened, came to the throne by the
 death of Elizabeth on the 24th of March, 1603.  Bacon was among the crowd
 of men who were made knights by James I., and he had to justify himself
 under the new order of things by writing Sir Francis Bacon his Apologie
 in certain Imputations concerning the late Earle of Essex.  He was
 returned to the first Parliament of James I. by Ipswich and St. Albans,
 and he was confirmed in his office of Kings Counsel in August, 1604; but
 he was not appointed to the office of Solicitor-General when it became
 vacant in that year.
 
 That was the position of Francis Bacon in 1605, when he published this
 work, where in his First Book he pointed out the discredits of learning
 from human defects of the learned, and emptiness of many of the studies
 chosen, or the way of dealing with them.  This came, he said, especially
 by the mistaking or misplacing of the last or furthest end of knowledge,
 as if there were sought in it a couch whereupon to rest a searching and
 restless spirit; or a terrace for a wandering and variable mind to walk
 up and down with a fair prospect; or a tower of state for a proud mind to
 raise itself upon; or a fort or commanding ground for strife and
 contention; or a shop for profit or sale; and not a rich storehouse for
 the glory of the Creator and the relief of mans estate.  The rest of
 the First Book was given to an argument upon the Dignity of Learning; and
 the Second Book, on the Advancement of Learning, is, as Bacon himself
 described it, a general and faithful perambulation of learning, with an
 inquiry what parts thereof lie fresh and waste, and not improved and
 converted by the industry of man; to the end that such a plot made and
 recorded to memory may both minister light to any public designation and
 also serve to excite voluntary endeavours.  Bacon makes, by a sort of
 exhaustive analysis, a ground-plan of all subjects of study, as an
 intellectual map, helping the right inquirer in his search for the right
 path.  The right path is that by which he has the best chance of adding
 to the stock of knowledge in the world something worth labouring for; and
 the true worth is in labour for the glory of the Creator and the relief
 of mans estate.
 
                                                                      H. M.
 
 
 
 
 THE
 FIRST BOOK OF FRANCIS BACON;
 OF THE PROFICIENCE AND
 ADVANCEMENT OF LEARNING,
 DIVINE AND HUMAN.
 
 
                               _To the King_.
 
 THERE were under the law, excellent King, both daily sacrifices and
 freewill offerings; the one proceeding upon ordinary observance, the
 other upon a devout cheerfulness: in like manner there belongeth to kings
 from their servants both tribute of duty and presents of affection.  In
 the former of these I hope I shall not live to be wanting, according to
 my most humble duty and the good pleasure of your Majestys employments:
 for the latter, I thought it more respective to make choice of some
 oblation which might rather refer to the propriety and excellency of your
 individual person, than to the business of your crown and state.
 
 Wherefore, representing your Majesty many times unto my mind, and
 beholding you not with the inquisitive eye of presumption, to discover
 that which the Scripture telleth me is inscrutable, but with the
 observant eye of duty and admiration, leaving aside the other parts of
 your virtue and fortune, I have been touchedyea, and possessedwith an
 extreme wonder at those your virtues and faculties, which the
 philosophers call intellectual; the largeness of your capacity, the
 faithfulness of your memory, the swiftness of your apprehension, the
 penetration of your judgment, and the facility and order of your
 elocution: and I have often thought that of all the persons living that I
 have known, your Majesty were the best instance to make a man of Platos
 opinion, that all knowledge is but remembrance, and that the mind of man
 by Nature knoweth all things, and hath but her own native and original
 notions (which by the strangeness and darkness of this tabernacle of the
 body are sequestered) again revived and restored: such a light of Nature
 I have observed in your Majesty, and such a readiness to take flame and
 blaze from the least occasion presented, or the least spark of anothers
 knowledge delivered.  And as the Scripture saith of the wisest king,
 That his heart was as the sands of the sea; which, though it be one of
 the largest bodies, yet it consisteth of the smallest and finest
 portions; so hath God given your Majesty a composition of understanding
 admirable, being able to compass and comprehend the greatest matters, and
 nevertheless to touch and apprehend the least; whereas it should seem an
 impossibility in Nature for the same instrument to make itself fit for
 great and small works.  And for your gift of speech, I call to mind what
 Cornelius Tacitus saith of Augustus Csar: _Augusto profluens_, _et qu
 principem deceret_, _eloquentia fuit_.  For if we note it well, speech
 that is uttered with labour and difficulty, or speech that savoureth of
 the affectation of art and precepts, or speech that is framed after the
 imitation of some pattern of eloquence, though never so excellent; all
 this hath somewhat servile, and holding of the subject.  But your
 Majestys manner of speech is, indeed, prince-like, flowing as from a
 fountain, and yet streaming and branching itself into Natures order,
 full of facility and felicity, imitating none, and inimitable by any.
 And as in your civil estate there appeareth to be an emulation and
 contention of your Majestys virtue with your fortune; a virtuous
 disposition with a fortunate regiment; a virtuous expectation (when time
 was) of your greater fortune, with a prosperous possession thereof in the
 due time; a virtuous observation of the laws of marriage, with most
 blessed and happy fruit of marriage; a virtuous and most Christian desire
 of peace, with a fortunate inclination in your neighbour princes
 thereunto: so likewise in these intellectual matters there seemeth to be
 no less contention between the excellency of your Majestys gifts of
 Nature and the universality and perfection of your learning.  For I am
 well assured that this which I shall say is no amplification at all, but
 a positive and measured truth; which is, that there hath not been since
 Christs time any king or temporal monarch which hath been so learned in
 all literature and erudition, divine and human.  For let a man seriously
 and diligently revolve and peruse the succession of the Emperors of Rome,
 of which Csar the Dictator (who lived some years before Christ) and
 Marcus Antoninus were the best learned, and so descend to the Emperors of
 Grcia, or of the West, and then to the lines of France, Spain, England,
 Scotland, and the rest, and he shall find this judgment is truly made.
 For it seemeth much in a king if, by the compendious extractions of other
 mens wits and labours, he can take hold of any superficial ornaments and
 shows of learning, or if he countenance and prefer learning and learned
 men; but to drink, indeed, of the true fountains of learningnay, to have
 such a fountain of learning in himself, in a king, and in a king bornis
 almost a miracle.  And the more, because there is met in your Majesty a
 rare conjunction, as well of divine and sacred literature as of profane
 and human; so as your Majesty standeth invested of that triplicity, which
 in great veneration was ascribed to the ancient Hermes: the power and
 fortune of a king, the knowledge and illumination of a priest, and the
 learning and universality of a philosopher.  This propriety inherent and
 individual attribute in your Majesty deserveth to be expressed not only
 in the fame and admiration of the present time, nor in the history or
 tradition of the ages succeeding, but also in some solid work, fixed
 memorial, and immortal monument, bearing a character or signature both of
 the power of a king and the difference and perfection of such a king.
 
 Therefore I did conclude with myself that I could not make unto your
 Majesty a better oblation than of some treatise tending to that end,
 whereof the sum will consist of these two parts: the former concerning
 the excellency of learning and knowledge, and the excellency of the merit
 and true glory in the augmentation and propagation thereof; the latter,
 what the particular acts and works are which have been embraced and
 undertaken for the advancement of learning; and again, what defects and
 undervalues I find in such particular acts: to the end that though I
 cannot positively or affirmatively advise your Majesty, or propound unto
 you framed particulars, yet I may excite your princely cogitations to
 visit the excellent treasure of your own mind, and thence to extract
 particulars for this purpose agreeable to your magnanimity and wisdom.
 
 I. (1) In the entrance to the former of theseto clear the way and, as it
 were, to make silence, to have the true testimonies concerning the
 dignity of learning to be better heard, without the interruption of tacit
 objectionsI think good to deliver it from the discredits and disgraces
 which it hath received, all from ignorance, but ignorance severally
 disguised; appearing sometimes in the zeal and jealousy of divines,
 sometimes in the severity and arrogancy of politics, and sometimes in the
 errors and imperfections of learned men themselves.
 
 (2) I hear the former sort say that knowledge is of those things which
 are to be accepted of with great limitation and caution; that the
 aspiring to overmuch knowledge was the original temptation and sin
 whereupon ensued the fall of man; that knowledge hath in it somewhat of
 the serpent, and, therefore, where it entereth into a man it makes him
 swell; _Scientia inflat_; that Solomon gives a censure, That there is no
 end of making books, and that much reading is weariness of the flesh;
 and again in another place, That in spacious knowledge there is much
 contristation, and that he that increaseth knowledge increaseth anxiety;
 that Saint Paul gives a caveat, That we be not spoiled through vain
 philosophy; that experience demonstrates how learned men have been
 arch-heretics, how learned times have been inclined to atheism, and how
 the contemplation of second causes doth derogate from our dependence upon
 God, who is the first cause.
 
 (3) To discover, then, the ignorance and error of this opinion, and the
 misunderstanding in the grounds thereof, it may well appear these men do
 not observe or consider that it was not the pure knowledge of Nature and
 universality, a knowledge by the light whereof man did give names unto
 other creatures in Paradise as they were brought before him according
 unto their proprieties, which gave the occasion to the fall; but it was
 the proud knowledge of good and evil, with an intent in man to give law
 unto himself, and to depend no more upon Gods commandments, which was
 the form of the temptation.  Neither is it any quantity of knowledge, how
 great soever, that can make the mind of man to swell; for nothing can
 fill, much less extend the soul of man, but God and the contemplation of
 God; and, therefore, Solomon, speaking of the two principal senses of
 inquisition, the eye and the ear, affirmeth that the eye is never
 satisfied with seeing, nor the ear with hearing; and if there be no
 fulness, then is the continent greater than the content: so of knowledge
 itself and the mind of man, whereto the senses are but reporters, he
 defineth likewise in these words, placed after that calendar or
 ephemerides which he maketh of the diversities of times and seasons for
 all actions and purposes, and concludeth thus: God hath made all things
 beautiful, or decent, in the true return of their seasons.  Also He hath
 placed the world in mans heart, yet cannot man find out the work which
 God worketh from the beginning to the enddeclaring not obscurely that
 God hath framed the mind of man as a mirror or glass, capable of the
 image of the universal world, and joyful to receive the impression
 thereof, as the eye joyeth to receive light; and not only delighted in
 beholding the variety of things and vicissitude of times, but raised also
 to find out and discern the ordinances and decrees which throughout all
 those changes are infallibly observed.  And although he doth insinuate
 that the supreme or summary law of Nature (which he calleth the work
 which God worketh from the beginning to the end) is not possible to be
 found out by man, yet that doth not derogate from the capacity of the
 mind; but may be referred to the impediments, as of shortness of life,
 ill conjunction of labours, ill tradition of knowledge over from hand to
 hand, and many other inconveniences, whereunto the condition of man is
 subject.  For that nothing parcel of the world is denied to mans inquiry
 and invention, he doth in another place rule over, when he saith, The
 spirit of man is as the lamp of God, wherewith He searcheth the
 inwardness of all secrets.  If, then, such be the capacity and receipt
 of the mind of man, it is manifest that there is no danger at all in the
 proportion or quantity of knowledge, how large soever, lest it should
 make it swell or out-compass itself; no, but it is merely the quality of
 knowledge, which, be it in quantity more or less, if it be taken without
 the true corrective thereof, hath in it some nature of venom or
 malignity, and some effects of that venom, which is ventosity or
 swelling.  This corrective spice, the mixture whereof maketh knowledge so
 sovereign, is charity, which the Apostle immediately addeth to the former
 clause; for so he saith, Knowledge bloweth up, but charity buildeth up;
 not unlike unto that which he deilvereth in another place: If I spake,
 saith he, with the tongues of men and angels, and had not charity, it
 were but as a tinkling cymbal.  Not but that it is an excellent thing to
 speak with the tongues of men and angels, but because, if it be severed
 from charity, and not referred to the good of men and mankind, it hath
 rather a sounding and unworthy glory than a meriting and substantial
 virtue.  And as for that censure of Solomon concerning the excess of
 writing and reading books, and the anxiety of spirit which redoundeth
 from knowledge, and that admonition of St. Paul, That we be not seduced
 by vain philosophy, let those places be rightly understood; and they do,
 indeed, excellently set forth the true bounds and limitations whereby
 human knowledge is confined and circumscribed, and yet without any such
 contracting or coarctation, but that it may comprehend all the universal
 nature of things; for these limitations are three: the first, That we do
 not so place our felicity in knowledge, as we forget our mortality; the
 second, That we make application of our knowledge, to give ourselves
 repose and contentment, and not distaste or repining; the third, That
 we do not presume by the contemplation of Nature to attain to the
 mysteries of God.  For as touching the first of these, Solomon doth
 excellently expound himself in another place of the same book, where he
 saith: I saw well that knowledge recedeth as far from ignorance as light
 doth from darkness; and that the wise mans eyes keep watch in his head,
 whereas this fool roundeth about in darkness: but withal I learned that
 the same mortality involveth them both.  And for the second, certain it
 is there is no vexation or anxiety of mind which resulteth from knowledge
 otherwise than merely by accident; for all knowledge and wonder (which is
 the seed of knowledge) is an impression of pleasure in itself; but when
 men fall to framing conclusions out of their knowledge, applying it to
 their particular, and ministering to themselves thereby weak fears or
 vast desires, there groweth that carefulness and trouble of mind which is
 spoken of; for then knowledge is no more _Lumen siccum_, whereof
 Heraclitus the profound said, _Lumen siccum optima anima_; but it
 becometh _Lumen madidum_, or _maceratum_, being steeped and infused in
 the humours of the affections.  And as for the third point, it deserveth
 to be a little stood upon, and not to be lightly passed over; for if any
 man shall think by view and inquiry into these sensible and material
 things to attain that light, whereby he may reveal unto himself the
 nature or will of God, then, indeed, is he spoiled by vain philosophy;
 for the contemplation of Gods creatures and works produceth (having
 regard to the works and creatures themselves) knowledge, but having
 regard to God no perfect knowledge, but wonder, which is broken
 knowledge.  And, therefore, it was most aptly said by one of Platos
 school, That the sense of man carrieth a resemblance with the sun, which
 (as we see) openeth and revealeth all the terrestrial globe; but then,
 again, it obscureth and concealeth the stars and celestial globe: so doth
 the sense discover natural things, but it darkeneth and shutteth up
 divine.  And hence it is true that it hath proceeded, that divers great
 learned men have been heretical, whilst they have sought to fly up to the
 secrets of the Deity by this waxen wings of the senses.  And as for the
 conceit that too much knowledge should incline a man to atheism, and that
 the ignorance of second causes should make a more devout dependence upon
 God, which is the first cause; first, it is good to ask the question
 which Job asked of his friends: Will you lie for God, as one man will
 lie for another, to gratify him?  For certain it is that God worketh
 nothing in Nature but by second causes; and if they would have it
 otherwise believed, it is mere imposture, as it were in favour towards
 God, and nothing else but to offer to the Author of truth the unclean
 sacrifice of a lie.  But further, it is an assured truth, and a
 conclusion of experience, that a little or superficial knowledge of
 philosophy may incline the mind of men to atheism, but a further
 proceeding therein doth bring the mind back again to religion.  For in
 the entrance of philosophy, when the second causes, which are next unto
 the senses, do offer themselves to the mind of man, if it dwell and stay
 there it may induce some oblivion of the highest cause; but when a man
 passeth on further and seeth the dependence of causes and the works of
 Providence; then, according to the allegory of the poets, he will easily
 believe that the highest link of Natures chain must needs he tied to the
 foot of Jupiters chair.  To conclude, therefore, let no man upon a weak
 conceit of sobriety or an ill-applied moderation think or maintain that a
 man can search too far, or be too well studied in the book of Gods word,
 or in the book of Gods works, divinity or philosophy; but rather let men
 endeavour an endless progress or proficience in both; only let men beware
 that they apply both to charity, and not to swelling; to use, and not to
 ostentation; and again, that they do not unwisely mingle or confound
 these learnings together.
 
 II. (1) And as for the disgraces which learning receiveth from politics,
 they be of this nature: that learning doth soften mens minds, and makes
 them more unapt for the honour and exercise of arms; that it doth mar and
 pervert mens dispositions for matter of government and policy, in making
 them too curious and irresolute by variety of reading, or too peremptory
 or positive by strictness of rules and axioms, or too immoderate and
 overweening by reason of the greatness of examples, or too incompatible
 and differing from the times by reason of the dissimilitude of examples;
 or at least, that it doth divert mens travails from action and business,
 and bringeth them to a love of leisure and privateness; and that it doth
 bring into states a relaxation of discipline, whilst every man is more
 ready to argue than to obey and execute.  Out of this conceit Cato,
 surnamed the Censor, one of the wisest men indeed that ever lived, when
 Carneades the philosopher came in embassage to Rome, and that the young
 men of Rome began to flock about him, being allured with the sweetness
 and majesty of his eloquence and learning, gave counsel in open senate
 that they should give him his despatch with all speed, lest he should
 infect and enchant the minds and affections of the youth, and at unawares
 bring in an alteration of the manners and customs of the state.  Out of
 the same conceit or humour did Virgil, turning his pen to the advantage
 of his country and the disadvantage of his own profession, make a kind of
 separation between policy and government, and between arts and sciences,
 in the verses so much renowned, attributing and challenging the one to
 the Romans, and leaving and yielding the other to the Grecians: _Tu
 regere imperio popules_, _Romane_, _memento_, _H tibi erunt artes_, &c.
 So likewise we see that Anytus, the accuser of Socrates, laid it as an
 article of charge and accusation against him, that he did, with the
 variety and power of his discourses and disputatious, withdraw young men
 from due reverence to the laws and customs of their country, and that he
 did profess a dangerous and pernicious science, which was to make the
 worse matter seem the better, and to suppress truth by force of eloquence
 and speech.
 
 (2) But these and the like imputations have rather a countenance of
 gravity than any ground of justice: for experience doth warrant that,
 both in persons and in times, there hath been a meeting and concurrence
 in learning and arms, flourishing and excelling in the same men and the
 same ages.  For as for men, there cannot be a better nor the hike
 instance as of that pair, Alexander the Great and Julius Csar, the
 Dictator; whereof the one was Aristotles scholar in philosophy, and the
 other was Ciceros rival in eloquence; or if any man had rather call for
 scholars that were great generals, than generals that were great
 scholars, let him take Epaminondas the Theban, or Xenophon the Athenian;
 whereof the one was the first that abated the power of Sparta, and the
 other was the first that made way to the overthrow of the monarchy of
 Persia.  And this concurrence is yet more visible in times than in
 persons, by how much an age is greater object than a man.  For both in
 Egypt, Assyria, Persia, Grcia, and Rome, the same times that are most
 renowned for arms are, likewise, most admired for learning, so that the
 greatest authors and philosophers, and the greatest captains and
 governors, have lived in the same ages.  Neither can it otherwise he: for
 as in man the ripeness of strength of the body and mind cometh much about
 an age, save that the strength of the body cometh somewhat the more
 early, so in states, arms and learning, whereof the one correspondeth to
 the body, the other to the soul of man, have a concurrence or near
 sequence in times.
 
 (3) And for matter of policy and government, that learning, should rather
 hurt, than enable thereunto, is a thing very improbable; we see it is
 accounted an error to commit a natural body to empiric physicians, which
 commonly have a few pleasing receipts whereupon they are confident and
 adventurous, but know neither the causes of diseases, nor the complexions
 of patients, nor peril of accidents, nor the true method of cures; we see
 it is a like error to rely upon advocates or lawyers which are only men
 of practice, and not grounded in their books, who are many times easily
 surprised when matter falleth out besides their experience, to the
 prejudice of the causes they handle: so by like reason it cannot be but a
 matter of doubtful consequence if states be managed by empiric statesmen,
 not well mingled with men grounded in learning.  But contrariwise, it is
 almost without instance contradictory that ever any government was
 disastrous that was in the hands of learned governors.  For howsoever it
 hath been ordinary with politic men to extenuate and disable learned men
 by the names of _pedantes_; yet in the records of time it appeareth in
 many particulars that the governments of princes in minority
 (notwithstanding the infinite disadvantage of that kind of state)have
 nevertheless excelled the government of princes of mature age, even for
 that reason which they seek to traduce, which is that by that occasion
 the state hath been in the hands of _pedantes_: for so was the state of
 Rome for the first five years, which are so much magnified, during the
 minority of Nero, in the hands of Seneca, a _pedenti_; so it was again,
 for ten years space or more, during the minority of Gordianus the
 younger, with great applause and contentation in the hands of Misitheus,
 a _pedanti_: so was it before that, in the minority of Alexander Severus,
 in like happiness, in hands not much unlike, by reason of the rule of the
 women, who were aided by the teachers and preceptors.  Nay, let a man
 look into the government of the Bishops of Rome, as by name, into the
 government of Pius Quintus and Sextus Quintus in our times, who were both
 at their entrance esteemed but as pedantical friars, and he shall find
 that such Popes do greater things, and proceed upon truer principles of
 state, than those which have ascended to the papacy from an education and
 breeding in affairs of state and courts of princes; for although men bred
 in learning are perhaps to seek in points of convenience and
 accommodating for the present, which the Italians call _ragioni di
 stato_, whereof the same Pius Quintus could not hear spoken with
 patience, terming them inventions against religion and the moral virtues;
 yet on the other side, to recompense that, they are perfect in those same
 plain grounds of religion, justice, honour, and moral virtue, which if
 they be well and watchfully pursued, there will be seldom use of those
 other, no more than of physic in a sound or well-dieted body.  Neither
 can the experience of one mans life furnish examples and precedents for
 the event of one mans life.  For as it happeneth sometimes that the
 grandchild, or other descendant, resembleth the ancestor more than the
 son; so many times occurrences of present times may sort better with
 ancient examples than with those of the later or immediate times; and
 lastly, the wit of one man can no more countervail learning than one
 mans means can hold way with a common purse.
 
 (4) And as for those particular seducements or indispositions of the mind
 for policy and government, which learning is pretended to insinuate; if
 it be granted that any such thing be, it must be remembered withal that
 learning ministereth in every of them greater strength of medicine or
 remedy than it offereth cause of indisposition or infirmity.  For if by a
 secret operation it make men perplexed and irresolute, on the other side
 by plain precept it teacheth them when and upon what ground to resolve;
 yea, and how to carry things in suspense, without prejudice, till they
 resolve.  If it make men positive and regular, it teacheth them what
 things are in their nature demonstrative, and what are conjectural, and
 as well the use of distinctions and exceptions, as the latitude of
 principles and rules.  If it mislead by disproportion or dissimilitude of
 examples, it teacheth men the force of circumstances, the errors of
 comparisons, and all the cautions of application; so that in all these it
 doth rectify more effectually than it can pervert.  And these medicines
 it conveyeth into mens minds much more forcibly by the quickness and
 penetration of examples.  For let a man look into the errors of Clement
 VII., so lively described by Guicciardini, who served under him, or into
 the errors of Cicero, painted out by his own pencil in his Epistles to
 Atticus, and he will fly apace from being irresolute.  Let him look into
 the errors of Phocion, and he will beware how he be obstinate or
 inflexible.  Let him but read the fable of Ixion, and it will hold him
 from being vaporous or imaginative.  Let him look into the errors of Cato
 II., and he will never be one of the Antipodes, to tread opposite to the
 present world.
 
 (5) And for the conceit that learning should dispose men to leisure and
 privateness, and make men slothful: it were a strange thing if that which
 accustometh the mind to a perpetual motion and agitation should induce
 slothfulness, whereas, contrariwise, it may be truly affirmed that no
 kind of men love business for itself but those that are learned; for
 other persons love it for profit, as a hireling that loves the work for
 the wages; or for honour, as because it beareth them up in the eyes of
 men, and refresheth their reputation, which otherwise would wear; or
 because it putteth them in mind of their fortune, and giveth them
 occasion to pleasure and displeasure; or because it exerciseth some
 faculty wherein they take pride, and so entertaineth them in good-humour
 and pleasing conceits towards themselves; or because it advanceth any
 other their ends.  So that as it is said of untrue valours, that some
 mens valours are in the eyes of them that look on, so such mens
 industries are in the eyes of others, or, at least, in regard of their
 own designments; only learned men love business as an action according to
 nature, as agreeable to health of mind as exercise is to health of body,
 taking pleasure in the action itself, and not in the purchase, so that of
 all men they are the most indefatigable, if it be towards any business
 which can hold or detain their mind.
 
 (6) And if any man be laborious in reading and study, and yet idle in
 business and action, it groweth from some weakness of body or softness of
 spirit, such as Seneca speaketh of: _Quidam tam sunt umbratiles_, _ut
 putent in turbido esse quicquid in luce est_; and not of learning: well
 may it be that such a point of a mans nature may make him give himself
 to learning, but it is not learning that breedeth any such point in his
 nature.
 
 (7) And that learning should take up too much time or leisure: I answer,
 the most active or busy man that hath been or can be, hath (no question)
 many vacant times of leisure while he expecteth the tides and returns of
 business (except he be either tedious and of no despatch, or lightly and
 unworthily ambitious to meddle in things that may be better done by
 others), and then the question is but how those spaces and times of
 leisure shall be filled and spent; whether in pleasure or in studies; as
 was well answered by Demosthenes to his adversary schines, that was a
 man given to pleasure, and told him That his orations did smell of the
 lamp.  Indeed, said Demosthenes, there is a great difference between
 the things that you and I do by lamp-light.  So as no man need doubt
 that learning will expel business, but rather it will keep and defend the
 possession of the mind against idleness and pleasure, which otherwise at
 unawares may enter to the prejudice of both.
 
 (8) Again, for that other conceit that learning should undermine the
 reverence of laws and government, it is assuredly a mere depravation and
 calumny, without all shadow of truth.  For to say that a blind custom of
 obedience should be a surer obligation than duty taught and understood,
 it is to affirm that a blind man may tread surer by a guide than a seeing
 man can by a light.  And it is without all controversy that learning doth
 make the minds of men gentle, generous, manageable, and pliant to
 government; whereas ignorance makes them churlish, thwart, and mutinous:
 and the evidence of time doth clear this assertion, considering that the
 most barbarous, rude, and unlearned times have been most subject to
 tumults, seditious, and changes.
 
 (9) And as to the judgment of Cato the Censor, he was well punished for
 his blasphemy against learning, in the same kind wherein he offended; for
 when he was past threescore years old, he was taken with an extreme
 desire to go to school again, and to learn the Greek tongue, to the end
 to peruse the Greek authors; which doth well demonstrate that his former
 censure of the Grecian learning was rather an affected gravity, than
 according to the inward sense of his own opinion.  And as for Virgils
 verses, though it pleased him to brave the world in taking to the Romans
 the art of empire, and leaving to others the arts of subjects, yet so
 much is manifestthat the Romans never ascended to that height of empire
 till the time they had ascended to the height of other arts.  For in the
 time of the two first Csars, which had the art of government in greatest
 perfection, there lived the best poet, Virgilius Maro; the best
 historiographer, Titus Livius; the best antiquary, Marcus Varro; and the
 best or second orator, Marcus Cicero, that to the memory of man are
 known.  As for the accusation of Socrates, the time must be remembered
 when it was prosecuted; which was under the Thirty Tyrants, the most
 base, bloody, and envious persons that have governed; which revolution of
 state was no sooner over but Socrates, whom they had made a person
 criminal, was made a person heroical, and his memory accumulate with
 honours divine and human; and those discourses of his which were then
 termed corrupting of manners, were after acknowledged for sovereign
 medicines of the mind and manners, and so have been received ever since
 till this day.  Let this, therefore, serve for answer to politiques,
 which in their humorous severity, or in their feigned gravity, have
 presumed to throw imputations upon learning; which redargution
 nevertheless (save that we know not whether our labours may extend to
 other ages) were not needful for the present, in regard of the love and
 reverence towards learning which the example and countenance of two so
 learned princes, Queen Elizabeth and your Majesty, being as Castor and
 Pollux, _lucida sidera_, stars of excellent light and most benign
 influence, hath wrought in all men of place and authority in our nation.
 
 III. (1) Now therefore we come to that third sort of discredit or
 diminution of credit that groweth unto learning from learned men
 themselves, which commonly cleaveth fastest: it is either from their
 fortune, or from their manners, or from the nature of their studies.  For
 the first, it is not in their power; and the second is accidental; the
 third only is proper to be handled: but because we are not in hand with
 true measure, but with popular estimation and conceit, it is not amiss to
 speak somewhat of the two former.  The derogations therefore which grow
 to learning from the fortune or condition of learned men, are either in
 respect of scarcity of means, or in respect of privateness of life and
 meanness of employments.
 
 (2) Concerning want, and that it is the case of learned men usually to
 begin with little, and not to grow rich so fast as other men, by reason
 they convert not their labours chiefly to lucre and increase, it were
 good to leave the commonplace in commendation of povery to some friar to
 handle, to whom much was attributed by Machiavel in this point when he
 said, That the kingdom of the clergy had been long before at an end, if
 the reputation and reverence towards the poverty of friars had not borne
 out the scandal of the superfluities and excesses of bishops and
 prelates.  So a man might say that the felicity and delicacy of princes
 and great persons had long since turned to rudeness and barbarism, if the
 poverty of learning had not kept up civility and honour of life; but
 without any such advantages, it is worthy the observation what a reverent
 and honoured thing poverty of fortune was for some ages in the Roman
 state, which nevertheless was a state without paradoxes.  For we see what
 Titus Livius saith in his introduction: _Cterum aut me amor negotii
 suscepti fallit aut nulla unquam respublica nec major_, _nec sanctior_,
 _nec bonis exemplis ditior fuit_; _nec in quam tam sero avaritia
 luxuriaque immigraverint_; _nec ubi tantus ac tam diu paupertati ac
 parsimoni honos fuerit_.  We see likewise, after that the state of Rome
 was not itself, but did degenerate, how that person that took upon him to
 be counsellor to Julius Csar after his victory where to begin his
 restoration of the state, maketh it of all points the most summary to
 take away the estimation of wealth: _Verum hc et omnia mala pariter cum
 honore pecuni desinent_; _si neque magistratus_, _neque alia vulgo
 cupienda_, _venalia erunt_.  To conclude this point: as it was truly said
 that _Paupertas est virtutis fortuna_, though sometimes it come from
 vice, so it may be fitly said that, though some times it may proceed from
 misgovernment and accident.  Surely Solomon hath pronounced it both in
 censure, _Qui festinat ad divitias non erit insons_; and in precept, Buy
 the truth, and sell it not; and so of wisdom and knowledge; judging that
 means were to be spent upon learning, and not learning to be applied to
 means.  And as for the privateness or obscureness (as it may be in vulgar
 estimation accounted) of life of contemplative men, it is a theme so
 common to extol a private life, not taxed with sensuality and sloth, in
 comparison and to the disadvantage of a civil life, for safety, liberty,
 pleasure, and dignity, or at least freedom from indignity, as no man
 handleth it but handleth it well; such a consonancy it hath to mens
 conceits in the expressing, and to mens consents in the allowing.  This
 only I will add, that learned men forgotten in states and not living in
 the eyes of men, are like the images of Cassius and Brutus in the funeral
 of Junia, of which, not being represented as many others were, Tacitus
 saith, _Eo ipso prfulgebant quod non visebantur_.
 
 (3) And for meanness of employment, that which is most traduced to
 contempt is that the government of youth is commonly allotted to them;
 which age, because it is the age of least authority, it is transferred to
 the disesteeming of those employments wherein youth is conversant, and
 which are conversant about youth.  But how unjust this traducement is (if
 you will reduce things from popularity of opinion to measure of reason)
 may appear in that we see men are more curious what they put into a new
 vessel than into a vessel seasoned; and what mould they lay about a young
 plant than about a plant corroborate; so as this weakest terms and times
 of all things use to have the best applications and helps.  And will you
 hearken to the Hebrew rabbins?  Your young men shall see visions, and
 your old men shall dream dreams: say they, youth is the worthier age,
 for that visions are nearer apparitions of God than dreams?  And let it
 be noted that howsoever the condition of life of _pedantes_ hath been
 scorned upon theatres, as the ape of tyranny; and that the modern
 looseness or negligence hath taken no due regard to the choice of
 schoolmasters and tutors; yet the ancient wisdom of the best times did
 always make a just complaint, that states were too busy with their laws
 and too negligent in point of education: which excellent part of ancient
 discipline hath been in some sort revived of late times by the colleges
 of the Jesuits; of whom, although in regard of their superstition I may
 say, _Quo meliores_, _eo deteriores_; yet in regard of this, and some
 other points concerning human learning and moral matters, I may say, as
 Agesilaus said to his enemy Pharnabazus, _Talis quum sis_, _utunam noster
 esses_.  And that much touching the discredits drawn from the fortunes of
 learned men.
 
 (4) As touching the manners of learned men, it is a thing personal and
 individual: and no doubt there be amongst them, as in other professions,
 of all temperatures: but yet so as it is not without truth which is said,
 that _Abeunt studua in mores_, studies have an influence and operation
 upon the manners of those that are conversant in them.
 
 (5) But upon an attentive and indifferent review, I for my part cannot
 find any disgrace to learning can proceed from the manners of learned
 men; not inherent to them as they are learned; except it be a fault
 (which was the supposed fault of Demosthenes, Cicero, Cato II., Seneca,
 and many more) that because the times they read of are commonly better
 than the times they live in, and the duties taught better than the duties
 practised, they contend sometimes too far to bring things to perfection,
 and to reduce the corruption of manners to honesty of precepts or
 examples of too great height.  And yet hereof they have caveats enough in
 their own walks.  For Solon, when he was asked whether he had given his
 citizens the best laws, answered wisely, Yea, of such as they would
 receive: and Plato, finding that his own heart could not agree with the
 corrupt manners of his country, refused to bear place or office, saying,
 That a mans country was to be used as his parents were, that is, with
 humble persuasions, and not with contestations.  And Csars counsellor
 put in the same caveat, _Non ad vetera instituta revocans qu jampridem
 corruptis moribus ludibrio sunt_; and Cicero noteth this error directly
 in Cato II. when he writes to his friend Atticus, _Cato optime sentit_,
 _sed nocet interdum reipublic_; _loquitur enim tanquam in republic
 Platonis_, _non tanquam in fce Romuli_.  And the same Cicero doth excuse
 and expound the philosophers for going too far and being too exact in
 their prescripts when he saith, _Isti ipse prceptores virtutis et
 magistri videntur fines officiorum paulo longius quam natura vellet
 protulisse_, _ut cum ad ultimum animo contendissemus_, _ibi tamen_, _ubi
 oportet_, _consisteremus_: and yet himself might have said, _Monitis sum
 minor ipse meis_; for it was his own fault, though not in so extreme a
 degree.
 
 (6) Another fault likewise much of this kind hath been incident to
 learned men, which is, that they have esteemed the preservation, good,
 and honour of their countries or masters before their own fortunes or
 safeties.  For so saith Demosthenes unto the Athenians: If it please you
 to note it, my counsels unto you are not such whereby I should grow great
 amongst you, and you become little amongst the Grecians; but they be of
 that nature as they are sometimes not good for me to give, but are always
 good for you to follow.  And so Seneca, after he had consecrated that
 _Quinquennium Neronis_ to the eternal glory of learned governors, held on
 his honest and loyal course of good and free counsel after his master
 grew extremely corrupt in his government.  Neither can this point
 otherwise be, for learning endueth mens minds with a true sense of the
 frailty of their persons, the casualty of their fortunes, and the dignity
 of their soul and vocation, so that it is impossible for them to esteem
 that any greatness of their own fortune can be a true or worthy end of
 their being and ordainment, and therefore are desirous to give their
 account to God, and so likewise to their masters under God (as kings and
 the states that they serve) in those words, _Ecce tibi lucrefeci_, and
 not _Ecce mihi lucrefeci_; whereas the corrupter sort of mere politiques,
 that have not their thoughts established by learning in the love and
 apprehension of duty, nor never look abroad into universality, do refer
 all things to themselves, and thrust themselves into the centre of the
 world, as if all lines should meet in them and their fortunes, never
 caring in all tempests what becomes of the ship of state, so they may
 save themselves in the cockboat of their own fortune; whereas men that
 feel the weight of duty and know the limits of self-love use to make good
 their places and duties, though with peril; and if they stand in
 seditious and violent alterations, it is rather the reverence which many
 times both adverse parts do give to honesty, than any versatile advantage
 of their own carriage.  But for this point of tender sense and fast
 obligation of duty which learning doth endue the mind withal, howsoever
 fortune may tax it, and many in the depth of their corrupt principles may
 despise it, yet it will receive an open allowance, and therefore needs
 the less disproof or excuse.
 
 (7) Another fault incident commonly to learned men, which may be more
 properly defended than truly denied, is that they fail sometimes in
 applying themselves to particular persons, which want of exact
 application ariseth from two causesthe one, because the largeness of
 their mind can hardly confine itself to dwell in the exquisite
 observation or examination of the nature and customs of one person, for
 it is a speech for a lover, and not for a wise man, _Satis magnum alter
 alteri theatrum sumus_.  Nevertheless I shall yield that he that cannot
 contract the sight of his mind as well as disperse and dilate it, wanteth
 a great faculty.  But there is a second cause, which is no inability, but
 a rejection upon choice and judgment.  For the honest and just bounds of
 observation by one person upon another extend no further but to
 understand him sufficiently, whereby not to give him offence, or whereby
 to be able to give him faithful counsel, or whereby to stand upon
 reasonable guard and caution in respect of a mans self.  But to be
 speculative into another man to the end to know how to work him, or wind
 him, or govern him, proceedeth from a heart that is double and cloven,
 and not entire and ingenuous; which as in friendship it is want of
 integrity, so towards princes or superiors is want of duty.  For the
 custom of the Levant, which is that subjects do forbear to gaze or fix
 their eyes upon princes, is in the outward ceremony barbarous, but the
 moral is good; for men ought not, by cunning and bent observations, to
 pierce and penetrate into the hearts of kings, which the Scripture hath
 declared to be inscrutable.
 
 (8) There is yet another fault (with which I will conclude this part)
 which is often noted in learned men, that they do many times fail to
 observe decency and discretion in their behaviour and carriage, and
 commit errors in small and ordinary points of action, so as the vulgar
 sort of capacities do make a judgment of them in greater matters by that
 which they find wanting in them in smaller.  But this consequence doth
 oft deceive men, for which I do refer them over to that which was said by
 Themistocles, arrogantly and uncivilly being applied to himself out of
 his own mouth, but, being applied to the general state of this question,
 pertinently and justly, when, being invited to touch a lute, he said, He
 could not fiddle, but he could make a small town a great state.  So no
 doubt many may be well seen in the passages of government and policy
 which are to seek in little and punctual occasions.  I refer them also to
 that which Plato said of his master Socrates, whom he compared to the
 gallipots of apothecaries, which on the outside had apes and owls and
 antiques, but contained within sovereign and precious liquors and
 confections; acknowledging that, to an external report, he was not
 without superficial levities and deformities, but was inwardly
 replenished with excellent virtues and powers.  And so much touching the
 point of manners of learned men.
 
 (9) But in the meantime I have no purpose to give allowance to some
 conditions and courses base and unworthy, wherein divers professors of
 learning have wronged themselves and gone too far; such as were those
 trencher philosophers which in the later age of the Roman state were
 usually in the houses of great persons, being little better than solemn
 parasites, of which kind, Lucian maketh a merry description of the
 philosopher that the great lady took to ride with her in her coach, and
 would needs have him carry her little dog, which he doing officiously and
 yet uncomely, the page scoffed and said, That he doubted the philosopher
 of a Stoic would turn to be a Cynic.  But, above all the rest, this
 gross and palpable flattery whereunto many not unlearned have abased and
 abused their wits and pens, turning (as Du Bartas saith) Hecuba into
 Helena, and Faustina into Lucretia, hath most diminished the price and
 estimation of learning.  Neither is the modern dedication of books and
 writings, as to patrons, to be commended, for that books (such as are
 worthy the name of books) ought to have no patrons but truth and reason.
 And the ancient custom was to dedicate them only to private and equal
 friends, or to entitle the books with their names; or if to kings and
 great persons, it was to some such as the argument of the book was fit
 and proper for; but these and the like courses may deserve rather
 reprehension than defence.
 
 (10) Not that I can tax or condemn the morigeration or application of
 learned men to men in fortune.  For the answer was good that Diogenes
 made to one that asked him in mockery, How it came to pass that
 philosophers were the followers of rich men, and not rich men of
 philosophers?  He answered soberly, and yet sharply, Because the one
 sort knew what they had need of, and the other did not.  And of the like
 nature was the answer which Aristippus made, when having a petition to
 Dionysius, and no ear given to him, he fell down at his feet, whereupon
 Dionysius stayed and gave him the hearing, and granted it; and afterwards
 some person, tender on the behalf of philosophy, reproved Aristippus that
 he would offer the profession of philosophy such an indignity as for a
 private suit to fall at a tyrants feet; but he answered, It was not his
 fault, but it was the fault of Dionysius, that had his ears in his feet.
 Neither was it accounted weakness, but discretion, in him that would not
 dispute his best with Adrianus Csar, excusing himself, That it was
 reason to yield to him that commanded thirty legions.  These and the
 like, applications, and stooping to points of necessity and convenience,
 cannot be disallowed; for though they may have some outward baseness, yet
 in a judgment truly made they are to be accounted submissions to the
 occasion and not to the person.
 
 IV. (1) Now I proceed to those errors and vanities which have intervened
 amongst the studies themselves of the learned, which is that which is
 principal and proper to the present argument; wherein my purpose is not
 to make a justification of the errors, but by a censure and separation of
 the errors to make a justification of that which is good and sound, and
 to deliver that from the aspersion of the other.  For we see that it is
 the manner of men to scandalise and deprave that which retaineth the
 state and virtue, by taking advantage upon that which is corrupt and
 degenerate, as the heathens in the primitive Church used to blemish and
 taint the Christians with the faults and corruptions of heretics.  But
 nevertheless I have no meaning at this time to make any exact
 animadversion of the errors and impediments in matters of learning, which
 are more secret and remote from vulgar opinion, but only to speak unto
 such as do fall under or near unto a popular observation.
 
 (2) There be therefore chiefly three vanities in studies, whereby
 learning hath been most traduced.  For those things we do esteem vain
 which are either false or frivolous, those which either have no truth or
 no use; and those persons we esteem vain which are either credulous or
 curious; and curiosity is either in matter or words: so that in reason as
 well as in experience there fall out to be these three distempers (as I
 may term them) of learningthe first, fantastical learning; the second,
 contentious learning; and the last, delicate learning; vain imaginations,
 vain altercations, and vain affectations; and with the last I will begin.
 Martin Luther, conducted, no doubt, by a higher Providence, but in
 discourse of reason, finding what a province he had undertaken against
 the Bishop of Rome and the degenerate traditions of the Church, and
 finding his own solitude, being in nowise aided by the opinions of his
 own time, was enforced to awake all antiquity, and to call former times
 to his succours to make a party against the present time.  So that the
 ancient authors, both in divinity and in humanity, which had long time
 slept in libraries, began generally to be read and revolved.  This, by
 consequence, did draw on a necessity of a more exquisite travail in the
 languages original, wherein those authors did write, for the better
 understanding of those authors, and the better advantage of pressing and
 applying their words.  And thereof grew, again, a delight in their manner
 of style and phrase, and an admiration of that kind of writing, which was
 much furthered and precipitated by the enmity and opposition that the
 propounders of those primitive but seeming new opinions had against the
 schoolmen, who were generally of the contrary part, and whose writings
 were altogether in a differing style and form; taking liberty to coin and
 frame new terms of art to express their own sense, and to avoid circuit
 of speech, without regard to the pureness, pleasantness, and (as I may
 call it) lawfulness of the phrase or word.  And again, because the great
 labour then was with the people (of whom the Pharisees were wont to say,
 _Execrabilis ista turba_, _qu non novit legem_), for the winning and
 persuading of them, there grew of necessity in chief price and request
 eloquence and variety of discourse, as the fittest and forciblest access
 into the capacity of the vulgar sort; so that these four causes
 concurringthe admiration of ancient authors, the hate of the schoolmen,
 the exact study of languages, and the efficacy of preachingdid bring in
 an affectionate study of eloquence and copy of speech, which then began
 to flourish.  This grew speedily to an excess; for men began to hunt more
 after words than mattermore after the choiceness of the phrase, and the
 round and clean composition of the sentence, and the sweet falling of the
 clauses, and the varying and illustration of their works with tropes and
 figures, than after the weight of matter, worth of subject, soundness of
 argument, life of invention, or depth of judgment.  Then grew the flowing
 and watery vein of Osorius, the Portugal bishop, to be in price.  Then
 did Sturmius spend such infinite and curious pains upon Cicero the Orator
 and Hermogenes the Rhetorician, besides his own books of Periods and
 Imitation, and the like.  Then did Car of Cambridge and Ascham with their
 lectures and writings almost deify Cicero and Demosthenes, and allure all
 young men that were studious unto that delicate and polished kind of
 learning.  Then did Erasmus take occasion to make the scoffing echo,
 _Decem annos consuumpsi in legendo Cicerone_; and the echo answered in
 Greek, _One_, _Asine_.  Then grew the learning of the schoolmen to be
 utterly despised as barbarous.  In sum, the whole inclination and bent of
 those times was rather towards copy than weight.
 
 (3) Here therefore [is] the first distemper of learning, when men study
 words and not matter; whereof, though I have represented an example of
 late times, yet it hath been and will be _secundum majus et minus_ in all
 time.  And how is it possible but this should have an operation to
 discredit learning, even with vulgar capacities, when they see learned
 mens works like the first letter of a patent or limited book, which
 though it hath large flourishes, yet it is but a letter?  It seems to me
 that Pygmalions frenzy is a good emblem or portraiture of this vanity;
 for words are but the images of matter, and except they have life of
 reason and invention, to fall in love with them is all one as to fall in
 love with a picture.
 
 (4) But yet notwithstanding it is a thing not hastily to be condemned, to
 clothe and adorn the obscurity even of philosophy itself with sensible
 and plausible elocution.  For hereof we have great examples in Xenophon,
 Cicero, Seneca, Plutarch, and of Plato also in some degree; and hereof
 likewise there is great use, for surely, to the severe inquisition of
 truth and the deep progress into philosophy, it is some hindrance because
 it is too early satisfactory to the mind of man, and quencheth the desire
 of further search before we come to a just period.  But then if a man be
 to have any use of such knowledge in civil occasions, of conference,
 counsel, persuasion, discourse, or the like, then shall he find it
 prepared to his hands in those authors which write in that manner.  But
 the excess of this is so justly contemptible, that as Hercules, when he
 saw the image of Adonis, Venus minion, in a temple, said in disdain,
 _Nil sacri es_; so there is none of Hercules followers in learningthat
 is, the more severe and laborious sort of inquirers into truthbut will
 despise those delicacies and affectations, as indeed capable of no
 divineness.  And thus much of the first disease or distemper of learning.
 
 (5) The second which followeth is in nature worse than the former: for as
 substance of matter is better than beauty of words, so contrariwise vain
 matter is worse than vain words: wherein it seemeth the reprehension of
 St. Paul was not only proper for those times, but prophetical for the
 times following; and not only respective to divinity, but extensive to
 all knowledge: _Devita profanas vocum novitates_, _et oppositiones falsi
 nominis scienti_.  For he assigneth two marks and badges of suspected
 and falsified science: the one, the novelty and strangeness of terms; the
 other, the strictness of positions, which of necessity doth induce
 oppositions, and so questions and altercations.  Surely, like as many
 substances in nature which are solid do putrefy and corrupt into
 worms;so it is the property of good and sound knowledge to putrefy and
 dissolve into a number of subtle, idle, unwholesome, and (as I may term
 them) vermiculate questions, which have indeed a kind of quickness and
 life of spirit, but no soundness of matter or goodness of quality.  This
 kind of degenerate learning did chiefly reign amongst the schoolmen, who
 having sharp and strong wits, and abundance of leisure, and small variety
 of reading, but their wits being shut up in the cells of a few authors
 (chiefly Aristotle their dictator) as their persons were shut up in the
 cells of monasteries and colleges, and knowing little history, either of
 nature or time, did out of no great quantity of matter and infinite
 agitation of wit spin out unto us those laborious webs of learning which
 are extant in their books.  For the wit and mind of man, if it work upon
 matter, which is the contemplation of the creatures of God, worketh
 according to the stuff and is limited thereby; but if it work upon
 itself, as the spider worketh his web, then it is endless, and brings
 forth indeed cobwebs of learning, admirable for the fineness of thread
 and work, but of no substance or profit.
 
 (6) This same unprofitable subtility or curiosity is of two sorts: either
 in the subject itself that they handle, when it is a fruitless
 speculation or controversy (whereof there are no small number both in
 divinity and philosophy), or in the manner or method of handling of a
 knowledge, which amongst them was thisupon every particular position or
 assertion to frame objections, and to those objections, solutions; which
 solutions were for the most part not confutations, but distinctions:
 whereas indeed the strength of all sciences is, as the strength of the
 old mans faggot, in the bond.  For the harmony of a science, supporting
 each part the other, is and ought to be the true and brief confutation
 and suppression of all the smaller sort of objections.  But, on the other
 side, if you take out every axiom, as the sticks of the faggot, one by
 one, you may quarrel with them and bend them and break them at your
 pleasure: so that, as was said of Seneca, _Verborum minutiis rerum
 frangit pondera_, so a man may truly say of the schoolmen, _Qustionum
 minutiis scientiarum frangunt soliditatem_.  For were it not better for a
 man in fair room to set up one great light, or branching candlestick of
 lights, than to go about with a small watch-candle into every corner?
 And such is their method, that rests not so much upon evidence of truth
 proved by arguments, authorities, similitudes, examples, as upon
 particular confutations and solutions of every scruple, cavillation, and
 objection; breeding for the most part one question as fast as it solveth
 another; even as in the former resemblance, when you carry the light into
 one corner, you darken the rest; so that the fable and fiction of Scylla
 seemeth to be a lively image of this kind of philosophy or knowledge;
 which was transformed into a comely virgin for the upper parts; but then
 _Candida succinctam latrantibus inguina monstris_: so the generalities of
 the schoolmen are for a while good and proportionable; but then when you
 descend into their distinctions and decisions, instead of a fruitful womb
 for the use and benefit of mans life, they end in monstrous altercations
 and barking questions.  So as it is not possible but this quality of
 knowledge must fall under popular contempt, the people being apt to
 contemn truths upon occasion of controversies and altercations, and to
 think they are all out of their way which never meet; and when they see
 such digladiation about subtleties, and matters of no use or moment, they
 easily fall upon that judgment of Dionysius of Syracusa, _Verba ista sunt
 senum otiosorum_.
 
 (7) Notwithstanding, certain it is that if those schoolmen to their great
 thirst of truth and unwearied travail of wit had joined variety and
 universality of reading and contemplation, they had proved excellent
 lights, to the great advancement of all learning and knowledge; but as
 they are, they are great undertakers indeed, and fierce with dark
 keeping.  But as in the inquiry of the divine truth, their pride inclined
 to leave the oracle of Gods word, and to vanish in the mixture of their
 own inventions; so in the inquisition of nature, they ever left the
 oracle of Gods works, and adored the deceiving and deformed images which
 the unequal mirror of their own minds, or a few received authors or
 principles, did represent unto them.  And thus much for the second
 disease of learning.
 
 (8) For the third vice or disease of learning, which concerneth deceit or
 untruth, it is of all the rest the foulest; as that which doth destroy
 the essential form of knowledge, which is nothing but a representation of
 truth: for the truth of being and the truth of knowing are one, differing
 no more than the direct beam and the beam reflected.  This vice therefore
 brancheth itself into two sorts; delight in deceiving and aptness to be
 deceived; imposture and credulity; which, although they appear to be of a
 diverse nature, the one seeming to proceed of cunning and the other of
 simplicity, yet certainly they do for the most part concur: for, as the
 verse noteth
 
     Percontatorem fugito, nam garrulus idem est,
 
 an inquisitive man is a prattler; so upon the like reason a credulous man
 is a deceiver: as we see it in fame, that he that will easily believe
 rumours will as easily augment rumours and add somewhat to them of his
 own; which Tacitus wisely noteth, when he saith, _Fingunt simul
 creduntque_: so great an affinity hath fiction and belief.
 
 (9) This facility of credit and accepting or admitting things weakly
 authorised or warranted is of two kinds according to the subject: for it
 is either a belief of history, or, as the lawyers speak, matter of fact;
 or else of matter of art and opinion.  As to the former, we see the
 experience and inconvenience of this error in ecclesiastical history;
 which hath too easily received and registered reports and narrations of
 miracles wrought by martyrs, hermits, or monks of the desert, and other
 holy men, and their relics, shrines, chapels and images: which though
 they had a passage for a time by the ignorance of the people, the
 superstitious simplicity of some and the politic toleration of others
 holding them but as divine poesies, yet after a period of time, when the
 mist began to clear up, they grew to be esteemed but as old wives
 fables, impostures of the clergy, illusions of spirits, and badges of
 Antichrist, to the great scandal and detriment of religion.
 
 (10) So in natural history, we see there hath not been that choice and
 judgment used as ought to have been; as may appear in the writings of
 Plinius, Cardanus, Albertus, and divers of the Arabians, being fraught
 with much fabulous matter, a great part not only untried, but notoriously
 untrue, to the great derogation of the credit of natural philosophy with
 the grave and sober kind of wits: wherein the wisdom and integrity of
 Aristotle is worthy to be observed, that, having made so diligent and
 exquisite a history of living creatures, hath mingled it sparingly with
 any vain or feigned matter; and yet on the other side hath cast all
 prodigious narrations, which he thought worthy the recording, into one
 book, excellently discerning that matter of manifest truth, such
 whereupon observation and rule was to be built, was not to be mingled or
 weakened with matter of doubtful credit; and yet again, that rarities and
 reports that seem uncredible are not to be suppressed or denied to the
 memory of men.
 
 (11) And as for the facility of credit which is yielded to arts and
 opinions, it is likewise of two kinds; either when too much belief is
 attributed to the arts themselves, or to certain authors in any art.  The
 sciences themselves, which have had better intelligence and confederacy
 with the imagination of man than with his reason, are three in number:
 astrology, natural magic, and alchemy; of which sciences, nevertheless,
 the ends or pretences are noble.  For astrology pretendeth to discover
 that correspondence or concatenation which is between the superior globe
 and the inferior; natural magic pretendeth to call and reduce natural
 philosophy from variety of speculations to the magnitude of works; and
 alchemy pretendeth to make separation of all the unlike parts of bodies
 which in mixtures of natures are incorporate.  But the derivations and
 prosecutions to these ends, both in the theories and in the practices,
 are full of error and vanity; which the great professors themselves have
 sought to veil over and conceal by enigmatical writings, and referring
 themselves to auricular traditions and such other devices, to save the
 credit of impostures.  And yet surely to alchemy this right is due, that
 it may be compared to the husbandman whereof sop makes the fable; that,
 when he died, told his sons that he had left unto them gold buried
 underground in his vineyard; and they digged over all the ground, and
 gold they found none; but by reason of their stirring and digging the
 mould about the roots of their vines, they had a great vintage the year
 following: so assuredly the search and stir to make gold hath brought to
 light a great number of good and fruitful inventions and experiments, as
 well for the disclosing of nature as for the use of mans life.
 
 (12) And as for the overmuch credit that hath been given unto authors in
 sciences, in making them dictators, that their words should stand, and
 not consuls, to give advice; the damage is infinite that sciences have
 received thereby, as the principal cause that hath kept them low at a
 stay without growth or advancement.  For hence it hath come, that in arts
 mechanical the first deviser comes shortest, and time addeth and
 perfecteth; but in sciences the first author goeth furthest, and time
 leeseth and corrupteth.  So we see artillery, sailing, printing, and the
 like, were grossly managed at the first, and by time accommodated and
 refined; but contrariwise, the philosophies and sciences of Aristotle,
 Plato, Democritus, Hippocrates, Euclides, Archimedes, of most vigour at
 the first, and by time degenerate and imbased: whereof the reason is no
 other, but that in the former many wits and industries have contributed
 in one; and in the latter many wits and industries have been spent about
 the wit of some one, whom many times they have rather depraved than
 illustrated; for, as water will not ascend higher than the level of the
 first spring-head from whence it descendeth, so knowledge derived from
 Aristotle, and exempted from liberty of examination, will not rise again
 higher than the knowledge of Aristotle.  And, therefore, although the
 position be good, _Oportet discentem credere_, yet it must be coupled
 with this, _Oportet edoctum judicare_; for disciples do owe unto masters
 only a temporary belief and a suspension of their own judgment till they
 be fully instructed, and not an absolute resignation or perpetual
 captivity; and therefore, to conclude this point, I will say no more, but
 so let great authors have their due, as time, which is the author of
 authors, be not deprived of his duewhich is, further and further to
 discover truth.  Thus have I gone over these three diseases of learning;
 besides the which there are some other rather peccant humours than formed
 diseases, which, nevertheless, are not so secret and intrinsic, but that
 they fall under a popular observation and traducement, and, therefore,
 are not to be passed over.
 
 V. (1) The first of these is the extreme affecting of two extremities:
 the one antiquity, the other novelty; wherein it seemeth the children of
 time do take after the nature and malice of the father.  For as he
 devoureth his children, so one of them seeketh to devour and suppress the
 other; while antiquity envieth there should be new additions, and novelty
 cannot be content to add but it must deface; surely the advice of the
 prophet is the true direction in this matter, _State super vias
 antiquas_, _et videte qunam sit via recta et bona et ambulate in ea_.
 Antiquity deserveth that reverence, that men should make a stand
 thereupon and discover what is the best way; but when the discovery is
 well taken, then to make progression.  And to speak truly, _Antiquitas
 sculi juventus mundi_.  These times are the ancient times, when the
 world is ancient, and not those which we account ancient _ordine
 retrogrado_, by a computation backward from ourselves.
 
 (2) Another error induced by the former is a distrust that anything
 should be now to be found out, which the world should have missed and
 passed over so long time: as if the same objection were to be made to
 time that Lucian maketh to Jupiter and other the heathen gods; of which
 he wondereth that they begot so many children in old time, and begot none
 in his time; and asketh whether they were become septuagenary, or whether
 the law _Papia_, made against old mens marriages, had restrained them.
 So it seemeth men doubt lest time is become past children and generation;
 wherein contrariwise we see commonly the levity and unconstancy of mens
 judgments, which, till a matter be done, wonder that it can be done; and
 as soon as it is done, wonder again that it was no sooner done: as we see
 in the expedition of Alexander into Asia, which at first was prejudged as
 a vast and impossible enterprise; and yet afterwards it pleaseth Livy to
 make no more of it than this, _Nil aliud qum bene ausus vana
 contemnere_.  And the same happened to Columbus in the western
 navigation.  But in intellectual matters it is much more common, as may
 be seen in most of the propositions of Euclid; which till they be
 demonstrate, they seem strange to our assent; but being demonstrate, our
 mind accepteth of them by a kind of relation (as the lawyers speak), as
 if we had known them before.
 
 (3) Another error, that hath also some affinity with the former, is a
 conceit that of former opinions or sects after variety and examination
 the best hath still prevailed and suppressed the rest; so as if a man
 should begin the labour of a new search, he were but like to light upon
 somewhat formerly rejected, and by rejection brought into oblivion; as if
 the multitude, or the wisest for the multitudes sake, were not ready to
 give passage rather to that which is popular and superficial than to that
 which is substantial and profound for the truth is, that time seemeth to
 be of the nature of a river or stream, which carrieth down to us that
 which is light and blown up, and sinketh and drowneth that which is
 weighty and solid.
 
 (4) Another error, of a diverse nature from all the former, is the
 over-early and peremptory reduction of knowledge into arts and methods;
 from which time commonly sciences receive small or no augmentation.  But
 as young men, when they knit and shape perfectly, do seldom grow to a
 further stature, so knowledge, while it is in aphorisms and observations,
 it is in growth; but when it once is comprehended in exact methods, it
 may, perchance, be further polished, and illustrate and accommodated for
 use and practice, but it increaseth no more in bulk and substance.
 
 (5) Another error which doth succeed that which we last mentioned is,
 that after the distribution of particular arts and sciences, men have
 abandoned universality, or _philosophia prima_, which cannot but cease
 and stop all progression.  For no perfect discovery can be made upon a
 flat or a level; neither is it possible to discover the more remote and
 deeper parts of any science if you stand but upon the level of the same
 science, and ascend not to a higher science.
 
 (6) Another error hath proceeded from too great a reverence, and a kind
 of adoration of the mind and understanding of man; by means whereof, men
 have withdrawn themselves too much from the contemplation of nature, and
 the observations of experience, and have tumbled up and down in their own
 reason and conceits.  Upon these intellectualists, which are
 notwithstanding commonly taken for the most sublime and divine
 philosophers, Heraclitus gave a just censure, saying:Men sought truth
 in their own little worlds, and not in the great and common world; for
 they disdain to spell, and so by degrees to read in the volume of Gods
 works; and contrariwise by continual meditation and agitation of wit do
 urge and, as it were, invocate their own spirits to divine and give
 oracles unto them, whereby they are deservedly deluded.
 
 (7) Another error that hath some connection with this latter is, that men
 have used to infect their meditations, opinions, and doctrines with some
 conceits which they have most admired, or some sciences which they have
 most applied, and given all things else a tincture according to them,
 utterly untrue and improper.  So hath Plato intermingled his philosophy
 with theology, and Aristotle with logic; and the second school of Plato,
 Proclus and the rest, with the mathematics; for these were the arts which
 had a kind of primogeniture with them severally.  So have the alchemists
 made a philosophy out of a few experiments of the furnace; and Gilbertus
 our countryman hath made a philosophy out of the observations of a
 loadstone.  So Cicero, when reciting the several opinions of the nature
 of the soul, he found a musician that held the soul was but a harmony,
 saith pleasantly, _Hic ab arte sua non recessit_, _&c._  But of these
 conceits Aristotle speaketh seriously and wisely when he saith, _Qui
 respiciunt ad pauca de facili pronunciant_.
 
 (8) Another error is an impatience of doubt, and haste to assertion
 without due and mature suspension of judgment.  For the two ways of
 contemplation are not unlike the two ways of action commonly spoken of by
 the ancients: the one plain and smooth in the beginning, and in the end
 impassable; the other rough and troublesome in the entrance, but after a
 while fair and even.  So it is in contemplation: if a man will begin with
 certainties, he shall end in doubts; but if he will be content to begin
 with doubts, he shall end in certainties.
 
 (9) Another error is in the manner of the tradition and delivery of
 knowledge, which is for the most part magistral and peremptory, and not
 ingenuous and faithful; in a sort as may be soonest believed, and not
 easiest examined.  It is true, that in compendious treatises for practice
 that form is not to be disallowed; but in the true handling of knowledge
 men ought not to fall either on the one side into the vein of Velleius
 the Epicurean, _Nil tam metuens quam ne dubitare aliqua de revideretur_:
 nor, on the other side, into Socrates, his ironical doubting of all
 things; but to propound things sincerely with more or less asseveration,
 as they stand in a mans own judgment proved more or less.
 
 (10) Other errors there are in the scope that men propound to themselves,
 whereunto they bend their endeavours; for, whereas the more constant and
 devote kind of professors of any science ought to propound to themselves
 to make some additions to their science, they convert their labours to
 aspire to certain second prizes: as to be a profound interpreter or
 commentor, to be a sharp champion or defender, to be a methodical
 compounder or abridger, and so the patrimony of knowledge cometh to be
 sometimes improved, but seldom augmented.
 
 (11) But the greatest error of all the rest is the mistaking or
 misplacing of the last or furthest end of knowledge.  For men have
 entered into a desire of learning and knowledge, sometimes upon a natural
 curiosity and inquisitive appetite; sometimes to entertain their minds
 with variety and delight; sometimes for ornament and reputation; and
 sometimes to enable them to victory of wit and contradiction; and most
 times for lucre and profession; and seldom sincerely to give a true
 account of their gift of reason to the benefit and use of men: as if
 there were sought in knowledge a couch whereupon to rest a searching and
 restless spirit; or a terrace for a wandering and variable mind to walk
 up and down with a fair prospect; or a tower of state, for a proud mind
 to raise itself upon; or a fort or commanding ground, for strife and
 contention; or a shop, for profit or sale; and not a rich storehouse for
 the glory of the Creator and the relief of mans estate.  But this is
 that which will indeed dignify and exalt knowledge, if contemplation and
 action may be more nearly and straitly conjoined and united together than
 they have been: a conjunction like unto that of the two highest planets,
 Saturn, the planet of rest and contemplation; and Jupiter, the planet of
 civil society and action, howbeit, I do not mean, when I speak of use and
 action, that end before-mentioned of the applying of knowledge to lucre
 and profession; for I am not ignorant how much that diverteth and
 interrupteth the prosecution and advancement of knowledge, like unto the
 golden ball thrown before Atalanta, which, while she goeth aside and
 stoopeth to take up, the race is hindered,
 
     Declinat cursus, aurumque volubile tollit. {39}
 
 Neither is my meaning, as was spoken of Socrates, to call philosophy down
 from heaven to converse upon the earththat is, to leave natural
 philosophy aside, and to apply knowledge only to manners and policy.  But
 as both heaven and earth do conspire and contribute to the use and
 benefit of man, so the end ought to be, from both philosophies to
 separate and reject vain speculations, and whatsoever is empty and void,
 and to preserve and augment whatsoever is solid and fruitful; that
 knowledge may not be as a courtesan, for pleasure and vanity only, or as
 a bond-woman, to acquire and gain to her masters use; but as a spouse,
 for generation, fruit, and comfort.
 
 (12) Thus have I described and opened, as by a kind of dissection, those
 peccant humours (the principal of them) which have not only given
 impediment to the proficience of learning, but have given also occasion
 to the traducement thereof: wherein, if I have been too plain, it must be
 remembered, _fidelia vulnera amantis_, _sed dolosa oscula malignantis_.
 This I think I have gained, that I ought to be the better believed in
 that which I shall say pertaining to commendation; because I have
 proceeded so freely in that which concerneth censure.  And yet I have no
 purpose to enter into a laudative of learning, or to make a hymn to the
 Muses (though I am of opinion that it is long since their rites were duly
 celebrated), but my intent is, without varnish or amplification justly to
 weigh the dignity of knowledge in the balance with other things, and to
 take the true value thereof by testimonies and arguments, divine and
 human.
 
 VI. (1) First, therefore, let us seek the dignity of knowledge in the
 archetype or first platform, which is in the attributes and acts of God,
 as far as they are revealed to man and may be observed with sobriety;
 wherein we may not seek it by the name of learning, for all learning is
 knowledge acquired, and all knowledge in God is original, and therefore
 we must look for it by another name, that of wisdom or sapience, as the
 Scriptures call it.
 
 (2) It is so, then, that in the work of the creation we see a double
 emanation of virtue from God; the one referring more properly to power,
 the other to wisdom; the one expressed in making the subsistence of the
 matter, and the other in disposing the beauty of the form.  This being
 supposed, it is to be observed that for anything which appeareth in the
 history of the creation, the confused mass and matter of heaven and earth
 was made in a moment, and the order and disposition of that chaos or mass
 was the work of six days; such a note of difference it pleased God to put
 upon the works of power, and the works of wisdom; wherewith concurreth,
 that in the former it is not set down that God said, Let there be heaven
 and earth, as it is set down of the works following; but actually, that
 God made heaven and earth: the one carrying the style of a manufacture,
 and the other of a law, decree, or counsel.
 
 (3) To proceed, to that which is next in order from God, to spirits: we
 find, as far as credit is to be given to the celestial hierarchy of that
 supposed Dionysius, the senator of Athens, the first place or degree is
 given to the angels of love, which are termed seraphim; the second to the
 angels of light, which are termed cherubim; and the third, and so
 following places, to thrones, principalities, and the rest, which are all
 angels of power and ministry; so as this angels of knowledge and
 illumination are placed before the angels of office and domination.
 
 (4) To descend from spirits and intellectual forms to sensible and
 material forms, we read the first form that was created was light, which
 hath a relation and correspondence in nature and corporal things to
 knowledge in spirits and incorporal things.
 
 (5) So in the distribution of days we see the day wherein God did rest
 and contemplate His own works was blessed above all the days wherein He
 did effect and accomplish them.
 
 (6) After the creation was finished, it is set down unto us that man was
 placed in the garden to work therein; which work, so appointed to him,
 could be no other than work of contemplation; that is, when the end of
 work is but for exercise and experiment, not for necessity; for there
 being then no reluctation of the creature, nor sweat of the brow, mans
 employment must of consequence have been matter of delight in the
 experiment, and not matter of labour for the use.  Again, the first acts
 which man performed in Paradise consisted of the two summary parts of
 knowledge; the view of creatures, and the imposition of names.  As for
 the knowledge which induced the fall, it was, as was touched before, not
 the natural knowledge of creatures, but the moral knowledge of good and
 evil; wherein the supposition was, that Gods commandments or
 prohibitions were not the originals of good and evil, but that they had
 other beginnings, which man aspired to know, to the end to make a total
 defection from God and to depend wholly upon himself.
 
 (7) To pass on: in the first event or occurrence after the fall of man,
 we see (as the Scriptures have infinite mysteries, not violating at all
 the truth of this story or letter) an image of the two estates, the
 contemplative state and the active state, figured in the two persons of
 Abel and Cain, and in the two simplest and most primitive trades of life;
 that of the shepherd (who, by reason of his leisure, rest in a place, and
 lying in view of heaven, is a lively image of a contemplative life), and
 that of the husbandman, where we see again the favour and election of God
 went to the shepherd, and not to the tiller of the ground.
 
 (8) So in the age before the flood, the holy records within those few
 memorials which are there entered and registered have vouchsafed to
 mention and honour the name of the inventors and authors of music and
 works in metal.  In the age after the flood, the first great judgment of
 God upon the ambition of man was the confusion of tongues; whereby the
 open trade and intercourse of learning and knowledge was chiefly
 imbarred.
 
 (9) To descend to Moses the lawgiver, and Gods first pen: he is adorned
 by the Scriptures with this addition and commendation, That he was seen
 in all the learning of the Egyptians, which nation we know was one of
 the most ancient schools of the world: for so Plato brings in the
 Egyptian priest saying unto Solon, You Grecians are ever children; you
 have no knowledge of antiquity, nor antiquity of knowledge.  Take a view
 of the ceremonial law of Moses; you shall find, besides the prefiguration
 of Christ, the badge or difference of the people of God, the exercise and
 impression of obedience, and other divine uses and fruits thereof, that
 some of the most learned Rabbins have travailed profitably and profoundly
 to observe, some of them a natural, some of them a moral sense, or
 reduction of many of the ceremonies and ordinances.  As in the law of the
 leprosy, where it is said, If the whiteness have overspread the flesh,
 the patient may pass abroad for clean; but if there be any whole flesh
 remaining, he is to be shut up for unclean; one of them noteth a
 principle of nature, that putrefaction is more contagious before maturity
 than after; and another noteth a position of moral philosophy, that men
 abandoned to vice do not so much corrupt manners, as those that are half
 good and half evil.  So in this and very many other places in that law,
 there is to be found, besides the theological sense, much aspersion of
 philosophy.
 
 (10)  So likewise in that excellent hook of Job, if it be revolved with
 diligence, it will be found pregnant and swelling with natural
 philosophy; as for example, cosmography, and the roundness of the world,
 _Qui extendit aquilonem super vacuum_, _et appendit terram super
 nihilum_; wherein the pensileness of the earth, the pole of the north,
 and the finiteness or convexity of heaven are manifestly touched.  So
 again, matter of astronomy: _Spiritus ejus ornavit clos_, _et
 obstetricante manu ejus eductus est Coluber tortuoses_.  And in another
 place, _Nunquid conjungere valebis micantes stellas Pleiadas_, _aut gyrum
 Arcturi poteris dissipare_?  Where the fixing of the stars, ever standing
 at equal distance, is with great elegancy noted.  And in another place,
 _Qui facit Arcturum_, _et Oriona_, _et Hyadas_, _et interiora Austri_;
 where again he takes knowledge of the depression of the southern pole,
 calling it the secrets of the south, because the southern stars were in
 that climate unseen.  Matter of generation: _Annon sicut lac mulsisti
 me_, _et sicut caseum coagulasti me_? &c.  Matter of minerals: _Habet
 argentum venarum suarum principia_; _et auro locus est in quo conflatur_,
 _ferrum de terra tollitur_, _et lapis solutus calore in s vertitur_; and
 so forwards in that chapter.
 
 (11) So likewise in the person of Solomon the king, we see the gift or
 endowment of wisdom and learning, both in Solomons petition and in Gods
 assent thereunto, preferred before all other terrene and temporal
 felicity.  By virtue of which grant or donative of God Solomon became
 enabled not only to write those excellent parables or aphorisms
 concerning divine and moral philosophy, but also to compile a natural
 history of all verdure, from the cedar upon the mountain to the moss upon
 the wall (which is but a rudiment between putrefaction and an herb), and
 also of all things that breathe or move.  Nay, the same Solomon the king,
 although he excelled in the glory of treasure and magnificent buildings,
 of shipping and navigation, of service and attendance, of fame and
 renown, and the like, yet he maketh no claim to any of those glories, but
 only to the glory of inquisition of truth; for so he saith expressly,
 The glory of God is to conceal a thing, but the glory of the king is to
 find it out; as if, according to the innocent play of children, the
 Divine Majesty took delight to hide His works, to the end to have them
 found out; and as if kings could not obtain a greater honour than to be
 Gods playfellows in that game; considering the great commandment of wits
 and means, whereby nothing needeth to be hidden from them.
 
 (12) Neither did the dispensation of God vary in the times after our
 Saviour came into the world; for our Saviour himself did first show His
 power to subdue ignorance, by His conference with the priests and doctors
 of the law, before He showed His power to subdue nature by His miracles.
 And the coming of this Holy Spirit was chiefly figured and expressed in
 the similitude and gift of tongues, which are but _vehicula scienti_.
 
 (13) So in the election of those instruments, which it pleased God to use
 for the plantation of the faith, notwithstanding that at the first He did
 employ persons altogether unlearned, otherwise than by inspiration, more
 evidently to declare His immediate working, and to abase all human wisdom
 or knowledge; yet nevertheless that counsel of His was no sooner
 performed, but in the next vicissitude and succession He did send His
 divine truth into the world, waited on with other learnings, as with
 servants or handmaids: for so we see St. Paul, who was only learned
 amongst the Apostles, had his pen most used in the Scriptures of the New
 Testament.
 
 (14) So again we find that many of the ancient bishops and fathers of the
 Church were excellently read and studied in all the learning of this
 heathen; insomuch that the edict of the Emperor Julianus (whereby it was
 interdicted unto Christians to be admitted into schools, lectures, or
 exercises of learning) was esteemed and accounted a more pernicious
 engine and machination against the Christian Faith than were all the
 sanguinary prosecutions of his predecessors; neither could the emulation
 and jealousy of Gregory, the first of that name, Bishop of Rome, ever
 obtain the opinion of piety or devotion; but contrariwise received the
 censure of humour, malignity, and pusillanimity, even amongst holy men;
 in that he designed to obliterate and extinguish the memory of heathen
 antiquity and authors.  But contrariwise it was the Christian Church,
 which, amidst the inundations of the Scythians on the one side from the
 north-west, and the Saracens from the east, did preserve in the sacred
 lap and bosom thereof the precious relics even of heathen learning, which
 otherwise had been extinguished, as if no such thing had ever been.
 
 (15) And we see before our eyes, that in the age of ourselves and our
 fathers, when it pleased God to call the Church of Rome to account for
 their degenerate manners and ceremonies, and sundry doctrines obnoxious
 and framed to uphold the same abuses; at one and the same time it was
 ordained by the Divine Providence that there should attend withal a
 renovation and new spring of all other knowledges.  And on the other side
 we see the Jesuits, who partly in themselves, and partly by the emulation
 and provocation of their example, have much quickened and strengthened
 the state of learning; we see (I say) what notable service and reparation
 they have done to the Roman see.
 
 (16) Wherefore, to conclude this part, let it be observed, that there be
 two principal duties and services, besides ornament and illustration,
 which philosophy and human learning do perform to faith and religion.
 The one, because they are an effectual inducement to the exaltation of
 the glory of God.  For as the Psalms and other Scriptures do often invite
 us to consider and magnify the great and wonderful works of God, so if we
 should rest only in the contemplation of the exterior of them as they
 first offer themselves to our senses, we should do a like injury unto the
 majesty of God, as if we should judge or construe of the store of some
 excellent jeweller by that only which is set out toward the street in his
 shop.  The other, because they minister a singular help and preservative
 against unbelief and error.  For our Saviour saith, You err, not knowing
 the Scriptures, nor the power of God; laying before us two books or
 volumes to study, if we will be secured from error: first the Scriptures,
 revealing the will of God, and then the creatures expressing His power;
 whereof the latter is a key unto the former: not only opening our
 understanding to conceive the true sense of the Scriptures by the general
 notions of reason and rules of speech, but chiefly opening our belief, in
 drawing us into a due meditation of the omnipotency of God, which is
 chiefly signed and engraven upon His works.  Thus much therefore for
 divine testimony and evidence concerning the true dignity and value of
 learning.
 
 VII. (1) As for human proofs, it is so large a field, as in a discourse
 of this nature and brevity it is fit rather to use choice of those things
 which we shall produce, than to embrace the variety of them.  First,
 therefore, in the degrees of human honour amongst the heathen, it was the
 highest to obtain to a veneration and adoration as a God.  This unto the
 Christians is as the forbidden fruit.  But we speak now separately of
 human testimony, according to whichthat which the Grecians call
 _apotheosis_, and the Latins _relatio inter divos_was the supreme honour
 which man could attribute unto man, specially when it was given, not by a
 formal decree or act of state (as it was used among the Roman Emperors),
 but by an inward assent and belief.  Which honour, being so high, had
 also a degree or middle term; for there were reckoned above human
 honours, honours heroical and divine: in the attribution and distribution
 of which honours we see antiquity made this difference; that whereas
 founders and uniters of states and cities, lawgivers, extirpers of
 tyrants, fathers of the people, and other eminent persons in civil merit,
 were honoured but with the titles of worthies or demigods, such as were
 Hercules, Theseus, Minus, Romulus, and the like; on the other side, such
 as were inventors and authors of new arts, endowments, and commodities
 towards mans life, were ever consecrated amongst the gods themselves, as
 was Ceres, Bacchus, Mercurius, Apollo, and others.  And justly; for the
 merit of the former is confined within the circle of an age or a nation,
 and is like fruitful showers, which though they be profitable and good,
 yet serve but for that season, and for a latitude of ground where they
 fall; but the other is, indeed, like the benefits of heaven, which are
 permanent and universal.  The former again is mixed with strife and
 perturbation, but the latter hath the true character of Divine Presence,
 coming in _aura leni_, without noise or agitation.
 
 (2) Neither is certainly that other merit of learning, in repressing the
 inconveniences which grow from man to man, much inferior to the former,
 of relieving the necessities which arise from nature, which merit was
 lively set forth by the ancients in that feigned relation of Orpheus
 theatre, where all beasts and birds assembled, and, forgetting their
 several appetitessome of prey, some of game, some of quarrelstood all
 sociably together listening unto the airs and accords of the harp, the
 sound whereof no sooner ceased, or was drowned by some louder noise, but
 every beast returned to his own nature; wherein is aptly described the
 nature and condition of men, who are full of savage and unreclaimed
 desires, of profit, of lust, of revenge; which as long as they give ear
 to precepts, to laws, to religion, sweetly touched with eloquence and
 persuasion of books, of sermons, of harangues, so long is society and
 peace maintained; but if these instruments be silent, or that sedition
 and tumult make them not audible, all things dissolve into anarchy and
 confusion.
 
 (3) But this appeareth more manifestly when kings themselves, or persons
 of authority under them, or other governors in commonwealths and popular
 estates, are endued with learning.  For although he might be thought
 partial to his own profession that said Then should people and estates
 be happy when either kings were philosophers, or philosophers kings; yet
 so much is verified by experience, that under learned princes and
 governors there have been ever the best times: for howsoever kings may
 have their imperfections in their passions and customs, yet, if they be
 illuminate by learning, they have those notions of religion, policy, and
 morality, which do preserve them and refrain them from all ruinous and
 peremptory errors and excesses, whispering evermore in their ears, when
 counsellors and servants stand mute and silent.  And senators or
 counsellors, likewise, which be learned, to proceed upon more safe and
 substantial principles, than counsellors which are only men of
 experience; the one sort keeping dangers afar off, whereas the other
 discover them not till they come near hand, and then trust to the agility
 of their wit to ward or avoid them.
 
 (4) Which felicity of times under learned princes (to keep still the law
 of brevity, by using the most eminent and selected examples) doth best
 appear in the age which passed from the death of Domitianus the emperor
 until the reign of Commodus; comprehending a succession of six princes,
 all learned, or singular favourers and advancers of learning, which age
 for temporal respects was the most happy and flourishing that ever the
 Roman Empire (which then was a model of the world) enjoyeda matter
 revealed and prefigured unto Domitian in a dream the night before he was
 slain: for he thought there was grown behind upon his shoulders a neck
 and a head of gold, which came accordingly to pass in those golden times
 which succeeded; of which princes we will make some commemoration;
 wherein, although the matter will be vulgar, and may be thought fitter
 for a declamation than agreeable to a treatise infolded as this is, yet,
 because it is pertinent to the point in hand_Neque semper arcum tendit
 Apollo_and to name them only were too naked and cursory, I will not omit
 it altogether.  The first was Nerva, the excellent temper of whose
 government is by a glance in Cornelius Tacitus touched to the life:
 _Postquam divus Nerva res oluim insociabiles miscuisset_, _imperium et
 libertatem_.  And in token of his learning, the last act of his short
 reign left to memory was a missive to his adopted son, Trajan, proceeding
 upon some inward discontent at the ingratitude of the times, comprehended
 in a verse of Homers
 
     Telis, Phbe, tuis, lacrymas ulciscere nostras.
 
 (5) Trajan, who succeeded, was for his person not learned; but if we will
 hearken to the speech of our Saviour, that saith, He that receiveth a
 prophet in the name of a prophet shall have a prophets reward, he
 deserveth to be placed amongst the most learned princes; for there was
 not a greater admirer of learning or benefactor of learning, a founder of
 famous libraries, a perpetual advancer of learned men to office, and
 familiar converser with learned professors and preceptors who were noted
 to have then most credit in court.  On the other side how much Trajans
 virtue and government was admired and renowned, surely no testimony of
 grave and faithful history doth more lively set forth than that legend
 tale of Gregorius Magnum, Bishop of Rome, who was noted for the extreme
 envy he bare towards all heathen excellency; and yet he is reported, out
 of the love and estimation of Trajans moral virtues, to have made unto
 God passionate and fervent prayers for the delivery of his soul out of
 hell, and to have obtained it, with a caveat that he should make no more
 such petitions.  In this princes time also the persecutions against the
 Christians received intermission upon the certificate of Plinius
 Secundus, a man of excellent learning and by Trajan advanced.
 
 (6) Adrian, his successor, was the most curious man that lived, and the
 most universal inquirer: insomuch as it was noted for an error in his
 mind that he desired to comprehend all things, and not to reserve himself
 for the worthiest things, falling into the like humour that was long
 before noted in Philip of Macedon, who, when he would needs overrule and
 put down an excellent musician in an argument touching music, was well
 answered by him againGod forbid, sir, saith he, that your fortune
 should be so bad as to know these things better than I.  It pleased God
 likewise to use the curiosity of this emperor as an inducement to the
 peace of His Church in those days; for having Christ in veneration, not
 as a God or Saviour, but as a wonder or novelty, and having his picture
 in his gallery matched with Apollonius (with whom in his vain imagination
 he thought its had some conformity), yet it served the turn to allay the
 bitter hatred of those times against the Christian name, so as the Church
 had peace during his time.  And for his government civil, although he did
 not attain to that of Trajans in glory of arms or perfection of justice,
 yet in deserving of the weal of the subject he did exceed him.  For
 Trajan erected many famous monuments and buildings, insomuch as
 Constantine the Great in emulation was wont to call him _Parietaria_,
 wall-flower, because his name was upon so many walls; but his buildings
 and works were more of glory and triumph than use and necessity.  But
 Adrian spent his whole reign, which was peaceable, in a perambulation or
 survey of the Roman Empire, giving order and making assignation where he
 went for re-edifying of cities, towns, and forts decayed, and for cutting
 of rivers and streams, and for making bridges and passages, and for
 policing of cities and commonalties with new ordinances and
 constitutions, and granting new franchises and incorporations; so that
 his whole time was a very restoration of all the lapses and decays of
 former times.
 
 (7) Antoninus Pius, who succeeded him, was a prince excellently learned,
 and had the patient and subtle wit of a schoolman, insomuch as in common
 speech (which leaves no virtue untaxed) he was called _Cymini Sector_, a
 carver or a divider of cummin seed, which is one of the least seeds.
 Such a patience he had and settled spirit to enter into the least and
 most exact differences of causes, a fruit no doubt of the exceeding
 tranquillity and serenity of his mind, which being no ways charged or
 encumbered, either with fears, remorses, or scruples, but having been
 noted for a man of the purest goodness, without all fiction or
 affectation, that hath reigned or lived, made his mind continually
 present and entire.  He likewise approached a degree nearer unto
 Christianity, and became, as Agrippa said unto St. Paul, half a
 Christian, holding their religion and law in good opinion, and not only
 ceasing persecution, but giving way to the advancement of Christians.
 
 (5) There succeeded him the first _Divi fratres_, the two adoptive
 brethrenLucius Commodus Verus, son to lius Verus, who delighted much in
 the softer kind of learning, and was wont to call the poet Martial his
 Virgil; and Marcus Aurelius Antoninus: whereof the latter, who obscured
 his colleague and survived him long, was named the Philosopher, who, as
 he excelled all the rest in learning, so he excelled them likewise in
 perfection of all royal virtues; insomuch as Julianus the emperor, in his
 book entitled _Crsares_, being as a pasquil or satire to deride all his
 predecessors, feigned that they were all invited to a banquet of the
 gods, and Silenus the jester sat at the nether end of the table and
 bestowed a scoff on everyone as they came in; but when Marcus Philosophus
 came in, Silenus was gravelled and out of countenance, not knowing where
 to carp at him, save at the last he gave a glance at his patience towards
 his wife.  And the virtue of this prince, continued with that of his
 predecessor, made the name of Antoninus so sacred in the world, that
 though it were extremely dishonoured in Commodus, Caracalla, and
 Heliogabalus, who all bare the name, yet, when Alexander Severus refused
 the name because he was a stranger to the family, the Senate with one
 acclamation said, _Quomodo Augustus_, _sic et Antoninus_.  In such renown
 and veneration was the name of these two princes in those days, that they
 would have had it as a perpetual addition in all the emperors style.  In
 this emperors time also the Church for the most part was in peace; so as
 in this sequence of six princes we do see the blessed effects of learning
 in sovereignty, painted forth in the greatest table of the world.
 
 (9) But for a tablet or picture of smaller volume (not presuming to speak
 of your Majesty that liveth), in my judgment the most excellent is that
 of Queen Elizabeth, your immediate predecessor in this part of Britain; a
 prince that, if Plutarch were now alive to write lives by parallels,
 would trouble him, I think, to find for her a parallel amongst women.
 This lady was endued with learning in her sex singular, and rare even
 amongst masculine princeswhether we speak of learning, of language, or
 of science, modern or ancient, divinity or humanityand unto the very
 last year of her life she accustomed to appoint set hours for reading,
 scarcely any young student in a university more daily or more duly.  As
 for her government, I assure myself (I shall not exceed if I do affirm)
 that this part of the island never had forty-five years of better tines,
 and yet not through the calmness of the season, but through the wisdom of
 her regiment.  For if there be considered, of the one side, the truth of
 religion established, the constant peace and security, the good
 administration of justice, the temperate use of the prerogative, not
 slackened, nor much strained; the flourishing state of learning, sortable
 to so excellent a patroness; the convenient estate of wealth and means,
 both of crown and subject; the habit of obedience, and the moderation of
 discontents; and there be considered, on the other side, the differences
 of religion, the troubles of neighbour countries, the ambition of Spain,
 and opposition of Rome, and then that she was solitary and of herself;
 these things, I say, considered, as I could not have chosen an instance
 so recent and so proper, so I suppose I could not have chosen one more
 remarkable or eminent to the purpose now in hand, which is concerning the
 conjunction of learning in the prince with felicity in the people.
 
 (10) Neither hath learning an influence and operation only upon civil
 merit and moral virtue, and the arts or temperature of peace and
 peaceable government; but likewise it hath no less power and efficacy in
 enablement towards martial and military virtue and prowess, as may be
 notably represented in the examples of Alexander the Great and Csar the
 Dictator (mentioned before, but now in fit place to be resumed), of whose
 virtues and acts in war there needs no note or recital, having been the
 wonders of time in that kind; but of their affections towards learning
 and perfections in learning it is pertinent to say somewhat.
 
 (11) Alexander was bred and taught under Aristotle, the great
 philosopher, who dedicated divers of his books of philosophy unto him; he
 was attended with Callisthenes and divers other learned persons, that
 followed him in camp, throughout his journeys and conquests.  What price
 and estimation he had learning in doth notably appear in these three
 particulars: first, in the envy he used to express that he bare towards
 Achilles, in this, that he had so good a trumpet of his praises as
 Homers verses; secondly, in the judgment or solution he gave touching
 that precious cabinet of Darius, which was found among his jewels
 (whereof question was made what thing was worthy to be put into it, and
 he gave his opinion for Homers works); thirdly, in his letter to
 Aristotle, after he had set forth his books of nature, wherein he
 expostulateth with him for publishing the secrets or mysteries of
 philosophy; and gave him to understand that himself esteemed it more to
 excel other men in learning and knowledge than in power and empire.  And
 what use he had of learning doth appear, or rather shine, in all his
 speeches and answers, being full of science and use of science, and that
 in all variety.
 
 (12) And herein again it may seem a thing scholastical, and somewhat idle
 to recite things that every man knoweth; but yet, since the argument I
 handle leadeth me thereunto, I am glad that men shall perceive I am as
 willing to flatter (if they will so call it) an Alexander, or a Csar, or
 an Antoninus, that are dead many hundred years since, as any that now
 liveth; for it is the displaying of the glory of learning in sovereignty
 that I propound to myself, and not a humour of declaiming in any mans
 praises.  Observe, then, the speech he used of Diogenes, and see if it
 tend not to the true state of one of the greatest questions of moral
 philosophy: whether the enjoying of outward things, or the contemning of
 them, be the greatest happiness; for when he saw Diogenes so perfectly
 contented with so little, he said to those that mocked at his condition,
 were I not Alexander, I would wish to be Diogenes.  But Seneca
 inverteth it, and saith, _Plus erat_, _quod hic nollet accipere_, _qum
 quod ille posset dare_.  There were more things which Diogenes would
 have refused than those were which Alexander could have given or enjoyed.
 
 (13) Observe, again, that speech which was usual with him,That he felt
 his mortality chiefly in two things, sleep and lust; and see if it were
 not a speech extracted out of the depth of natural philosophy, and liker
 to have come out of the mouth of Aristotle or Democritus than from
 Alexander.
 
 (14) See, again, that speech of humanity and poesy, when, upon the
 bleeding of his wounds, he called unto him one of his flatterers, that
 was wont to ascribe to him divine honour, and said, Look, this is very
 blood; this is not such a liquor as Homer speaketh of, which ran from
 Venus hand when it was pierced by Diomedes.
 
 (15) See likewise his readiness in reprehension of logic in the speech he
 used to Cassander, upon a complaint that was made against his father
 Antipater; for when Alexander happened to say, Do you think these men
 would have come from so far to complain except they had just cause of
 grief? and Cassander answered, Yea, that was the matter, because they
 thought they should not be disproved; said Alexander, laughing, See the
 subtleties of Aristotle, to take a matter both ways, _pro et contra_,
 &c.
 
 (16) But note, again, how well he could use the same art which he
 reprehended to serve his own humour: when bearing a secret grudge to
 Callisthenes, because he was against the new ceremony of his adoration,
 feasting one night where the same Callisthenes was at the table, it was
 moved by some after supper, for entertainment sake, that Callisthenes,
 who was an eloquent man, might speak of some theme or purpose at his own
 choice; which Callisthenes did, choosing the praise of the Macedonian
 nation for his discourse, and performing the same with so good manner as
 the hearers were much ravished; whereupon Alexander, nothing pleased,
 said, It was easy to be eloquent upon so good a subject; but, saith he,
 turn your style, and let us hear what you can say against us; which
 Callisthenes presently undertook, and did with that sting and life that
 Alexander interrupted him, and said, The goodness of the cause made him
 eloquent before, and despite made him eloquent then again.
 
 (17) Consider further, for tropes of rhetoric, that excellent use of a
 metaphor or translation, wherewith he taxeth Antipater, who was an
 imperious and tyrannous governor; for when one of Antipaters friends
 commended him to Alexander for his moderation, that he did not degenerate
 as his other lieutenants did into the Persian pride, in uses of purple,
 but kept the ancient habit of Macedon, of black.  True, saith
 Alexander; but Antipater is all purple within.  Or that other, when
 Parmenio came to him in the plain of Arbela and showed him the
 innumerable multitude of his enemies, specially as they appeared by the
 infinite number of lights as it had been a new firmament of stars, and
 thereupon advised him to assail them by night; whereupon he answered,
 That he would not steal the victory.
 
 (18) For matter of policy, weigh that significant distinction, so much in
 all ages embraced, that he made between his two friends Hephstion and
 Craterus, when he said, That the one loved Alexander, and the other
 loved the king: describing the principal difference of princes best
 servants, that some in affection love their person, and other in duty
 love their crown.
 
 (19) Weigh also that excellent taxation of an error, ordinary with
 counsellors of princes, that they counsel their masters according to the
 model of their own mind and fortune, and not of their masters.  When upon
 Darius great offers Parmenio had said, Surely I would accept these
 offers were I as Alexander; saith Alexander, So would I were I as
 Parmenio.
 
 (20) Lastly, weigh that quick and acute reply which he made when he gave
 so large gifts to his friends and servants, and was asked what he did
 reserve for himself, and he answered, Hope.  Weigh, I say, whether he
 had not cast up his account aright, because _hope_ must be the portion of
 all that resolve upon great enterprises; for this was Csars portion
 when he went first into Gaul, his estate being then utterly overthrown
 with largesses.  And this was likewise the portion of that noble prince,
 howsoever transported with ambition, Henry Duke of Guise, of whom it was
 usually said that he was the greatest usurer in France, because he had
 turned all his estate into obligations.
 
 (21) To conclude, therefore, as certain critics are used to say
 hyperbolically, That if all sciences were lost they might be found in
 Virgil, so certainly this may be said truly, there are the prints and
 footsteps of learning in those few speeches which are reported of this
 prince, the admiration of whom, when I consider him not as Alexander the
 Great, but as Aristotles scholar, hath carried me too far.
 
 (22) As for Julius Csar, the excellency of his learning needeth not to
 be argued from his education, or his company, or his speeches; but in a
 further degree doth declare itself in his writings and works: whereof
 some are extant and permanent, and some unfortunately perished.  For
 first, we see there is left unto us that excellent history of his own
 wars, which he entitled only a Commentary, wherein all succeeding times
 have admired the solid weight of matter, and the real passages and lively
 images of actions and persons, expressed in the greatest propriety of
 words and perspicuity of narration that ever was; which that it was not
 the effect of a natural gift, but of learning and precept, is well
 witnessed by that work of his entitled _De Analogia_, being a grammatical
 philosophy, wherein he did labour to make this same _Vox ad placitum_ to
 become _Vox ad licitum_, and to reduce custom of speech to congruity of
 speech; and took as it were the pictures of words from the life of
 reason.
 
 (23) So we receive from him, as a monument both of his power and
 learning, the then reformed computation of the year; well expressing that
 he took it to be as great a glory to himself to observe and know the law
 of the heavens, as to give law to men upon the earth.
 
 (24) So likewise in that book of his, _Anti-Cato_, it may easily appear
 that he did aspire as well to victory of wit as victory of war:
 undertaking therein a conflict against the greatest champion with the pen
 that then lived, Cicero the orator.
 
 (25) So, again, in his book of Apophthegms, which he collected, we see
 that he esteemed it more honour to make himself but a pair of tables, to
 take the wise and pithy words of others, than to have every word of his
 own to be made an apophthegm or an oracle, as vain princes, by custom of
 flattery, pretend to do.  And yet if I should enumerate divers of his
 speeches, as I did those of Alexander, they are truly such as Solomon
 noteth, when he saith, _Verba sapientum tanquam aculei_, _et tanquam
 clavi in altum defixi_: whereof I will only recite three, not so
 delectable for elegancy, but admirable for vigour and efficacy.
 
 (26) As first, it is reason he be thought a master of words, that could
 with one word appease a mutiny in his army, which was thus: The Romans,
 when their generals did speak to their army, did use the word _Milites_,
 but when the magistrates spake to the people they did use the word
 _Quirites_.  The soldiers were in tumult, and seditiously prayed to be
 cashiered; not that they so meant, but by expostulation thereof to draw
 Csar to other conditions; wherein he being resolute not to give way,
 after some silence, he began his speech, _Ego Quirites_, which did admit
 them already cashieredwherewith they were so surprised, crossed, and
 confused, as they would not suffer him to go on in his speech, but
 relinquished their demands, and made it their suit to be again called by
 the name of _Milites_.
 
 (27) The second speech was thus: Csar did extremely affect the name of
 king; and some were set on as he passed by in popular acclamation to
 salute him king.  Whereupon, finding the cry weak and poor, he put it off
 thus, in a kind of jest, as if they had mistaken his surname: _Non Rex
 sum_, _sed Csar_; a speech that, if it be searched, the life and fulness
 of it can scarce be expressed.  For, first, it was a refusal of the name,
 but yet not serious; again, it did signify an infinite confidence and
 magnanimity, as if he presumed Csar was the greater title, as by his
 worthiness it is come to pass till this day.  But chiefly it was a speech
 of great allurement toward his own purpose, as if the state did strive
 with him but for a name, whereof mean families were vested; for _Rex_ was
 a surname with the Romans, as well as _King_ is with us.
 
 (28) The last speech which I will mention was used to Metellus, when
 Csar, after war declared, did possess himself of this city of Rome; at
 which time, entering into the inner treasury to take the money there
 accumulate, Metellus, being tribune, forbade him.  Whereto Csar said,
 That if he did not desist, he would lay him dead in the place.  And
 presently taking himself up, he added, Young man, it is harder for me to
 speak it than to do it_Adolescens_, _durius est mihi hoc dicere qum
 facere_.  A speech compounded of the greatest terror and greatest
 clemency that could proceed out of the mouth of man.
 
 (29) But to return and conclude with him, it is evident himself knew well
 his own perfection in learning, and took it upon him, as appeared when
 upon occasion that some spake what a strange resolution it was in Lucius
 Sylla to resign his dictators, he, scoffing at him to his own advantage,
 answered, That Sylla could not skill of letters, and therefore knew not
 how to dictate.
 
 (30) And here it were fit to leave this point, touching the concurrence
 of military virtue and learning (for what example should come with any
 grace after those two of Alexander and Csar?), were it not in regard of
 the rareness of circumstance, that I find in one other particular, as
 that which did so suddenly pass from extreme scorn to extreme wonder: and
 it is of Xenophon the philosopher, who went from Socrates school into
 Asia in the expedition of Cyrus the younger against King Artaxerxes.
 This Xenophon at that time was very young, and never had seen the wars
 before, neither had any command in the army, but only followed the war as
 a voluntary, for the love and conversation of Proxenus, his friend.  He
 was present when Falinus came in message from the great king to the
 Grecians, after that Cyrus was slain in the field, and they, a handful of
 men, left to themselves in the midst of the kings territories, cut off
 from their country by many navigable rivers and many hundred miles.  The
 message imported that they should deliver up their arms and submit
 themselves to the kings mercy.  To which message, before answer was
 made, divers of the army conferred familiarly with Falinus; and amongst
 the rest Xenophon happened to say, Why, Falinus, we have now but these
 two things left, our arms and our virtue; and if we yield up our arms,
 how shall we make use of our virtue?  Whereto Falinus, smiling on him,
 said, If I be not deceived, young gentleman, you are an Athenian, and I
 believe you study philosophy, and it is pretty that you say; but you are
 much abused if you think your virtue can withstand the kings power.
 Here was the scorn; the wonder followed: which was that this young
 scholar or philosopher, after all the captains were murdered in parley by
 treason, conducted those ten thousand foot, through the heart of all the
 kings high countries, from Babylon to Grcia in safety, in despite of
 all the kings forces, to the astonishment of the world, and the
 encouragement of the Grecians in times succeeding to make invasion upon
 the kings of Persia, as was after purposed by Jason the Thessalian,
 attempted by Agesilaus the Spartan, and achieved by Alexander the
 Macedonian, all upon the ground of the act of that young scholar.
 
 VIII. (1) To proceed now from imperial and military virtue to moral and
 private virtue; first, it is an assured truth, which is contained in the
 verses:
 
     Scilicet ingenuas didicisse fideliter artes
     Emollit mores nec sinit esse feros.
 
 It taketh away the wildness and barbarism and fierceness of mens minds;
 but indeed the accent had need be upon _fideliter_; for a little
 superficial learning doth rather work a contrary effect.  It taketh away
 all levity, temerity, and insolency, by copious suggestion of all doubts
 and difficulties, and acquainting the mind to balance reasons on both
 sides, and to turn back the first offers and conceits of the mind, and to
 accept of nothing but examined and tried.  It taketh away vain admiration
 of anything, which is the root of all weakness.  For all things are
 admired, either because they are new, or because they are great.  For
 novelty, no man that wadeth in learning or contemplation thoroughly but
 will find that printed in his heart, _Nil novi super terram_.  Neither
 can any man marvel at the play of puppets, that goeth behind the curtain,
 and adviseth well of the motion.  And for magnitude, as Alexander the
 Great, after that he was used to great armies, and the great conquests of
 the spacious provinces in Asia, when he received letters out of Greece,
 of some fights and services there, which were commonly for a passage or a
 fort, or some walled town at the most, he said:It seemed to him that he
 was advertised of the battles of the frogs and the mice, that the old
 tales went of.  So certainly, if a man meditate much upon the universal
 frame of nature, the earth with men upon it (the divineness of souls
 except) will not seem much other than an ant-hill, whereas some ants
 carry corn, and some carry their young, and some go empty, and all to and
 fro a little heap of dust.  It taketh away or mitigateth fear of death or
 adverse fortune, which is one of the greatest impediments of virtue and
 imperfections of manners.  For if a mans mind be deeply seasoned with
 the consideration of the mortality and corruptible nature of things, he
 will easily concur with Epictetus, who went forth one day and saw a woman
 weeping for her pitcher of earth that was broken, and went forth the next
 day and saw a woman weeping for her son that was dead, and thereupon
 said, _Heri vidi fragilem frangi_, _hodie vidi mortalem mori_.  And,
 therefore, Virgil did excellently and profoundly couple the knowledge of
 causes and the conquest of all fears together, as _concomitantia_.
 
     Felix, qui potuit rerum cognoscere causas,
     Quique metus omnes, et inexorabile fatum
     Subjecit pedibus, strepitumque Acherontis avari.
 
 (2) It were too long to go over the particular remedies which learning
 doth minister to all the diseases of the mind: sometimes purging the ill
 humours, sometimes opening the obstructions, sometimes helping digestion,
 sometimes increasing appetite, sometimes healing the wounds and
 exulcerations thereof, and the like; and, therefore, I will conclude with
 that which hath _rationem totius_which is, that it disposeth the
 constitution of the mind not to be fixed or settled in the defects
 thereof, but still to be capable and susceptible of growth and
 reformation.  For the unlearned man knows not what it is to descend into
 himself, or to call himself to account, nor the pleasure of that
 _suavissima vita_, _indies sentire se fieri meliorem_.  The good parts he
 hath he will learn to show to the full, and use them dexterously, but not
 much to increase them.  The faults he hath he will learn how to hide and
 colour them, but not much to amend them; like an ill mower, that mows on
 still, and never whets his scythe.  Whereas with the learned man it fares
 otherwise, that he doth ever intermix the correction and amendment of his
 mind with the use and employment thereof.  Nay, further, in general and
 in sum, certain it is that _Veritas_ and _Bonitas_ differ but as the seal
 and the print; for truth prints goodness, and they be the clouds of error
 which descend in the storms of passions and perturbations.
 
 (3) From moral virtue let us pass on to matter of power and commandment,
 and consider whether in right reason there be any comparable with that
 wherewith knowledge investeth and crowneth mans nature.  We see the
 dignity of the commandment is according to the dignity of the commanded;
 to have commandment over beasts as herdmen have, is a thing contemptible;
 to have commandment over children as schoolmasters have, is a matter of
 small honour; to have commandment over galley-slaves is a disparagement
 rather than an honour.  Neither is the commandment of tyrants much
 better, over people which have put off the generosity of their minds;
 and, therefore, it was ever holden that honours in free monarchies and
 commonwealths had a sweetness more than in tyrannies, because the
 commandment extendeth more over the wills of men, and not only over their
 deeds and services.  And therefore, when Virgil putteth himself forth to
 attribute to Augustus Csar the best of human honours, he doth it in
 these words:
 
           Victorque volentes
     Per populos dat jura, viamque affectat Olympo.
 
 But yet the commandment of knowledge is yet higher than the commandment
 over the will; for it is a commandment over the reason, belief, and
 understanding of man, which is the highest part of the mind, and giveth
 law to the will itself.  For there is no power on earth which setteth up
 a throne or chair of estate in the spirits and souls of men, and in their
 cogitations, imaginations, opinions, and beliefs, but knowledge and
 learning.  And therefore we see the detestable and extreme pleasure that
 arch-heretics, and false prophets, and impostors are transported with,
 when they once find in themselves that they have a superiority in the
 faith and conscience of men; so great as if they have once tasted of it,
 it is seldom seen that any torture or persecution can make them
 relinquish or abandon it.  But as this is that which the author of the
 Revelation calleth the depth or profoundness of Satan, so by argument of
 contraries, the just and lawful sovereignty over mens understanding, by
 force of truth rightly interpreted, is that which approacheth nearest to
 the similitude of the divine rule.
 
 (4) As for fortune and advancement, the beneficence of learning is not so
 confined to give fortune only to states and commonwealths, as it doth not
 likewise give fortune to particular persons.  For it was well noted long
 ago, that Homer hath given more men their livings, than either Sylla, or
 Csar, or Augustus ever did, notwithstanding their great largesses and
 donatives, and distributions of lands to so many legions.  And no doubt
 it is hard to say whether arms or learning have advanced greater numbers.
 And in case of sovereignty we see, that if arms or descent have carried
 away the kingdom, yet learning hath carried the priesthood, which ever
 hath been in some competition with empire.
 
 (5) Again, for the pleasure and delight of knowledge and learning, it far
 surpasseth all other in nature.  For, shall the pleasures of the
 affections so exceed the pleasure of the sense, as much as the obtaining
 of desire or victory exceedeth a song or a dinner? and must not of
 consequence the pleasures of the intellect or understanding exceed the
 pleasures of the affections?  We see in all other pleasures there is
 satiety, and after they be used, their verdure departeth, which showeth
 well they be but deceits of pleasure, and not pleasures; and that it was
 the novelty which pleased, and not the quality.  And, therefore, we see
 that voluptuous men turn friars, and ambitions princes turn melancholy.
 But of knowledge there is no satiety, but satisfaction and appetite are
 perpetually interchangeable; and, therefore, appeareth to be good in
 itself simply, without fallacy or accident.  Neither is that pleasure of
 small efficacy and contentment to the mind of man, which the poet
 Lucretius describeth elegantly:
 
     Suave mari magno, turbantibus quora ventis, &c.
 
 It is a view of delight, saith he, to stand or walk upon the shore
 side, and to see a ship tossed with tempest upon the sea; or to be in a
 fortified tower, and to see two battles join upon a plain.  But it is a
 pleasure incomparable, for the mind of man to be settled, landed, and
 fortified in the certainty of truth; and from thence to descry and behold
 the errors, perturbations, labours, and wanderings up and down of other
 men.
 
 (6) Lastly, leaving the vulgar arguments, that by learning man excelleth
 man in that wherein man excelleth beasts; that by learning man ascendeth
 to the heavens and their motions, where in body he cannot come; and the
 like: let us conclude with the dignity and excellency of knowledge and
 learning in that whereunto mans nature doth most aspire, which is
 immortality, or continuance; for to this tendeth generation, and raising
 of houses and families; to this tend buildings, foundations, and
 monuments; to this tendeth the desire of memory, fame, and celebration;
 and in effect the strength of all other human desires.  We see then how
 far the monuments of wit and learning are more durable than the monuments
 of power or of the hands.  For have not the verses of Homer continued
 twenty-five hundred years, or more, without the loss of a syllable or
 letter; during which the infinite palaces, temples, castles, cities, have
 been decayed and demolished?  It is not possible to have the true
 pictures or statues of Cyrus, Alexander, Csar, no nor of the kings or
 great personages of much later years; for the originals cannot last, and
 the copies cannot but leese of the life and truth.  But the images of
 mens wits and knowledges remain in books, exempted from the wrong of
 time and capable of perpetual renovation.  Neither are they fitly to be
 called images, because they generate still, and cast their seeds in the
 minds of others, provoking and causing infinite actions and opinions in
 succeeding ages.  So that if the invention of the ship was thought so
 noble, which carrieth riches and commodities from place to place, and
 consociateth the most remote regions in participation of their fruits,
 how much more are letters to be magnified, which as ships pass through
 the vast seas of time, and make ages so distant to participate of the
 wisdom, illuminations, and inventions, the one of the other?  Nay,
 further, we see some of the philosophers which were least divine, and
 most immersed in the senses, and denied generally the immortality of the
 soul, yet came to this point, that whatsoever motions the spirit of man
 could act and perform without the organs of the body, they thought might
 remain after death, which were only those of the understanding and not of
 the affection; so immortal and incorruptible a thing did knowledge seem
 unto them to be.  But we, that know by divine revelation that not only
 the understanding but the affections purified, not only the spirit but
 the body changed, shall be advanced to immortality, do disclaim in these
 rudiments of the senses.  But it must be remembered, both in this last
 point, and so it may likewise be needful in other places, that in
 probation of the dignity of knowledge or learning, I did in the beginning
 separate divine testimony from human, which method I have pursued, and so
 handled them both apart.
 
 (7) Nevertheless I do not pretend, and I know it will be impossible for
 me, by any pleading of mine, to reverse the judgment, either of sops
 cock, that preferred the barleycorn before the gem; or of Midas, that
 being chosen judge between Apollo, president of the Muses, and Pan, god
 of the flocks, judged for plenty; or of Paris, that judged for beauty and
 love against wisdom and power; or of Agrippina, _occidat matrem_, _modo
 imperet_, that preferred empire with any condition never so detestable;
 or of Ulysses, _qui vetulam prtulit immortalitati_, being a figure of
 those which prefer custom and habit before all excellency, or of a number
 of the like popular judgments.  For these things must continue as they
 have been; but so will that also continue whereupon learning hath ever
 relied, and which faileth not: _Justificata est sapientia a filiis suis_.
 
 
 
 
 THE SECOND BOOK.
 
 
                               _To the King_.
 
 1.  IT might seem to have more convenience, though it come often
 otherwise to pass (excellent King), that those which are fruitful in
 their generations, and have in themselves the foresight of immortality in
 their descendants, should likewise be more careful of the good estate of
 future times, unto which they know they must transmit and commend over
 their dearest pledges.  Queen Elizabeth was a sojourner in the world in
 respect of her unmarried life, and was a blessing to her own times; and
 yet so as the impression of her good government, besides her happy
 memory, is not without some effect which doth survive her.  But to your
 Majesty, whom God hath already blessed with so much royal issue, worthy
 to continue and represent you for ever, and whose youthful and fruitful
 bed doth yet promise many the like renovations, it is proper and
 agreeable to be conversant not only in the transitory parts of good
 government, but in those acts also which are in their nature permanent
 and perpetual.  Amongst the which (if affection do not transport me)
 there is not any more worthy than the further endowment of the world with
 sound and fruitful knowledge.  For why should a few received authors
 stand up like Hercules columns, beyond which there should be no sailing
 or discovering, since we have so bright and benign a star as your Majesty
 to conduct and prosper us?  To return therefore where we left, it
 remaineth to consider of what kind those acts are which have been
 undertaken and performed by kings and others for the increase and
 advancement of learning, wherein I purpose to speak actively, without
 digressing or dilating.
 
 2.  Let this ground therefore be laid, that all works are over common by
 amplitude of reward, by soundness of direction, and by the conjunction of
 labours.  The first multiplieth endeavour, the second preventeth error,
 and the third supplieth the frailty of man.  But the principal of these
 is direction, for _claudus in via antevertit cursorem extra viam_; and
 Solomon excellently setteth it down, If the iron be not sharp, it
 requireth more strength, but wisdom is that which prevaileth, signifying
 that the invention or election of the mean is more effectual than any
 enforcement or accumulation of endeavours.  This I am induced to speak,
 for that (not derogating from the noble intention of any that have been
 deservers towards the state of learning), I do observe nevertheless that
 their works and acts are rather matters of magnificence and memory than
 of progression and proficience, and tend rather to augment the mass of
 learning in the multitude of learned men than to rectify or raise the
 sciences themselves.
 
 3.  The works or acts of merit towards learning are conversant about
 three objectsthe places of learning, the books of learning, and the
 persons of the learned.  For as water, whether it be the dew of heaven or
 the springs of the earth, doth scatter and leese itself in the ground,
 except it be collected into some receptacle where it may by union comfort
 and sustain itself; and for that cause the industry of man hath made and
 framed springheads, conduits, cisterns, and pools, which men have
 accustomed likewise to beautify and adorn with accomplishments of
 magnificence and state, as well as of use and necessity; so this
 excellent liquor of knowledge, whether it descend from divine
 inspiration, or spring from human sense, would soon perish and vanish to
 oblivion, if it were not preserved in books, traditions, conferences, and
 places appointed, as universities, colleges, and schools, for the receipt
 and comforting of the same.
 
 4.  The works which concern the seats and places of learning are
 fourfoundations and buildings, endowments with revenues, endowments with
 franchises and privileges, institutions and ordinances for governmentall
 tending to quietness and privateness of life, and discharge of cares and
 troubles; much like the stations which Virgil prescribeth for the hiving
 of bees:
 
     Principio sedes apibus statioque petenda,
     Quo neque sit ventis aditus, &c.
 
 5.  The works touching books are twofirst, libraries, which are as the
 shrines where all the relics of the ancient saints, full of true virtue,
 and that without delusion or imposture, are preserved and reposed;
 secondly, new editions of authors, with more correct impressions, more
 faithful translations, more profitable glosses, more diligent
 annotations, and the like.
 
 6.  The works pertaining to the persons of learned men (besides the
 advancement and countenancing of them in general) are twothe reward and
 designation of readers in sciences already extant and invented; and the
 reward and designation of writers and inquirers concerning any parts of
 learning not sufficiently laboured and prosecuted.
 
 7.  These are summarily the works and acts wherein the merits of many
 excellent princes and other worthy personages, have been conversant.  As
 for any particular commemorations, I call to mind what Cicero said when
 he gave general thanks, _Difficile non aliquem_, _ingratum quenquam
 prterire_.  Let us rather, according to the Scriptures, look unto that
 part of the race which is before us, than look back to that which is
 already attained.
 
 8.  First, therefore, amongst so many great foundations of colleges in
 Europe, I find strange that they are all dedicated to professions, and
 none left free to arts and sciences at large.  For if men judge that
 learning should be referred to action, they judge well; but in this they
 fall into the error described in the ancient fable, in which the other
 parts of the body did suppose the stomach had been idle, because it
 neither performed the office of motion, as the limbs do, nor of sense, as
 the head doth; but yet notwithstanding it is the stomach that digesteth
 and distributeth to all the rest.  So if any man think philosophy and
 universality to be idle studies, he doth not consider that all
 professions are from thence served and supplied.  And this I take to be a
 great cause that hath hindered the progression of learning, because these
 fundamental knowledges have been studied but in passage.  For if you will
 have a tree bear more fruit than it hath used to do, it is not anything
 you can do to the boughs, but it is the stirring of the earth and putting
 new mould about thee roots that must work it.  Neither is it to be
 forgotten, that this dedicating of foundations and dotations to
 professory learning hath not only had a malign aspect and influence upon
 the growth of sciences, but hath also been prejudicial to states, and
 governments.  For hence it proceedeth that princes find a solitude in
 regard of able men to serve them in causes of estate, because there is no
 education collegiate which is free, where such as were so disposed might
 give themselves in histories, modern languages, books of policy and civil
 discourse, and other the like enablements unto service of estate.
 
 9.  And because founders of colleges do plant, and founders of lectures
 do water, it followeth well in order to speak of the defect which is in
 public lectures; namely, in the smallness, and meanness of the salary or
 reward which in most places is assigned unto them, whether they be
 lectures of arts, or of professions.  For it is necessary to the
 progression of sciences that readers be of the most able and sufficient
 men; as those which are ordained for generating and propagating of
 sciences, and not for transitory use.  This cannot be, except their
 condition and endowment be such as may content the ablest man to
 appropriate his whole labour and continue his whole age in that function
 and attendance; and therefore must have a proportion answerable to that
 mediocrity or competency of advancement, which may be expected from a
 profession or the practice of a profession.  So as, if you will have
 sciences flourish, you must observe Davids military law, which was,
 That those which stayed with the carriage should have equal part with
 those which were in the action; else will the carriages be ill attended.
 So readers in sciences are indeed the guardians of the stores and
 provisions of sciences, whence men in active courses are furnished, and
 therefore ought to have equal entertainment with them; otherwise if the
 fathers in sciences be of the weakest sort or be ill maintained,
 
     Et patrum invalidi referent jejunia nati.
 
 10.  Another defect I note, wherein I shall need some alchemist to help
 me, who call upon men to sell their books, and to build furnaces;
 quitting and forsaking Minerva and the Muses as barren virgins, and
 relying upon Vulcan.  But certain it is, that unto the deep, fruitful,
 and operative study of many sciences, specialty natural philosophy and
 physic, books be not only the instrumentals; wherein also the beneficence
 of men hath not been altogether wanting.  For we see spheres, globes,
 astrolabes, maps, and the like, have been provided as appurtenances to
 astronomy and cosmography, as well as books.  We see likewise that some
 places instituted for physic have annexed the commodity of gardens for
 simples of all sorts, and do likewise command the use of dead bodies for
 anatomies.  But these do respect but a few things.  In general, there
 will hardly be any main proficience in the disclosing of nature, except
 there be some allowance for expenses about experiments; whether they be
 experiments appertaining to Vulcanus or Ddalus, furnace or engine, or
 any other kind.  And therefore as secretaries and spials of princes and
 states bring in bills for intelligence, so you must allow the spials and
 intelligencers of nature to bring in their bills; or else you shall be
 ill advertised.
 
 11.  And if Alexander made such a liberal assignation to Aristotle of
 treasure for the allowance of hunters, fowlers, fishers, and the like,
 that he might compile a history of nature, much better do they deserve it
 that travail in arts of nature.
 
 12.  Another defect which I note is an intermission or neglect in those
 which are governors in universities, of consultation, and in princes or
 superior persons, of visitation: to enter into account and consideration,
 whether the readings, exercises, and other customs appertaining unto
 learning, anciently begun and since continued, be well instituted or no;
 and thereupon to ground an amendment or reformation in that which shall
 be found inconvenient.  For it is one of your Majestys own most wise and
 princely maxims, That in all usages and precedents, the times be
 considered wherein they first began; which if they were weak or ignorant,
 it derogateth from the authority of the usage, and leaveth it for
 suspect.  And therefore inasmuch as most of the usages and orders of the
 universities were derived from more obscure times, it is the more
 requisite they be re-examined.  In this kind I will give an instance or
 two, for example sake, of things that are the most obvious and familiar.
 The one is a matter, which though it be ancient and general, yet I hold
 to be an error; which is, that scholars in universities come too soon and
 too unripe to logic and rhetoric, arts fitter for graduates than children
 and novices.  For these two, rightly taken, are the gravest of sciences,
 being the arts of arts; the one for judgment, the other for ornament.
 And they be the rules and directions how to set forth and dispose matter:
 and therefore for minds empty and unfraught with matter, and which have
 not gathered that which Cicero calleth _sylva_ and _supellex_, stuff and
 variety, to begin with those arts (as if one should learn to weigh, or to
 measure, or to paint the wind) doth work but this effect, that the wisdom
 of those arts, which is great and universal, is almost made contemptible,
 and is degenerate into childish sophistry and ridiculous affectation.
 And further, the untimely learning of them hath drawn on by consequence
 the superficial and unprofitable teaching and writing of them, as fitteth
 indeed to the capacity of children.  Another is a lack I find in the
 exercises used in the universities, which do snake too great a divorce
 between invention and memory.  For their speeches are either premeditate,
 in _verbis conceptis_, where nothing is left to invention, or merely
 extemporal, where little is left to memory.  Whereas in life and action
 there is least use of either of these, but rather of intermixtures of
 premeditation and invention, notes and memory.  So as the exercise
 fitteth not the practice, nor the image the life; and it is ever a true
 rule in exercises, that they be framed as near as may be to the life of
 practice; for otherwise they do pervert the motions and faculties of the
 mind, and not prepare them.  The truth whereof is not obscure, when
 scholars come to the practices of professions, or other actions of civil
 life; which when they set into, this want is soon found by themselves,
 and sooner by others.  But this part, touching the amendment of the
 institutions and orders of universities, I will conclude with the clause
 of Csars letter to Oppius and Balbes, _Hoc quemadmodum fieri possit_,
 _nonnulla mihi in mentem veniunt_, _et multa reperiri possunt_: _de iis
 rebus rgo vos ut cogitationem suscipiatis_.
 
 13.  Another defect which I note ascendeth a little higher than the
 precedent.  For as the proficience of learning consisteth much in the
 orders and institutions of universities in the same states and kingdoms,
 so it would be yet more advanced, if there were more intelligence mutual
 between the universities of Europe than now there is.  We see there be
 many orders and foundations, which though they be divided under several
 sovereignties and territories, yet they take themselves to have a kind of
 contract, fraternity, and correspondence one with the other, insomuch as
 they have provincials and generals.  And surely as nature createth
 brotherhood in families, and arts mechanical contract brotherhoods in
 communalties, and the anointment of God superinduceth a brotherhood in
 kings and bishops, so in like manner there cannot but be a fraternity in
 learning and illumination, relating to that paternity which is attributed
 to God, who is called the Father of illuminations or lights.
 
 14.  The last defect which I will note is, that there hath not been, or
 very rarely been, any public designation of writers or inquirers
 concerning such parts of knowledge as may appear not to have been already
 sufficiently laboured or undertaken; unto which point it is an inducement
 to enter into a view and examination what parts of learning have been
 prosecuted, and what omitted.  For the opinion of plenty is amongst the
 causes of want, and the great quantity of books maketh a show rather of
 superfluity than lack; which surcharge nevertheless is not to be remedied
 by making no more books, but by making more good books, which, as the
 serpent of Moses, might devour the serpents of the enchanters.
 
 15.  The removing of all the defects formerly enumerate, except the last,
 and of the active part also of the last (which is the designation of
 writers), are _opera basilica_; towards which the endeavours of a private
 man may be but as an image in a crossway, that may point at the way, but
 cannot go it.  But the inducing part of the latter (which is the survey
 of learning) may be set forward by private travail.  Wherefore I will now
 attempt to make a general and faithful perambulation of learning, with an
 inquiry what parts thereof lie fresh and waste, and not improved and
 converted by the industry of man, to the end that such a plot made and
 recorded to memory may both minister light to any public designation,
 and, also serve to excite voluntary endeavours.  Wherein, nevertheless,
 my purpose is at this time to note only omissions and deficiences, and
 not to make any redargution of errors or incomplete prosecutions.  For it
 is one thing to set forth what ground lieth unmanured, and another thing
 to correct ill husbandry in that which is manured.
 
 In the handling and undertaking of which work I am not ignorant what it
 is that I do now move and attempt, nor insensible of mine own weakness to
 sustain my purpose.  But my hope is, that if my extreme love to learning
 carry me too far, I may obtain the excuse of affection; for that It is
 not granted to man to love and to be wise.  But I know well I can use no
 other liberty of judgment than I must leave to others; and I for my part
 shall be indifferently glad either to perform myself, or accept from
 another, that duty of humanity_Nam qui erranti comiter monstrat viam_,
 &c.  I do foresee likewise that of those things which I shall enter and
 register as deficiences and omissions, many will conceive and censure
 that some of them are already done and extant; others to be but
 curiosities, and things of no great use; and others to be of too great
 difficulty, and almost impossibility to be compassed and effected.  But
 for the two first, I refer myself to the particulars.  For the last,
 touching impossibility, I take it those things are to be held possible
 which may be done by some person, though not by every one; and which may
 be done by many, though not by any one; and which may be done in the
 succession of ages, though not within the hourglass of one mans life;
 and which may be done by public designation, though not by private
 endeavour.  But, notwithstanding, if any man will take to himself rather
 that of Solomon, _Dicit piger_, _Leo est in via_, than that of Virgil,
 _Possunt quia posse videntur_, I shall be content that my labours be
 esteemed but as the better sort of wishes; for as it asketh some
 knowledge to demand a question not impertinent, so it requireth some
 sense to make a wish not absurd.
 
 I. (1) The parts of human learning have reference to the three parts of
 mans understanding, which is the seat of learning: history to his
 memory, poesy to his imagination, and philosophy to his reason.  Divine
 learning receiveth the same distribution; for, the spirit of man is the
 same, though the revelation of oracle and sense be diverse.  So as
 theology consisteth also of history of the Church; of parables, which is
 divine poesy; and of holy doctrine or precept.  For as for that part
 which seemeth supernumerary, which is prophecy, it is but divine history,
 which hath that prerogative over human, as the narration may be before
 the fact as well as after.
 
 (2) History is natural, civil, ecclesiastical, and literary; whereof the
 first three I allow as extant, the fourth I note as deficient.  For no
 man hath propounded to himself the general state of learning to be
 described and represented from age to age, as many have done the works of
 Nature, and the state, civil and ecclesiastical; without which the
 history of the world seemeth to me to be as the statue of Polyphemus with
 his eye out, that part being wanting which doth most show the spirit and
 life of the person.  And yet I am not ignorant that in divers particular
 sciences, as of the jurisconsults, the mathematicians, the rhetoricians,
 the philosophers, there are set down some small memorials of the schools,
 authors, and books; and so likewise some barren relations touching the
 invention of arts or usages.  But a just story of learning, containing
 the antiquities and originals of knowledges and their sects, their
 inventions, their traditions, their diverse administrations and
 managings, their flourishings, their oppositions, decays, depressions,
 oblivions, removes, with the causes and occasions of them, and all other
 events concerning learning, throughout the ages of the world, I may truly
 affirm to be wanting; the use and end of which work I do not so much
 design for curiosity or satisfaction of those that are the lovers of
 learning, but chiefly for a more serious and grave purpose, which is this
 in few words, that it will make learned men wise in the use and
 administration of learning.  For it is not Saint Augustines nor Saint
 Ambroses works that will make so wise a divine as ecclesiastical history
 thoroughly read and observed, and the same reason is of learning.
 
 (3) History of Nature is of three sorts; of Nature in course, of Nature
 erring or varying, and of Nature altered or wrought; that is, history of
 creatures, history of marvels, and history of arts.  The first of these
 no doubt is extant, and that in good perfection; the two latter are
 bandied so weakly and unprofitably as I am moved to note them as
 deficient.  For I find no sufficient or competent collection of the works
 of Nature which have a digression and deflexion from the ordinary course
 of generations, productions, and motions; whether they be singularities
 of place and region, or the strange events of time and chance, or the
 effects of yet unknown properties, or the instances of exception to
 general kinds.  It is true I find a number of books of fabulous
 experiments and secrets, and frivolous impostures for pleasure and
 strangeness; but a substantial and severe collection of the heteroclites
 or irregulars of Nature, well examined and described, I find not,
 specially not with due rejection of fables and popular errors.  For as
 things now are, if an untruth in Nature be once on foot, what by reason
 of the neglect of examination, and countenance of antiquity, and what by
 reason of the use of the opinion in similitudes and ornaments of speech,
 it is never called down.
 
 (4) The use of this work, honoured with a precedent in Aristotle, is
 nothing less than to give contentment to the appetite of curious and vain
 wits, as the manner of Mirabilaries is to do; but for two reasons, both
 of great weight: the one to correct the partiality of axioms and
 opinions, which are commonly framed only upon common and familiar
 examples; the other because from the wonders of Nature is the nearest
 intelligence and passage towards the wonders of art, for it is no more
 but by following and, as it were, hounding Nature in her wanderings, to
 be able to lead her afterwards to the same place again.  Neither am I of
 opinion, in this history of marvels, that superstitious narrations of
 sorceries, witchcrafts, dreams, divinations, and the like, where there is
 an assurance and clear evidence of the fact, be altogether excluded.  For
 it is not yet known in what cases and how far effects attributed to
 superstition do participate of natural causes; and, therefore, howsoever
 the practice of such things is to be condemned, yet from the speculation
 and consideration of them light may be taken, not only for the discerning
 of the offences, but for the further disclosing of Nature.  Neither ought
 a man to make scruple of entering into these things for inquisition of
 truth, as your Majesty hath showed in your own example, who, with the two
 clear eyes of religion and natural philosophy, have looked deeply and
 wisely into these shadows, and yet proved yourself to be of the nature of
 the sun, which passeth through pollutions and itself remains as pure as
 before.  But this I hold fit, that these narrations, which have mixture
 with superstition, be sorted by themselves, and not to be mingled with
 the narrations which are merely and sincerely natural.  But as for the
 narrations touching the prodigies and miracles of religions, they are
 either not true or not natural; and, therefore, impertinent for the story
 of Nature.
 
 (5) For history of Nature, wrought or mechanical, I find some collections
 made of agriculture, and likewise of manual arts; but commonly with a
 rejection of experiments familiar and vulgar; for it is esteemed a kind
 of dishonour unto learning to descend to inquiry or meditation upon
 matters mechanical, except they be such as may be thought secrets,
 rarities, and special subtleties; which humour of vain and supercilious
 arrogancy is justly derided in Plato, where he brings in Hippias, a
 vaunting sophist, disputing with Socrates, a true and unfeigned
 inquisitor of truth; where, the subject being touching beauty, Socrates,
 after his wandering manner of inductions, put first an example of a fair
 virgin, and then of a fair horse, and then of a fair pot well glazed,
 whereat Hippias was offended, and said, More than for courtesys sake,
 he did think much to dispute with any that did allege such base and
 sordid instances.  Whereunto Socrates answereth, You have reason, and
 it becomes you well, being a man so trim in your vestments, &c., and so
 goeth on in an irony.  But the truth is, they be not the highest
 instances that give the securest information, as may be well expressed in
 the tale so common of the philosopher that, while he gazed upwards to the
 stars, fell into the water; for if he had looked down he might have seen
 the stars in the water, but looking aloft he could not see the water in
 the stars.  So it cometh often to pass that mean and small things
 discover great, better than great can discover the small; and therefore
 Aristotle noteth well, That the nature of everything is best seen in his
 smallest portions.  And for that cause he inquireth the nature of a
 commonwealth, first in a family, and the simple conjugations of man and
 wife, parent and child, master and servant, which are in every cottage.
 Even so likewise the nature of this great city of the world, and the
 policy thereof, must be first sought in mean concordances and small
 portions.  So we see how that secret of Nature, of the turning of iron
 touched with the loadstone towards the north, was found out in needles of
 iron, not in bars of iron.
 
 (6) But if my judgment be of any weight, the use of history mechanical is
 of all others the most radical and fundamental towards natural
 philosophy; such natural philosophy as shall not vanish in the fume of
 subtle, sublime, or delectable speculation, but such as shall be
 operative to the endowment and benefit of mans life.  For it will not
 only minister and suggest for the present many ingenious practices in all
 trades, by a connection and transferring of the observations of one art
 to the use of another, when the experiences of several mysteries shall
 fall under the consideration of one mans mind; but further, it will give
 a more true and real illumination concerning causes and axioms than is
 hitherto attained.  For like as a mans disposition is never well known
 till he be crossed, nor Proteus ever changed shapes till he was
 straitened and held fast; so the passages and variations of nature cannot
 appear so fully in the liberty of nature as in the trials and vexations
 of art.
 
 II. (1) For civil history, it is of three kinds; not unfitly to be
 compared with the three kinds of pictures or images.  For of pictures or
 images we see some are unfinished, some are perfect, and some are
 defaced.  So of histories we may find three kinds: memorials, perfect
 histories, and antiquities; for memorials are history unfinished, or the
 first or rough drafts of history; and antiquities are history defaced, or
 some remnants of history which have casually escaped the shipwreck of
 time.
 
 (2) Memorials, or preparatory history, are of two sorts; whereof the one
 may be termed commentaries, and the other registers.  Commentaries are
 they which set down a continuance of the naked events and actions,
 without the motives or designs, the counsels, the speeches, the pretexts,
 the occasions, and other passages of action.  For this is the true nature
 of a commentary (though Csar, in modesty mixed with greatness, did for
 his pleasure apply the name of a commentary to the best history of the
 world).  Registers are collections of public acts, as decrees of council,
 judicial proceedings, declarations and letters of estate, orations, and
 the like, without a perfect continuance or contexture of the thread of
 the narration.
 
 (3) Antiquities, or remnants of history, are, as was said, _tanquam
 tabula naufragii_: when industrious persons, by an exact and scrupulous
 diligence and observation, out of monuments, names, words, proverbs,
 traditions, private records and evidences, fragments of stories, passages
 of books that concern not story, and the like, do save and recover
 somewhat from the deluge of time.
 
 (4) In these kinds of unperfect histories I do assign no deficience, for
 they are _tanquam imperfecte mista_; and therefore any deficience in them
 is but their nature.  As for the corruptions and moths of history, which
 are epitomes, the use of them deserveth to be banished, as all men of
 sound judgment have confessed, as those that have fretted and corroded
 the sound bodies of many excellent histories, and wrought them into base
 and unprofitable dregs.
 
 (5) History, which may be called just and perfect history, is of three
 kinds, according to the object which it propoundeth, or pretendeth to
 represent: for it either representeth a time, or a person, or an action.
 The first we call chronicles, the second lives, and the third narrations
 or relations.  Of these, although the first be the most complete and
 absolute kind of history, and hath most estimation and glory, yet the
 second excelleth it in profit and use, and the third in verity and
 sincerity.  For history of times representeth the magnitude of actions,
 and the public faces and deportments of persons, and passeth over in
 silence the smaller passages and motions of men and matters.  But such
 being the workmanship of God, as He doth hang the greatest weight upon
 the smallest wires, _maxima  minimis_, _suspendens_, it comes therefore
 to pass, that such histories do rather set forth the pomp of business
 than the true and inward resorts thereof.  But lives, if they be well
 written, propounding to themselves a person to represent, in whom
 actions, both greater and smaller, public and private, have a commixture,
 must of necessity contain a more true, native, and lively representation.
 So again narrations and relations of actions, as the war of Peloponnesus,
 the expedition of Cyrus Minor, the conspiracy of Catiline, cannot but be
 more purely and exactly true than histories of times, because they may
 choose an argument comprehensible within the notice and instructions of
 the writer: whereas he that undertaketh the story of a time, specially of
 any length, cannot but meet with many blanks and spaces, which he must be
 forced to fill up out of his own wit and conjecture.
 
 (6) For the history of times, I mean of civil history, the providence of
 God hath made the distribution.  For it hath pleased God to ordain and
 illustrate two exemplar states of the world for arms, learning, moral
 virtue, policy, and laws; the state of Grcia and the state of Rome; the
 histories whereof occupying the middle part of time, have more ancient to
 them histories which may by one common name be termed the antiquities of
 the world; and after them, histories which may be likewise called by the
 name of modern history.
 
 (7) Now to speak of the deficiences.  As to the heathen antiquities of
 the world it is in vain to note them for deficient.  Deficient they are
 no doubt, consisting most of fables and fragments; but the deficience
 cannot be holpen; for antiquity is like fame, _caput inter nubila
 condit_, her head is muffled from our sight.  For the history of the
 exemplar states, it is extant in good perfection.  Not but I could wish
 there were a perfect course of history for Grcia, from Theseus to
 Philopmen (what time the affairs of Grcia drowned and extinguished in
 the affairs of Rome), and for Rome from Romulus to Justinianus, who may
 be truly said to be _ultimus Romanorum_.  In which sequences of story the
 text of Thucydides and Xenophon in the one, and the texts of Livius,
 Polybius, Sallustius, Csar, Appianus, Tacitus, Herodianus in the other,
 to be kept entire, without any diminution at all, and only to be supplied
 and continued.  But this is a matter of magnificence, rather to be
 commended than required; and we speak now of parts of learning
 supplemental, and not of supererogation.
 
 (8) But for modern histories, whereof there are some few very worthy, but
 the greater part beneath mediocrity, leaving the care of foreign stories
 to foreign states, because I will not be _curiosus in aliena republica_,
 I cannot fail to represent to your Majesty the unworthiness of the
 history of England in the main continuance thereof, and the partiality
 and obliquity of that of Scotland in the latest and largest author that I
 have seen: supposing that it would be honour for your Majesty, and a work
 very memorable, if this island of Great Britain, as it is now joined in
 monarchy for the ages to come, so were joined in one history for the
 times passed, after the manner of the sacred history, which draweth down
 the story of the ten tribes and of the two tribes as twins together.  And
 if it shall seem that the greatness of this work may make it less exactly
 performed, there is an excellent period of a much smaller compass of
 time, as to the story of England; that is to say, from the uniting of the
 Roses to the uniting of the kingdoms; a portion of time wherein, to my
 understanding, there hath been the rarest varieties that in like number
 of successions of any hereditary monarchy hath been known.  For it
 beginneth with the mixed adoption of a crown by arms and title; an entry
 by battle, an establishment by marriage; and therefore times answerable,
 like waters after a tempest, full of working and swelling, though without
 extremity of storm; but well passed through by the wisdom of the pilot,
 being one of the most sufficient kings of all the number.  Then followeth
 the reign of a king, whose actions, howsoever conducted, had much
 intermixture with the affairs of Europe, balancing and inclining them
 variably; in whose time also began that great alteration in the state
 ecclesiastical, an action which seldom cometh upon the stage.  Then the
 reign of a minor; then an offer of a usurpation (though it was but as
 _febris ephemera_).  Then the reign of a queen matched with a foreigner;
 then of a queen that lived solitary and unmarried, and yet her government
 so masculine, as it had greater impression and operation upon the states
 abroad than it any ways received from thence.  And now last, this most
 happy and glorious event, that this island of Britain, divided from all
 the world, should be united in itself, and that oracle of rest given to
 Neas, _antiquam exquirite matrem_, should now be performed and fulfilled
 upon the nations of England and Scotland, being now reunited in the
 ancient mother name of Britain, as a full period of all instability and
 peregrinations.  So that as it cometh to pass in massive bodies, that
 they have certain trepidations and waverings before they fix and settle,
 so it seemeth that by the providence of God this monarchy, before it was
 to settle in your majesty and your generations (in which I hope it is now
 established for ever), it had these prelusive changes and varieties.
 
 (9) For lives, I do find strange that these times have so little esteemed
 the virtues of the times, as that the writings of lives should be no more
 frequent.  For although there be not many sovereign princes or absolute
 commanders, and that states are most collected into monarchies, yet are
 there many worthy personages that deserve better than dispersed report or
 barren eulogies.  For herein the invention of one of the late poets is
 proper, and doth well enrich the ancient fiction.  For he feigneth that
 at the end of the thread or web of every mans life there was a little
 medal containing the persons name, and that Time waited upon the shears,
 and as soon as the thread was cut caught the medals, and carried them to
 the river of Lathe; and about the bank there were many birds flying up
 and down, that would get the medals and carry them in their beak a little
 while, and then let them fall into the river.  Only there were a few
 swans, which if they got a name would carry it to a temple where it was
 consecrate.  And although many men, more mortal in their affections than
 in their bodies, do esteem desire of name and memory but as a vanity and
 ventosity,
 
     Animi nil magn laudis egentes;
 
 which opinion cometh from that root, _Non prius laudes contempsimus_,
 _quam laudanda facere desivimus_: yet that will not alter Solomons
 judgment, _Memoria justi cum laudibus_, _at impiorum nomen putrescet_:
 the one flourisheth, the other either consumeth to present oblivion, or
 turneth to an ill odour.  And therefore in that style or addition, which
 is and hath been long well received and brought in use, _felicis
 memori_, _pi memori_, _bon memori_, we do acknowledge that which
 Cicero saith, borrowing it from Demosthenes, that _bona fama propria
 possessio defunctorum_; which possession I cannot but note that in our
 times it lieth much waste, and that therein there is a deficience.
 
 (10) For narrations and relations of particular actions, there were also
 to be wished a greater diligence therein; for there is no great action
 but hath some good pen which attends it.  And because it is an ability
 not common to write a good history, as may well appear by the small
 number of them; yet if particularity of actions memorable were but
 tolerably reported as they pass, the compiling of a complete history of
 times might be the better expected, when a writer should arise that were
 fit for it: for the collection of such relations might be as a nursery
 garden, whereby to plant a fair and stately garden when time should
 serve.
 
 (11) There is yet another partition of history which Cornelius Tacitus
 maketh, which is not to be forgotten, specially with that application
 which he accoupleth it withal, annals and journals: appropriating to the
 former matters of estate, and to the latter acts and accidents of a
 meaner nature.  For giving but a touch of certain magnificent buildings,
 he addeth, _Cum ex dignitate populi Romani repertum sit_, _res illustres
 annalibus_, _talia diurnis urbis actis mandare_.  So as there is a kind
 of contemplative heraldry, as well as civil.  And as nothing doth
 derogate from the dignity of a state more than confusion of degrees, so
 it doth not a little imbase the authority of a history to intermingle
 matters of triumph, or matters of ceremony, or matters of novelty, with
 matters of state.  But the use of a journal hath not only been in the
 history of time, but likewise in the history of persons, and chiefly of
 actions; for princes in ancient time had, upon point of honour and policy
 both, journals kept, what passed day by day.  For we see the chronicle
 which was read before Ahasuerus, when he could not take rest, contained
 matter of affairs, indeed, but such as had passed in his own time and
 very lately before.  But the journal of Alexanders house expressed every
 small particularity, even concerning his person and court; and it is yet
 a use well received in enterprises memorable, as expeditions of war,
 navigations, and the like, to keep diaries of that which passeth
 continually.
 
 (12) I cannot likewise be ignorant of a form of writing which some grave
 and wise men have used, containing a scattered history of those actions
 which they have thought worthy of memory, with politic discourse and
 observation thereupon: not incorporate into the history, but separately,
 and as the more principal in their intention; which kind of ruminated
 history I think more fit to place amongst books of policy, whereof we
 shall hereafter speak, than amongst books of history.  For it is the true
 office of history to represent the events themselves together with the
 counsels, and to leave the observations and conclusions thereupon to the
 liberty and faculty of every mans judgment.  But mixtures are things
 irregular, whereof no man can define.
 
 (13) So also is there another kind of history manifoldly mixed, and that
 is history of cosmography: being compounded of natural history, in
 respect of the regions themselves; of history civil, in respect of the
 habitations, regiments, and manners of the people; and the mathematics,
 in respect of the climates and configurations towards the heavens: which
 part of learning of all others in this latter time hath obtained most
 proficience.  For it may be truly affirmed to the honour of these times,
 and in a virtuous emulation with antiquity, that this great building of
 the world had never through-lights made in it, till the age of us and our
 fathers.  For although they had knowledge of the antipodes,
 
     Nosque ubi primus equis Oriens afflavit anhelis,
     Illic sera rubens accendit lumina Vesper,
 
 yet that might be by demonstration, and not in fact; and if by travel, it
 requireth the voyage but of half the globe.  But to circle the earth, as
 the heavenly bodies do, was not done nor enterprised till these later
 times: and therefore these times may justly bear in their word, not only
 _plus ultra_, in precedence of the ancient _non ultra_, and _imitabile
 fulmen_, in precedence of the ancient _non imitabile fulmen_,
 
     Demens qui nimbos et non imitabile fulmen, &c.
 
 but likewise _imitabile clum_; in respect of the many memorable voyages
 after the manner of heaven about the globe of the earth.
 
 (14) And this proficience in navigation and discoveries may plant also an
 expectation of the further proficience and augmentation of all sciences;
 because it may seem they are ordained by God to be coevals, that is, to
 meet in one age.  For so the prophet Daniel speaking of the latter times
 foretelleth, _Plurimi pertransibunt_, _et multiplex erit scientia_: as if
 the openness and through-passage of the world and the increase of
 knowledge were appointed to be in the same ages; as we see it is already
 performed in great part: the learning of these later times not much
 giving place to the former two periods or returns of learning, the one of
 the Grecians, the other of the Romans.
 
 III. (1) History ecclesiastical receiveth the same divisions with history
 civil: but further in the propriety thereof may be divided into the
 history of the Church, by a general name; history of prophecy; and
 history of providence.  The first describeth the times of the militant
 Church, whether it be fluctuant, as the ark of Noah, or movable, as the
 ark in the wilderness, or at rest, as the ark in the Temple: that is, the
 state of the Church in persecution, in remove, and in peace.  This part I
 ought in no sort to note as deficient; only I would that the virtue and
 sincerity of it were according to the mass and quantity.  But I am not
 now in hand with censures, but with omissions.
 
 (2) The second, which is history of prophecy, consisteth of two
 relativesthe prophecy and the accomplishment; and, therefore, the nature
 of such a work ought to be, that every prophecy of the Scripture be
 sorted with the event fulfilling the same throughout the ages of the
 world, both for the better confirmation of faith and for the better
 illumination of the Church touching those parts of prophecies which are
 yet unfulfilled: allowing, nevertheless, that latitude which is agreeable
 and familiar unto divine prophecies, being of the nature of their Author,
 with whom a thousand years are but as one day, and therefore are not
 fulfilled punctually at once, but have springing and germinant
 accomplishment throughout many ages, though the height or fulness of them
 may refer to some one age.  This is a work which I find deficient, but is
 to be done with wisdom, sobriety, and reverence, or not at all.
 
 (3) The third, which is history of Providence, containeth that excellent
 correspondence which is between Gods revealed will and His secret will;
 which though it be so obscure, as for the most part it is not legible to
 the natural manno, nor many times to those that behold it from the
 tabernacleyet, at some times it pleaseth God, for our better
 establishment and the confuting of those which are as without God in the
 world, to write it in such text and capital letters, that, as the prophet
 saith, He that runneth by may read itthat is, mere sensual persons,
 which hasten by Gods judgments, and never bend or fix their cogitations
 upon them, are nevertheless in their passage and race urged to discern
 it.  Such are the notable events and examples of Gods judgments,
 chastisements, deliverances, and blessings; and this is a work which has
 passed through the labour of many, and therefore I cannot present as
 omitted.
 
 (4) There are also other parts of learning which are appendices to
 history.  For all the exterior proceedings of man consist of words and
 deeds, whereof history doth properly receive and retain in memory the
 deeds; and if words, yet but as inducements and passages to deeds; so are
 there other books and writings which are appropriate to the custody and
 receipt of words only, which likewise are of three sortsorations,
 letters, and brief speeches or sayings.  Orations are pleadings, speeches
 of counsel, laudatives, invectives, apologies, reprehensions, orations of
 formality or ceremony, and the like.  Letters are according to all the
 variety of occasions, advertisements, advises, directions, propositions,
 petitions, commendatory, expostulatory, satisfactory, of compliment, of
 pleasure, of discourse, and all other passages of action.  And such as
 are written from wise men, are of all the words of man, in my judgment,
 the best; for they are more natural than orations and public speeches,
 and more advised than conferences or present speeches.  So again letters
 of affairs from such as manage them, or are privy to them, are of all
 others the best instructions for history, and to a diligent reader the
 best histories in themselves.  For apophthegms, it is a great loss of
 that book of Csars; for as his history, and those few letters of his
 which we have, and those apophthegms which were of his own, excel all
 mens else, so I suppose would his collection of apophthegms have done;
 for as for those which are collected by others, either I have no taste in
 such matters or else their choice hath not been happy.  But upon these
 three kinds of writings I do not insist, because I have no deficiences to
 propound concerning them.
 
 (5) Thus much therefore concerning history, which is that part of
 learning which answereth to one of the cells, domiciles, or offices of
 the mind of man, which is that of the memory.
 
 IV. (1) Poesy is a part of learning in measure of words, for the most
 part restrained, but in all other points extremely licensed, and doth
 truly refer to the imagination; which, being not tied to the laws of
 matter, may at pleasure join that which nature hath severed, and sever
 that which nature hath joined, and so make unlawful matches and divorces
 of things_Pictoribus atque poetis_, &c.  It is taken in two senses in
 respect of words or matter.  In the first sense, it is but a character of
 style, and belongeth to arts of speech, and is not pertinent for the
 present.  In the latter, it isas hath been saidone of the principal
 portions of learning, and is nothing else but feigned history, which may
 be styled as well in prose as in verse.
 
 (2) The use of this feigned history hath been to give some shadow of
 satisfaction to the mind of man in those points wherein the nature of
 things doth deny it, the world being in proportion inferior to the soul;
 by reason whereof there is, agreeable to the spirit of man, a more ample
 greatness, a more exact goodness, and a more absolute variety, than can
 be found in the nature of things.  Therefore, because the acts or events
 of true history have not that magnitude which satisfieth the mind of man,
 poesy feigneth acts and events greater and more heroical.  Because true
 history propoundeth the successes and issues of actions not so agreeable
 to the merits of virtue and vice, therefore poesy feigns them more just
 in retribution, and more according to revealed Providence.  Because true
 history representeth actions and events more ordinary and less
 interchanged, therefore poesy endueth them with more rareness and more
 unexpected and alternative variations.  So as it appeareth that poesy
 serveth and conferreth to magnanimity, morality and to delectation.  And
 therefore, it was ever thought to have some participation of divineness,
 because it doth raise and erect the mind, by submitting the shows of
 things to the desires of the mind; whereas reason doth buckle and bow the
 mind unto the nature of things.  And we see that by these insinuations
 and congruities with mans nature and pleasure, joined also with the
 agreement and consort it hath with music, it hath had access and
 estimation in rude times and barbarous regions, where other learning
 stood excluded.
 
 (3) The division of poesy which is aptest in the propriety thereof
 (besides those divisions which are common unto it with history, as
 feigned chronicles, feigned lives, and the appendices of history, as
 feigned epistles, feigned orations, and the rest) is into poesy
 narrative, representative, and allusive.  The narrative is a mere
 imitation of history, with the excesses before remembered, choosing for
 subjects commonly wars and love, rarely state, and sometimes pleasure or
 mirth.  Representative is as a visible history, and is an image of
 actions as if they were present, as history is of actions in nature as
 they are (that is) past.  Allusive, or parabolical, is a narration
 applied only to express some special purpose or conceit; which latter
 kind of parabolical wisdom was much more in use in the ancient times, as
 by the fables of sop, and the brief sentences of the seven, and the use
 of hieroglyphics may appear.  And the cause was (for that it was then of
 necessity to express any point of reason which was more sharp or subtle
 than the vulgar in that manner) because men in those times wanted both
 variety of examples and subtlety of conceit.  And as hieroglyphics were
 before letters, so parables were before arguments; and nevertheless now
 and at all times they do retain much life and rigour, because reason
 cannot be so sensible nor examples so fit.
 
 (4) But there remaineth yet another use of poesy parabolical, opposite to
 that which we last mentioned; for that tendeth to demonstrate and
 illustrate that which is taught or delivered, and this other to retire
 and obscure itthat is, when the secrets and mysteries of religion,
 policy, or philosophy, are involved in fables or parables.  Of this in
 divine poesy we see the use is authorised.  In heathen poesy we see the
 exposition of fables doth fall out sometimes with great felicity: as in
 the fable that the giants being overthrown in their war against the gods,
 the earth their mother in revenge thereof brought forth Fame:
 
     Illam terra parens, ira irritat Deorum,
     Extremam, ut perhibent, Co Enceladoque soroem,
     Progenuit.
 
 Expounded that when princes and monarchs have suppressed actual and open
 rebels, then the malignity of people (which is the mother of rebellion)
 doth bring forth libels and slanders, and taxations of the states, which
 is of the same kind with rebellion but more feminine.  So in the fable
 that the rest of the gods having conspired to bind Jupiter, Pallas called
 Briareus with his hundred hands to his aid: expounded that monarchies
 need not fear any curbing of their absoluteness by mighty subjects, as
 long as by wisdom they keep the hearts of the people, who will be sure to
 come in on their side.  So in the fable that Achilles was brought up
 under Chiron, the centaur, who was part a man and part a beast, expounded
 ingeniously but corruptly by Machiavel, that it belongeth to the
 education and discipline of princes to know as well how to play the part
 of a lion in violence, and the fox in guile, as of the man in virtue and
 justice.  Nevertheless, in many the like encounters, I do rather think
 that the fable was first, and the exposition devised, than that the moral
 was first, and thereupon the fable framed; for I find it was an ancient
 vanity in Chrysippus, that troubled himself with great contention to
 fasten the assertions of the Stoics upon the fictions of the ancient
 poets; but yet that all the fables and fictions of the poets were but
 pleasure and not figure, I interpose no opinion.  Surely of these poets
 which are now extant, even Homer himself (notwithstanding he was made a
 kind of scripture by the later schools of the Grecians), yet I should
 without any difficulty pronounce that his fables had no such inwardness
 in his own meaning.  But what they might have upon a more original
 tradition is not easy to affirm, for he was not the inventor of many of
 them.
 
 (5) In this third part of learning, which is poesy, I can report no
 deficience; for being as a plant that cometh of the lust of the earth,
 without a formal seed, it hath sprung up and spread abroad more than any
 other kind.  But to ascribe unto it that which is due, for the expressing
 of affections, passions, corruptions, and customs, we are beholding to
 poets more than to the philosophers works; and for wit and eloquence,
 not much less than to orators harangues.  But it is not good to stay too
 long in the theatre.  Let us now pass on to the judicial place or palace
 of the mind, which we are to approach and view with more reverence and
 attention.
 
 V. (1) The knowledge of man is as the waters, some descending from above,
 and some springing from beneath: the one informed by the light of nature,
 the other inspired by divine revelation.  The light of nature consisteth
 in the notions of the mind and the reports of the senses; for as for
 knowledge which man receiveth by teaching, it is cumulative and not
 original, as in a water that besides his own spring-head is fed with
 other springs and streams.  So then, according to these two differing
 illuminations or originals, knowledge is first of all divided into
 divinity and philosophy.
 
 (2) In philosophy the contemplations of man do either penetrate unto God,
 or are circumferred to nature, or are reflected or reverted upon himself.
 Out of which several inquiries there do arise three knowledgesdivine
 philosophy, natural philosophy, and human philosophy or humanity.  For
 all things are marked and stamped with this triple characterthe power of
 God, the difference of nature and the use of man.  But because the
 distributions and partitions of knowledge are not like several lines that
 meet in one angle, and so touch but in a point, but are like branches of
 a tree that meet in a stem, which hath a dimension and quantity of
 entireness and continuance before it come to discontinue and break itself
 into arms and boughs; therefore it is good, before we enter into the
 former distribution, to erect and constitute one universal science, by
 the name of _philosophia prima_, primitive or summary philosophy, as the
 main and common way, before we come where the ways part and divide
 themselves; which science whether I should report as deficient or no, I
 stand doubtful.  For I find a certain rhapsody of natural theology, and
 of divers parts of logic; and of that part of natural philosophy which
 concerneth the principles, and of that other part of natural philosophy
 which concerneth the soul or spiritall these strangely commixed and
 confused; but being examined, it seemeth to me rather a depredation of
 other sciences, advanced and exalted unto some height of terms, than
 anything solid or substantive of itself.  Nevertheless I cannot be
 ignorant of the distinction which is current, that the same things are
 handled but in several respects.  As for example, that logic considereth
 of many things as they are in notion, and this philosophy as they are in
 naturethe one in appearance, the other in existence; but I find this
 difference better made than pursued.  For if they had considered
 quantity, similitude, diversity, and the rest of those extern characters
 of things, as philosophers, and in nature, their inquiries must of force
 have been of a far other kind than they are.  For doth any of them, in
 handling quantity, speak of the force of union, how and how far it
 multiplieth virtue?  Doth any give the reason why some things in nature
 are so common, and in so great mass, and others so rare, and in so small
 quantity?  Doth any, in handling similitude and diversity, assign the
 cause why iron should not move to iron, which is more like, but move to
 the loadstone, which is less like?  Why in all diversities of things
 there should be certain participles in nature which are almost ambiguous
 to which kind they should be referred?  But there is a mere and deep
 silence touching the nature and operation of those common adjuncts of
 things, as in nature; and only a resuming and repeating of the force and
 use of them in speech or argument.  Therefore, because in a writing of
 this nature I avoid all subtlety, my meaning touching this original or
 universal philosophy is thus, in a plain and gross description by
 negative: That it be a receptacle for all such profitable observations
 and axioms as fall not within the compass of any of the special parts of
 philosophy or sciences, but are more common and of a higher stage.
 
 (3) Now that there are many of that kind need not be doubted.  For
 example: Is not the rule, _Si inqualibus qualia addas_, _omnia erunt
 inqualia_, an axiom as well of justice as of the mathematics? and is
 there not a true coincidence between commutative and distributive
 justice, and arithmetical and geometrical proportion?  Is not that other
 rule, _Qu in eodem tertio conveniunt_, _et inter se conveniunt_, a rule
 taken from the mathematics, but so potent in logic as all syllogisms are
 built upon it?  Is not the observation, _Omnia mutantur_, _nil interit_,
 a contemplation in philosophy thus, that the _quantum_ of nature is
 eternal? in natural theology thus, that it requireth the same omnipotency
 to make somewhat nothing, which at the first made nothing somewhat?
 according to the Scripture, _Didici quod omnia opera_, _qu fecit Deus_,
 _perseverent in perpetuum_; _non possumus eis quicquam addere nec
 auferre_.  Is not the ground, which Machiavel wisely and largely
 discourseth concerning governments, that the way to establish and
 preserve them is to reduce them _ad principia_a rule in religion and
 nature, as well as in civil administration?  Was not the Persian magic a
 reduction or correspondence of the principles and architectures of nature
 to the rules and policy of governments?  Is not the precept of a
 musician, to fall from a discord or harsh accord upon a concord or sweet
 accord, alike true in affection?  Is not the trope of music, to avoid or
 slide from the close or cadence, common with the trope of rhetoric of
 deceiving expectation?  Is not the delight of the quavering upon a stop
 in music the same with the playing of light upon the water?
 
     Splendet tremulo sub lumine pontus.
 
 Are not the organs of the senses of one kind with the organs of
 reflection, the eye with a glass, the ear with a cave or strait,
 determined and bounded?  Neither are these only similitudes, as men of
 narrow observation may conceive them to be, but the same footsteps of
 nature, treading or printing upon several subjects or matters.  This
 science therefore (as I understand it) I may justly report as deficient;
 for I see sometimes the profounder sort of wits, in handling some
 particular argument, will now and then draw a bucket of water out of this
 well for their present use; but the spring-head thereof seemeth to me not
 to have been visited, being of so excellent use both for the disclosing
 of nature and the abridgment of art.
 
 VI. (1) This science being therefore first placed as a common parent like
 unto Berecynthia, which had so much heavenly issue, _omnes clicolas_,
 _omnes supera alta tenetes_; we may return to the former distribution of
 the three philosophiesdivine, natural, and human.  And as concerning
 divine philosophy or natural theology, it is that knowledge or rudiment
 of knowledge concerning God which may be obtained by the contemplation of
 His creatures; which knowledge may be truly termed divine in respect of
 the object, and natural in respect of the light.  The bounds of this
 knowledge are, that it sufficeth to convince atheism, but not to inform
 religion; and therefore there was never miracle wrought by God to convert
 an atheist, because the light of nature might have led him to confess a
 God; but miracles have been wrought to convert idolaters and the
 superstitious, because no light of nature extendeth to declare the will
 and true worship of God.  For as all works do show forth the power and
 skill of the workman, and not his image, so it is of the works of God,
 which do show the omnipotency and wisdom of the Maker, but not His image.
 And therefore therein the heathen opinion differeth from the sacred
 truth: for they supposed the world to be the image of God, and man to be
 an extract or compendious image of the world; but the Scriptures never
 vouchsafe to attribute to the world that honour, as to be the image of
 God, but only _the work of His hands_; neither do they speak of any other
 image of God but man.  Wherefore by the contemplation of nature to induce
 and enforce the acknowledgment of God, and to demonstrate His power,
 providence, and goodness, is an excellent argument, and hath been
 excellently handled by divers, but on the other side, out of the
 contemplation of nature, or ground of human knowledges, to induce any
 verity or persuasion concerning the points of faith, is in my judgment
 not safe; _Da fidei qu fidei sunt_.  For the heathen themselves conclude
 as much in that excellent and divine fable of the golden chain, That men
 and gods were not able to draw Jupiter down to the earth; but,
 contrariwise, Jupiter was able to draw them up to heaven.  So as we
 ought not to attempt to draw down or submit the mysteries of God to our
 reason, but contrariwise to raise and advance our reason to the divine
 truth.  So as in this part of knowledge, touching divine philosophy, I am
 so far from noting any deficience, as I rather note an excess; whereunto
 I have digressed because of the extreme prejudice which both religion and
 philosophy hath received and may receive by being commixed together; as
 that which undoubtedly will make an heretical religion, and an imaginary
 and fabulous philosophy.
 
 (2) Otherwise it is of the nature of angels and spirits, which is an
 appendix of theology, both divine and natural, and is neither inscrutable
 nor interdicted.  For although the Scripture saith, Let no man deceive
 you in sublime discourse touching the worship of angels, pressing into
 that he knoweth not, &c., yet notwithstanding if you observe well that
 precept, it may appear thereby that there be two things only
 forbiddenadoration of them, and opinion fantastical of them, either to
 extol them further than appertaineth to the degree of a creature, or to
 extol a mans knowledge of them further than he hath ground.  But the
 sober and grounded inquiry, which may arise out of the passages of Holy
 Scriptures, or out of the gradations of nature, is not restrained.  So of
 degenerate and revolted spirits, the conversing with them or the
 employment of them is prohibited, much more any veneration towards them;
 but the contemplation or science of their nature, their power, their
 illusions, either by Scripture or reason, is a part of spiritual wisdom.
 For so the apostle saith, We are not ignorant of his stratagems.  And
 it is no more unlawful to inquire the nature of evil spirits, than to
 inquire the force of poisons in nature, or the nature of sin and vice in
 morality.  But this part touching angels and spirits I cannot note as
 deficient, for many have occupied themselves in it; I may rather
 challenge it, in many of the writers thereof, as fabulous and
 fantastical.
 
 VII. (1) Leaving therefore divine philosophy or natural theology (not
 divinity or inspired theology, which we reserve for the last of all as
 the haven and sabbath of all mans contemplations) we will now proceed to
 natural philosophy.  If then it be true that Democritus said, That the
 truth of nature lieth hid in certain deep mines and caves; and if it be
 true likewise that the alchemists do so much inculcate, that Vulcan is a
 second nature, and imitateth that dexterously and compendiously, which
 nature worketh by ambages and length of time, it were good to divide
 natural philosophy into the mine and the furnace, and to make two
 professions or occupations of natural philosopherssome to be pioneers
 and some smiths; some to dig, and some to refine and hammer.  And surely
 I do best allow of a division of that kind, though in more familiar and
 scholastical terms: namely, that these be the two parts of natural
 philosophythe inquisition of causes, and the production of effects;
 speculative and operative; natural science, and natural prudence.  For as
 in civil matters there is a wisdom of discourse, and a wisdom of
 direction; so is it in natural.  And here I will make a request, that for
 the latter (or at least for a part thereof) I may revive and reintegrate
 the misapplied and abused name of natural magic, which in the true sense
 is but natural wisdom, or natural prudence; taken according to the
 ancient acception, purged from vanity and superstition.  Now although it
 be true, and I know it well, that there is an intercourse between causes
 and effects, so as both these knowledges, speculative and operative, have
 a great connection between themselves; yet because all true and fruitful
 natural philosophy hath a double scale or ladder, ascendent and
 descendent, ascending from experiments to the invention of causes, and
 descending from causes to the invention of new experiments; therefore I
 judge it most requisite that these two parts be severally considered and
 handled.
 
 (2) Natural science or theory is divided into physic and metaphysic;
 wherein I desire it may be conceived that I use the word metaphysic in a
 differing sense from that that is received.  And in like manner, I doubt
 not but it will easily appear to men of judgment, that in this and other
 particulars, wheresoever my conception and notion may differ from the
 ancient, yet I am studious to keep the ancient terms.  For hoping well to
 deliver myself from mistaking, by the order and perspicuous expressing of
 that I do propound, I am otherwise zealous and affectionate to recede as
 little from antiquity, either in terms or opinions, as may stand with
 truth and the proficience of knowledge.  And herein I cannot a little
 marvel at the philosopher Aristotle, that did proceed in such a spirit of
 difference and contradiction towards all antiquity; undertaking not only
 to frame new words of science at pleasure, but to confound and extinguish
 all ancient wisdom; insomuch as he never nameth or mentioneth an ancient
 author or opinion, but to confute and reprove; wherein for glory, and
 drawing followers and disciples, he took the right course.  For certainly
 there cometh to pass, and hath place in human truth, that which was noted
 and pronounced in the highest truth:_Veni in nomine partis_, _nec
 recipits me_; _si quis venerit in nomine suo eum recipietis_.  But in
 this divine aphorism (considering to whom it was applied, namely, to
 antichrist, the highest deceiver), we may discern well that the coming in
 a mans own name, without regard of antiquity or paternity, is no good
 sign of truth, although it be joined with the fortune and success of an
 _eum recipietis_.  But for this excellent person Aristotle, I will think
 of him that he learned that humour of his scholar, with whom it seemeth
 he did emulate; the one to conquer all opinions, as the other to conquer
 all nations.  Wherein, nevertheless, it may be, he may at some mens
 hands, that are of a bitter disposition, get a like title as his scholar
 did:
 
     Felix terrarum prdo, non utile mundo
     Editus exemplum, &c.
 
 So,
 
     Felix doctrin prdo.
 
 But to me, on the other side, that do desire as much as lieth in my pen
 to ground a sociable intercourse between antiquity and proficience, it
 seemeth best to keep way with antiquity _usque ad aras_; and, therefore,
 to retain the ancient terms, though I sometimes alter the uses and
 definitions, according to the moderate proceeding in civil government;
 where, although there be some alteration, yet that holdeth which Tacitus
 wisely noteth, _eadem magistratuum vocabula_.
 
 (3) To return, therefore, to the use and acception of the term metaphysic
 as I do now understand the word; it appeareth, by that which hath been
 already said, that I intend _philosophia prima_, summary philosophy and
 metaphysic, which heretofore have been confounded as one, to be two
 distinct things.  For the one I have made as a parent or common ancestor
 to all knowledge; and the other I have now brought in as a branch or
 descendant of natural science.  It appeareth likewise that I have
 assigned to summary philosophy the common principles and axioms which are
 promiscuous and indifferent to several sciences; I have assigned unto it
 likewise the inquiry touching the operation or the relative and adventive
 characters of essences, as quantity, similitude, diversity, possibility,
 and the rest, with this distinction and provision; that they be handled
 as they have efficacy in nature, and not logically.  It appeareth
 likewise that natural theology, which heretofore hath been handled
 confusedly with metaphysic, I have enclosed and bounded by itself.  It is
 therefore now a question what is left remaining for metaphysic; wherein I
 may without prejudice preserve thus much of the conceit of antiquity,
 that physic should contemplate that which is inherent in matter, and
 therefore transitory; and metaphysic that which is abstracted and fixed.
 And again, that physic should handle that which supposeth in nature only
 a being and moving; and metaphysic should handle that which supposeth
 further in nature a reason, understanding, and platform.  But the
 difference, perspicuously expressed, is most familiar and sensible.  For
 as we divided natural philosophy in general into the inquiry of causes
 and productions of effects, so that part which concerneth the inquiry of
 causes we do subdivide according to the received and sound division of
 causes.  The one part, which is physic, inquireth and handleth the
 material and efficient causes; and the other, which is metaphysic,
 handleth the formal and final causes.
 
 (4) Physic (taking it according to the derivation, and not according to
 our idiom for medicine) is situate in a middle term or distance between
 natural history and metaphysic.  For natural history describeth the
 variety of things; physic the causes, but variable or respective causes;
 and metaphysic the fixed and constant causes.
 
     Limus ut hic durescit, et hc ut cera liquescit,
     Uno eodemque igni.
 
 Fire is the cause of induration, but respective to clay; fire is the
 cause of colliquation, but respective to wax.  But fire is no constant
 cause either of induration or colliquation; so then the physical causes
 are but the efficient and the matter.  Physic hath three parts, whereof
 two respect nature united or collected, the third contemplateth nature
 diffused or distributed.  Nature is collected either into one entire
 total, or else into the same principles or seeds.  So as the first
 doctrine is touching the contexture or configuration of things, as _de
 mundo_, _de universitate rerum_.  The second is the doctrine concerning
 the principles or originals of things.  The third is the doctrine
 concerning all variety and particularity of things; whether it be of the
 differing substances, or their differing qualities and natures; whereof
 there needeth no enumeration, this part being but as a gloss or
 paraphrase that attendeth upon the text of natural history.  Of these
 three I cannot report any as deficient.  In what truth or perfection they
 are handled, I make not now any judgment; but they are parts of knowledge
 not deserted by the labour of man.
 
 (5) For metaphysic, we have assigned unto it the inquiry of formal and
 final causes; which assignation, as to the former of them, may seem to be
 nugatory and void, because of the received and inveterate opinion, that
 the inquisition of man is not competent to find out essential forms or
 true differences; of which opinion we will take this hold, that the
 invention of forms is of all other parts of knowledge the worthiest to be
 sought, if it be possible to be found.  As for the possibility, they are
 ill discoverers that think there is no land, when they can see nothing
 but sea.  But it is manifest that Plato, in his opinion of ideas, as one
 that had a wit of elevation situate as upon a cliff, did descry that
 forms were the true object of knowledge; but lost the real fruit of his
 opinion, by considering of forms as absolutely abstracted from matter,
 and not confined and determined by matter; and so turning his opinion
 upon theology, wherewith all his natural philosophy is infected.  But if
 any man shall keep a continual watchful and severe eye upon action,
 operation, and the use of knowledge, he may advise and take notice what
 are the forms, the disclosures whereof are fruitful and important to the
 state of man.  For as to the forms of substances (man only except, of
 whom it is said, _Formavit hominem de limo terr_, _et spiravit in faciem
 ejus spiraculum vit_, and not as of all other creatures, _Producant
 aqu_, _producat terra_), the forms of substances I say (as they are now
 by compounding and transplanting multiplied) are so perplexed, as they
 are not to be inquired; no more than it were either possible or to
 purpose to seek in gross the forms of those sounds which make words,
 which by composition and transposition of letters are infinite.  But, on
 the other side, to inquire the form of those sounds or voices which make
 simple letters is easily comprehensible; and being known induceth and
 manifesteth the forms of all words, which consist and are compounded of
 them.  In the same manner to inquire the form of a lion, of an oak, of
 gold; nay, of water, of air, is a vain pursuit; but to inquire the forms
 of sense, of voluntary motion, of vegetation, of colours, of gravity and
 levity, of density, of tenuity, of heat, of cold, and all other natures
 and qualities, which, like an alphabet, are not many, and of which the
 essences (upheld by matter) of all creatures do consist; to inquire, I
 say, the true forms of these, is that part of metaphysic which we now
 define of.  Not but that physic doth make inquiry and take consideration
 of the same natures; but how?  Only as to the material and efficient
 causes of them, and not as to the forms.  For example, if the cause of
 whiteness in snow or froth be inquired, and it be rendered thus, that the
 subtle intermixture of air and water is the cause, it is well rendered;
 but, nevertheless, is this the form of whiteness?  No; but it is the
 efficient, which is ever but _vehiculum form_.  This part of metaphysic
 I do not find laboured and performed; whereat I marvel not; because I
 hold it not possible to be invented by that course of invention which
 hath been used; in regard that men (which is the root of all error) have
 made too untimely a departure, and too remote a recess from particulars.
 
 (6) But the use of this part of metaphysic, which I report as deficient,
 is of the rest the most excellent in two respects: the one, because it is
 the duty and virtue of all knowledge to abridge the infinity of
 individual experience, as much as the conception of truth will permit,
 and to remedy the complaint of _vita brevis_, _ars longa_; which is
 performed by uniting the notions and conceptions of sciences.  For
 knowledges are as pyramids, whereof history is the basis.  So of natural
 philosophy, the basis is natural history; the stage next the basis is
 physic; the stage next the vertical point is metaphysic.  As for the
 vertical point, _opus quod operatur Deus  principio usque ad finem_, the
 summary law of nature, we know not whether mans inquiry can attain unto
 it.  But these three be the true stages of knowledge, and are to them
 that are depraved no better than the giants hills:
 
     Ter sunt conati imponere Pelio Ossam,
     Scilicet atque Oss frondsum involvere Olympum.
 
 But to those which refer all things to the glory of God, they are as the
 three acclamations, _Sante_, _sancte_, _sancte_! holy in the description
 or dilatation of His works; holy in the connection or concatenation of
 them; and holy in the union of them in a perpetual and uniform law.  And,
 therefore, the speculation was excellent in Parmenides and Plato,
 although but a speculation in them, that all things by scale did ascend
 to unity.  So then always that knowledge is worthiest which is charged
 with least multiplicity, which appeareth to be metaphysic; as that which
 considereth the simple forms or differences of things, which are few in
 number, and the degrees and co-ordinations whereof make all this variety.
 The second respect, which valueth and commendeth this part of metaphysic,
 is that it doth enfranchise the power of man unto the greatest liberty
 and possibility of works and effects.  For physic carrieth men in narrow
 and restrained ways, subject to many accidents and impediments, imitating
 the ordinary flexuous courses of nature.  But _lat undique sunt
 sapientibus vi_; to sapience (which was anciently defined to be _rerum
 divinarum et humanarum scientia_) there is ever a choice of means.  For
 physical causes give light to new invention in _simili materia_.  But
 whosoever knoweth any form, knoweth the utmost possibility of
 superinducing that nature upon any variety of matter; and so is less
 restrained in operation, either to the basis of the matter, or the
 condition of the efficient; which kind of knowledge Solomon likewise,
 though in a more divine sense, elegantly describeth: _non arctabuntur
 gressus tui_, _et currens non habebis offendiculum_.  The ways of
 sapience are not much liable either to particularity or chance.
 
 (7) The second part of metaphysic is the inquiry of final causes, which I
 am moved to report not as omitted, but as misplaced.  And yet if it were
 but a fault in order, I would not speak of it; for order is matter of
 illustration, but pertaineth not to the substance of sciences.  But this
 misplacing hath caused a deficience, or at least a great improficience in
 the sciences themselves.  For the handling of final causes, mixed with
 the rest in physical inquiries, hath intercepted the severe and diligent
 inquiry of all real and physical causes, and given men the occasion to
 stay upon these satisfactory and specious causes, to the great arrest and
 prejudice of further discovery.  For this I find done not only by Plato,
 who ever anchoreth upon that shore, but by Aristotle, Galen, and others
 which do usually likewise fall upon these flats of discoursing causes.
 For to say that the hairs of the eyelids are for a quickset and fence
 about the sight; or that the firmness of the skins and hides of living
 creatures is to defend them from the extremities of heat or cold; or
 that the bones are for the columns or beams, whereupon the frames of the
 bodies of living creatures are built; or that the leaves of trees are
 for protecting of the fruit; or that the clouds are for watering of the
 earth; or that the solidness of the earth is for the station and
 mansion of living creatures; and the like, is well inquired and
 collected in metaphysic, but in physic they are impertinent.  Nay, they
 are, indeed, but _remoras_ and hindrances to stay and slug the ship from
 further sailing; and have brought this to pass, that the search of the
 physical causes hath been neglected and passed in silence.  And,
 therefore, the natural philosophy of Democritus and some others, who did
 not suppose a mind or reason in the frame of things, but attributed the
 form thereof able to maintain itself to infinite essays or proofs of
 Nature, which they term fortune, seemeth to me (as far as I can judge by
 the recital and fragments which remain unto us) in particularities of
 physical causes more real and better inquired than that of Aristotle and
 Plato; whereof both intermingled final causes, the one as a part of
 theology, and the other as a part of logic, which were the favourite
 studies respectively of both those persons; not because those final
 causes are not true and worthy to be inquired, being kept within their
 own province, but because their excursions into the limits of physical
 causes hath bred a vastness and solitude in that tract.  For otherwise,
 keeping their precincts and borders, men are extremely deceived if they
 think there is an enmity or repugnancy at all between them.  For the
 cause rendered, that the hairs about the eyelids are for the safeguard
 of the sight, doth not impugn the cause rendered, that pilosity is
 incident to orifices of moisture_muscosi fontes_, &c.  Nor the cause
 rendered, that the firmness of hides is for the armour of the body
 against extremities of heat or cold, doth not impugn the cause rendered,
 that contraction of pores is incident to the outwardest parts, in regard
 of their adjacence to foreign or unlike bodies; and so of the rest, both
 causes being true and compatible, the one declaring an intention, the
 other a consequence only.  Neither doth this call in question or derogate
 from Divine Providence, but highly confirm and exalt it.  For as in civil
 actions he is the greater and deeper politique that can make other men
 the instruments of his will and ends, and yet never acquaint them with
 his purpose, so as they shall do it and yet not know what they do, than
 he that imparteth his meaning to those he employeth; so is the wisdom of
 God more admirable, when Nature intendeth one thing and Providence
 draweth forth another, than if He had communicated to particular
 creatures and motions the characters and impressions of His Providence.
 And thus much for metaphysic; the latter part whereof I allow as extant,
 but wish it confined to his proper place.
 
 VIII. (1) Nevertheless, there remaineth yet another part of natural
 philosophy, which is commonly made a principal part, and holdeth rank
 with physic special and metaphysic, which is mathematic; but I think it
 more agreeable to the nature of things, and to the light of order, to
 place it as a branch of metaphysic.  For the subject of it being
 quantity, not quantity indefinite, which is but a relative, and belongeth
 to _philosophia prima_ (as hath been said), but quantity determined or
 proportionable, it appeareth to be one of the essential forms of things,
 as that that is causative in Nature of a number of effects; insomuch as
 we see in the schools both of Democritus and of Pythagoras that the one
 did ascribe figure to the first seeds of things, and the other did
 suppose numbers to be the principles and originals of things.  And it is
 true also that of all other forms (as we understand forms) it is the most
 abstracted and separable from matter, and therefore most proper to
 metaphysic; which hath likewise been the cause why it hath been better
 laboured and inquired than any of the other forms, which are more
 immersed in matter.  For it being the nature of the mind of man (to the
 extreme prejudice of knowledge) to delight in the spacious liberty of
 generalities, as in a champaign region, and not in the inclosures of
 particularity, the mathematics of all other knowledge were the goodliest
 fields to satisfy that appetite.  But for the placing of this science, it
 is not much material: only we have endeavoured in these our partitions to
 observe a kind of perspective, that one part may cast light upon another.
 
 (2) The mathematics are either pure or mixed.  To the pure mathematics
 are those sciences belonging which handle quantity determinate, merely
 severed from any axioms of natural philosophy; and these are two,
 geometry and arithmetic, the one handling quantity continued, and the
 other dissevered.  Mixed hath for subject some axioms or parts of natural
 philosophy, and considereth quantity determined, as it is auxiliary and
 incident unto them.  For many parts of Nature can neither be invented
 with sufficient subtlety, nor demonstrated with sufficient perspicuity,
 nor accommodated unto use with sufficient dexterity, without the aid and
 intervening of the mathematics, of which sort are perspective, music,
 astronomy, cosmography, architecture, engineery, and divers others.  In
 the mathematics I can report no deficience, except it be that men do not
 sufficiently understand this excellent use of the pure mathematics, in
 that they do remedy and cure many defects in the wit and faculties
 intellectual.  For if the wit be too dull, they sharpen it; if too
 wandering, they fix it; if too inherent in the sense, they abstract it.
 So that as tennis is a game of no use in itself, but of great use in
 respect it maketh a quick eye and a body ready to put itself into all
 postures, so in the mathematics that use which is collateral and
 intervenient is no less worthy than that which is principal and intended.
 And as for the mixed mathematics, I may only make this prediction, that
 there cannot fail to be more kinds of them as Nature grows further
 disclosed.  Thus much of natural science, or the part of Nature
 speculative.
 
 (3) For natural prudence, or the part operative of natural philosophy, we
 will divide it into three partsexperimental, philosophical, and magical;
 which three parts active have a correspondence and analogy with the three
 parts speculative, natural history, physic, and metaphysic.  For many
 operations have been invented, sometimes by a casual incidence and
 occurrence, sometimes by a purposed experiment; and of those which have
 been found by an intentional experiment, some have been found out by
 varying or extending the same experiment, some by transferring and
 compounding divers experiments the one into the other, which kind of
 invention an empiric may manage.  Again, by the knowledge of physical
 causes there cannot fail to follow many indications and designations of
 new particulars, if men in their speculation will keep one eye upon use
 and practice.  But these are but coastings along the shore, _premendo
 littus iniquum_; for it seemeth to me there can hardly be discovered any
 radical or fundamental alterations and innovations in Nature, either by
 the fortune and essays of experiments, or by the light and direction of
 physical causes.  If, therefore, we have reported metaphysic deficient,
 it must follow that we do the like of natural magic, which hath relation
 thereunto.  For as for the natural magic whereof now there is mention in
 books, containing certain credulous and superstitious conceits and
 observations of sympathies and antipathies, and hidden proprieties, and
 some frivolous experiments, strange rather by disguisement than in
 themselves, it is as far differing in truth of Nature from such a
 knowledge as we require as the story of King Arthur of Britain, or Hugh
 of Bourdeaux, differs from Csars Commentaries in truth of story; for it
 is manifest that Csar did greater things _de vero_ than those imaginary
 heroes were feigned to do.  But he did them not in that fabulous manner.
 Of this kind of learning the fable of Ixion was a figure, who designed to
 enjoy Juno, the goddess of power, and instead of her had copulation with
 a cloud, of which mixture were begotten centaurs and chimeras.  So
 whosoever shall entertain high and vaporous imaginations, instead of a
 laborious and sober inquiry of truth, shall beget hopes and beliefs of
 strange and impossible shapes.  And, therefore, we may note in these
 sciences which hold so much of imagination and belief, as this degenerate
 natural magic, alchemy, astrology, and the like, that in their
 propositions the description of the means is ever more monstrous than the
 pretence or end.  For it is a thing more probable that he that knoweth
 well the natures of weight, of colour, of pliant and fragile in respect
 of the hammer, of volatile and fixed in respect of the fire, and the
 rest, may superinduce upon some metal the nature and form of gold by such
 mechanic as longeth to the production of the natures afore rehearsed,
 than that some grains of the medicine projected should in a few moments
 of time turn a sea of quicksilver or other material into gold.  So it is
 more probable that he that knoweth the nature of arefaction, the nature
 of assimilation of nourishment to the thing nourished, the manner of
 increase and clearing of spirits, the manner of the depredations which
 spirits make upon the humours and solid parts, shall by ambages of diets,
 bathings, anointings, medicines, motions, and the like, prolong life, or
 restore some degree of youth or vivacity, than that it can be done with
 the use of a few drops or scruples of a liquor or receipt.  To conclude,
 therefore, the true natural magic, which is that great liberty and
 latitude of operation which dependeth upon the knowledge of forms, I may
 report deficient, as the relative thereof is.  To which part, if we be
 serious and incline not to vanities and plausible discourse, besides the
 deriving and deducing the operations themselves from metaphysic, there
 are pertinent two points of much purpose, the one by way of preparation,
 the other by way of caution.  The first is, that there be made a
 calendar, resembling an inventory of the estate of man, containing all
 the inventions (being the works or fruits of Nature or art) which are now
 extant, and whereof man is already possessed; out of which doth naturally
 result a note what things are yet held impossible, or not invented, which
 calendar will be the more artificial and serviceable if to every reputed
 impossibility you add what thing is extant which cometh the nearest in
 degree to that impossibility; to the end that by these optatives and
 potentials mans inquiry may be the more awake in deducing direction of
 works from the speculation of causes.  And secondly, that these
 experiments be not only esteemed which have an immediate and present use,
 but those principally which are of most universal consequence for
 invention of other experiments, and those which give most light to the
 invention of causes; for the invention of the mariners needle, which
 giveth the direction, is of no less benefit for navigation than the
 invention of the sails which give the motion.
 
 (4) Thus have I passed through natural philosophy and the deficiences
 thereof; wherein if I have differed from the ancient and received
 doctrines, and thereby shall move contradiction, for my part, as I affect
 not to dissent, so I purpose not to contend.  If it be truth,
 
     Non canimus surdis, respondent omnia sylv,
 
 the voice of Nature will consent, whether the voice of man do or no.  And
 as Alexander Borgia was wont to say of the expedition of the French for
 Naples, that they came with chalk in their hands to mark up their
 lodgings, and not with weapons to fight; so I like better that entry of
 truth which cometh peaceably with chalk to mark up those minds which are
 capable to lodge and harbour it, than that which cometh with pugnacity
 and contention.
 
 (5) But there remaineth a division of natural philosophy according to the
 report of the inquiry, and nothing concerning the matter or subject: and
 that is positive and considerative, when the inquiry reporteth either an
 assertion or a doubt.  These doubts or _non liquets_ are of two sorts,
 particular and total.  For the first, we see a good example thereof in
 Aristotles Problems which deserved to have had a better continuance; but
 so nevertheless as there is one point whereof warning is to be given and
 taken.  The registering of doubts hath two excellent uses: the one, that
 it saveth philosophy from errors and falsehoods; when that which is not
 fully appearing is not collected into assertion, whereby error might draw
 error, but reserved in doubt; the other, that the entry of doubts are as
 so many suckers or sponges to draw use of knowledge; insomuch as that
 which if doubts had not preceded, a man should never have advised, but
 passed it over without note, by the suggestion and solicitation of doubts
 is made to be attended and applied.  But both these commodities do
 scarcely countervail and inconvenience, which will intrude itself if it
 be not debarred; which is, that when a doubt is once received, men labour
 rather how to keep it a doubt still, than how to solve it, and
 accordingly bend their wits.  Of this we see the familiar example in
 lawyers and scholars, both which, if they have once admitted a doubt, it
 goeth ever after authorised for a doubt.  But that use of wit and
 knowledge is to be allowed, which laboureth to make doubtful things
 certain, and not those which labour to make certain things doubtful.
 Therefore these calendars of doubts I commend as excellent things; so
 that there he this caution used, that when they be thoroughly sifted and
 brought to resolution, they be from thenceforth omitted, discarded, and
 not continued to cherish and encourage men in doubting.  To which
 calendar of doubts or problems I advise be annexed another calendar, as
 much or more material which is a calendar of popular errors: I mean
 chiefly in natural history, such as pass in speech and conceit, and are
 nevertheless apparently detected and convicted of untruth, that mans
 knowledge be not weakened nor embased by such dross and vanity.  As for
 the doubts or _non liquets_ general or in total, I understand those
 differences of opinions touching the principles of nature, and the
 fundamental points of the same, which have caused the diversity of sects,
 schools, and philosophies, as that of Empedocles, Pythagoras, Democritus,
 Parmenides, and the rest.  For although Aristotle, as though he had been
 of the race of the Ottomans, thought he could not reign except the first
 thing he did he killed all his brethren; yet to those that seek truth and
 not magistrality, it cannot but seem a matter of great profit, to see
 before them the several opinions touching the foundations of nature.  Not
 for any exact truth that can be expected in those theories; for as the
 same phenomena in astronomy are satisfied by this received astronomy of
 the diurnal motion, and the proper motions of the planets, with their
 eccentrics and epicycles, and likewise by the theory of Copernicus, who
 supposed the earth to move, and the calculations are indifferently
 agreeable to both, so the ordinary face and view of experience is many
 times satisfied by several theories and philosophies; whereas to find the
 real truth requireth another manner of severity and attention.  For as
 Aristotle saith, that children at the first will call every woman mother,
 but afterward they come to distinguish according to truth, so experience,
 if it be in childhood, will call every philosophy mother, but when it
 cometh to ripeness it will discern the true mother.  So as in the
 meantime it is good to see the several glosses and opinions upon Nature,
 whereof it may be everyone in some one point hath seen clearer than his
 fellows, therefore I wish some collection to be made painfully and
 understandingly _de antiquis philosophiis_, out of all the possible light
 which remaineth to us of them: which kind of work I find deficient.  But
 here I must give warning, that it be done distinctly and severedly; the
 philosophies of everyone throughout by themselves, and not by titles
 packed and faggoted up together, as hath been done by Plutarch.  For it
 is the harmony of a philosophy in itself, which giveth it light and
 credence; whereas if it be singled and broken, it will seem more foreign
 and dissonant.  For as when I read in Tacitus the actions of Nero or
 Claudius, with circumstances of times, inducements, and occasions, I find
 them not so strange; but when I read them in Suetonius Tranquillus,
 gathered into titles and bundles and not in order of time, they seem more
 monstrous and incredible: so is it of any philosophy reported entire, and
 dismembered by articles.  Neither do I exclude opinions of latter times
 to be likewise represented in this calendar of sects of philosophy, as
 that of Theophrastus Paracelsus, eloquently reduced into an harmony by
 the pen of Severinus the Dane; and that of Tilesius, and his scholar
 Donius, being as a pastoral philosophy, full of sense, but of no great
 depth; and that of Fracastorius, who, though he pretended not to make any
 new philosophy, yet did use the absoluteness of his own sense upon the
 old; and that of Gilbertus our countryman, who revived, with some
 alterations and demonstrations, the opinions of Xenophanes; and any other
 worthy to be admitted.
 
 (6) Thus have we now dealt with two of the three beams of mans
 knowledge; that is _radius directus_, which is referred to nature,
 _radius refractus_, which is referred to God, and cannot report truly
 because of the inequality of the medium.  There resteth _radius
 reflexus_, whereby man beholdeth and contemplateth himself.
 
 IX. (1) We come therefore now to that knowledge whereunto the ancient
 oracle directeth us, which is the knowledge of ourselves; which deserveth
 the more accurate handling, by how much it toucheth us more nearly.  This
 knowledge, as it is the end and term of natural philosophy in the
 intention of man, so notwithstanding it is but a portion of natural
 philosophy in the continent of Nature.  And generally let this be a rule,
 that all partitions of knowledges be accepted rather for lines and veins
 than for sections and separations; and that the continuance and
 entireness of knowledge be preserved.  For the contrary hereof hath made
 particular sciences to become barren, shallow, and erroneous, while they
 have not been nourished and maintained from the common fountain.  So we
 see Cicero, the orator, complained of Socrates and his school, that he
 was the first that separated philosophy and rhetoric; whereupon rhetoric
 became an empty and verbal art.  So we may see that the opinion of
 Copernicus, touching the rotation of the earth, which astronomy itself
 cannot correct, because it is not repugnant to any of the _phenomena_,
 yet natural philosophy may correct.  So we see also that the science of
 medicine if it be destituted and forsaken by natural philosophy, it is
 not much better than an empirical practice.  With this reservation,
 therefore, we proceed to human philosophy or humanity, which hath two
 parts: the one considereth man segregate or distributively, the other
 congregate or in society; so as human philosophy is either simple and
 particular, or conjugate and civil.  Humanity particular consisteth of
 the same parts whereof man consisteth: that is, of knowledges which
 respect the body, and of knowledges that respect the mind.  But before we
 distribute so far, it is good to constitute.  For I do take the
 consideration in general, and at large, of human nature to be fit to be
 emancipate and made a knowledge by itself, not so much in regard of those
 delightful and elegant discourses which have been made of the dignity of
 man, of his miseries, of his state and life, and the like adjuncts of his
 common and undivided nature; but chiefly in regard of the knowledge
 concerning the sympathies and concordances between the mind and body,
 which being mixed cannot be properly assigned to the sciences of either.
 
 (2) This knowledge hath two branches: for as all leagues and amities
 consist of mutual intelligence and mutual offices, so this league of mind
 and body hath these two parts: how the one discloseth the other, and how
 the one worketh upon the other; discovery and impression.  The former of
 these hath begotten two arts, both of prediction or prenotion; whereof
 the one is honoured with the inquiry of Aristotle, and the other of
 Hippocrates.  And although they have of later time been used to be
 coupled with superstitions and fantastical arts, yet being purged and
 restored to their true state, they have both of them a solid ground in
 Nature, and a profitable use in life.  The first is physiognomy, which
 discovereth the disposition of the mind by the lineaments of the body.
 The second is the exposition of natural dreams, which discovereth the
 state of the body by the imaginations of the mind.  In the former of
 these I note a deficience.  For Aristotle hath very ingeniously and
 diligently handled the factures of the body, but not the gestures of the
 body, which are no less comprehensible by art, and of greater use and
 advantage.  For the lineaments of the body do disclose the disposition
 and inclination of the mind in general; but the motions of the
 countenance and parts do not only so, but do further disclose the present
 humour and state of the mind and will.  For as your majesty saith most
 aptly and elegantly, As the tongue speaketh to the ear so the gesture
 speaketh to the eye.  And, therefore, a number of subtle persons, whose
 eyes do dwell upon the faces and fashions of men, do well know the
 advantage of this observation, as being most part of their ability;
 neither can it be denied, but that it is a great discovery of
 dissimulations, and a great direction in business.
 
 (3) The latter branch, touching impression, hath not been collected into
 art, but hath been handled dispersedly; and it hath the same relation or
 _antistrophe_ that the former hath.  For the consideration is
 doubleeither how and how far the humours and affects of the body do
 alter or work upon the mind, or, again, how and how far the passions or
 apprehensions of the mind do alter or work upon the body.  The former of
 these hath been inquired and considered as a part and appendix of
 medicine, but much more as a part of religion or superstition.  For the
 physician prescribeth cures of the mind in frenzies and melancholy
 passions, and pretendeth also to exhibit medicines to exhilarate the
 mind, to control the courage, to clarify the wits, to corroborate the
 memory, and the like; but the scruples and superstitions of diet and
 other regiment of the body in the sect of the Pythagoreans, in the heresy
 of the Manichees, and in the law of Mahomet, do exceed.  So likewise the
 ordinances in the ceremonial law, interdicting the eating of the blood
 and the fat, distinguishing between beasts clean and unclean for meat,
 are many and strict; nay, the faith itself being clear and serene from
 all clouds of ceremony, yet retaineth the use of fastlings, abstinences,
 and other macerations and humiliations of the body, as things real, and
 not figurative.  The root and life of all which prescripts is (besides
 the ceremony) the consideration of that dependency which the affections
 of the mind are submitted unto upon the state and disposition of the
 body.  And if any man of weak judgment do conceive that this suffering of
 the mind from the body doth either question the immortality, or derogate
 from the sovereignty of the soul, he may be taught, in easy instances,
 that the infant in the mothers womb is compatible with the mother, and
 yet separable; and the most absolute monarch is sometimes led by his
 servants, and yet without subjection.  As for the reciprocal knowledge,
 which is the operation of the conceits and passions of the mind upon the
 body, we see all wise physicians, in the prescriptions of their regiments
 to their patients, do ever consider _accidentia animi_, as of great force
 to further or hinder remedies or recoveries: and more specially it is an
 inquiry of great depth and worth concerning imagination, how and how far
 it altereth the body proper of the imaginant; for although it hath a
 manifest power to hurt, it followeth not it hath the same degree of power
 to help.  No more than a man can conclude, that because there be
 pestilent airs, able suddenly to kill a man in health, therefore there
 should be sovereign airs, able suddenly to cure a man in sickness.  But
 the inquisition of this part is of great use, though it needeth, as
 Socrates said, a Delian diver, being difficult and profound.  But unto
 all this knowledge _de communi vinculo_, of the concordances between the
 mind and the body, that part of inquiry is most necessary which
 considereth of the seats and domiciles which the several faculties of the
 mind do take and occupate in the organs of the body; which knowledge hath
 been attempted, and is controverted, and deserveth to be much better
 inquired.  For the opinion of Plato, who placed the understanding in the
 brain, animosity (which he did unfitly call anger, having a greater
 mixture with pride) in the heart, and concupiscence or sensuality in the
 liver, deserveth not to be despised, but much less to be allowed.  So,
 then, we have constituted (as in our own wish and advice) the inquiry
 touching human nature entire, as a just portion of knowledge to be
 handled apart.
 
 X. (1) The knowledge that concerneth mans body is divided as the good of
 mans body is divided, unto which it referreth.  The good of mans body
 is of four kindshealth, beauty, strength, and pleasure: so the
 knowledges are medicine, or art of cure; art of decoration, which is
 called cosmetic; art of activity, which is called athletic; and art
 voluptuary, which Tacitus truly calleth _eruditus luxus_.  This subject
 of mans body is, of all other things in nature, most susceptible of
 remedy; but then that remedy is most susceptible of error; for the same
 subtlety of the subject doth cause large possibility and easy failing,
 and therefore the inquiry ought to be the more exact.
 
 (2) To speak, therefore, of medicine, and to resume that we have said,
 ascending a little higher: the ancient opinion that man was
 _microcosmus_an abstract or model of the worldhath been fantastically
 strained by Paracelsus and the alchemists, as if there were to be found
 in mans body certain correspondences and parallels, which should have
 respect to all varieties of things, as stars, planets, minerals, which
 are extant in the great world.  But thus much is evidently true, that of
 all substances which nature hath produced, mans body is the most
 extremely compounded.  For we see herbs and plants are nourished by earth
 and water; beasts for the most part by herbs and fruits; man by the flesh
 of beasts, birds, fishes, herbs, grains, fruits, water, and the manifold
 alterations, dressings, and preparations of these several bodies before
 they come to be his food and aliment.  Add hereunto that beasts have a
 more simple order of life, and less change of affections to work upon
 their bodies, whereas man in his mansion, sleep, exercise, passions, hath
 infinite variations: and it cannot be denied but that the body of man of
 all other things is of the most compounded mass.  The soul, on the other
 side, is the simplest of substances, as is well expressed:
 
           Purumque reliquit
     thereum sensum atque aura simplicis ignem.
 
 So that it is no marvel though the soul so placed enjoy no rest, if that
 principle be true, that _Motus rerum est rapidus extra locum_, _placidus
 in loco_.  But to the purpose.  This variable composition of mans body
 hath made it as an instrument easy to distemper; and, therefore, the
 poets did well to conjoin music and medicine in Apollo, because the
 office of medicine is but to tune this curious harp of mans body and to
 reduce it to harmony.  So, then, the subject being so variable hath made
 the art by consequent more conjectural; and the art being conjectural
 hath made so much the more place to be left for imposture.  For almost
 all other arts and sciences are judged by acts or masterpieces, as I may
 term them, and not by the successes and events.  The lawyer is judged by
 the virtue of his pleading, and not by the issue of the cause; this
 master in this ship is judged by the directing his course aright, and not
 by the fortune of the voyage; but the physician, and perhaps this
 politique, hath no particular acts demonstrative of his ability, but is
 judged most by the event, which is ever but as it is taken: for who can
 tell, if a patient die or recover, or if a state be preserved or ruined,
 whether it be art or accident?  And therefore many times the impostor is
 prized, and the man of virtue taxed.  Nay, we see [the] weakness and
 credulity of men is such, as they will often refer a mountebank or witch
 before a learned physician.  And therefore the poets were clear-sighted
 in discerning this extreme folly when they made sculapius and Circe,
 brother and sister, both children of the sun, as in the verses
 
     Ipse repertorem medicin talis et artis
     Fulmine Phbigenam Stygias detrusit ad undas.
 
 And again
 
     Dives inaccessos ubi Solis filia lucos, &c.
 
 For in all times, in the opinion of the multitude, witches and old women
 and impostors, have had a competition with physicians.  And what
 followeth?  Even this, that physicians say to themselves, as Solomon
 expresseth it upon a higher occasion, If it befall to me as befalleth to
 the fools, why should I labour to be more wise?  And therefore I cannot
 much blame physicians that they use commonly to intend some other art or
 practice, which they fancy more than their profession; for you shall have
 of them antiquaries, poets, humanists, statesmen, merchants, divines, and
 in every of these better seen than in their profession; and no doubt upon
 this ground that they find that mediocrity and excellency in their art
 maketh no difference in profit or reputation towards their fortune: for
 the weakness of patients, and sweetness of life, and nature of hope,
 maketh men depend upon physicians with all their defects.  But,
 nevertheless, these things which we have spoken of are courses begotten
 between a little occasion and a great deal of sloth and default; for if
 we will excite and awake our observation, we shall see in familiar
 instances what a predominant faculty the subtlety of spirit hath over the
 variety of matter or form.  Nothing more variable than faces and
 countenances, yet men can bear in memory the infinite distinctions of
 them; nay, a painter, with a few shells of colours, and the benefit of
 his eye, and habit of his imagination, can imitate them all that ever
 have been, are, or may be, if they were brought before him.  Nothing more
 variable than voices, yet men can likewise discern them personally: nay,
 you shall have a _buffon_ or _pantomimus_ will express as many as he
 pleaseth.  Nothing more variable than the differing sounds of words; yet
 men have found the way to reduce them to a few simple letters.  So that
 it is not the insufficiency or incapacity of mans mind, but it is the
 remote standing or placing thereof that breedeth these mazes and
 incomprehensions; for as the sense afar off is full of mistaking, but is
 exact at hand, so is it of the understanding, the remedy whereof is, not
 to quicken or strengthen the organ, but to go nearer to the object; and
 therefore there is no doubt but if the physicians will learn and use the
 true approaches and avenues of nature, they may assume as much as the
 poet saith:
 
     Et quoniam variant morbi, variabimus artes;
     Mille mali species, mille salutis erunt.
 
 Which that they should do, the nobleness of their art doth deserve: well
 shadowed by the poets, in that they made sculapius to be the son of
 [the] sun, the one being the fountain of life, the other as the
 second-stream; but infinitely more honoured by the example of our
 Saviour, who made the body of man the object of His miracles, as the soul
 was the object of His doctrine.  For we read not that ever He vouchsafed
 to do any miracle about honour or money (except that one for giving
 tribute to Csar), but only about the preserving, sustaining, and healing
 the body of man.
 
 (3) Medicine is a science which hath been (as we have said) more
 professed than laboured, and yet more laboured than advanced; the labour
 having been, in my judgment, rather in circle than in progression.  For I
 find much iteration, but small addition.  It considereth causes of
 diseases, with the occasions or impulsions; the diseases themselves, with
 the accidents; and the cures, with the preservations.  The deficiences
 which I think good to note, being a few of many, and those such as are of
 a more open and manifest nature, I will enumerate and not place.
 
 (4) The first is the discontinuance of the ancient and serious diligence
 of Hippocrates, which used to set down a narrative of the special cases
 of his patients, and how they proceeded, and how they were judged by
 recovery or death.  Therefore having an example proper in the father of
 the art, I shall not need to allege an example foreign, of the wisdom of
 the lawyers, who are careful to report new cases and decisions, for the
 direction of future judgments.  This continuance of medicinal history I
 find deficient; which I understand neither to be so infinite as to extend
 to every common case, nor so reserved as to admit none but wonders: for
 many things are new in this manner, which are not new in the kind; and if
 men will intend to observe, they shall find much worthy to observe.
 
 (5) In the inquiry which is made by anatomy, I find much deficience: for
 they inquire of the parts, and their substances, figures, and
 collocations; but they inquire not of the diversities of the parts, the
 secrecies of the passages, and the seats or nestling of the humours, nor
 much of the footsteps and impressions of diseases.  The reason of which
 omission I suppose to be, because the first inquiry may be satisfied in
 the view of one or a few anatomies; but the latter, being comparative and
 casual, must arise from the view of many.  And as to the diversity of
 parts, there is no doubt but the facture or framing of the inward parts
 is as full of difference as the outward, and in that is the cause
 continent of many diseases; which not being observed, they quarrel many
 times with the humours, which are not in fault; the fault being in the
 very frame and mechanic of the part, which cannot be removed by medicine
 alterative, but must be accommodated and palliated by diets and medicines
 familiar.  And for the passages and pores, it is true which was anciently
 noted, that the more subtle of them appear not in anatomies, because they
 are shut and latent in dead bodies, though they be open and manifest in
 life: which being supposed, though the inhumanity of _anatomia vivorum_
 was by Celsus justly reproved; yet in regard of the great use of this
 observation, the inquiry needed not by him so slightly to have been
 relinquished altogether, or referred to the casual practices of surgery;
 but might have been well diverted upon the dissection of beasts alive,
 which notwithstanding the dissimilitude of their parts may sufficiently
 satisfy this inquiry.  And for the humours, they are commonly passed over
 in anatomies as purgaments; whereas it is most necessary to observe, what
 cavities, nests, and receptacles the humours do find in the parts, with
 the differing kind of the humour so lodged and received.  And as for the
 footsteps of diseases, and their devastations of the inward parts,
 impostumations, exulcerations, discontinuations, putrefactions,
 consumptions, contractions, extensions, convulsions, dislocations,
 obstructions, repletions, together with all preternatural substances, as
 stones, carnosities, excrescences, worms, and the like; they ought to
 have been exactly observed by multitude of anatomies, and the
 contribution of mens several experiences, and carefully set down both
 historically according to the appearances, and artificially with a
 reference to the diseases and symptoms which resulted from them, in case
 where the anatomy is of a defunct patient; whereas now upon opening of
 bodies they are passed over slightly and in silence.
 
 (6) In the inquiry of diseases, they do abandon the cures of many, some
 as in their nature incurable, and others as past the period of cure; so
 that Sylla and the Triumvirs never proscribed so many men to die, as they
 do by their ignorant edicts: whereof numbers do escape with less
 difficulty than they did in the Roman prescriptions.  Therefore I will
 not doubt to note as a deficience, that they inquire not the perfect
 cures of many diseases, or extremities of diseases; but pronouncing them
 incurable do enact a law of neglect, and exempt ignorance from discredit.
 
 (7) Nay further, I esteem it the office of a physician not only to
 restore health, but to mitigate pain and dolors; and not only when such
 mitigation may conduce to recovery, but when it may serve to make a fair
 and easy passage.  For it is no small felicity which Augustus Csar was
 wont to wish to himself, that same _Euthanasia_; and which was specially
 noted in the death of Antoninus Pius, whose death was after the fashion,
 and semblance of a kindly and pleasant sheep.  So it is written of
 Epicurus, that after his disease was judged desperate, he drowned his
 stomach and senses with a large draught and ingurgitation of wine;
 whereupon the epigram was made, _Hinc Stygias ebrius hausit aquas_; he
 was not sober enough to taste any bitterness of the Stygian water.  But
 the physicians contrariwise do make a kind of scruple and religion to
 stay with the patient after the disease is deplored; whereas in my
 judgment they ought both to inquire the skill, and to give the
 attendances, for the facilitating and assuaging of the pains and agonies
 of death.
 
 (5) In the consideration of the cures of diseases, I find a deficience in
 the receipts of propriety, respecting the particular cures of diseases:
 for the physicians have frustrated the fruit of tradition and experience
 by their magistralities, in adding and taking out and changing _quid pro
 qua_ in their receipts, at their pleasures; commanding so over the
 medicine, as the medicine cannot command over the disease.  For except it
 be treacle and _mithridatum_, and of late _diascordium_, and a few more,
 they tie themselves to no receipts severely and religiously.  For as to
 the confections of sale which are in the shops, they are for readiness
 and not for propriety.  For they are upon general intentions of purging,
 opening, comforting, altering, and not much appropriate to particular
 diseases.  And this is the cause why empirics and old women are more
 happy many times in their cures than learned physicians, because they are
 more religious in holding their medicines.  Therefore here is the
 deficience which I find, that physicians have not, partly out of their
 own practice, partly out of the constant probations reported in books,
 and partly out of the traditions of empirics, set down and delivered over
 certain experimental medicines for the cure of particular diseases,
 besides their own conjectural and magistral descriptions.  For as they
 were the men of the best composition in the state of Rome, which either
 being consuls inclined to the people, or being tribunes inclined to the
 senate; so in the matter we now handle, they be the best physicians,
 which being learned incline to the traditions of experience, or being
 empirics incline to the methods of learning.
 
 (9) In preparation of medicines I do find strange, specially considering
 how mineral medicines have been extolled, and that they are safer for the
 outward than inward parts, that no man hath sought to make an imitation
 by art of natural baths and medicinable fountains: which nevertheless are
 confessed to receive their virtues from minerals; and not so only, but
 discerned and distinguished from what particular mineral they receive
 tincture, as sulphur, vitriol, steel, or the like; which nature, if it
 may be reduced to compositions of art, both the variety of them will be
 increased, and the temper of them will be more commanded.
 
 (10) But lest I grow to be more particular than is agreeable either to my
 intention or to proportion, I will conclude this part with the note of
 one deficience more, which seemeth to me of greatest consequence: which
 is, that the prescripts in use are too compendious to attain their end;
 for, to my understanding, it is a vain and flattering opinion to think
 any medicine can be so sovereign or so happy, as that the receipt or miss
 of it can work any great effect upon the body of man.  It were a strange
 speech which spoken, or spoken oft, should reclaim a man from a vice to
 which he were by nature subject.  It is order, pursuit, sequence, and
 interchange of application, which is mighty in nature; which although it
 require more exact knowledge in prescribing, and more precise obedience
 in observing, yet is recompensed with the magnitude of effects.  And
 although a man would think, by the daily visitations of the physicians,
 that there were a pursuance in the cure, yet let a man look into their
 prescripts and ministrations, and he shall find them but inconstancies
 and every days devices, without any settled providence or project.  Not
 that every scrupulous or superstitious prescript is effectual, no more
 than every straight way is the way to heaven; but the truth of the
 direction must precede severity of observance.
 
 (11) For cosmetic, it hath parts civil, and parts effeminate: for
 cleanness of body was ever esteemed to proceed from a due reverence to
 God, to society, and to ourselves.  As for artificial decoration, it is
 well worthy of the deficiences which it hath; being neither fine enough
 to deceive, nor handsome to use, nor wholesome to please.
 
 (12) For athletic, I take the subject of it largely, that is to say, for
 any point of ability whereunto the body of man may be brought, whether it
 be of activity, or of patience; whereof activity hath two parts, strength
 and swiftness; and patience likewise hath two parts, hardness against
 wants and extremities, and endurance of pain or torment; whereof we see
 the practices in tumblers, in savages, and in those that suffer
 punishment.  Nay, if there be any other faculty which falls not within
 any of the former divisions, as in those that dive, that obtain a strange
 power of containing respiration, and the like, I refer it to this part.
 Of these things the practices are known, but the philosophy that
 concerneth them is not much inquired; the rather, I think, because they
 are supposed to be obtained, either by an aptness of nature, which cannot
 be taught, or only by continual custom, which is soon prescribed which
 though it be not true, yet I forbear to note any deficiences; for the
 Olympian games are down long since, and the mediocrity of these things is
 for use; as for the excellency of them it serveth for the most part but
 for mercenary ostentation.
 
 (13) For arts of pleasure sensual, the chief deficience in them is of
 laws to repress them.  For as it hath been well observed, that the arts
 which flourish in times while virtue is in growth, are military; and
 while virtue is in state, are liberal; and while virtue is in
 declination, are voluptuary: so I doubt that this age of the world is
 somewhat upon the descent of the wheel.  With arts voluptuary I couple
 practices joculary; for the deceiving of the senses is one of the
 pleasures of the senses.  As for games of recreation, I hold them to
 belong to civil life and education.  And thus much of that particular
 human philosophy which concerns the body, which is but the tabernacle of
 the mind.
 
 XI. (1) For human knowledge which concerns the mind, it hath two parts;
 the one that inquireth of the substance or nature of the soul or mind,
 the other that inquireth of the faculties or functions thereof.   Unto
 the first of these, the considerations of the original of the soul,
 whether it be native or adventive, and how far it is exempted from laws
 of matter, and of the immortality thereof, and many other points, do
 appertain: which have been not more laboriously inquired than variously
 reported; so as the travail therein taken seemeth to have been rather in
 a maze than in a way.  But although I am of opinion that this knowledge
 may be more really and soundly inquired, even in nature, than it hath
 been, yet I hold that in the end it must be hounded by religion, or else
 it will be subject to deceit and delusion.  For as the substance of the
 soul in the creation was not extracted out of the mass of heaven and
 earth by the benediction of a _producat_, but was immediately inspired
 from God, so it is not possible that it should be (otherwise than by
 accident) subject to the laws of heaven and earth, which are the subject
 of philosophy; and therefore the true knowledge of the nature and state
 of the soul must come by the same inspiration that gave the substance.
 Unto this part of knowledge touching the soul there be two appendices;
 which, as they have been handled, have rather vapoured forth fables than
 kindled truth: divination and fascination.
 
 (2) Divination hath been anciently and fitly divided into artificial and
 natural: whereof artificial is, when the mind maketh a prediction by
 argument, concluding upon signs and tokens; natural is, when the mind
 hath a presention by an internal power, without the inducement of a sign.
 Artificial is of two sorts: either when the argument is coupled with a
 derivation of causes, which is rational; or when it is only grounded upon
 a coincidence of the effect, which is experimental: whereof the latter
 for the most part is superstitious, such as were the heathen observations
 upon the inspection of sacrifices, the flights of birds, the swarming of
 bees; and such as was the Chaldean astrology, and the like.  For
 artificial divination, the several kinds thereof are distributed amongst
 particular knowledges.  The astronomer hath his predictions, as of
 conjunctions, aspects, eclipses, and the like.  The physician hath his
 predictions, of death, of recovery, of the accidents and issues of
 diseases.  The politique hath his predictions; _O urbem venalem_, _et
 cito perituram_, _si emptorem invenerit_! which stayed not long to be
 performed, in Sylla first, and after in Csar: so as these predictions
 are now impertinent, and to be referred over.  But the divination which
 springeth from the internal nature of the soul is that which we now speak
 of; which hath been made to be of two sorts, primitive and by influxion.
 Primitive is grounded upon the supposition that the mind, when it is
 withdrawn and collected into itself, and not diffused into the organs of
 the body, hath some extent and latitude of prenotion; which therefore
 appeareth most in sleep, in ecstasies, and near death, and more rarely in
 waking apprehensions; and is induced and furthered by those abstinences
 and observances which make the mind most to consist in itself.  By
 influxion, is grounded upon the conceit that the mind, as a mirror or
 glass, should take illumination from the foreknowledge of God and
 spirits: unto which the same regiment doth likewise conduce.  For the
 retiring of the mind within itself is the state which is most susceptible
 of divine influxions; save that it is accompanied in this case with a
 fervency and elevation (which the ancients noted by fury), and not with a
 repose and quiet, as it is in the other.
 
 (3) Fascination is the power and act of imagination intensive upon other
 bodies than the body of the imaginant, for of that we spake in the proper
 place.  Wherein the school of Paracelsus, and the disciples of pretended
 natural magic, have been so intemperate, as they have exalted the power
 of the imagination to be much one with the power of miracle-working
 faith.  Others, that draw nearer to probability, calling to their view
 the secret passages of things, and specially of the contagion that
 passeth from body to body, do conceive it should likewise be agreeable to
 nature that there should be some transmissions and operations from spirit
 to spirit without the mediation of the senses; whence the conceits have
 grown (now almost made civil) of the mastering spirit, and the force of
 confidence, and the like.  Incident unto this is the inquiry how to raise
 and fortify the imagination; for if the imagination fortified have power,
 then it is material to know how to fortify and exalt it.  And herein
 comes in crookedly and dangerously a palliation of a great part of
 ceremonial magic.  For it may be pretended that ceremonies, characters,
 and charms do work, not by any tacit or sacramental contract with evil
 spirits, but serve only to strengthen the imagination of him that useth
 it; as images are said by the Roman Church to fix the cogitations and
 raise the devotions of them that pray before them.  But for mine own
 judgment, if it be admitted that imagination hath power, and that
 ceremonies fortify imagination, and that they be used sincerely and
 intentionally for that purpose; yet I should hold them unlawful, as
 opposing to that first edict which God gave unto man, _In sudore vultus
 comedes panem tuum_.  For they propound those noble effects, which God
 hath set forth unto man to be bought at the price of labour, to be
 attained by a few easy and slothful observances.  Deficiences in these
 knowledges I will report none, other than the general deficience, that it
 is not known how much of them is verity, and how much vanity.
 
 XII. (1) The knowledge which respecteth the faculties of the mind of man
 is of two kindsthe one respecting his understanding and reason, and the
 other his will, appetite, and affection; whereof the former produceth
 position or decree, the latter action or execution.  It is true that the
 imagination is an agent or _nuncius_ in both provinces, both the judicial
 and the ministerial.  For sense sendeth over to imagination before reason
 have judged, and reason sendeth over to imagination before the decree can
 be acted.  For imagination ever precedeth voluntary motion.  Saving that
 this Janus of imagination hath differing faces: for the face towards
 reason hath the print of truth, but the face towards action hath the
 print of good; which nevertheless are faces,
 
     Quales decet esse sororum.
 
 Neither is the imagination simply and only a messenger; but is invested
 with, or at least wise usurpeth no small authority in itself, besides the
 duty of the message.  For it was well said by Aristotle, That the mind
 hath over the body that commandment, which the lord hath over a bondman;
 but that reason hath over the imagination that commandment which a
 magistrate hath over a free citizen, who may come also to rule in his
 turn.  For we see that, in matters of faith and religion, we raise our
 imagination above our reason, which is the cause why religion sought ever
 access to the mind by similitudes, types, parables, visions, dreams.  And
 again, in all persuasions that are wrought by eloquence, and other
 impressions of like nature, which do paint and disguise the true
 appearance of things, the chief recommendation unto reason is from the
 imagination.  Nevertheless, because I find not any science that doth
 properly or fitly pertain to the imagination, I see no cause to alter the
 former division.  For as for poesy, it is rather a pleasure or play of
 imagination than a work or duty thereof.  And if it be a work, we speak
 not now of such parts of learning as the imagination produceth, but of
 such sciences as handle and consider of the imagination.  No more than we
 shall speak now of such knowledges as reason produceth (for that
 extendeth to all philosophy), but of such knowledges as do handle and
 inquire of the faculty of reason: so as poesy had his true place.  As for
 the power of the imagination in nature, and the manner of fortifying the
 same, we have mentioned it in the doctrine _De Anima_, whereunto most
 fitly it belongeth.  And lastly, for imaginative or insinuative reason,
 which is the subject of rhetoric, we think it best to refer it to the
 arts of reason.  So therefore we content ourselves with the former
 division, that human philosophy, which respecteth the faculties of the
 mind of man, hath two parts, rational and moral.
 
 (2) The part of human philosophy which is rational is of all knowledges,
 to the most wits, the least delightful, and seemeth but a net of subtlety
 and spinosity.  For as it was truly said, that knowledge is _pabulum
 animi_; so in the nature of mens appetite to this food most men are of
 the taste and stomach of the Israelites in the desert, that would fain
 have returned _ad ollas carnium_, and were weary of manna; which, though
 it were celestial, yet seemed less nutritive and comfortable.  So
 generally men taste well knowledges that are drenched in flesh and blood,
 civil history, morality, policy, about the which mens affections,
 praises, fortunes do turn and are conversant.  But this same _lumen
 siccum_ doth parch and offend most mens watery and soft natures.  But to
 speak truly of things as they are in worth, rational knowledges are the
 keys of all other arts, for as Aristotle saith aptly and elegantly, That
 the hand is the instrument of instruments, and the mind is the form of
 forms; so these be truly said to be the art of arts.  Neither do they
 only direct, but likewise confirm and strengthen; even as the habit of
 shooting doth not only enable to shoot a nearer shoot, but also to draw a
 stronger bow.
 
 (3) The arts intellectual are four in number, divided according to the
 ends whereunto they are referredfor mans labour is to invent that which
 is sought or propounded; or to judge that which is invented; or to retain
 that which is judged; or to deliver over that which is retained.  So as
 the arts must be fourart of inquiry or invention; art of examination or
 judgment; art of custody or memory; and art of elocution or tradition.
 
 XIII. (1) Invention is of two kinds much differingthe one of arts and
 sciences, and the other of speech and arguments.  The former of these I
 do report deficient; which seemeth to me to be such a deficience as if,
 in the making of an inventory touching the state of a defunct, it should
 be set down that there is no ready money.  For as money will fetch all
 other commodities, so this knowledge is that which should purchase all
 the rest.  And like as the West Indies had never been discovered if the
 use of the mariners needle had not been first discovered, though the one
 be vast regions, and the other a small motion; so it cannot be found
 strange if sciences be no further discovered, if the art itself of
 invention and discovery hath been passed over.
 
 (2) That this part of knowledge is wanting, to my judgment standeth
 plainly confessed; for first, logic doth not pretend to invent sciences,
 or the axioms of sciences, but passeth it over with a _cuique in sua arte
 credendum_.  And Celsus acknowledgeth it gravely, speaking of the
 empirical and dogmatical sects of physicians, That medicines and cures
 were first found out, and then after the reasons and causes were
 discoursed; and not the causes first found out, and by light from them
 the medicines and cures discovered.  And Plato in his Thetetus noteth
 well, That particulars are infinite, and the higher generalities give no
 sufficient direction; and that the pith of all sciences, which maketh the
 artsman differ from the inexpert, is in the middle propositions, which in
 every particular knowledge are taken from tradition and experience.  And
 therefore we see, that they which discourse of the inventions and
 originals of things refer them rather to chance than to art, and rather
 to beasts, birds, fishes, serpents, than to men.
 
     Dictamnum genetrix Creta carpit ab Ida,
     Puberibus caulem foliis et flore camantem
     Purpureo; non illa feris incognita capris
     Gramina, cum tergo volucres hsere sagitt.
 
 So that it was no marvel (the manner of antiquity being to consecrate
 inventors) that the Egyptians had so few human idols in their temples,
 but almost all brute:
 
     Omnigenumque Deum monstra, et latrator Anubis,
     Contra Neptunum, et Venerem, contraque Minervam, &c.
 
 And if you like better the tradition of the Grecians, and ascribe the
 first inventions to men, yet you will rather believe that Prometheus
 first stroke the flints, and marvelled at the spark, than that when he
 first stroke the flints he expected the spark; and therefore we see the
 West Indian Prometheus had no intelligence with the European, because of
 the rareness with them of flint, that gave the first occasion.  So as it
 should seem, that hitherto men are rather beholden to a wild goat for
 surgery, or to a nightingale for music, or to the ibis for some part of
 physic, or to the pot-lid that flew open for artillery, or generally to
 chance or anything else than to logic for the invention of arts and
 sciences.  Neither is the form of invention which Virgil describeth much
 other:
 
     Ut varias usus meditande extunderet artes
     Paulatim.
 
 For if you observe the words well, it is no other method than that which
 brute beasts are capable of, and do put in ure; which is a perpetual
 intending or practising some one thing, urged and imposed by an absolute
 necessity of conservation of being.  For so Cicero saith very truly,
 _Usus uni rei deditus et naturam et artem spe vincit_.  And therefore if
 it be said of men,
 
           Labor omnia vincit
     Improbus, et duris urgens in rebus egestas,
 
 it is likewise said of beasts, _Quis psittaco docuit suum _?  Who
 taught the raven in a drought to throw pebbles into a hollow tree, where
 she spied water, that the water might rise so as she might come to it?
 Who taught the bee to sail through such a vast sea or air, and to find
 the way from a field in a flower a great way off to her hive?  Who taught
 the ant to bite every grain of corn that she burieth in her hill, lest it
 should take root and grow?  Add then the word _extundere_, which
 importeth the extreme difficulty, and the word _paulatim_, which
 importeth the extreme slowness, and we are where we were, even amongst
 the Egyptians gods; there being little left to the faculty of reason,
 and nothing to the duty or art, for matter of invention.
 
 (3) Secondly, the induction which the logicians speak of, and which
 seemeth familiar with Plato, whereby the principles of sciences may be
 pretended to be invented, and so the middle propositions by derivation
 from the principles; their form of induction, I say, is utterly vicious
 and incompetent; wherein their error is the fouler, because it is the
 duty of art to perfect and exalt nature; but they contrariwise have
 wronged, abused, and traduced nature.  For he that shall attentively
 observe how the mind doth gather this excellent dew of knowledge, like
 unto that which the poet speaketh of, _Arei mellis clestia dona_,
 distilling and contriving it out of particulars natural and artificial,
 as the flowers of the field and garden, shall find that the mind of
 herself by nature doth manage and act an induction much better than they
 describe it.  For to conclude upon an enumeration of particulars, without
 instance contradictory, is no conclusion, but a conjecture; for who can
 assure (in many subjects) upon those particulars which appear of a side,
 that there are not other on the contrary side which appear not?  As if
 Samuel should have rested upon those sons of Jesse which were brought
 before him, and failed of David which was in the field.  And this form
 (to say truth), is so gross, as it had not been possible for wits so
 subtle as have managed these things to have offered it to the world, but
 that they hasted to their theories and dogmaticals, and were imperious
 and scornful toward particulars; which their manner was to use but as
 _lictores_ and _viatores_, for sergeants and whifflers, _ad summovendam
 turbam_, to make way and make room for their opinions, rather than in
 their true use and service.  Certainly it is a thing may touch a man with
 a religious wonder, to see how the footsteps of seducement are the very
 same in divine and human truth; for, as in divine truth man cannot endure
 to become as a child, so in human, they reputed the attending the
 inductions (whereof we speak), as if it were a second infancy or
 childhood.
 
 (4) Thirdly, allow some principles or axioms were rightly induced, yet,
 nevertheless, certain it is that middle propositions cannot be deduced
 from them in subject of nature by syllogismthat is, by touch and
 reduction of them to principles in a middle term.  It is true that in
 sciences popular, as moralities, laws, and the like, yea, and divinity
 (because it pleaseth God to apply Himself to the capacity of the
 simplest), that form may have use; and in natural philosophy likewise, by
 way of argument or satisfactory reason, _Qu assensum parit operis effta
 est_; but the subtlety of nature and operations will not be enchained in
 those bonds.  For arguments consist of propositions, and propositions of
 words, and words are but the current tokens or marks of popular notions
 of things; which notions, if they be grossly and variably collected out
 of particulars, it is not the laborious examination either of
 consequences of arguments, or of the truth of propositions, that can ever
 correct that error, being (as the physicians speak) in the first
 digestion.  And, therefore, it was not without cause, that so many
 excellent philosophers became sceptics and academics, and denied any
 certainty of knowledge or comprehension; and held opinion that the
 knowledge of man extended only to appearances and probabilities.  It is
 true that in Socrates it was supposed to be but a form of irony,
 _Scientiam dissimulando simulavit_; for he used to disable his knowledge,
 to the end to enhance his knowledge; like the humour of Tiberius in his
 beginnings, that would reign, but would not acknowledge so much.  And in
 the later academy, which Cicero embraced, this opinion also of
 _acatalepsia_ (I doubt) was not held sincerely; for that all those which
 excelled in copy of speech seem to have chosen that sect, as that which
 was fittest to give glory to their eloquence and variable discourses;
 being rather like progresses of pleasure than journeys to an end.  But
 assuredly many scattered in both academies did hold it in subtlety and
 integrity.  But here was their chief error: they charged the deceit upon
 the senses; which in my judgment (notwithstanding all their cavillations)
 are very sufficient to certify and report truth, though not always
 immediately, yet by comparison, by help of instrument, and by producing
 and urging such things as are too subtle for the sense to some effect
 comprehensible by the sense, and other like assistance.  But they ought
 to have charged the deceit upon the weakness of the intellectual powers,
 and upon the manner of collecting and concluding upon the reports of the
 senses.  This I speak, not to disable the mind of man, but to stir it up
 to seek help; for no man, be he never so cunning or practised, can make a
 straight line or perfect circle by steadiness of hand, which may be
 easily done by help of a ruler or compass.
 
 (5) This part of invention, concerning the invention of sciences, I
 purpose (if God give me leave) hereafter to propound, having digested it
 into two parts: whereof the one I term _experientia literata_, and the
 other _interpretatio natur_; the former being but a degree and rudiment
 of the latter.  But I will not dwell too long, nor speak too great upon a
 promise.
 
 (6) The invention of speech or argument is not properly an invention; for
 to invent is to discover that we know not, and not to recover or resummon
 that which we already know; and the use of this invention is no other
 but, out of the knowledge whereof our mind is already possessed to draw
 forth or call before us that which may be pertinent to the purpose which
 we take into our consideration.  So as to speak truly, it is no
 invention, but a remembrance or suggestion, with an application; which is
 the cause why the schools do place it after judgment, as subsequent and
 not precedent.  Nevertheless, because we do account it a chase as well of
 deer in an enclosed park as in a forest at large, and that it hath
 already obtained the name, let it be called invention; so as it be
 perceived and discerned, that the scope and end of this invention is
 readiness and present use of our knowledge, and not addition or
 amplification thereof.
 
 (7) To procure this ready use of knowledge there are two courses,
 preparation and suggestion.  The former of these seemeth scarcely a part
 of knowledge, consisting rather of diligence than of any artificial
 erudition.  And herein Aristotle wittily, but hurtfully, doth deride the
 sophists near his time, saying, They did as if one that professed the
 art of shoemaking should not teach how to make up a shoe, but only
 exhibit in a readiness a number of shoes of all fashions and sizes.  But
 yet a man might reply, that if a shoemaker should have no shoes in his
 shop, but only work as he is bespoken, he should be weakly customed.  But
 our Saviour, speaking of divine knowledge, saith, That the kingdom of
 heaven is like a good householder, that bringeth forth both new and old
 store; and we see the ancient writers of rhetoric do give it in precept,
 that pleaders should have the places, whereof they have most continual
 use, ready handled in all the variety that may be; as that, to speak for
 the literal interpretation of the law against equity, and contrary; and
 to speak for presumptions and inferences against testimony, and contrary.
 And Cicero himself, being broken unto it by great experience, delivereth
 it plainly, that whatsoever a man shall have occasion to speak of (if he
 will take the pains), he may have it in effect premeditate and handled
 _in thesi_.  So that when he cometh to a particular he shall have nothing
 to do, but to put to names, and times, and places, and such other
 circumstances of individuals.  We see likewise the exact diligence of
 Demosthenes; who, in regard of the great force that the entrance and
 access into causes hath to make a good impression, had ready framed a
 number of prefaces for orations and speeches.  All which authorities and
 precedents may overweigh Aristotles opinion, that would have us change a
 rich wardrobe for a pair of shears.
 
 (8) But the nature of the collection of this provision or preparatory
 store, though it be common both to logic and rhetoric, yet having made an
 entry of it here, where it came first to be spoken of, I think fit to
 refer over the further handling of it to rhetoric.
 
 (9) The other part of invention, which I term suggestion, doth assign and
 direct us to certain marks, or places, which may excite our mind to
 return and produce such knowledge as it hath formerly collected, to the
 end we may make use thereof.  Neither is this use (truly taken) only to
 furnish argument to dispute, probably with others, but likewise to
 minister unto our judgment to conclude aright within ourselves.  Neither
 may these places serve only to apprompt our invention, but also to direct
 our inquiry.  For a faculty of wise interrogating is half a knowledge.
 For as Plato saith, Whosoever seeketh, knoweth that which he seeketh for
 in a general notion; else how shall he know it when he hath found it?
 And, therefore, the larger your anticipation is, the more direct and
 compendious is your search.  But the same places which will help us what
 to produce of that which we know already, will also help us, if a man of
 experience were before us, what questions to ask; or, if we have books
 and authors to instruct us, what points to search and revolve; so as I
 cannot report that this part of invention, which is that which the
 schools call topics, is deficient.
 
 (10) Nevertheless, topics are of two sorts, general and special.  The
 general we have spoken to; but the particular hath been touched by some,
 but rejected generally as inartificial and variable.  But leaving the
 humour which hath reigned too much in the schools (which is, to be vainly
 subtle in a few things which are within their command, and to reject the
 rest), I do receive particular topics; that is, places or directions of
 invention and inquiry in every particular knowledge, as things of great
 use, being mixtures of logic with the matter of sciences.  For in these
 it holdeth _ars inveniendi adolescit cum inventis_; for as in going of a
 way, we do not only gain that part of the way which is passed, but we
 gain the better sight of that part of the way which remaineth, so every
 degree of proceeding in a science giveth a light to that which followeth;
 which light, if we strengthen by drawing it forth into questions or
 places of inquiry, we do greatly advance our pursuit.
 
 XIV. (1) Now we pass unto the arts of judgment, which handle the natures
 of proofs and demonstrations, which as to induction hath a coincidence
 with invention; for all inductions, whether in good or vicious form, the
 same action of the mind which inventeth, judgethall one as in the sense.
 But otherwise it is in proof by syllogism, for the proof being not
 immediate, but by mean, the invention of the mean is one thing, and the
 judgment of the consequence is another; the one exciting only, the other
 examining.  Therefore, for the real and exact form of judgment, we refer
 ourselves to that which we have spoken of interpretation of Nature.
 
 (2) For the other judgment by syllogism, as it is a thing most agreeable
 to the mind of man, so it hath been vehemently end excellently laboured.
 For the nature of man doth extremely covet to have somewhat in his
 understanding fixed and unmovable, and as a rest and support of the mind.
 And, therefore, as Aristotle endeavoureth to prove, that in all motion
 there is some point quiescent; and as he elegantly expoundeth the ancient
 fable of Atlas (that stood fixed, and bare up the heaven from falling) to
 be meant of the poles or axle-tree of heaven, whereupon the conversion is
 accomplished, so assuredly men have a desire to have an Atlas or
 axle-tree within to keep them from fluctuation, which is like to a
 perpetual peril of falling.  Therefore men did hasten to set down some
 principles about which the variety of their disputatious might turn.
 
 (3) So, then, this art of judgment is but the reduction of propositions
 to principles in a middle term.  The principles to be agreed by all and
 exempted from argument; the middle term to be elected at the liberty of
 every mans invention; the reduction to be of two kinds, direct and
 inverted: the one when the proposition is reduced to the principle, which
 they term a probation ostensive; the other, when the contradictory of the
 proposition is reduced to the contradictory of the principle, which is
 that which they call _per incommodum_, or pressing an absurdity; the
 number of middle terms to be as the proposition standeth degrees more or
 less removed from the principle.
 
 (4) But this art hath two several methods of doctrine, the one by way of
 direction, the other by way of caution: the former frameth and setteth
 down a true form of consequence, by the variations and deflections from
 which errors and inconsequences may be exactly judged.  Toward the
 composition and structure of which form it is incident to handle the
 parts thereof, which are propositions, and the parts of propositions,
 which are simple words.  And this is that part of logic which is
 comprehended in the Analytics.
 
 (5) The second method of doctrine was introduced for expedite use and
 assurance sake, discovering the more subtle forms of sophisms and
 illaqueations with their redargutions, which is that which is termed
 _elenches_.  For although in the more gross sorts of fallacies it
 happeneth (as Seneca maketh the comparison well) as in juggling feats,
 which, though we know not how they are done, yet we know well it is not
 as it seemeth to be; yet the more subtle sort of them doth not only put a
 man besides his answer, but doth many times abuse his judgment.
 
 (6) This part concerning _elenches_ is excellently handled by Aristotle
 in precept, but more excellently by Plato in example; not only in the
 persons of the sophists, but even in Socrates himself, who, professing to
 affirm nothing, but to infirm that which was affirmed by another, hath
 exactly expressed all the forms of objection, fallace, and redargution.
 And although we have said that the use of this doctrine is for
 redargution, yet it is manifest the degenerate and corrupt use is for
 caption and contradiction, which passeth for a great faculty, and no
 doubt is of very great advantage, though the difference be good which was
 made between orators and sophisters, that the one is as the greyhound,
 which hath his advantage in the race, and the other as the hare, which
 hath her advantage in the turn, so as it is the advantage of the weaker
 creature.
 
 (7) But yet further, this doctrine of elenches hath a more ample latitude
 and extent than is perceived; namely, unto divers parts of knowledge,
 whereof some are laboured and other omitted.  For first, I conceive
 (though it may seem at first somewhat strange) that that part which is
 variably referred, sometimes to logic, sometimes to metaphysic, touching
 the common adjuncts of essences, is but an _elenche_; for the great
 sophism of all sophisms being equivocation or ambiguity of words and
 phrase, specially of such words as are most general and intervene in
 every inquiry, it seemeth to me that the true and fruitful use (leaving
 vain subtleties and speculations) of the inquiry of majority, minority,
 priority, posteriority, identity, diversity, possibility, act, totality,
 parts, existence, privation, and the like, are but wise cautions against
 ambiguities of speech.  So, again, the distribution of things into
 certain tribes, which we call categories or predicaments, are but
 cautions against the confusion of definitions and divisions.
 
 (8) Secondly, there is a seducement that worketh by the strength of the
 impression, and not by the subtlety of the illaqueationnot so much
 perplexing the reason, as overruling it by power of the imagination.  But
 this part I think more proper to handle when I shall speak of rhetoric.
 
 (9) But lastly, there is yet a much more important and profound kind of
 fallacies in the mind of man, which I find not observed or inquired at
 all, and think good to place here, as that which of all others
 appertaineth most to rectify judgment, the force whereof is such as it
 doth not dazzle or snare the understanding in some particulars, but doth
 more generally and inwardly infect and corrupt the state thereof.  For
 the mind of man is far from the nature of a clear and equal glass,
 wherein the beams of things should reflect according to their true
 incidence; nay, it is rather like an enchanted glass, full of
 superstition and imposture, if it be not delivered and reduced.  For this
 purpose, let us consider the false appearances that are imposed upon us
 by the general nature of the mind, beholding them in an example or two;
 as first, in that instance which is the root of all superstition, namely,
 that to the nature of the mind of all men it is consonant for the
 affirmative or active to affect more than the negative or privative.  So
 that a few times hitting or presence countervails ofttimes failing or
 absence, as was well answered by Diagoras to him that showed him in
 Neptunes temple the great number of pictures of such as had escaped
 shipwreck, and had paid their vows to Neptune, saying, Advise now, you
 that think it folly to invocate Neptune in tempest.  Yea, but, saith
 Diagoras, where are they painted that are drowned?  Let us behold it in
 another instance, namely, that the spirit of man, being of an equal and
 uniform substance, doth usually suppose and feign in nature a greater
 equality and uniformity than is in truth.  Hence it cometh that the
 mathematicians cannot satisfy themselves except they reduce the motions
 of the celestial bodies to perfect circles, rejecting spiral lines, and
 labouring to be discharged of eccentrics.  Hence it cometh that whereas
 there are many things in Nature as it were _monodica_, _sui juris_, yet
 the cogitations of man do feign unto them relatives, parallels, and
 conjugates, whereas no such thing is; as they have feigned an element of
 fire to keep square with earth, water, and air, and the like.  Nay, it is
 not credible, till it be opened, what a number of fictions and fantasies
 the similitude of human actions and arts, together with the making of man
 _communis mensura_, have brought into natural philosophy; not much better
 than the heresy of the Anthropomorphites, bred in the cells of gross and
 solitary monks, and the opinion of Epicurus, answerable to the same in
 heathenism, who supposed the gods to be of human shape.  And, therefore,
 Velleius the Epicurean needed not to have asked why God should have
 adorned the heavens with stars, as if He had been an _dilis_, one that
 should have set forth some magnificent shows or plays.  For if that great
 Work-master had been of a human disposition, He would have cast the stars
 into some pleasant and beautiful works and orders like the frets in the
 roofs of houses; whereas one can scarce find a posture in square, or
 triangle, or straight line, amongst such an infinite number, so differing
 a harmony there is between the spirit of man and the spirit of Nature.
 
 (10) Let us consider again the false appearances imposed upon us by every
 mans own individual nature and custom in that feigned supposition that
 Plato maketh of the cave; for certainly if a child were continued in a
 grot or cave under the earth until maturity of age, and came suddenly
 abroad, he would have strange and absurd imaginations.  So, in like
 manner, although our persons live in the view of heaven, yet our spirits
 are included in the caves of our own complexions and customs, which
 minister unto us infinite errors and vain opinions if they be not
 recalled to examination.  But hereof we have given many examples in one
 of the errors, or peccant humours, which we ran briefly over in our first
 book.
 
 (11) And lastly, let us consider the false appearances that are imposed
 upon us by words, which are framed and applied according to the conceit
 and capacities of the vulgar sort; and although we think we govern our
 words, and prescribe it well _loquendum ut vulgus sentiendum ut
 sapientes_, yet certain it is that words, as a Tartars bow, do shoot
 back upon the understanding of the wisest, and mightily entangle and
 pervert the judgment.  So as it is almost necessary in all controversies
 and disputations to imitate the wisdom of the mathematicians, in setting
 down in the very beginning the definitions of our words and terms, that
 others may know how we accept and understand them, and whether they
 concur with us or no.  For it cometh to pass, for want of this, that we
 are sure to end there where we ought to have begun, which is, in
 questions and differences about words.  To conclude, therefore, it must
 be confessed that it is not possible to divorce ourselves from these
 fallacies and false appearances because they are inseparable from our
 nature and condition of life; so yet, nevertheless, the caution of them
 (for all elenches, as was said, are but cautions) doth extremely import
 the true conduct of human judgment.  The particular elenches or cautions
 against these three false appearances I find altogether deficient.
 
 (12) There remaineth one part of judgment of great excellency which to
 mine understanding is so slightly touched, as I may report that also
 deficient; which is the application of the differing kinds of proofs to
 the differing kinds of subjects.  For there being but four kinds of
 demonstrations, that is, by the immediate consent of the mind or sense,
 by induction, by syllogism, and by congruity, which is that which
 Aristotle calleth demonstration in orb or circle, and not _a notioribus_,
 every of these hath certain subjects in the matter of sciences, in which
 respectively they have chiefest use; and certain others, from which
 respectively they ought to be excluded; and the rigour and curiosity in
 requiring the more severe proofs in some things, and chiefly the facility
 in contenting ourselves with the more remiss proofs in others, hath been
 amongst the greatest causes of detriment and hindrance to knowledge.  The
 distributions and assignations of demonstrations according to the analogy
 of sciences I note as deficient.
 
 XV. (1) The custody or retaining of knowledge is either in writing or
 memory; whereof writing hath two parts, the nature of the character and
 the order of the entry.  For the art of characters, or other visible
 notes of words or things, it hath nearest conjugation with grammar, and,
 therefore, I refer it to the due place; for the disposition and
 collocation of that knowledge which we preserve in writing, it consisteth
 in a good digest of common-places, wherein I am not ignorant of the
 prejudice imputed to the use of common-place books, as causing a
 retardation of reading, and some sloth or relaxation of memory.  But
 because it is but a counterfeit thing in knowledges to be forward and
 pregnant, except a man be deep and full, I hold the entry of
 common-places to be a matter of great use and essence in studying, as
 that which assureth copy of invention, and contracteth judgment to a
 strength.  But this is true, that of the methods of common-places that I
 have seen, there is none of any sufficient worth, all of them carrying
 merely the face of a school and not of a world; and referring to vulgar
 matters and pedantical divisions, without all life or respect to action.
 
 (2) For the other principal part of the custody of knowledge, which is
 memory, I find that faculty in my judgment weakly inquired of.  An art
 there is extant of it; but it seemeth to me that there are better
 precepts than that art, and better practices of that art than those
 received.  It is certain the art (as it is) may be raised to points of
 ostentation prodigious; but in use (as is now managed) it is barren, not
 burdensome, nor dangerous to natural memory, as is imagined, but barren,
 that is, not dexterous to be applied to the serious use of business and
 occasions.  And, therefore, I make no more estimation of repeating a
 great number of names or words upon once hearing, or the pouring forth of
 a number of verses or rhymes _extempore_, or the making of a satirical
 simile of everything, or the turning of everything to a jest, or the
 falsifying or contradicting of everything by cavil, or the like (whereof
 in the faculties of the mind there is great copy, and such as by device
 and practice may be exalted to an extreme degree of wonder), than I do of
 the tricks of tumblers, funambuloes, baladines; the one being the same in
 the mind that the other is in the body, matters of strangeness without
 worthiness.
 
 (3) This art of memory is but built upon two intentions; the one
 prenotion, the other emblem.  Prenotion dischargeth the indefinite
 seeking of that we would remember, and directeth us to seek in a narrow
 compass, that is, somewhat that hath congruity with our place of memory.
 Emblem reduceth conceits intellectual to images sensible, which strike
 the memory more; out of which axioms may be drawn much better practice
 than that in use; and besides which axioms, there are divers more
 touching help of memory not inferior to them.  But I did in the beginning
 distinguish, not to report those things deficient, which are but only ill
 managed.
 
 XVI. (1) There remaineth the fourth kind of rational knowledge, which is
 transitive, concerning the expressing or transferring our knowledge to
 others, which I will term by the general name of tradition or delivery.
 Tradition hath three parts: the first concerning the organ of tradition;
 the second concerning the method of tradition; and the third concerning
 the illustration of tradition.
 
 (2) For the organ of tradition, it is either speech or writing; for
 Aristotle saith well, Words are the images of cogitations, and letters
 are the images of words.  But yet it is not of necessity that
 cogitations be expressed by the medium of words.  For whatsoever is
 capable of sufficient differences, and those perceptible by the sense, is
 in nature competent to express cogitations.  And, therefore, we see in
 the commerce of barbarous people that understand not one anothers
 language, and in the practice of divers that are dumb and deaf, that
 mens minds are expressed in gestures, though not exactly, yet to serve
 the turn.  And we understand further, that it is the use of China and the
 kingdoms of the High Levant to write in characters real, which express
 neither letters nor words in gross, but things or notions; insomuch as
 countries and provinces which understand not one anothers language can
 nevertheless read one anothers writings, because the characters are
 accepted more generally than the languages do extend; and, therefore,
 they have a vast multitude of characters, as many, I suppose, as radical
 words.
 
 (3) These notes of cogitations are of two sorts: the one when the note
 hath some similitude or congruity with the notion; the other _ad
 placitum_, having force only by contract or acceptation.  Of the former
 sort are hieroglyphics and gestures.  For as to hieroglyphics (things of
 ancient use and embraced chiefly by the Egyptians, one of the most
 ancient nations), they are but as continued impresses and emblems.  And
 as for gestures, they are as transitory hieroglyphics, and are to
 hieroglyphics as words spoken are to words written, in that they abide
 not; but they have evermore, as well as the other, an affinity with the
 things signified.  As Periander, being consulted with how to preserve a
 tyranny newly usurped, bid the messenger attend and report what he saw
 him do; and went into his garden and topped all the highest flowers,
 signifying that it consisted in the cutting off and keeping low of the
 nobility and grandees.  _Ad placitum_, are the characters real before
 mentioned, and words: although some have been willing by curious inquiry,
 or rather by apt feigning, to have derived imposition of names from
 reason and intendment; a speculation elegant, and, by reason it searcheth
 into antiquity, reverent, but sparingly mixed with truth, and of small
 fruit.  This portion of knowledge touching the notes of things and
 cogitations in general, I find not inquired, but deficient.  And although
 it may seem of no great use, considering that words and writings by
 letters do far excel all the other ways; yet because this part
 concerneth, as it were, the mint of knowledge (for words are the tokens
 current and accepted for conceits, as moneys are for values, and that it
 is fit men be not ignorant that moneys may be of another kind than gold
 and silver), I thought good to propound it to better inquiry.
 
 (4) Concerning speech and words, the consideration of them hath produced
 the science of grammar.  For man still striveth to reintegrate himself in
 those benedictions, from which by his fault he hath been deprived; and as
 he hath striven against the first general curse by the invention of all
 other arts, so hath he sought to come forth of the second general curse
 (which was the confusion of tongues) by the art of grammar; whereof the
 use in a mother tongue is small, in a foreign tongue more; but most in
 such foreign tongues as have ceased to be vulgar tongues, and are turned
 only to learned tongues.  The duty of it is of two natures: the one
 popular, which is for the speedy and perfect attaining languages, as well
 for intercourse of speech as for understanding of authors; the other
 philosophical, examining the power and nature of words, as they are the
 footsteps and prints of reason: which kind of analogy between words and
 reason is handled _sparsim_, brokenly though not entirely; and,
 therefore, I cannot report it deficient, though I think it very worthy to
 be reduced into a science by itself.
 
 (5) Unto grammar also belongeth, as an appendix, the consideration of the
 accidents of words; which are measure, sound, and elevation or accent,
 and the sweetness and harshness of them: whence hath issued some curious
 observations in rhetoric, but chiefly poesy, as we consider it, in
 respect of the verse and not of the argument.  Wherein though men in
 learned tongues do tie themselves to the ancient measures, yet in modern
 languages it seemeth to me as free to make new measures of verses as of
 dances; for a dance is a measured pace, as a verse is a measured speech.
 In these things this sense is better judge than the art:
 
        Cn fercula nostr
     Mallem convivis quam placuisse cocis.
 
 And of the servile expressing antiquity in an unlike and an unfit
 subject, it is well said, _Quod tempore antiquum videtur_, _id
 incongruitate est maxime novum_.
 
 (6) For ciphers, they are commonly in letters or alphabets, but may be in
 words.  The kinds of ciphers (besides the simple ciphers, with changes,
 and intermixtures of nulls and non-significants) are many, according to
 the nature or rule of the infolding, wheel-ciphers, key-ciphers, doubles,
 &c.  But the virtues of them, whereby they are to be preferred, are
 three; that they be not laborious to write and read; that they be
 impossible to decipher; and, in some cases, that they be without
 suspicion.  The highest degree whereof is to write _omnia per omnia_;
 which is undoubtedly possible, with a proportion quintuple at most of the
 writing infolding to the writing infolded, and no other restraint
 whatsoever.  This art of ciphering hath for relative an art of
 deciphering, by supposition unprofitable, but, as things are, of great
 use.  For suppose that ciphers were well managed, there be multitudes of
 them which exclude the decipherer.  But in regard of the rawness and
 unskilfulness of the hands through which they pass, the greatest matters
 are many times carried in the weakest ciphers.
 
 (7) In the enumeration of these private and retired arts it may be
 thought I seek to make a great muster-roll of sciences, naming them for
 show and ostentation, and to little other purpose.  But let those, which
 are skilful in them, judge whether I bring them in only for appearance,
 or whether in that which I speak of them (though in few words) there be
 not some seed of proficience.  And this must be remembered, that as there
 be many of great account in their countries and provinces, which, when
 they come up to the seat of the estate, are but of mean rank and scarcely
 regarded; so these arts, being here placed with the principal and supreme
 sciences, seem petty things: yet to such as have chosen them to spend
 their labours and studies in them, they seem great matters.
 
 XVII. (1) For the method of tradition, I see it hath moved a controversy
 in our time.  But as in civil business, if there be a meeting, and men
 fall at words, there is commonly an end of the matter for that time, and
 no proceeding at all; so in learning, where there is much controversy,
 there is many times little inquiry.  For this part of knowledge of method
 seemeth to me so weakly inquired as I shall report it deficient.
 
 (2) Method hath been placed, and that not amiss, in logic, as a part of
 judgment.  For as the doctrine of syllogisms comprehendeth the rules of
 judgment upon that which is invented, so the doctrine of method
 containeth the rules of judgment upon that which is to be delivered; for
 judgment precedeth delivery, as it followeth invention.  Neither is the
 method or the nature of the tradition material only to the use of
 knowledge, but likewise to the progression of knowledge: for since the
 labour and life of one man cannot attain to perfection of knowledge, the
 wisdom of the tradition is that which inspireth the felicity of
 continuance and proceeding.  And therefore the most real diversity of
 method is of method referred to use, and method referred to progression:
 whereof the one may be termed magistral, and the other of probation.
 
 (3) The latter whereof seemeth to be _via deserta et interclusa_.  For as
 knowledges are now delivered, there is a kind of contract of error
 between the deliverer and the receiver.  For he that delivereth knowledge
 desireth to deliver it in such form as may be best believed, and not as
 may be best examined; and he that receiveth knowledge desireth rather
 present satisfaction than expectant inquiry; and so rather not to doubt,
 than not to err: glory making the author not to lay open his weakness,
 and sloth making the disciple not to know his strength.
 
 (4) But knowledge that is delivered as a thread to be spun on ought to be
 delivered and intimated, if it were possible, in the same method wherein
 it was invented: and so is it possible of knowledge induced.  But in this
 same anticipated and prevented knowledge, no man knoweth how he came to
 the knowledge which he hath obtained.  But yet, nevertheless, _secundum
 majus et minus_, a man may revisit and descend unto the foundations of
 his knowledge and consent; and so transplant it into another, as it grew
 in his own mind.  For it is in knowledges as it is in plants: if you mean
 to use the plant, it is no matter for the rootsbut if you mean to remove
 it to grow, then it is more assured to rest upon roots than slips: so the
 delivery of knowledges (as it is now used) is as of fair bodies of trees
 without the roots; good for the carpenter, but not for the planter.  But
 if you will have sciences grow, it is less matter for the shaft or body
 of the tree, so you look well to the taking up of the roots.  Of which
 kind of delivery the method of the mathematics, in that subject, hath
 some shadow: but generally I see it neither put in use nor put in
 inquisition, and therefore note it for deficient.
 
 (5) Another diversity of method there is, which hath some affinity with
 the former, used in some cases by the discretion of the ancients, but
 disgraced since by the impostures of many vain persons, who have made it
 as a false light for their counterfeit merchandises; and that is
 enigmatical and disclosed.  The pretence whereof is, to remove the vulgar
 capacities from being admitted to the secrets of knowledges, and to
 reserve them to selected auditors, or wits of such sharpness as can
 pierce the veil.
 
 (6) Another diversity of method, whereof the consequence is great, is the
 delivery of knowledge in aphorisms, or in methods; wherein we may observe
 that it hath been too much taken into custom, out of a few axioms or
 observations upon any subject, to make a solemn and formal art, filling
 it with some discourses, and illustrating it with examples, and digesting
 it into a sensible method.  But the writing in aphorisms hath many
 excellent virtues, whereto the writing in method doth not approach.
 
 (7) For first, it trieth the writer, whether he be superficial or solid:
 for aphorisms, except they should be ridiculous, cannot be made but of
 the pith and heart of sciences; for discourse of illustration is cut off;
 recitals of examples are cut off; discourse of connection and order is
 cut off; descriptions of practice are cut off.  So there remaineth
 nothing to fill the aphorisms but some good quantity of observation; and
 therefore no man can suffice, nor in reason will attempt, to write
 aphorisms, but he that is sound and grounded.  But in methods,
 
        Tantum series juncturaque pollet,
     Tantum de medio sumptis accedit honoris,
 
 as a man shall make a great show of an art, which, if it were disjointed,
 would come to little.  Secondly, methods are more fit to win consent or
 belief, but less fit to point to action; for they carry a kind of
 demonstration in orb or circle, one part illuminating another, and
 therefore satisfy.  But particulars being dispersed do best agree with
 dispersed directions.  And lastly, aphorisms, representing a knowledge
 broken, do invite men to inquire further; whereas methods, carrying the
 show of a total, do secure men, as if they were at furthest.
 
 (8) Another diversity of method, which is likewise of great weight, is
 the handling of knowledge by assertions and their proofs, or by questions
 and their determinations.  The latter kind whereof, if it be immoderately
 followed, is as prejudicial to the proceeding of learning as it is to the
 proceeding of an army to go about to besiege every little fort or hold.
 For if the field be kept, and the sum of the enterprise pursued, those
 smaller things will come in of themselves: indeed a man would not leave
 some important piece enemy at his back.  In like manner, the use of
 confutation in the delivery of sciences ought to be very sparing; and to
 serve to remove strong preoccupations and prejudgments, and not to
 minister and excite disputatious and doubts.
 
 (9) Another diversity of method is, according to the subject or matter
 which is handled.  For there is a great difference in delivery of the
 mathematics, which are the most abstracted of knowledges, and policy,
 which is the most immersed.  And howsoever contention hath been moved,
 touching a uniformity of method in multiformity of matter, yet we see how
 that opinion, besides the weakness of it, hath been of ill desert towards
 learning, as that which taketh the way to reduce learning to certain
 empty and barren generalities; being but the very husks and shells of
 sciences, all the kernel being forced out and expulsed with the torture
 and press of the method.  And, therefore, as I did allow well of
 particular topics for invention, so I do allow likewise of particular
 methods of tradition.
 
 (10) Another diversity of judgment in the delivery and teaching of
 knowledge is, according unto the light and presuppositions of that which
 is delivered.  For that knowledge which is new, and foreign from opinions
 received, is to be delivered in another form than that that is agreeable
 and familiar; and therefore Aristotle, when he thinks to tax Democritus,
 doth in truth commend him, where he saith If we shall indeed dispute,
 and not follow after similitudes, &c.  For those whose conceits are
 seated in popular opinions need only but to prove or dispute; but those
 whose conceits are beyond popular opinions, have a double labour; the one
 to make themselves conceived, and the other to prove and demonstrate.  So
 that it is of necessity with them to have recourse to similitudes and
 translations to express themselves.  And therefore in the infancy of
 learning, and in rude times when those conceits which are now trivial
 were then new, the world was full of parables and similitudes; for else
 would men either have passed over without mark, or else rejected for
 paradoxes that which was offered, before they had understood or judged.
 So in divine learning, we see how frequent parables and tropes are, for
 it is a rule, that whatsoever science is not consonant to presuppositions
 must pray in aid of similitudes.
 
 (11) There be also other diversities of methods vulgar and received: as
 that of resolution or analysis, of constitution or systasis, of
 concealment or cryptic, &c., which I do allow well of, though I have
 stood upon those which are least handled and observed.  All which I have
 remembered to this purpose, because I would erect and constitute one
 general inquiry (which seems to me deficient) touching the wisdom of
 tradition.
 
 (12) But unto this part of knowledge, concerning method, doth further
 belong not only the architecture of the whole frame of a work, but also
 the several beams and columns thereof; not as to their stuff, but as to
 their quantity and figure.  And therefore method considereth not only the
 disposition of the argument or subject, but likewise the propositions:
 not as to their truth or matter, but as to their limitation and manner.
 For herein Ramus merited better a great deal in reviving the good rules
 of propositions ,   &c.than he did in
 introducing the canker of epitomes; and yet (as it is the condition of
 human things that, according to the ancient fables, the most precious
 things have the most pernicious keepers) it was so, that the attempt of
 the one made him fall upon the other.  For he had need be well conducted
 that should design to make axioms convertible, if he make them not withal
 circular, and non-promovent, or incurring into themselves; but yet the
 intention was excellent.
 
 (13) The other considerations of method, concerning propositions, are
 chiefly touching the utmost propositions, which limit the dimensions of
 sciences: for every knowledge may be fitly said, besides the profundity
 (which is the truth and substance of it, that makes it solid), to have a
 longitude and a latitude; accounting the latitude towards other sciences,
 and the longitude towards action; that is, from the greatest generality
 to the most particular precept.  The one giveth rule how far one
 knowledge ought to intermeddle within the province of another, which is
 the rule they call ; the other giveth rule unto what degree of
 particularity a knowledge should descend: which latter I find passed over
 in silence, being in my judgment the more material.  For certainty there
 must be somewhat left to practice; but how much is worthy the inquiry?
 We see remote and superficial generalities do but offer knowledge to
 scorn of practical men; and are no more aiding to practice than an
 Ortelius universal map is to direct the way between London and York.
 The better sort of rules have been not unfitly compared to glasses of
 steel unpolished, where you may see the images of things, but first they
 must be filed: so the rules will help if they be laboured and polished by
 practice.  But how crystalline they may be made at the first, and how far
 forth they may be polished aforehand, is the question, the inquiry
 whereof seemeth to me deficient.
 
 (14) There hath been also laboured and put in practice a method, which is
 not a lawful method, but a method of imposture: which is, to deliver
 knowledges in such manner as men may speedily come to make a show of
 learning, who have it not.  Such was the travail of Raymundus Lullius in
 making that art which bears his name; not unlike to some books of
 typocosmy, which have been made since; being nothing but a mass of words
 of all arts, to give men countenance, that those which use the terms
 might be thought to understand the art; which collections are much like a
 frippers or brokers shop, that hath ends of everything, but nothing of
 worth.
 
 XVIII. (1) Now we descend to that part which concerneth the illustration
 of tradition, comprehended in that science which we call rhetoric, or art
 of eloquence, a science excellent, and excellently well laboured.  For
 although in true value it is inferior to wisdom (as it is said by God to
 Moses, when he disabled himself for want of this faculty, Aaron shall be
 thy speaker, and thou shalt be to him as God), yet with people it is the
 more mighty; for so Solomon saith, _Sapiens corde appellabitur prudens_,
 _sed dulcis eloquio majora reperiet_, signifying that profoundness of
 wisdom will help a man to a name or admiration, but that it is eloquence
 that prevaileth in an active life.  And as to the labouring of it, the
 emulation of Aristotle with the rhetoricians of his time, and the
 experience of Cicero, hath made them in their works of rhetoric exceed
 themselves.  Again, the excellency of examples of eloquence in the
 orations of Demosthenes and Cicero, added to the perfection of the
 precepts of eloquence, hath doubled the progression in this art; and
 therefore the deficiences which I shall note will rather be in some
 collections, which may as handmaids attend the art, than in the rules or
 use of the art itself.
 
 (2)  Notwithstanding, to stir the earth a little about the roots of this
 science, as we have done of the rest, the duty and office of rhetoric is
 to apply reason to imagination for the better moving of the will.  For we
 see reason is disturbed in the administration thereof by three meansby
 illaqueation or sophism, which pertains to logic; by imagination or
 impression, which pertains to rhetoric; and by passion or affection,
 which pertains to morality.  And as in negotiation with others, men are
 wrought by cunning, by importunity, and by vehemency; so in this
 negotiation within ourselves, men are undermined by inconsequences,
 solicited and importuned by impressions or observations, and transported
 by passions.  Neither is the nature of man so unfortunately built, as
 that those powers and arts should have force to disturb reason, and not
 to establish and advance it.  For the end of logic is to teach a form of
 argument to secure reason, and not to entrap it; the end of morality is
 to procure the affections to obey reason, and not to invade it; the end
 of rhetoric is to fill the imagination to second reason, and not to
 oppress it; for these abuses of arts come in but _ex oblique_, for
 caution.
 
 (3) And therefore it was great injustice in Plato, though springing out
 of a just hatred to the rhetoricians of his time, to esteem of rhetoric
 but as a voluptuary art, resembling it to cookery, that did mar wholesome
 meats, and help unwholesome by variety of sauces to the pleasure of the
 taste.  For we see that speech is much more conversant in adorning that
 which is good than in colouring that which is evil; for there is no man
 but speaketh more honestly than he can do or think; and it was
 excellently noted by Thucydides, in Cleon, that because he used to hold
 on the bad side in causes of estate, therefore he was ever inveighing
 against eloquence and good speech, knowing that no man can speak fair of
 courses sordid and base.  And therefore, as Plato said elegantly, That
 virtue, if she could be seen, would move great love and affection; so
 seeing that she cannot be showed to the sense by corporal shape, the next
 degree is to show her to the imagination in lively representation; for to
 show her to reason only in subtlety of argument was a thing ever derided
 in Chrysippus and many of the Stoics, who thought to thrust virtue upon
 men by sharp disputations and conclusions, which have no sympathy with
 the will of man.
 
 (4) Again, if the affections in themselves were pliant and obedient to
 reason, it were true there should be no great use of persuasions and
 insinuations to the will, more than of naked proposition and proofs; but
 in regard of the continual mutinies and seditious of the affections
 
        Video meliora, proboque,
     Deteriora sequor,
 
 reason would become captive and servile, if eloquence of persuasions did
 not practise and win the imagination from the affections part, and
 contract a confederacy between the reason and imagination against the
 affections; for the affections themselves carry ever an appetite to good,
 as reason doth.  The difference is, that the affection beholdeth merely
 the present; reason beholdeth the future and sum of time.  And,
 therefore, the present filling the imagination more, reason is commonly
 vanquished; but after that force of eloquence and persuasion hath made
 things future and remote appear as present, then upon the revolt of the
 imagination reason prevaileth.
 
 (5) We conclude, therefore, that rhetoric can be no more charged with the
 colouring of the worst part, than logic with sophistry, or morality with
 vice; for we know the doctrines of contraries are the same, though the
 use be opposite.  It appeareth also that logic differeth from rhetoric,
 not only as the fist from the palmthe one close, the other at largebut
 much more in this, that logic handleth reason exact and in truth, and
 rhetoric handleth it as it is planted in popular opinions and manners.
 And therefore Aristotle doth wisely place rhetoric as between logic on
 the one side, and moral or civil knowledge on the other, as participating
 of both; for the proofs and demonstrations of logic are toward all men
 indifferent and the same, but the proofs and persuasions of rhetoric
 ought to differ according to the auditors:
 
     Orpheus in sylvis, inter delphinas Arion.
 
 Which application in perfection of idea ought to extend so far that if a
 man should speak of the same thing to several persons, he should speak to
 them all respectively and several ways; though this politic part of
 eloquence in private speech it is easy for the greatest orators to want:
 whilst, by the observing their well-graced forms of speech, they leese
 the volubility of application; and therefore it shall not be amiss to
 recommend this to better inquiry, not being curious whether we place it
 here or in that part which concerneth policy.
 
 (6) Now therefore will I descend to the deficiences, which, as I said,
 are but attendances; and first, I do not find the wisdom and diligence of
 Aristotle well pursued, who began to make a collection of the popular
 signs and colours of good and evil, both simple and comparative, which
 are as the sophisms of rhetoric (as I touched before).  For example
 
        Sophisma.
 
     Quod laudatur, bonum: quod vituperatur, malum.
 
        Redargutio.
 
     Laudat venales qui vult extrudere merces.
 
 _Malum est_, _malum est_ (_inquit emptor_): _sed cum recesserit_, _tum
 gloriabitur_!  The defects in the labour of Aristotle are threeone, that
 there be but a few of many; another, that there elenches are not annexed;
 and the third, that he conceived but a part of the use of them: for their
 use is not only in probation, but much more in impression.  For many
 forms are equal in signification which are differing in impression, as
 the difference is great in the piercing of that which is sharp and that
 which is flat, though the strength of the percussion be the same.  For
 there is no man but will be a little more raised by hearing it said,
 Your enemies will be glad of this
 
     Hoc Ithacus velit, et magno mercentur Atrid.
 
 than by hearing it said only, This is evil for you.
 
 (7) Secondly, I do resume also that which I mentioned before, touching
 provision or preparatory store for the furniture of speech and readiness
 of invention, which appeareth to be of two sorts: the one in resemblance
 to a shop of pieces unmade up, the other to a shop of things ready made
 up; both to be applied to that which is frequent and most in request.
 The former of these I will call _antitheta_, and the latter _formul_.
 
 (8) _Antitheta_ are theses argued _pro et contra_, wherein men may be
 more large and laborious; but (in such as are able to do it) to avoid
 prolixity of entry, I wish the seeds of the several arguments to be cast
 up into some brief and acute sentences, not to be cited, but to be as
 skeins or bottoms of thread, to be unwinded at large when they come to be
 used; supplying authorities and examples by reference.
 
        _Pro verbis legis_.
     Non est interpretatio, sed divinatio, qu recedit a litera:
     Cum receditur a litera, judex transit in legislatorem.
 
        _Pro sententia legis_.
     Ex omnibus verbis est eliciendus sensus qui interpretatur singula.
 
 (9) _Formul_ are but decent and apt passages or conveyances of speech,
 which may serve indifferently for differing subjects; as of preface,
 conclusion, digression, transition, excusation, &c.  For as in buildings
 there is great pleasure and use in the well casting of the staircases,
 entries, doors, windows, and the like; so in speech, the conveyances and
 passages are of special ornament and effect.
 
     _A conclusion in a deliberative_.
     So may we redeem the faults passed, and prevent the inconveniences
     future.
 
 XIX. (1) There remain two appendices touching the tradition of knowledge,
 the one critical, the other pedantical.  For all knowledge is either
 delivered by teachers, or attained by mens proper endeavours: and
 therefore as the principal part of tradition of knowledge concerneth
 chiefly writing of books, so the relative part thereof concerneth reading
 of books; whereunto appertain incidently these considerations.  The first
 is concerning the true correction and edition of authors; wherein
 nevertheless rash diligence hath done great prejudice.  For these critics
 have often presumed that that which they understand not is false set
 down: as the priest that, where he found it written of St. Paul _Demissus
 est per sportam_, mended his book, and made it _Demissus est per portam_;
 because _sporta_ was a hard word, and out of his reading: and surely
 their errors, though they be not so palpable and ridiculous, yet are of
 the same kind.  And therefore, as it hath been wisely noted, the most
 corrected copies are commonly the least correct.
 
 The second is concerning the exposition and explication of authors, which
 resteth in annotations and commentaries: wherein it is over usual to
 blanch the obscure places and discourse upon the plain.
 
 The third is concerning the times, which in many cases give great light
 to true interpretations.
 
 The fourth is concerning some brief censure and judgment of the authors;
 that men thereby may make some election unto themselves what books to
 read.
 
 And the fifth is concerning the syntax and disposition of studies; that
 men may know in what order or pursuit to read.
 
 (2) For pedantical knowledge, it containeth that difference of tradition
 which is proper for youth; whereunto appertain divers considerations of
 great fruit.
 
 As first, the timing and seasoning of knowledges; as with what to
 initiate them, and from what for a time to refrain them.
 
 Secondly, the consideration where to begin with the easiest, and so
 proceed to the more difficult; and in what courses to press the more
 difficult, and then to turn them to the more easy; for it is one method
 to practise swimming with bladders, and another to practise dancing with
 heavy shoes.
 
 A third is the application of learning according unto the propriety of
 the wits; for there is no defect in the faculties intellectual, but
 seemeth to have a proper cure contained in some studies: as, for example,
 if a child be bird-witted, that is, hath not the faculty of attention,
 the mathematics giveth a remedy thereunto; for in them, if the wit be
 caught away but a moment, one is new to begin.  And as sciences have a
 propriety towards faculties for cure and help, so faculties or powers
 have a sympathy towards sciences for excellency or speedy profiting: and
 therefore it is an inquiry of great wisdom, what kinds of wits and
 natures are most apt and proper for what sciences.
 
 Fourthly, the ordering of exercises is matter of great consequence to
 hurt or help: for, as is well observed by Cicero, men in exercising their
 faculties, if they be not well advised, do exercise their faults and get
 ill habits as well as good; so as there is a great judgment to be had in
 the continuance and intermission of exercises.  It were too long to
 particularise a number of other considerations of this nature, things but
 of mean appearance, but of singular efficacy.  For as the wronging or
 cherishing of seeds or young plants is that that is most important to
 their thriving, and as it was noted that the first six kings being in
 truth as tutors of the state of Rome in the infancy thereof was the
 principal cause of the immense greatness of that state which followed, so
 the culture and manurance of minds in youth hath such a forcible (though
 unseen) operation, as hardly any length of time or contention of labour
 can countervail it afterwards.  And it is not amiss to observe also how
 small and mean faculties gotten by education, yet when they fall into
 great men or great matters, do work great and important effects: whereof
 we see a notable example in Tacitus of two stage players, Percennius and
 Vibulenus, who by their faculty of playing put the Pannonian armies into
 an extreme tumult and combustion.  For there arising a mutiny amongst
 them upon the death of Augustus Csar, Blsus the lieutenant had
 committed some of the mutineers, which were suddenly rescued; whereupon
 Vibulenus got to be heard speak, which he did in this manner:These poor
 innocent wretches appointed to cruel death, you have restored to behold
 the light; but who shall restore my brother to me, or life unto my
 brother, that was sent hither in message from the legions of Germany, to
 treat of the common cause? and he hath murdered him this last night by
 some of his fencers and ruffians, that he hath about him for his
 executioners upon soldiers.  Answer, Blsus, what is done with his body?
 The mortalest enemies do not deny burial.  When I have performed my last
 duties to the corpse with kisses, with tears, command me to be slain
 besides him; so that these my fellows, for our good meaning and our true
 hearts to the legions, may have leave to bury us.  With which speech he
 put the army into an infinite fury and uproar: whereas truth was he had
 no brother, neither was there any such matter; but he played it merely as
 if he had been upon the stage.
 
 (3) But to return: we are now come to a period of rational knowledges;
 wherein if I have made the divisions other than those that are received,
 yet would I not be thought to disallow all those divisions which I do not
 use.  For there is a double necessity imposed upon me of altering the
 divisions.  The one, because it differeth in end and purpose, to sort
 together those things which are next in nature, and those things which
 are next in use.  For if a secretary of estate should sort his papers, it
 is like in his study or general cabinet he would sort together things of
 a nature, as treaties, instructions, &c.  But in his boxes or particular
 cabinet he would sort together those that he were like to use together,
 though of several natures.  So in this general cabinet of knowledge it
 was necessary for me to follow the divisions of the nature of things;
 whereas if myself had been to handle any particular knowledge, I would
 have respected the divisions fittest for use.  The other, because the
 bringing in of the deficiences did by consequence alter the partitions of
 the rest.  For let the knowledge extant (for demonstration sake) be
 fifteen.  Let the knowledge with the deficiences be twenty; the parts of
 fifteen are not the parts of twenty; for the parts of fifteen are three
 and five; the parts of twenty are two, four, five, and ten.  So as these
 things are without contradiction, and could not otherwise be.
 
 XX. (1) We proceed now to that knowledge which considereth of the
 appetite and will of man: whereof Solomon saith, _Ante omnia_, _fili_,
 _custodi cor tuum_: _nam inde procedunt actiones vit_.  In the handling
 of this science, those which have written seem to me to have done as if a
 man, that professed to teach to write, did only exhibit fair copies of
 alphabets and letters joined, without giving any precepts or directions
 for the carriage of the hand and framing of the letters.  So have they
 made good and fair exemplars and copies, carrying the draughts and
 portraitures of good, virtue, duty, felicity; propounding them well
 described as the true objects and scopes of mans will and desires.  But
 how to attain these excellent marks, and how to frame and subdue the will
 of man to become true and conformable to these pursuits, they pass it
 over altogether, or slightly and unprofitably.  For it is not the
 disputing that moral virtues are in the mind of man by habit and not by
 nature, or the distinguishing that generous spirits are won by doctrines
 and persuasions, and the vulgar sort by reward and punishment, and the
 like scattered glances and touches, that can excuse the absence of this
 part.
 
 (2) The reason of this omission I suppose to be that hidden rock
 whereupon both this and many other barks of knowledge have been cast
 away; which is, that men have despised to be conversant in ordinary and
 common matters, the judicious direction whereof nevertheless is the
 wisest doctrine (for life consisteth not in novelties nor subtleties),
 but contrariwise they have compounded sciences chiefly of a certain
 resplendent or lustrous mass of matter, chosen to give glory either to
 the subtlety of disputatious, or to the eloquence of discourses.  But
 Seneca giveth an excellent check to eloquence, _Nocet illis eloquentia_,
 _quibus non rerum cupiditatem facit_, _sed sui_.  Doctrine should be such
 as should make men in love with the lesson, and not with the teacher;
 being directed to the auditors benefit, and not to the authors
 commendation.  And therefore those are of the right kind which may be
 concluded as Demosthenes concludes his counsel, _Qu si feceritis_, _non
 oratorem dumtaxat in prsentia laudabitis_, _sed vosmetipsos etiam non
 ita multo post statu rerum vestraram meliore_.
 
 (3) Neither needed men of so excellent parts to have despaired of a
 fortune, which the poet Virgil promised himself, and indeed obtained, who
 got as much glory of eloquence, wit, and learning in the expressing of
 the observations of husbandry, as of the heroical acts of neas:
 
     Nec sum animi dubius, verbis ea vincere magnum
     Quam sit, et angustis his addere rebus honorem.
 
 And surely, if the purpose be in good earnest, not to write at leisure
 that which men may read at leisure, but really to instruct and suborn
 action and active life, these Georgics of the mind, concerning the
 husbandry and tillage thereof, are no less worthy than the heroical
 descriptions of virtue, duty, and felicity.  Wherefore the main and
 primitive division of moral knowledge seemeth to be into the exemplar or
 platform of good, and the regiment or culture of the mind: the one
 describing the nature of good, the other prescribing rules how to subdue,
 apply, and accommodate the will of man thereunto.
 
 (4) The doctrine touching the platform or nature of good considereth it
 either simple or compared; either the kinds of good, or the degrees of
 good; in the latter whereof those infinite disputatious which were
 touching the supreme degree thereof, which they term felicity, beatitude,
 or the highest good, the doctrines concerning which were as the heathen
 divinity, are by the Christian faith discharged.  And as Aristotle saith,
 That young men may be happy, but not otherwise but by hope; so we must
 all acknowledge our minority, and embrace the felicity which is by hope
 of the future world.
 
 (5) Freed therefore and delivered from this doctrine of the philosophers
 heaven, whereby they feigned a higher elevation of mans nature than was
 (for we see in what height of style Seneca writeth, _Vere magnum_,
 _habere fragilitatem hominis_, _securitatem Dei_), we may with more
 sobriety and truth receive the rest of their inquiries and labours.
 Wherein for the nature of good positive or simple, they have set it down
 excellently in describing the forms of virtue and duty, with their
 situations and postures; in distributing them into their kinds, parts,
 provinces, actions, and administrations, and the like: nay further, they
 have commended them to mans nature and spirit with great quickness of
 argument and beauty of persuasions; yea, and fortified and entrenched
 them (as much as discourse can do) against corrupt and popular opinions.
 Again, for the degrees and comparative nature of good, they have also
 excellently handled it in their triplicity of good, in the comparisons
 between a contemplative and an active life, in the distinction between
 virtue with reluctation and virtue secured, in their encounters between
 honesty and profit, in their balancing of virtue with virtue, and the
 like; so as this part deserveth to be reported for excellently laboured.
 
 (6) Notwithstanding, if before they had come to the popular and received
 notions of virtue and vice, pleasure and pain, and the rest, they had
 stayed a little longer upon the inquiry concerning the roots of good and
 evil, and the strings of those roots, they had given, in my opinion, a
 great light to that which followed; and specially if they had consulted
 with nature, they had made their doctrines less prolix and more profound:
 which being by them in part omitted and in part handled with much
 confusion, we will endeavour to resume and open in a more clear manner.
 
 (7) There is formed in everything a double nature of goodthe one, as
 everything is a total or substantive in itself; the other, as it is a
 part or member of a greater body; whereof the latter is in degree the
 greater and the worthier, because it tendeth to the conservation of a
 more general form.  Therefore we see the iron in particular sympathy
 moveth to the loadstone; but yet if it exceed a certain quantity, it
 forsaketh the affection to the loadstone, and like a good patriot moveth
 to the earth, which is the region and country of massy bodies; so may we
 go forward, and see that water and massy bodies move to the centre of the
 earth; but rather than to suffer a divulsion in the continuance of
 nature, they will move upwards from the centre of the earth, forsaking
 their duty to the earth in regard of their duty to the world.  This
 double nature of good, and the comparative thereof, is much more engraven
 upon man, if he degenerate not, unto whom the conservation of duty to the
 public ought to be much more precious than the conservation of life and
 being; according to that memorable speech of Pompeius Magnus, when being
 in commission of purveyance for a famine at Rome, and being dissuaded
 with great vehemency and instance by his friends about him, that he
 should not hazard himself to sea in an extremity of weather, he said only
 to them, _Necesse est ut eam_, _non ut vivam_.  But it may be truly
 affirmed that there was never any philosophy, religion, or other
 discipline, which did so plainly and highly exalt the good which is
 communicative, and depress the good which is private and particular, as
 the Holy Faith; well declaring that it was the same God that gave the
 Christian law to men, who gave those laws of nature to inanimate
 creatures that we spake of before; for we read that the elected saints of
 God have wished themselves anathematised and razed out of the book of
 life, in an ecstasy of charity and infinite feeling of communion.
 
 (8) This being set down and strongly planted, doth judge and determine
 most of the controversies wherein moral philosophy is conversant.  For
 first, it decideth the question touching the preferment of the
 contemplative or active life, and decideth it against Aristotle.  For all
 the reasons which he bringeth for the contemplative are private, and
 respecting the pleasure and dignity of a mans self (in which respects no
 question the contemplative life hath the pre-eminence), not much unlike
 to that comparison which Pythagoras made for the gracing and magnifying
 of philosophy and contemplation, who being asked what he was, answered,
 That if Hiero were ever at the Olympian games, he knew the manner, that
 some came to try their fortune for the prizes, and some came as merchants
 to utter their commodities, and some came to make good cheer and meet
 their friends, and some came to look on; and that he was one of them that
 came to look on.  But men must know, that in this theatre of mans life
 it is reserved only for God and angels to be lookers on.  Neither could
 the like question ever have been received in the Church, notwithstanding
 their _Pretiosa in oculis Domini mors sanctorum ejus_, by which place
 they would exalt their civil death and regular professions, but upon this
 defence, that the monastical life is not simple contemplative, but
 performeth the duty either of incessant prayers and supplications, which
 hath been truly esteemed as an office in the Church, or else of writing
 or taking instructions for writing concerning the law of God, as Moses
 did when he abode so long in the mount.  And so we see Enoch, the seventh
 from Adam, who was the first contemplative and walked with God, yet did
 also endow the Church with prophecy, which Saint Jude citeth.  But for
 contemplation which should be finished in itself, without casting beams
 upon society, assuredly divinity knoweth it not.
 
 (9) It decideth also the controversies between Zeno and Socrates, and
 their schools and successions, on the one side, who placed felicity in
 virtue simply or attended, the actions and exercises whereof do chiefly
 embrace and concern society; and on the other side, the Cyrenaics and
 Epicureans, who placed it in pleasure, and made virtue (as it is used in
 some comedies of errors, wherein the mistress and the maid change habits)
 to be but as a servant, without which pleasure cannot be served and
 attended; and the reformed school of the Epicureans, which placed it in
 serenity of mind and freedom from perturbation; as if they would have
 deposed Jupiter again, and restored Saturn and the first age, when there
 was no summer nor winter, spring nor autumn, but all after one air and
 season; and Herillus, which placed felicity in extinguishment of the
 disputes of the mind, making no fixed nature of good and evil, esteeming
 things according to the clearness of the desires, or the reluctation;
 which opinion was revived in the heresy of the Anabaptists, measuring
 things according to the motions of the spirit, and the constancy or
 wavering of belief; all which are manifest to tend to private repose and
 contentment, and not to point of society.
 
 (10) It censureth also the philosophy of Epictetus, which presupposeth
 that felicity must be placed in those things which are in our power, lest
 we be liable to fortune and disturbance; as if it were not a thing much
 more happy to fail in good and virtuous ends for the public, than to
 obtain all that we can wish to ourselves in our proper fortune: as
 Consalvo said to his soldiers, showing them Naples, and protesting he had
 rather die one foot forwards, than to have his life secured for long by
 one foot of retreat.  Whereunto the wisdom of that heavenly leader hath
 signed, who hath affirmed that a good conscience is a continual feast;
 showing plainly that the conscience of good intentions, howsoever
 succeeding, is a more continual joy to nature than all the provision
 which can be made for security and repose.
 
 (11) It censureth likewise that abuse of philosophy which grew general
 about the time of Epictetus, in converting it into an occupation or
 profession; as if the purpose had been, not to resist and extinguish
 perturbations, but to fly and avoid the causes of them, and to shape a
 particular kind and course of life to that end; introducing such a health
 of mind, as was that health of body of which Aristotle speaketh of
 Herodicus, who did nothing all his life long but intend his health;
 whereas if men refer themselves to duties of society, as that health of
 body is best which is ablest to endure all alterations and extremities,
 so likewise that health of mind is most proper which can go through the
 greatest temptations and perturbations.  So as Diogenes opinion is to be
 accepted, who commended not them which abstained, but them which
 sustained, and could refrain their mind _in prcipitio_, and could give
 unto the mind (as is used in horsemanship) the shortest stop or turn.
 
 (12) Lastly, it censureth the tenderness and want of application in some
 of the most ancient and reverend philosophers and philosophical men, that
 did retire too easily from civil business, for avoiding of indignities
 and perturbations; whereas the resolution of men truly moral ought to be
 such as the same Consalvo said the honour of a soldier should be, _e tel
 crassiore_, and not so fine as that everything should catch in it and
 endanger it.
 
 XXI. (1) To resume private or particular good, it falleth into the
 division of good active and passive; for this difference of good (not
 unlike to that which amongst the Romans was expressed in the familiar or
 household terms of _promus_ and _condus_) is formed also in all things,
 and is best disclosed in the two several appetites in creatures; the one
 to preserve or continue themselves, and the other to dilate or multiply
 themselves, whereof the latter seemeth to be the worthier; for in nature
 the heavens, which are the more worthy, are the agent, and the earth,
 which is the less worthy, is the patient.  In the pleasures of living
 creatures, that of generation is greater than that of food.  In divine
 doctrine, _beatius est dare quam accipere_.  And in life, there is no
 mans spirit so soft, but esteemeth the effecting of somewhat that he
 hath fixed in his desire, more than sensuality, which priority of the
 active good is much upheld by the consideration of our estate to be
 mortal and exposed to fortune.  For if we might have a perpetuity and
 certainty in our pleasures, the state of them would advance their price.
 But when we see it is but _magni stimamus mori tardius_, and _ne
 glorieris de crastino_, _nescis partum diei_, it maketh us to desire to
 have somewhat secured and exempted from time, which are only our deeds
 and works; as it is said, _Opera eorum sequuntur eos_.  The pre-eminence
 likewise of this active good is upheld by the affection which is natural
 in man towards variety and proceeding, which in the pleasures of the
 sense, which is the principal part of passive good, can have no great
 latitude.  _Cogita quamdiu eadem feceris_; _cibus_, _somnus_, _ludus per
 hunc circulum curritur_; _mori velle non tantum fortis_, _aut miser_,
 _aut prudens_, _sed etiam fastidiosus potest_.  But in enterprises,
 pursuits, and purposes of life, there is much variety; whereof men are
 sensible with pleasure in their inceptions, progressions, recoils,
 reintegrations, approaches and attainings to their ends.  So as it was
 well said, _Vita sine proposito languida et vaga est_.  Neither hath this
 active good an identity with the good of society, though in some cases it
 hath an incidence into it.  For although it do many times bring forth
 acts of beneficence, yet it is with a respect private to a mans own
 power, glory, amplification, continuance; as appeareth plainly, when it
 findeth a contrary subject.  For that gigantine state of mind which
 possesseth the troublers of the world, such as was Lucius Sylla and
 infinite other in smaller model, who would have all men happy or unhappy
 as they were their friends or enemies, and would give form to the world,
 according to their own humours (which is the true theomachy), pretendeth
 and aspireth to active good, though it recedeth furthest from good of
 society, which we have determined to be the greater.
 
 (2) To resume passive good, it receiveth a subdivision of conservative
 and effective.  For let us take a brief review of that which we have
 said: we have spoken first of the good of society, the intention whereof
 embraceth the form of human nature, whereof we are members and portions,
 and not our own proper and individual form; we have spoken of active
 good, and supposed it as a part of private and particular good.  And
 rightly, for there is impressed upon all things a triple desire or
 appetite proceeding from love to themselves: one of preserving and
 continuing their form; another of advancing and perfecting their form;
 and a third of multiplying and extending their form upon other things:
 whereof the multiplying, or signature of it upon other things, is that
 which we handled by the name of active good.  So as there remaineth the
 conserving of it, and perfecting or raising of it, which latter is the
 highest degree of passive good.  For to preserve in state is the less, to
 preserve with advancement is the greater.  So in man,
 
     Igneus est ollis vigor, et clestis origo.
 
 His approach or assumption to divine or angelical nature is the
 perfection of his form; the error or false imitation of which good is
 that which is the tempest of human life; while man, upon the instinct of
 an advancement, formal and essential, is carried to seek an advancement
 local.  For as those which are sick, and find no remedy, do tumble up and
 down and change place, as if by a remove local they could obtain a remove
 internal, so is it with men in ambition, when failing of the mean to
 exalt their nature, they are in a perpetual estuation to exalt their
 place.  So then passive good is, as was said, either conservative or
 perfective.
 
 (3) To resume the good of conservation or comfort, which consisteth in
 the fruition of that which is agreeable to our natures; it seemeth to be
 most pure and natural of pleasures, but yet the softest and lowest.  And
 this also receiveth a difference, which hath neither been well judged of,
 nor well inquired; for the good of fruition or contentment is placed
 either in the sincereness of the fruition, or in the quickness and vigour
 of it; the one superinduced by equality, the other by vicissitude; the
 one having less mixture of evil, the other more impression of good.
 Whether of these is the greater good is a question controverted; but
 whether mans nature may not be capable of both is a question not
 inquired.
 
 (4) The former question being debated between Socrates and a sophist,
 Socrates placing felicity in an equal and constant peace of mind, and the
 sophist in much desiring and much enjoying, they fell from argument to
 ill words: the sophist saying that Socrates felicity was the felicity of
 a block or stone; and Socrates saying that the sophists felicity was the
 felicity of one that had the itch, who did nothing but itch and scratch.
 And both these opinions do not want their supports.  For the opinion of
 Socrates is much upheld by the general consent even of the epicures
 themselves, that virtue beareth a great part in felicity; and if so,
 certain it is, that virtue hath more use in clearing perturbations then
 in compassing desires.  The sophists opinion is much favoured by the
 assertion we last spake of, that good of advancement is greater than good
 of simple preservation; because every obtaining a desire hath a show of
 advancement, as motion though in a circle hath a show of progression.
 
 (5) But the second question, decided the true way, maketh the former
 superfluous.  For can it be doubted, but that there are some who take
 more pleasure in enjoying pleasures than some other, and yet,
 nevertheless, are less troubled with the loss or leaving of them?  So as
 this same, _Non uti ut non appetas_, _non appetere ut non metuas_, _sunt
 animi pusilli et diffidentis_.  And it seemeth to me that most of the
 doctrines of the philosophers are more fearful and cautious than the
 nature of things requireth.  So have they increased the fear of death in
 offering to cure it.  For when they would have a mans whole life to be
 but a discipline or preparation to die, they must needs make men think
 that it is a terrible enemy, against whom there is no end of preparing.
 Better saith the poet:
 
     Qui finem vit extremum inter munera ponat
     Natur.
 
 So have they sought to make mens minds too uniform and harmonical, by
 not breaking them sufficiently to contrary motions; the reasons whereof I
 suppose to be, because they themselves were men dedicated to a private,
 free, and unapplied course of life.  For as we see, upon the lute or like
 instrument, a ground, though it be sweet and have show of many changes,
 yet breaketh not the hand to such strange and hard stops and passages, as
 a set song or voluntary; much after the same manner was the diversity
 between a philosophical and civil life.  And, therefore, men are to
 imitate the wisdom of jewellers: who, if there be a grain, or a cloud, or
 an ice which may be ground forth without taking too much of the stone,
 they help it; but if it should lessen and abate the stone too much, they
 will not meddle with it: so ought men so to procure serenity as they
 destroy not magnanimity.
 
 (6) Having therefore deduced the good of man which is private and
 particular, as far as seemeth fit, we will now return to that good of man
 which respecteth and beholdeth society, which we may term duty; because
 the term of duty is more proper to a mind well framed and disposed
 towards others, as the term of virtue is applied to a mind well formed
 and composed in itself; though neither can a man understand virtue
 without some relation to society, nor duty without an inward disposition.
 This part may seem at first to pertain to science civil and politic; but
 not if it be well observed.  For it concerneth the regiment and
 government of every man over himself, and not over others.  And as in
 architecture the direction of framing the posts, beams, and other parts
 of building, is not the same with the manner of joining them and erecting
 the building; and in mechanicals, the direction how to frame an
 instrument or engine is not the same with the manner of setting it on
 work and employing it; and yet, nevertheless, in expressing of the one
 you incidently express the aptness towards the other; so the doctrine of
 conjugation of men in society differeth from that of their conformity
 thereunto.
 
 (7) This part of duty is subdivided into two parts: the common duty of
 every man, as a man or member of a state; the other, the respective or
 special duty of every man in his profession, vocation, and place.  The
 first of these is extant and well laboured, as hath been said.  The
 second likewise I may report rather dispersed than deficient; which
 manner of dispersed writing in this kind of argument I acknowledge to be
 best.  For who can take upon him to write of the proper duty, virtue,
 challenge, and right of every several vocation, profession, and place?
 For although sometimes a looker on may see more than a gamester, and
 there be a proverb more arrogant than sound, That the vale best
 discovereth the hill; yet there is small doubt but that men can write
 best and most really and materially in their own professions; and that
 the writing of speculative men of active matter for the most part doth
 seem to men of experience, as Phormios argument of the wars seemed to
 Hannibal, to be but dreams and dotage.  Only there is one vice which
 accompanieth them that write in their own professions, that they magnify
 them in excess.  But generally it were to be wished (as that which would
 make learning indeed solid and fruitful) that active men would or could
 become writers.
 
 (8) In which kind I cannot but mention, _honoris causa_, your Majestys
 excellent book touching the duty of a king; a work richly compounded of
 divinity, morality, and policy, with great aspersion of all other arts;
 and being in some opinion one of the most sound and healthful writings
 that I have read: not distempered in the heat of invention, nor in the
 coldness of negligence; not sick of dizziness, as those are who leese
 themselves in their order, nor of convulsions, as those which cramp in
 matters impertinent; not savouring of perfumes and paintings, as those do
 who seek to please the reader more than nature beareth; and chiefly well
 disposed in the spirits thereof, being agreeable to truth and apt for
 action; and far removed from that natural infirmity, whereunto I noted
 those that write in their own professions to be subjectwhich is, that
 they exalt it above measure.  For your Majesty hath truly described, not
 a king of Assyria or Persia in their extern glory, but a Moses or a
 David, pastors of their people.  Neither can I ever leese out of my
 remembrance what I heard your Majesty in the same sacred spirit of
 government deliver in a great cause of judicature, which was, That kings
 ruled by their laws, as God did by the laws of nature; and ought as
 rarely to put in use their supreme prerogative as God doth His power of
 working miracles.  And yet notwithstanding in your book of a free
 monarchy, you do well give men to understand, that you know the plenitude
 of the power and right of a king, as well as the circle of his office and
 duty.  Thus have I presumed to allege this excellent writing of your
 Majesty, as a prime or eminent example of tractates concerning special
 and respective duties; wherein I should have said as much, if it had been
 written a thousand years since.  Neither am I moved with certain courtly
 decencies, which esteem it flattery to praise in presence.  No, it is
 flattery to praise in absencethat is, when either the virtue is absent,
 or the occasion is absent; and so the praise is not natural, but forced,
 either in truth or in time.  But let Cicero be read in his oration _pro
 Marcello_, which is nothing but an excellent table of Csars virtue, and
 made to his face; besides the example of many other excellent persons,
 wiser a great deal than such observers; and we will never doubt, upon a
 full occasion, to give just praises to present or absent.
 
 (9) But to return; there belongeth further to the handling of this part,
 touching the duties of professions and vocations, a relative or opposite,
 touching the frauds, cautels, impostures, and vices of every profession,
 which hath been likewise handled; but how? rather in a satire and
 cynically, than seriously and wisely; for men have rather sought by wit
 to deride and traduce much of that which is good in professions, than
 with judgment to discover and sever that which is corrupt.  For, as
 Solomon saith, he that cometh to seek after knowledge with a mind to
 scorn and censure shall be sure to find matter for his humour, but no
 matter for his instruction: _Qurenti derisori scientiam ipsa se
 abscondit_; _sed studioso fit obviam_.  But the managing of this argument
 with integrity and truth, which I note as deficient, seemeth to me to be
 one of the best fortifications for honesty and virtue that can be
 planted.  For, as the fable goeth of the basiliskthat if he see you
 first, you die for it; but if you see him first, he diethso is it with
 deceits and evil arts, which, if they be first espied they leese their
 life; but if they prevent, they endanger.  So that we are much beholden
 to Machiavel and others, that write what men do, and not what they ought
 to do.  For it is not possible to join serpentine wisdom with the
 columbine innocency, except men know exactly all the conditions of the
 serpent; his baseness and going upon his belly, his volubility and
 lubricity, his envy and sting, and the restthat is, all forms and
 natures of evil.  For without this, virtue lieth open and unfenced.  Nay,
 an honest man can do no good upon those that are wicked, to reclaim them,
 without the help of the knowledge of evil.  For men of corrupted minds
 presuppose that honesty groweth out of simplicity of manners, and
 believing of preachers, schoolmasters, and mens exterior language.  So
 as, except you can make them perceive that you know the utmost reaches of
 their own corrupt opinions, they despise all morality.  _Non recipit
 stultus verba prudenti_, _nisi ea dixeris qu_, _versantur in corde
 ejus_.
 
 (10) Unto this part, touching respective duty, doth also appertain the
 duties between husband and wife, parent and child, master and servant.
 So likewise the laws of friendship and gratitude, the civil bond of
 companies, colleges, and politic bodies, of neighbourhood, and all other
 proportionate duties; not as they are parts of government and society,
 but as to the framing of the mind of particular persons.
 
 (11) The knowledge concerning good respecting society doth handle it
 also, not simply alone, but comparatively; whereunto belongeth the
 weighing of duties between person and person, case and case, particular
 and public.  As we see in the proceeding of Lucius Brutus against his own
 sons, which was so much extolled, yet what was said?
 
     Infelix, utcunque ferent ea fata minores.
 
 So the case was doubtful, and had opinion on both sides.  Again, we see
 when M. Brutus and Cassius invited to a supper certain whose opinions
 they meant to feel, whether they were fit to be made their associates,
 and cast forth the question touching the killing of a tyrant being a
 usurper, they were divided in opinion; some holding that servitude was
 the extreme of evils, and others that tyranny was better than a civil
 war: and a number of the like cases there are of comparative duty.
 Amongst which that of all others is the most frequent, where the question
 is of a great deal of good to ensue of a small injustice.  Which Jason of
 Thessalia determined against the truth: _Aliqua sunt injuste facienda_,
 _ut multa juste fieri possint_.  But the reply is good: _Auctorem
 prsentis justiti habes_, _sponsorem futur non habes_.  Men must pursue
 things which are just in present, and leave the future to the Divine
 Providence.  So then we pass on from this general part touching the
 exemplar and description of good.
 
 XXII. (1) Now, therefore, that we have spoken of this fruit of life, it
 remaineth to speak of the husbandry that belongeth thereunto, without
 which part the former seemeth to be no better than a fair image or
 statue, which is beautiful to contemplate, but is without life and
 motion; whereunto Aristotle himself subscribeth in these words: _Necesse
 est scilicet de virtute dicere_, _et quid sit_, _et ex quibus gignatur_.
 _Inutile enum fere fuerit virtutem quidem nosse_, _acquirend autem ejus
 modos et vias ignorare_.  _Non enum de virtute tantum_, _qua specie sit_,
 _qurendum est_, _sed et quomodo sui copiam faciat_: _utrumque enum
 volumeus_, _et rem ipsam nosse_, _et ejus compotes fieri_: _hoc autem ex
 voto non succedet_, _nisi sciamus et ex quibus et quomodo_.  In such full
 words and with such iteration doth he inculcate this part.  So saith
 Cicero in great commendation of Cato the second, that he had applied
 himself to philosophy, _Non ita disputandi causa_, _sed ita vivendi_.
 And although the neglect of our times, wherein few men do hold any
 consultations touching the reformation of their life (as Seneca
 excellently saith, _De partibus vit quisque deliberat_, _de summa
 nemo_), may make this part seem superfluous; yet I must conclude with
 that aphorism of Hippocrates, _Qui gravi morbo correpti dolores non
 sentiunt_, _iis mens grotat_.  They need medicine, not only to assuage
 the disease, but to awake the sense.  And if it be said that the cure of
 mens minds belongeth to sacred divinity, it is most true; but yet moral
 philosophy may be preferred unto her as a wise servant and humble
 handmaid.  For as the Psalm saith, That the eyes of the handmaid look
 perpetually towards the mistress, and yet no doubt many things are left
 to the discretion of the handmaid to discern of the mistress will; so
 ought moral philosophy to give a constant attention to the doctrines of
 divinity, and yet so as it may yield of herself (within due limits) many
 sound and profitable directions.
 
 (2) This part, therefore, because of the excellency thereof, I cannot but
 find exceeding strange that it is not reduced to written inquiry; the
 rather, because it consisteth of much matter, wherein both speech and
 action is often conversant; and such wherein the common talk of men
 (which is rare, but yet cometh sometimes to pass) is wiser than their
 books.  It is reasonable, therefore, that we propound it in the more
 particularity, both for the worthiness, and because we may acquit
 ourselves for reporting it deficient, which seemeth almost incredible,
 and is otherwise conceived and presupposed by those themselves that have
 written.  We will, therefore, enumerate some heads or points thereof,
 that it may appear the better what it is, and whether it be extant.
 
 (3) First, therefore, in this, as in all things which are practical we
 ought to cast up our account, what is in our power, and what not; for the
 one may be dealt with by way of alteration, but the other by way of
 application only.  The husbandman cannot command neither the nature of
 the earth nor the seasons of the weather; no more can the physician the
 constitution of the patient nor the variety of accidents.  So in the
 culture and cure of the mind of man, two things are without our command:
 points of Nature, and points of fortune.  For to the basis of the one,
 and the conditions of the other, our work is limited and tied.  In these
 things, therefore, it is left unto us to proceed by application:
 
     Vincenda est omnis fertuna ferendo:
 
 and so likewise,
 
     Vincenda est omnis Natura ferendo.
 
 But when that we speak of suffering, we do not speak of a dull and
 neglected suffering, but of a wise and industrious suffering, which
 draweth and contriveth use and advantage out of that which seemeth
 adverse and contrary; which is that properly which we call accommodating
 or applying.  Now the wisdom of application resteth principally in the
 exact and distinct knowledge of the precedent state or disposition, unto
 which we do apply; for we cannot fit a garment except we first take
 measure of the body.
 
 (4) So, then, the first article of this knowledge is to set down sound
 and true distributions and descriptions of the several characters and
 tempers of mens natures and dispositions, specially having regard to
 those differences which are most radical in being the fountains and
 causes of the rest, or most frequent in concurrence or commixture;
 wherein it is not the handling of a few of them in passage, the better to
 describe the mediocrities of virtues, that can satisfy this intention.
 For if it deserve to be considered, that there are minds which are
 proportioned to great matters, and others to small (which Aristotle
 handleth, or ought to have bandied, by the name of magnanimity), doth it
 not deserve as well to be considered that there are minds proportioned to
 intend many matters, and others to few?  So that some can divide
 themselves: others can perchance do exactly well, but it must be but in
 few things at once; and so there cometh to be a narrowness of mind, as
 well as a pusillanimity.  And again, that some minds are proportioned to
 that which may be dispatched at once, or within a short return of time;
 others to that which begins afar off, and is to be won with length of
 pursuit:
 
     Jam tum tenditqus fovetque.
 
 So that there may be fitly said to be a longanimity, which is commonly
 also ascribed to God as a magnanimity.  So further deserved it to be
 considered by Aristotle, That there is a disposition in conversation
 (supposing it in things which do in no sort touch or concern a mans
 self) to soothe and please, and a disposition contrary to contradict and
 cross; and deserveth it not much better to be considered.  That there
 is a disposition, not in conversation or talk, but in matter of more
 serious nature (and supposing it still in things merely indifferent), to
 take pleasure in the good of another; and a disposition contrariwise, to
 take distaste at the good of another? which is that properly which we
 call good nature or ill nature, benignity or malignity; and, therefore, I
 cannot sufficiently marvel that this part of knowledge, touching the
 several characters of natures and dispositions, should be omitted both in
 morality and policy, considering it is of so great ministry and
 suppeditation to them both.  A man shall find in the traditions of
 astrology some pretty and apt divisions of mens natures, according to
 the predominances of the planets: lovers of quiet, lovers of action,
 lovers of victory, lovers of honour, lovers of pleasure, lovers of arts,
 lovers of change, and so forth.  A man shall find in the wisest sort of
 these relations which the Italians make touching conclaves, the natures
 of the several cardinals handsomely and lively painted forth.  A man
 shall meet with in every days conference the denominations of sensitive,
 dry, formal, real, humorous, certain, _huomo di prima impressione_,
 _huomo di ultima impressione_, and the like; and yet, nevertheless, this
 kind of observations wandereth in words, but is not fixed in inquiry.
 For the distinctions are found (many of them), but we conclude no
 precepts upon them: wherein our fault is the greater, because both
 history, poesy, and daily experience are as goodly fields where these
 observations grow; whereof we make a few posies to hold in our hands, but
 no man bringeth them to the confectionary that receipts might be made of
 them for use of life.
 
 (5) Of much like kind are those impressions of Nature, which are imposed
 upon the mind by the sex, by the age, by the region, by health and
 sickness, by beauty and deformity, and the like, which are inherent and
 not extern; and again, those which are caused by extern fortune, as
 sovereignty, nobility, obscure birth, riches, want, magistracy,
 privateness, prosperity, adversity, constant fortune, variable fortune,
 rising _per saltum_, _per gradus_, and the like.  And, therefore, we see
 that Plautus maketh it a wonder to see an old man beneficent, _benignitas
 hujis ut adolescentuli est_.  Saint Paul concludeth that severity of
 discipline was to be used to the Cretans, _increpa eos dure_, upon the
 disposition of their country, _Cretensus semper mendaces_, _mal besti_,
 _ventres_.  Sallust noteth that it is usual with kings to desire
 contradictories: _Sed plerumque regi voluntates_, _ut vehementes sunt_,
 _sic mobiles_, _speque ips sibi advers_.  Tacitus observeth how rarely
 raising of the fortune mendeth the disposition: _solus Vespasianus
 mutatus in melius_.  Pindarus maketh an observation, that great and
 sudden fortune for the most part defeateth men _qui magnam felicitatem
 concoquere non possunt_.  So the Psalm showeth it is more easy to keep a
 measure in the enjoying of fortune, than in the increase of fortune;
 _Diviti si affluant_, _nolite cor apponere_.  These observations and the
 like I deny not but are touched a little by Aristotle as in passage in
 his Rhetorics, and are handled in some scattered discourses; but they
 were never incorporate into moral philosophy, to which they do
 essentially appertain; as the knowledge of this diversity of grounds and
 moulds doth to agriculture, and the knowledge of the diversity of
 complexions and constitutions doth to the physician, except we mean to
 follow the indiscretion of empirics, which minister the same medicines to
 all patients.
 
 (6) Another article of this knowledge is the inquiry touching the
 affections; for as in medicining of the body, it is in order first to
 know the divers complexions and constitutions; secondly, the diseases;
 and lastly, the cures: so in medicining of the mind, after knowledge of
 the divers characters of mens natures, it followeth in order to know the
 diseases and infirmities of the mind, which are no other than the
 perturbations and distempars of the affections.  For as the ancient
 politiques in popular estates were wont to compare the people to the sea,
 and the orators to the winds; because as the sea would of itself be calm
 and quiet, if the winds did not move and trouble it; so the people would
 be peaceable and tractable if the seditious orators did not set them in
 working and agitation: so it may be fitly said, that the mind in the
 nature thereof would be temperate and stayed, if the affections, as
 winds, did not put it into tumult and perturbation.  And here again I
 find strange, as before, that Aristotle should have written divers
 volumes of Ethics, and never handled the affections which is the
 principal subject thereof; and yet in his Rhetorics, where they are
 considered but collaterally and in a second degree (as they may be moved
 by speech), he findeth place for them, and handleth them well for the
 quantity; but where their true place is he pretermitteth them.  For it is
 not his disputations about pleasure and pain that can satisfy this
 inquiry, no more than he that should generally handle the nature of light
 can be said to handle the nature of colours; for pleasure and pain are to
 the particular affections as light is to particular colours.  Better
 travails, I suppose, had the Stoics taken in this argument, as far as I
 can gather by that which we have at second hand.  But yet it is like it
 was after their manner, rather in subtlety of definitions (which in a
 subject of this nature are but curiosities), than in active and ample
 descriptions and observations.  So likewise I find some particular
 writings of an elegant nature, touching some of the affections: as of
 anger, of comfort upon adverse accidents, of tenderness of countenance,
 and other.  But the poets and writers of histories are the best doctors
 of this knowledge; where we may find painted forth, with great life, how
 affections are kindled and incited; and how pacified and refrained; and
 how again contained from act and further degree; how they disclose
 themselves; how they work; how they vary; how they gather and fortify:
 how they are enwrapped one within another; and how they do fight and
 encounter one with another; and other the like particularities.  Amongst
 the which this last is of special use in moral and civil matters; how, I
 say, to set affection against affection, and to master one by another;
 even as we used to hunt beast with beast, and fly bird with bird, which
 otherwise percase we could not so easily recover: upon which foundation
 is erected that excellent use of _prmium_ and _pna_, whereby civil
 states consist: employing the predominant affections of fear and hope,
 for the suppressing and bridling the rest.  For as in the government of
 states it is sometimes necessary to bridle one faction with another, so
 it is in the government within.
 
 (7) Now come we to those points which are within our own command, and
 have force and operation upon the mind, to affect the will and appetite,
 and to alter manners: wherein they ought to have handled custom,
 exercise, habit, education, example, imitation, emulation, company,
 friends, praise, reproof, exhortation, fame, laws, books, studies: these
 as they have determinate use in moralities, from these the mind
 suffereth, and of these are such receipts and regiments compounded and
 described, as may serve to recover or preserve the health and good estate
 of the mind, as far as pertaineth to human medicine: of which number we
 will insist upon some one or two, as an example of the rest, because it
 were too long to prosecute all; and therefore we do resume custom and
 habit to speak of.
 
 (8) The opinion of Aristotle seemeth to me a negligent opinion, that of
 those things which consist by Nature, nothing can be changed by custom;
 using for example, that if a stone be thrown ten thousand times up it
 will not learn to ascend; and that by often seeing or hearing we do not
 learn to see or hear the better.  For though this principle be true in
 things wherein Nature is peremptory (the reason whereof we cannot now
 stand to discuss), yet it is otherwise in things wherein Nature admitteth
 a latitude.  For he might see that a strait glove will come more easily
 on with use; and that a wand will by use bend otherwise than it grew; and
 that by use of the voice we speak louder and stronger; and that by use of
 enduring heat or cold we endure it the better, and the like: which latter
 sort have a nearer resemblance unto that subject of manners he handleth,
 than those instances which he allegeth.  But allowing his conclusion,
 that virtues and vices consist in habit, he ought so much the more to
 have taught the manner of superinducing that habit: for there be many
 precepts of the wise ordering the exercises of the mind, as there is of
 ordering the exercises of the body, whereof we will recite a few.
 
 (9) The first shall be, that we beware we take not at the first either
 too high a strain or too weak: for if too high, in a diffident nature you
 discourage, in a confident nature you breed an opinion of facility, and
 so a sloth; and in all natures you breed a further expectation than can
 hold out, and so an insatisfaction in the end: if too weak, of the other
 side, you may not look to perform and overcome any great task.
 
 (10) Another precept is to practise all things chiefly at two several
 times, the one when the mind is best disposed, the other when it is worst
 disposed; that by the one you may gain a great step, by the other you may
 work out the knots and stonds of the mind, and make the middle times the
 more easy and pleasant.
 
 (11) Another precept is that which Aristotle mentioneth by the way, which
 is to bear ever towards the contrary extreme of that whereunto we are by
 nature inclined; like unto the rowing against the stream, or making a
 wand straight by bending him contrary to his natural crookedness.
 
 (12) Another precept is that the mind is brought to anything better, and
 with more sweetness and happiness, if that whereunto you pretend be not
 first in the intention, but _tanquam aliud agendo_, because of the
 natural hatred of the mind against necessity and constraint.  Many other
 axioms there are touching the managing of exercise and custom, which
 being so conducted doth prove indeed another nature; but, being governed
 by chance, doth commonly prove but an ape of Nature, and bringeth forth
 that which is lame and counterfeit.
 
 (13) So if we should handle books and studies, and what influence and
 operation they have upon manners, are there not divers precepts of great
 caution and direction appertaining thereunto?  Did not one of the fathers
 in great indignation call poesy _vinum dmonum_, because it increaseth
 temptations, perturbations, and vain opinions?  Is not the opinion of
 Aristotle worthy to be regarded, wherein he saith, That young men are no
 fit auditors of moral philosophy, because they are not settled from the
 boiling heat of their affections, nor attempered with time and
 experience?  And doth it not hereof come, that those excellent books and
 discourses of the ancient writers (whereby they have persuaded unto
 virtue most effectually, by representing her in state and majesty, and
 popular opinions against virtue in their parasites coats fit to be
 scorned and derided), are of so little effect towards honesty of life,
 because they are not read and revolved by men in their mature and settled
 years, but confined almost to boys and beginners?  But is it not true
 also, that much less young men are fit auditors of matters of policy,
 till they have been thoroughly seasoned in religion and morality; lest
 their judgments be corrupted, and made apt to think that there are no
 true differences of things, but according to utility and fortune, as the
 verse describes it, _Prosperum et felix scelus virtus vocatur_; and
 again, _Ille crucem pretium sceleris tulit_, _hic diadema_: which the
 poets do speak satirically and in indignation on virtues behalf; but
 books of policy do speak it seriously and positively; for so it pleaseth
 Machiavel to say, That if Csar had been overthrown, he would have been
 more odious than ever was Catiline; as if there had been no difference,
 but in fortune, between a very fury of lust and blood, and the most
 excellent spirit (his ambition reserved) of the world?  Again, is there
 not a caution likewise to be given of the doctrines of moralities
 themselves (some kinds of them), lest they make men too precise,
 arrogant, incompatible; as Cicero saith of Cato, _In Marco Catone hc
 bona qu videmus divina et egregia_, _ipsius scitote esse propria_; _qu
 nonunquam requirimus ea sunt omnia non a natura_, _sed a magistro_?  Many
 other axioms and advices there are touching those proprieties and
 effects, which studies do infuse and instil into manners.  And so,
 likewise, is there touching the use of all those other points, of
 company, fame, laws, and the rest, which we recited in the beginning in
 the doctrine of morality.
 
 (14) But there is a kind of culture of the mind that seemeth yet more
 accurate and elaborate than the rest, and is built upon this ground; that
 the minds of all men are at some times in a state more perfect, and at
 other times in a state more depraved.  The purpose, therefore, of this
 practice is to fix and cherish the good hours of the mind, and to
 obliterate and take forth the evil.  The fixing of the good hath been
 practised by two means, vows or constant resolutions, and observances or
 exercises; which are not to be regarded so much in themselves, as because
 they keep the mind in continual obedience.  The obliteration of the evil
 hath been practised by two means, some kind of redemption or expiation of
 that which is past, and an inception or account _de novo_ for the time to
 come.  But this part seemeth sacred and religious, and justly; for all
 good moral philosophy (as was said) is but a handmaid to religion.
 
 (15) Wherefore we will conclude with that last point, which is of all
 other means the most compendious and summary, and again, the most noble
 and effectual to the reducing of the mind unto virtue and good estate;
 which is, the electing and propounding unto a mans self good and
 virtuous ends of his life, such as may be in a reasonable sort within his
 compass to attain.  For if these two things be supposed, that a man set
 before him honest and good ends, and again, that he be resolute,
 constant, and true unto them; it will follow that he shall mould himself
 into all virtue at once.  And this indeed is like the work of nature;
 whereas the other course is like the work of the hand.  For as when a
 carver makes an image, he shapes only that part whereupon he worketh; as
 if he be upon the face, that part which shall be the body is but a rude
 stone still, till such times as he comes to it.  But contrariwise when
 nature makes a flower or living creature, she formeth rudiments of all
 the parts at one time.  So in obtaining virtue by habit, while a man
 practiseth temperance, he doth not profit much to fortitude, nor the like
 but when he dedicateth and applieth himself to good ends, look, what
 virtue soever the pursuit and passage towards those ends doth commend
 unto him, he is invested of a precedent disposition to conform himself
 thereunto.  Which state of mind Aristotle doth excellently express
 himself, that it ought not to be called virtuous, but divine.  His words
 are these: _Immanitati autem consentaneum est opponere eam_, _qu supra
 humanitatem est_, _heroicam sive divinam virtutem_; and a little after,
 _Nam ut fer neque vitium neque virtus est_, _swic neque Dei_: _sed hic
 quidem status altius quiddam virtute est_, _ille aluid quiddam a vitio_.
 And therefore we may see what celsitude of honour Plinius Secundus
 attributeth to Trajan in his funeral oration, where he said, That men
 needed to make no other prayers to the gods, but that they would continue
 as good lords to them as Trajan had been; as if he had not been only an
 imitation of divine nature, but a pattern of it.  But these be heathen
 and profane passages, having but a shadow of that divine state of mind,
 which religion and the holy faith doth conduct men unto, by imprinting
 upon their souls charity, which is excellently called the bond of
 perfection, because it comprehendeth and fasteneth all virtues together.
 And as it is elegantly said by Menander of vain love, which is but a
 false imitation of divine love, _Amor melior Sophista lvo ad humanam
 vitam_that love teacheth a man to carry himself better than the sophist
 or preceptor; which he calleth left-handed, because, with all his rules
 and preceptions, he cannot form a man so dexterously, nor with that
 facility to prize himself and govern himself, as love can do: so
 certainly, if a mans mind be truly inflamed with charity, it doth work
 him suddenly into greater perfection than all the doctrine of morality
 can do, which is but a sophist in comparison of the other.  Nay, further,
 as Xenophon observed truly, that all other affections, though they raise
 the mind, yet they do it by distorting and uncomeliness of ecstasies or
 excesses; but only love doth exalt the mind, and nevertheless at the same
 instant doth settle and compose it: so in all other excellences, though
 they advance nature, yet they are subject to excess.  Only charity
 admitteth no excess.  For so we see, aspiring to be like God in power,
 the angels transgressed and fell; _Ascendam_, _et ero similis altissimo_:
 by aspiring to be like God in knowledge, man transgressed and fell;
 _Eritis sicut Dii_, _scientes bonum et malum_: but by aspiring to a
 similitude of God in goodness or love, neither man nor angel ever
 transgressed, or shall transgress.  For unto that imitation we are
 called: _Diligite inimicos vestros_, _benefacite eis qui oderunt vos_,
 _et orate pro persequentibus et calumniantibus vos_, _ut sitis filii
 Patris vestri qui in clis est_, _qui solem suum oriri facit super bonos
 et malos_, _et pluit super justos et injustos_.  So in the first platform
 of the divine nature itself, the heathen religion speaketh thus, _Optimus
 Maximus_: and the sacred Scriptures thus, _Miscericordia ejus super omnia
 opera ejus_.
 
 (16) Wherefore I do conclude this part of moral knowledge, concerning the
 culture and regiment of the mind; wherein if any man, considering the
 arts thereof which I have enumerated, do judge that my labour is but to
 collect into an art or science that which hath been pretermitted by
 others, as matter of common sense and experience, he judgeth well.  But
 as Philocrates sported with Demosthenes, You may not marvel (Athenians)
 that Demosthenes and I do differ; for he drinketh water, and I drink
 wine; and like as we read of an ancient parable of the two gates of
 sleep
 
     Sunt gemin somni port: quarum altera fertur
     Cornea, qua veris facilis datur exitus umbris:
     Altera candenti perfecta nitens elephanto,
     Sed falsa ad clum mittunt insomnia manes:
 
 so if we put on sobriety and attention, we shall find it a sure maxim in
 knowledge, that the more pleasant liquor (of wine) is the more
 vaporous, and the braver gate (of ivory) sendeth forth the falser
 dreams.
 
 (17) But we have now concluded that general part of human philosophy,
 which contemplateth man segregate, and as he consisteth of body and
 spirit.  Wherein we may further note, that there seemeth to be a relation
 or conformity between the good of the mind and the good of the body.  For
 as we divided the good of the body into health, beauty, strength, and
 pleasure, so the good of the mind, inquired in rational and moral
 knowledges, tendeth to this, to make the mind sound, and without
 perturbation; beautiful, and graced with decency; and strong and agile
 for all duties of life.  These three, as in the body, so in the mind,
 seldom meet, and commonly sever.  For it is easy to observe, that many
 have strength of wit and courage, but have neither health from
 perturbations, nor any beauty or decency in their doings; some again have
 an elegancy and fineness of carriage which have neither soundness of
 honesty nor substance of sufficiency; and some again have honest and
 reformed minds, that can neither become themselves nor manage business;
 and sometimes two of them meet, and rarely all three.  As for pleasure,
 we have likewise determined that the mind ought not to be reduced to
 stupid, but to retain pleasure; confined rather in the subject of it,
 than in the strength and vigour of it.
 
 XXIII. (1) Civil knowledge is conversant about a subject which of all
 others is most immersed in matter, and hardliest reduced to axiom.
 Nevertheless, as Cato the Censor said, That the Romans were like sheep,
 for that a man were better drive a flock of them, than one of them; for
 in a flock, if you could get but some few go right, the rest would
 follow: so in that respect moral philosophy is more difficile than
 policy.  Again, moral philosophy propoundeth to itself the framing of
 internal goodness; but civil knowledge requireth only an external
 goodness; for that as to society sufficeth.  And therefore it cometh oft
 to pass that there be evil times in good governments: for so we find in
 the Holy story, when the kings were good, yet it is added, _Sed adhuc
 poulus non direxerat cor suum ad Dominum Deum patrum suorum_.  Again,
 states, as great engines, move slowly, and are not so soon put out of
 frame: for as in Egypt the seven good years sustained the seven bad, so
 governments for a time well grounded do bear out errors following; but
 the resolution of particular persons is more suddenly subverted.  These
 respects do somewhat qualify the extreme difficulty of civil knowledge.
 
 (2) This knowledge hath three parts, according to the three summary
 actions of society; which are conversation, negotiation, and government.
 For man seeketh in society comfort, use, and protection; and they be
 three wisdoms of divers natures which do often severwisdom of the
 behaviour, wisdom of business, and wisdom of state.
 
 (3) The wisdom of conversation ought not to be over much affected, but
 much less despised; for it hath not only an honour in itself, but an
 influence also into business and government.  The poet saith, _Nec vultu
 destrue verba tuo_: a man may destroy the force of his words with his
 countenance; so may he of his deeds, saith Cicero, recommending to his
 brother affability and easy access; _Nil interest habere ostium apertum_,
 _vultum clausum_: it is nothing won to admit men with an open door, and
 to receive them with a shut and reserved countenance.  So we see Atticus,
 before the first interview between Csar and Cicero, the war depending,
 did seriously advise Cicero touching the composing and ordering of his
 countenance and gesture.  And if the government of the countenance be of
 such effect, much more is that of the speech, and other carriage
 appertaining to conversation; the true model whereof seemeth to me well
 expressed by Livy, though not meant for this purpose: _Ne aut arrogans
 videar_, _aut obnoxius_; _quorum alterum est lien libertatis obliti_,
 _alterum su_: the sum of behaviour is to retain a mans own dignity,
 without intruding upon the liberty of others.  On the other side, if
 behaviour and outward carriage be intended too much, first it may pass
 into affectation, and then _Quid deformius quam scenam in vitam
 transferre_to act a mans life?  But although it proceed not to that
 extreme, yet it consumeth time, and employeth the mind too much.  And
 therefore as we use to advise young students from company keeping, by
 saying, _Amici fures temporis_: so certainly the intending of the
 discretion of behaviour is a great thief of meditation.  Again, such as
 are accomplished in that form of urbanity please themselves in it, and
 seldom aspire to higher virtue; whereas those that have defect in it do
 seek comeliness by reputation; for where reputation is, almost everything
 becometh; but where that is not, it must be supplied by _puntos_ and
 compliments.  Again, there is no greater impediment of action than an
 over-curious observance of decency, and the guide of decency, which is
 time and season.  For as Solomon saith, _Qui respicit ad ventos_, _non
 seminat_; _et qui respicit ad nubes_, _non metet_: a man must make his
 opportunity, as oft as find it.  To conclude, behaviour seemeth to me as
 a garment of the mind, and to have the conditions of a garment.  For it
 ought to be made in fashion; it ought not to be too curious; it ought to
 be shaped so as to set forth any good making of the mind and hide any
 deformity; and above all, it ought not to be too strait or restrained for
 exercise or motion.  But this part of civil knowledge hath been elegantly
 handled, and therefore I cannot report it for deficient.
 
 (4) The wisdom touching negotiation or business hath not been hitherto
 collected into writing, to the great derogation of learning and the
 professors of learning.  For from this root springeth chiefly that note
 or opinion, which by us is expressed in adage to this effect, that there
 is no great concurrence between learning and wisdom.  For of the three
 wisdoms which we have set down to pertain to civil life, for wisdom of
 behaviour, it is by learned men for the most part despised, as an
 inferior to virtue and an enemy to meditation; for wisdom of government,
 they acquit themselves well when they are called to it, but that
 happeneth to few; but for the wisdom of business, wherein mans life is
 most conversant, there be no books of it, except some few scattered
 advertisements, that have no proportion to the magnitude of this subject.
 For if books were written of this as the other, I doubt not but learned
 men with mean experience would far excel men of long experience without
 learning, and outshoot them in their own bow.
 
 (5) Neither needeth it at all to be doubted, that this knowledge should
 be so variable as it falleth not under precept; for it is much less
 infinite than science of government, which we see is laboured and in some
 part reduced.  Of this wisdom it seemeth some of the ancient Romans in
 the saddest and wisest times were professors; for Cicero reporteth, that
 it was then in use for senators that had name and opinion for general
 wise men, as Coruncanius, Curius, Llius, and many others, to walk at
 certain hours in the Place, and to give audience to those that would use
 their advice; and that the particular citizens would resort unto them,
 and consult with them of the marriage of a daughter, or of the employing
 of a son, or of a purchase or bargain, or of an accusation, and every
 other occasion incident to mans life.  So as there is a wisdom of
 counsel and advice even in private causes, arising out of a universal
 insight into the affairs of the world; which is used indeed upon
 particular causes propounded, but is gathered by general observation of
 causes of like nature.  For so we see in the book which Q. Cicero writeth
 to his brother, _De petitione consulatus_ (being the only book of
 business that I know written by the ancients), although it concerned a
 particular action then on foot, yet the substance thereof consisteth of
 many wise and politic axioms, which contain not a temporary, but a
 perpetual direction in the case of popular elections.  But chiefly we may
 see in those aphorisms which have place amongst divine writings, composed
 by Solomon the king, of whom the Scriptures testify that his heart was as
 the sands of the sea, encompassing the world and all worldly matters, we
 see, I say, not a few profound and excellent cautions, precepts,
 positions, extending to much variety of occasions; whereupon we will stay
 a while, offering to consideration some number of examples.
 
 (6) _Sed et cunctis sermonibus qui dicuntur ne accommodes aurem tuam_,
 _ne forte audias servum tuum maledicentem tibi_.  Here is commended the
 provident stay of inquiry of that which we would be loth to find: as it
 was judged great wisdom in Pompeius Magnus that he burned Sertorius
 papers unperused.
 
 _Vir sapiens_, _si cum stulto contenderit_, _sive irascatur_, _sive
 rideat_, _non inveniet requiem_.  Here is described the great
 disadvantage which a wise man hath in undertaking a lighter person than
 himself; which is such an engagement as, whether a man turn the matter to
 jest, or turn it to heat, or howsoever he change copy, he can no ways
 quit himself well of it.
 
 _Qui delicate a pueritia nutrit servum suum_, _postea sentiet eum
 contumacem_.  Here is signified, that if a man begin too high a pitch in
 his favours, it doth commonly end in unkindness and unthankfulness.
 
 _Vidisti virum velocem in opere suo_? _coram regibus stabit_, _nec erit
 inter ignobiles_.  Here is observed, that of all virtues for rising to
 honour, quickness of despatch is the best; for superiors many times love
 not to have those they employ too deep or too sufficient, but ready and
 diligent.
 
 _Vidi cunctos viventes qui ambulant sub sole_, _cum adolescente secundo
 qui consurgit pro eo_.  Here is expressed that which was noted by Sylla
 first, and after him by Tiberius.  _Plures adorant solem orientem quam
 occidentem vel meridianum_.
 
 _Si spiritus potestatem habentis ascenderit super te_, _locum tuum ne
 demiseris_; _quia curatio faciet cessare peccata maxima_.  Here caution
 is given, that upon displeasure, retiring is of all courses the
 unfittest; for a man leaveth things at worst, and depriveth himself of
 means to make them better.
 
 _Erat civitas parva_, _et pauci in ea viri_: _venit contra eam rex
 magnus_, _et vallavit eam_, _instruxitque munitones per gyrum_, _et
 perfecta est obsidio_; _inventusque est in ea vir pauper et sapiens_, _et
 liberavit eam per sapientiam suam_; _et nullus deinceps recordatus est
 huminis illius pauperis_.  Here the corruption of states is set forth,
 that esteem not virtue or merit longer than they have use of it.
 
 _Millis responsio frangit iram_.  Here is noted that silence or rough
 answer exasperateth; but an answer present and temperate pacifieth.
 
 _Iter pigrorum quasi sepes spinarum_.  Here is lively represented how
 laborious sloth proveth in the end; for when things are deferred till the
 last instant, and nothing prepared beforehand, every step findeth a briar
 or impediment, which catcheth or stoppeth.
 
 _Melior est finis orationis quam principium_.  Here is taxed the vanity
 of formal speakers, that study more about prefaces and inducements, than
 upon the conclusions and issues of speech.
 
 _Qui cognoscit in judicio faciem_, _non bene facit_; _iste et pro
 buccella panis deseret veritatem_.  Here is noted, that a judge were
 better be a briber than a respecter of persons; for a corrupt judge
 offendeth not so lightly as a facile.
 
 _Vir pauper calumnians pauperes simils est imbri vehementi_, _in quo
 paratur fames_.  Here is expressed the extremity of necessitous
 extortions, figured in the ancient fable of the full and the hungry
 horseleech.
 
 _Fons turbatus pede_, _et vena corrupta_, _est justus cadens coram
 impio_.  Here is noted, that one judicial and exemplar iniquity in the
 face of the world doth trouble the fountains of justice more than many
 particular injuries passed over by connivance.
 
 _Qui subtrahit aliquid a patre et a matre_, _et dicit hoc non esse
 peccatum_, _particeps est homicidii_.  Here is noted that, whereas men in
 wronging their best friends use to extenuate their fault, as if they
 might presume or be bold upon them, it doth contrariwise indeed aggravate
 their fault, and turneth it from injury to impiety.
 
 _Noli esse amicus homini iracundo_, _nec ambulato cum homine furioso_.
 Here caution is given, that in the election of our friends we do
 principally avoid those which are impatient, as those that will espouse
 us to many factions and quarrels.
 
 _Qui conturbat domum suam_, _possidebit ventum_.  Here is noted, that in
 domestical separations and breaches men do promise to themselves quieting
 of their mind and contentment; but still they are deceived of their
 expectation, and it turneth to wind.
 
 _Filius sapiens ltificat patrem_: _filius vero stultus mstitia est
 matri su_.  Here is distinguished, that fathers have most comfort of the
 good proof of their sons; but mothers have most discomfort of their ill
 proof, because women have little discerning of virtue, but of fortune.
 
 _Qui celat delictum_, _qurit amicitiam_; _sed qui altero sermone
 repetit_, _separat fderatos_.  Here caution is given, that reconcilement
 is better managed by an amnesty, and passing over that which is past,
 than by apologies and excuses.
 
 _In omni opere bono erit abundantia_; _ubi autem verba sunt plurima_,
 _ibi frequenter egestas_.  Here is noted, that words and discourse
 aboundeth most where there is idleness and want.
 
 _Primus in sua causa justus_: _sed venit altera pars_, _et inquiret in
 eum_.  Here is observed, that in all causes the first tale possesseth
 much; in sort, that the prejudice thereby wrought will be hardly removed,
 except some abuse or falsity in the information be detected.
 
 _Verba bilinguis quasi simplicia_, _et ipsa perveniunt ad interiora
 ventris_.  Here is distinguished, that flattery and insinuation, which
 seemeth set and artificial, sinketh not far; but that entereth deep which
 hath show of nature, liberty, and simplicity.
 
 _Qui erudit derisorem_, _ipse sibi injuriam facit_; _et qui arguit
 impium_, _sibi maculam generat_.  Here caution is given how we tender
 reprehension to arrogant and scornful natures, whose manner is to esteem
 it for contumely, and accordingly to return it.
 
 _Da sapienti occasionem_, _et addetur ei sapientia_.  Here is
 distinguished the wisdom brought into habit, and that which is but verbal
 and swimming only in conceit; for the one upon the occasion presented is
 quickened and redoubled, the other is amazed and confused.
 
 _Quomodo in aquis resplendent vultus prospicientium_, _sic corda hominum
 manifesta sunt prudentibus_.  Here the mind of a wise man is compared to
 a glass, wherein the images of all diversity of natures and customs are
 represented; from which representation proceedeth that application,
 
     Qui sapit, innumeris moribus aptus erit.
 
 (7) Thus have I stayed somewhat longer upon these sentences politic of
 Solomon than is agreeable to the proportion of an example; led with a
 desire to give authority to this part of knowledge, which I noted as
 deficient, by so excellent a precedent; and have also attended them with
 brief observations, such as to my understanding offer no violence to the
 sense, though I know they may be applied to a more divine use: but it is
 allowed, even in divinity, that some interpretations, yea, and some
 writings, have more of the eagle than others; but taking them as
 instructions for life, they might have received large discourse, if I
 would have broken them and illustrated them by deducements and examples.
 
 (8) Neither was this in use only with the Hebrews, but it is generally to
 be found in the wisdom of the more ancient times; that as men found out
 any observation that they thought was good for life, they would gather it
 and express it in parable or aphorism or fable.  But for fables, they
 were vicegerents and supplies where examples failed: now that the times
 abound with history, the aim is better when the mark is alive.  And
 therefore the form of writing which of all others is fittest for this
 variable argument of negotiation and occasions is that which Machiavel
 chose wisely and aptly for government; namely, discourse upon histories
 or examples.  For knowledge drawn freshly and in our view out of
 particulars, knoweth the way best to particulars again.  And it hath much
 greater life for practice when the discourse attendeth upon the example,
 than when the example attendeth upon the discourse.  For this is no point
 of order, as it seemeth at first, but of substance.  For when the example
 is the ground, being set down in a history at large, it is set down with
 all circumstances, which may sometimes control the discourse thereupon
 made, and sometimes supply it, as a very pattern for action; whereas the
 examples alleged for the discourses sake are cited succinctly, and
 without particularity, and carry a servile aspect towards the discourse
 which they are brought in to make good.
 
 (9) But this difference is not amiss to be remembered, that as history of
 times is the best ground for discourse of government, such as Machiavel
 handleth, so histories of lives is the most popular for discourse of
 business, because it is more conversant in private actions.  Nay, there
 is a ground of discourse for this purpose fitter than them both, which is
 discourse upon letters, such as are wise and weighty, as many are of
 Cicero _ad Atticum_, and others.  For letters have a great and more
 particular representation of business than either chronicles or lives.
 Thus have we spoken both of the matter and form of this part of civil
 knowledge, touching negotiation, which we note to be deficient.
 
 (10) But yet there is another part of this part, which differeth as much
 from that whereof we have spoken as _sapere_ and _sibi sapere_, the one
 moving as it were to the circumference, the other to the centre.  For
 there is a wisdom of counsel, and again there is a wisdom of pressing a
 mans own fortune; and they do sometimes meet, and often sever.  For many
 are wise in their own ways that are weak for government or counsel; like
 ants, which is a wise creature for itself, but very hurtful for the
 garden.  This wisdom the Romans did take much knowledge of: _Nam pol
 sapiens_ (saith the comical poet) _fingit fortunam sibi_; and it grew to
 an adage, _Faber quisque fortun propri_; and Livy attributed it to Cato
 the first, _In hoc viro tanta vis animi et ingenii inerat_, _ut quocunque
 loco natus esset sibi ipse fortunam facturus videretur_.
 
 (11) This conceit or position, if it be too much declared and professed,
 hath been thought a thing impolitic and unlucky, as was observed in
 Timotheus the Athenian, who, having done many great services to the state
 in his government, and giving an account thereof to the people as the
 manner was, did conclude every particular with this clause, And in this
 fortune had no part.  And it came so to pass, that he never prospered in
 anything he took in hand afterwards.  For this is too high and too
 arrogant, savouring of that which Ezekiel saith of Pharaoh, _Dicis_,
 _Fluvius est neus et ego feci memet ipsum_; or of that which another
 prophet speaketh, that men offer sacrifices to their nets and snares; and
 that which the poet expresseth,
 
     Dextra mihi Deus, et telum quod missile libro,
     Nunc adsint!
 
 For these confidences were ever unhallowed, and unblessed; and,
 therefore, those that were great politiques indeed ever ascribed their
 successes to their felicity and not to their skill or virtue.  For so
 Sylla surnamed himself Felix, not Magnus.  So Csar said to the master of
 the ship, _Csarem portas et fortunam ejus_.
 
 (12) But yet, nevertheless, these positions, _Faber quisque fortun su_:
 _Sapiens dominabitur astris_: _Invia virtuti null est via_, and the like,
 being taken and used as spurs to industry, and not as stirrups to
 insolency, rather for resolution than for the presumption or outward
 declaration, have been ever thought sound and good; and are no question
 imprinted in the greatest minds, who are so sensible of this opinion as
 they can scarce contain it within.  As we see in Augustus Csar (who was
 rather diverse from his uncle than inferior in virtue), how when he died
 he desired his friends about him to give him a _plaudite_, as if he were
 conscious to himself that he had played his part well upon the stage.
 This part of knowledge we do report also as deficient; not but that it is
 practised too much, but it hath not been reduced to writing.  And,
 therefore, lest it should seem to any that it is not comprehensible by
 axiom, it is requisite, as we did in the former, that we set down some
 heads or passages of it.
 
 (13) Wherein it may appear at the first a new and unwonted argument to
 teach men how to raise and make their fortune; a doctrine wherein every
 man perchance will be ready to yield himself a disciple, till he see the
 difficulty: for fortune layeth as heavy impositions as virtue; and it is
 as hard and severe a thing to be a true politique, as to be truly moral.
 But the handling hereof concerneth learning greatly, both in honour and
 in substance.  In honour, because pragmatical men may not go away with an
 opinion that learning is like a lark, that can mount and sing, and please
 herself, and nothing else; but may know that she holdeth as well of the
 hawk, that can soar aloft, and can also descend and strike upon the prey.
 In substance, because it is the perfect law of inquiry of truth, that
 nothing be in the globe of matter, which should not be likewise in the
 globe of crystal or form; that is, that there be not anything in being
 and action which should not be drawn and collected into contemplation and
 doctrine.  Neither doth learning admire or esteem of this architecture of
 fortune otherwise than as of an inferior work, for no mans fortune can
 be an end worthy of his being, and many times the worthiest men do
 abandon their fortune willingly for better respects: but nevertheless
 fortune as an organ of virtue and merit deserveth the consideration.
 
 (14) First, therefore, the precept which I conceive to be most summary
 towards the prevailing in fortune, is to obtain that window which Momus
 did require; who seeing in the frame of mans heart such angles and
 recesses, found fault there was not a window to look into them; that is,
 to procure good informations of particulars touching persons, their
 natures, their desires and ends, their customs and fashions, their helps
 and advantages, and whereby they chiefly stand, so again their weaknesses
 and disadvantages, and where they lie most open and obnoxious, their
 friends, factions, dependences; and again their opposites, enviers,
 competitors, their moods and times, _Sola viri molles aditus et tempora
 noras_; their principles, rules, and observations, and the like: and this
 not only of persons but of actions; what are on foot from time to time,
 and how they are conducted, favoured, opposed, and how they import, and
 the like.  For the knowledge of present actions is not only material in
 itself, but without it also the knowledge of persons is very erroneous:
 for men change with the actions; and whilst they are in pursuit they are
 one, and when they return to their nature they are another.  These
 informations of particulars, touching persons and actions, are as the
 minor propositions in every active syllogism; for no excellency of
 observations (which are as the major propositions) can suffice to ground
 a conclusion, if there be error and mistaking in the minors.
 
 (15) That this knowledge is possible, Solomon is our surety, who saith,
 _Consilium in corde viri tanquam aqua profunda_; _sed vir prudens
 exhauriet illud_.  And although the knowledge itself falleth not under
 precept because it is of individuals, yet the instructions for the
 obtaining of it may.
 
 (16) We will begin, therefore, with this precept, according to the
 ancient opinion, that the sinews of wisdom are slowness of belief and
 distrust; that more trust be given to countenances and deeds than to
 words; and in words rather to sudden passages and surprised words than to
 set and purposed words.  Neither let that be feared which is said,
 _Fronti nulla fides_, which is meant of a general outward behaviour, and
 not of the private and subtle motions and labours of the countenance and
 gesture; which, as Q. Cicero elegantly saith, is _Animi janua_, the gate
 of the mind.  None more close than Tiberius, and yet Tacitus saith of
 Gallus, _Etenim vultu offensionem conjectaverat_.  So again, noting the
 differing character and manner of his commending Germanicus and Drusus in
 the Senate, he saith, touching his fashion wherein he carried his speech
 of Germanicus, thus: _Magis in speciem adornatis verbis_, _quam ut
 penitus sentire crederetur_; but of Drusus thus: _Paucioribus sed
 intentior_, _et fida oratione_; and in another place, speaking of his
 character of speech when he did anything that was gracious and popular,
 he saith, That in other things he was _velut eluctantium verborum_; but
 then again, _solutius loquebatur quando subveniret_.  So that there is no
 such artificer of dissimulation, nor no such commanded countenance
 (_vultus jussus_), that can sever from a feigned tale some of these
 fashions, either a more slight and careless fashion, or more set and
 formal, or more tedious and wandering, or coming from a man more drily
 and hardly.
 
 (17) Neither are deeds such assured pledges as that they may be trusted
 without a judicious consideration of their magnitude and nature: _Fraus
 sibi in parvis fidem prstruit ut majore emolumento fallat_; and the
 Italian thinketh himself upon the point to be bought and sold, when he is
 better used than he was wont to be without manifest cause.  For small
 favours, they do but lull men to sleep, both as to caution and as to
 industry; and are, as Demosthenes calleth them, _Alimenta socordi_.  So
 again we see how false the nature of some deeds are, in that particular
 which Mutianus practised upon Antonius Primus, upon that hollow and
 unfaithful reconcilement which was made between them; whereupon Mutianus
 advanced many of the friends of Antonius, _Simul amicis ejus prfecturas
 et tribunatus largitur_: wherein, under pretence to strengthen him, he
 did desolate him, and won from him his dependents.
 
 (18) As for words, though they be like waters to physicians, full of
 flattery and uncertainty, yet they are not to be despised specially with
 the advantage of passion and affection.  For so we see Tiberius, upon a
 stinging and incensing speech of Agrippina, came a step forth of his
 dissimulation when he said, You are hurt because you do not reign; of
 which Tacitus saith, _Audita hc raram occulti pectoris vocem elicuere_:
 _correptamque Grco versu admonuit_, _ideo ldi quia non regnaret_.  And,
 therefore, the poet doth elegantly call passions tortures that urge men
 to confess their secrets:
 
     Vino torus et ira.
 
 And experience showeth there are few men so true to themselves and so
 settled but that, sometimes upon heat, sometimes upon bravery, sometimes
 upon kindness, sometimes upon trouble of mind and weakness, they open
 themselves; specially if they be put to it with a counter-dissimulation,
 according to the proverb of Spain, _Di mentira_, _y sacar as verdad_:
 Tell a lie and find a truth.
 
 (19) As for the knowing of men which is at second hand from reports:
 mens weaknesses and faults are best known from their enemies, their
 virtues and abilities from their friends, their customs and times from
 their servants, their conceits and opinions from their familiar friends,
 with whom they discourse most.  General fame is light, and the opinions
 conceived by superiors or equals are deceitful; for to such men are more
 masked: _Verior fama e domesticis emanat_.
 
 (20) But the soundest disclosing and expounding of men is by their
 natures and ends, wherein the weakest sort of men are best interpreted by
 their natures, and the wisest by their ends.  For it was both pleasantly
 and wisely said (though I think very untruly) by a nuncio of the Pope,
 returning from a certain nation where he served as lidger; whose opinion
 being asked touching the appointment of one to go in his place, he wished
 that in any case they did not send one that was too wise; because no very
 wise man would ever imagine what they in that country were like to do.
 And certainly it is an error frequent for men to shoot over, and to
 suppose deeper ends and more compass reaches than are: the Italian
 proverb being elegant, and for the most part true:
 
     Di danari, di senno, e di fede,
     C ne manco che non credi.
 
 There is commonly less money, less wisdom, and less good faith than men
 do account upon.
 
 (21) But princes, upon a far other reason, are best interpreted by their
 natures, and private persons by their ends.  For princes being at the top
 of human desires, they have for the most part no particular ends whereto
 they aspire, by distance from which a man might take measure and scale of
 the rest of their actions and desires; which is one of the causes that
 maketh their hearts more inscrutable.  Neither is it sufficient to inform
 ourselves in mens ends and natures of the variety of them only, but also
 of the predominancy, what humour reigneth most, and what end is
 principally sought.  For so we see, when Tigellinus saw himself
 outstripped by Petronius Turpilianus in Neros humours of pleasures,
 _metus ejus rimatur_, he wrought upon Neros fears, whereby he broke the
 others neck.
 
 (22) But to all this part of inquiry the most compendious way resteth in
 three things; the first, to have general acquaintance and inwardness with
 those which have general acquaintance and look most into the world; and
 specially according to the diversity of business, and the diversity of
 persons, to have privacy and conversation with some one friend at least
 which is perfect and well-intelligenced in every several kind.  The
 second is to keep a good mediocrity in liberty of speech and secrecy; in
 most things liberty; secrecy where it importeth; for liberty of speech
 inviteth and provoketh liberty to be used again, and so bringeth much to
 a mans knowledge; and secrecy on the other side induceth trust and
 inwardness.  The last is the reducing of a mans self to this watchful
 and serene habit, as to make account and purpose, in every conference and
 action, as well to observe as to act.  For as Epictetus would have a
 philosopher in every particular action to say to himself, _Et hoc volo_,
 _et etiam institutum servare_; so a politic man in everything should say
 to himself, _Et hoc volo_, _ac etiam aliquid addiscere_.  I have stayed
 the longer upon this precept of obtaining good information because it is
 a main part by itself, which answereth to all the rest.  But, above all
 things, caution must be taken that men have a good stay and hold of
 themselves, and that this much knowing do not draw on much meddling; for
 nothing is more unfortunate than light and rash intermeddling in many
 matters.  So that this variety of knowledge tendeth in conclusion but
 only to this, to make a better and freer choice of those actions which
 may concern us, and to conduct them with the less error and the more
 dexterity.
 
 (23) The second precept concerning this knowledge is, for men to take
 good information touching their own person, and well to understand
 themselves; knowing that, as St. James saith, though men look oft in a
 glass, yet they do suddenly forget themselves; wherein as the divine
 glass is the Word of God, so the politic glass is the state of the world,
 or times wherein we live, in the which we are to behold ourselves.
 
 (24) For men ought to take an impartial view of their own abilities and
 virtues; and again of their wants and impediments; accounting these with
 the most, and those other with the least; and from this view and
 examination to frame the considerations following.
 
 (25) First, to consider how the constitution of their nature sorteth with
 the general state of the times; which if they find agreeable and fit,
 then in all things to give themselves more scope and liberty; but if
 differing and dissonant, then in the whole course of their life to be
 more close retired, and reserved; as we see in Tiberius, who was never
 seen at a play, and came not into the senate in twelve of his last years;
 whereas Augustus Csar lived ever in mens eyes, which Tacitus observeth,
 _alia Tiberio morum via_.
 
 (26) Secondly, to consider how their nature sorteth with professions and
 courses of life, and accordingly to make election, if they be free; and,
 if engaged, to make the departure at the first opportunity; as we see was
 done by Duke Valentine, that was designed by his father to a sacerdotal
 profession, but quitted it soon after in regard of his parts and
 inclination; being such, nevertheless, as a man cannot tell well whether
 they were worse for a prince or for a priest.
 
 (27) Thirdly, to consider how they sort with those whom they are like to
 have competitors and concurrents; and to take that course wherein there
 is most solitude, and themselves like to be most eminent; as Csar Julius
 did, who at first was an orator or pleader; but when he saw the
 excellency of Cicero, Hortensius, Catulus, and others for eloquence, and
 saw there was no man of reputation for the wars but Pompeius, upon whom
 the state was forced to rely, he forsook his course begun towards a civil
 and popular greatness, and transferred his designs to a martial
 greatness.
 
 (28) Fourthly, in the choice of their friends and dependents, to proceed
 according to the composition of their own nature; as we may see in Csar,
 all whose friends and followers were men active and effectual, but not
 solemn, or of reputation.
 
 (29) Fifthly, to take special heed how they guide themselves by examples,
 in thinking they can do as they see others do; whereas perhaps their
 natures and carriages are far differing.  In which error it seemeth
 Pompey was, of whom Cicero saith that he was wont often to say, _Sylla
 potuit_, _ego non potero_?  Wherein he was much abused, the natures and
 proceedings of himself and his example being the unlikest in the world;
 the one being fierce, violent, and pressing the fact; the other solemn,
 and full of majesty and circumstance, and therefore the less effectual.
 
 But this precept touching the politic knowledge of ourselves hath many
 other branches, whereupon we cannot insist.
 
 (30) Next to the well understanding and discerning of a mans self, there
 followeth the well opening and revealing a mans self; wherein we see
 nothing more usual than for the more able man to make the less show.  For
 there is a great advantage in the well setting forth of a mans virtues,
 fortunes, merits; and again, in the artificial covering of a mans
 weaknesses, defects, disgraces; staying upon the one, sliding from the
 other; cherishing the one by circumstances, gracing the other by
 exposition, and the like.  Wherein we see what Tacitus saith of Mutianus,
 who was the greatest politique of his time, _Omnium qu dixerat
 feceratque arte quadam ostentator_, which requireth indeed some art, lest
 it turn tedious and arrogant; but yet so, as ostentation (though it be to
 the first degree of vanity) seemeth to me rather a vice in manners than
 in policy; for as it is said, _Audacter calumniare_, _semper aliquid
 hret_; so, except it be in a ridiculous degree of deformity, _Audacter
 te vendita_, _semper aluquid hret_.  For it will stick with the more
 ignorant and inferior sort of men, though men of wisdom and rank do smile
 at it and despise it; and yet the authority won with many doth
 countervail the disdain of a few.  But if it be carried with decency and
 government, as with a natural, pleasant, and ingenious fashion; or at
 times when it is mixed with some peril and unsafety (as in military
 persons); or at times when others are most envied; or with easy and
 careless passage to it and from it, without dwelling too long, or being
 too serious; or with an equal freedom of taxing a mans self, as well as
 gracing himself; or by occasion of repelling or putting down others
 injury or insolency; it doth greatly add to reputation: and surely not a
 few solid natures, that want this ventosity and cannot sail in the height
 of the winds, are not without some prejudice and disadvantage by their
 moderation.
 
 (31) But for these flourishes and enhancements of virtue, as they are not
 perchance unnecessary, so it is at least necessary that virtue be not
 disvalued and embased under the just price, which is done in three
 mannersby offering and obtruding a mans self, wherein men think he is
 rewarded when he is accepted; by doing too much, which will not give that
 which is well done leave to settle, and in the end induceth satiety; and
 by finding too soon the fruit of a mans virtue, in commendation,
 applause, honour, favour; wherein if a man be pleased with a little, let
 him hear what is truly said: _Cave ne insuetus rebus majoribus videaris_,
 _si hc te res parva sicuti magna delectat_.
 
 (32) But the covering of defects is of no less importance than the
 valuing of good parts; which may be done likewise in three mannersby
 caution, by colour, and by confidence.  Caution is when men do
 ingeniously and discreetly avoid to be put into those things for which
 they are not proper; whereas contrariwise bold and unquiet spirits will
 thrust themselves into matters without difference, and so publish and
 proclaim all their wants.  Colour is when men make a way for themselves
 to have a construction made of their faults or wants, as proceeding from
 a better cause or intended for some other purpose.  For of the one it is
 well said,
 
     Spe latet vitium proximitate boni,
 
 and therefore whatsoever want a man hath, he must see that he pretend the
 virtue that shadoweth it; as if he be dull, he must affect gravity; if a
 coward, mildness; and so the rest.  For the second, a man must frame some
 probable cause why he should not do his best, and why he should dissemble
 his abilities; and for that purpose must use to dissemble those abilities
 which are notorious in him, to give colour that his true wants are but
 industries and dissimulations.  For confidence, it is the last but the
 surest remedynamely, to depress and seem to despise whatsoever a man
 cannot attain; observing the good principle of the merchants, who
 endeavour to raise the price of their own commodities, and to beat down
 the price of others.  But there is a confidence that passeth this other,
 which is to face out a mans own defects, in seeming to conceive that he
 is best in those things wherein he is failing; and, to help that again,
 to seem on the other side that he hath least opinion of himself in those
 things wherein he is best: like as we shall see it commonly in poets,
 that if they show their verses, and you except to any, they will say,
 That that line cost them more labour than any of the rest; and
 presently will seem to disable and suspect rather some other line, which
 they know well enough to be the best in the number.  But above all, in
 this righting and helping of a mans self in his own carriage, he must
 take heed he show not himself dismantled and exposed to scorn and injury,
 by too much dulceness, goodness, and facility of nature; but show some
 sparkles of liberty, spirit, and edge.  Which kind of fortified carriage,
 with a ready rescussing of a mans self from scorns, is sometimes of
 necessity imposed upon men by somewhat in their person or fortune; but it
 ever succeedeth with good felicity.
 
 (33) Another precept of this knowledge is by all possible endeavour to
 frame the mind to be pliant and obedient to occasion; for nothing
 hindereth mens fortunes so much as this: _Idem manebat_, _neque idem
 decebat_men are where they were, when occasions turn: and therefore to
 Cato, whom Livy maketh such an architect of fortune, he addeth that he
 had _versatile ingenium_.  And thereof it cometh that these grave solemn
 wits, which must be like themselves and cannot make departures, have more
 dignity than felicity.  But in some it is nature to be somewhat vicious
 and enwrapped, and not easy to turn.  In some it is a conceit that is
 almost a nature, which is, that men can hardly make themselves believe
 that they ought to change their course, when they have found good by it
 in former experience.  For Machiavel noted wisely how Fabius Maximus
 would have been temporising still, according to his old bias, when the
 nature of the war was altered and required hot pursuit.  In some other it
 is want of point and penetration in their judgment, that they do not
 discern when things have a period, but come in too late after the
 occasion; as Demosthenes compareth the people of Athens to country
 fellows, when they play in a fence school, that if they have a blow, then
 they remove their weapon to that ward, and not before.  In some other it
 is a lothness to lose labours passed, and a conceit that they can bring
 about occasions to their ply; and yet in the end, when they see no other
 remedy, then they come to it with disadvantage; as Tarquinius, that gave
 for the third part of Sibyllas books the treble price, when he might at
 first have had all three for the simple.  But from whatsoever root or
 cause this restiveness of mind proceedeth, it is a thing most
 prejudicial; and nothing is more politic than to make the wheels of our
 mind concentric and voluble with the wheels of fortune.
 
 (34) Another precept of this knowledge, which hath some affinity with
 that we last spoke of, but with difference, is that which is well
 expressed, _Fatis accede deisque_, that men do not only turn with the
 occasions, but also run with the occasions, and not strain their credit
 or strength to over-hard or extreme points; but choose in their actions
 that which is most passable: for this will preserve men from foil, not
 occupy them too much about one matter, win opinion of moderation, please
 the most, and make a show of a perpetual felicity in all they undertake:
 which cannot but mightily increase reputation.
 
 (35) Another part of this knowledge seemeth to have some repugnancy with
 the former two, but not as I understand it; and it is that which
 Demosthenes uttereth in high terms: _Et quemadmodum receptum est_, _ut
 exercitum ducat imperator_, _sic et a cordatis viris res ips ducend_;
 _ut quipsis videntur_, _ea gerantur_, _et non ipsi eventus persequi
 cogantur_.  For if we observe we shall find two differing kinds of
 sufficiency in managing of business: some can make use of occasions aptly
 and dexterously, but plot little; some can urge and pursue their own
 plots well, but cannot accommodate nor take in; either of which is very
 imperfect without the other.
 
 (36) Another part of this knowledge is the observing a good mediocrity in
 the declaring or not declaring a mans self: for although depth of
 secrecy, and making way (_qualis est via navis in mari_, which the French
 calleth _sourdes menes_, when men set things in work without opening
 themselves at all), be sometimes both prosperous and admirable; yet many
 times _dissimulatio errores parit_, _qui dissimulatorem ipsum
 illaqueant_.  And therefore we see the greatest politiques have in a
 natural and free manner professed their desires, rather than been
 reserved and disguised in them.  For so we see that Lucius Sylla made a
 kind of profession, that he wished all men happy or unhappy, as they
 stood his friends or enemies.  So Csar, when he went first into Gaul,
 made no scruple to profess that he had rather be first in a village than
 second at Rome.  So again, as soon as he had begun the war, we see what
 Cicero saith of him, _Alter_ (meaning of Csar) _non recusat_, _sed
 quodammodo postulat_, _ut_ (_ut est_) _sic appelletur tyrannus_.  So we
 may see in a letter of Cicero to Atticus, that Augustus Csar, in his
 very entrance into affairs, when he was a darling of the senate, yet in
 his harangues to the people would swear, _Ita parentis honores consequi
 liceat_ (which was no less than the tyranny), save that, to help it, he
 would stretch forth his hand towards a statue of Csars that was erected
 in the place: and men laughed and wondered, and said, Is it possible?
 or, Did you ever hear the like? and yet thought he meant no hurt; he
 did it so handsomely and ingenuously.  And all these were prosperous:
 whereas Pompey, who tended to the same ends, but in a more dark and
 dissembling manner as Tacitus saith of him, _Occultior non melior_,
 wherein Sallust concurreth, _Ore probo_, _animo inverecundo_, made it his
 design, by infinite secret engines, to cast the state into an absolute
 anarchy and confusion, that the state might cast itself into his arms for
 necessity and protection, and so the sovereign power be put upon him, and
 he never seen in it: and when he had brought it (as he thought) to that
 point when he was chosen consul alone, as never any was, yet he could
 make no great matter of it, because men understood him not; but was fain
 in the end to go the beaten track of getting arms into his hands, by
 colour of the doubt of Csars designs: so tedious, casual, and
 unfortunate are these deep dissimulations: whereof it seemeth Tacitus
 made this judgment, that they were a cunning of an inferior form in
 regard of true policy; attributing the one to Augustus, the other to
 Tiberius; where, speaking of Livia, he saith, _Et cum artibus mariti
 simulatione filii bene compostia_: for surely the continual habit of
 dissimulation is but a weak and sluggish cunning, and not greatly
 politic.
 
 (37) Another precept of this architecture of fortune is to accustom our
 minds to judge of the proportion or value of things, as they conduce and
 are material to our particular ends; and that to do substantially and not
 superficially.  For we shall find the logical part (as I may term it) of
 some mens minds good, but the mathematical part erroneous; that is, they
 can well judge of consequences, but not of proportions and comparison,
 preferring things of show and sense before things of substance and
 effect.  So some fall in love with access to princes, others with popular
 fame and applause, supposing they are things of great purchase, when in
 many cases they are but matters of envy, peril, and impediment.  So some
 measure things according to the labour and difficulty or assiduity which
 are spent about them; and think, if they be ever moving, that they must
 needs advance and proceed; as Csar saith in a despising manner of Cato
 the second, when he describeth how laborious and indefatigable he was to
 no great purpose, _Hc omnia magno studio agebat_.  So in most things men
 are ready to abuse themselves in thinking the greatest means to be best,
 when it should be the fittest.
 
 (38) As for the true marshalling of mens pursuits towards their fortune,
 as they are more or less material, I hold them to stand thus.  First the
 amendment of their own minds.  For the removal of the impediments of the
 mind will sooner clear the passages of fortune than the obtaining fortune
 will remove the impediments of the mind.  In the second place I set down
 wealth and means; which I know most men would have placed first, because
 of the general use which it beareth towards all variety of occasions.
 But that opinion I may condemn with like reason as Machiavel doth that
 other, that moneys were the sinews of the wars; whereas (saith he) the
 true sinews of the wars are the sinews of mens arms, that is, a valiant,
 populous, and military nation: and he voucheth aptly the authority of
 Solon, who, when Crsus showed him his treasury of gold, said to him,
 that if another came that had better iron, he would be master of his
 gold.  In like manner it may be truly affirmed that it is not moneys that
 are the sinews of fortune, but it is the sinews and steel of mens minds,
 wit, courage, audacity, resolution, temper, industry, and the like.  In
 the third place I set down reputation, because of the peremptory tides
 and currents it hath; which, if they be not taken in their due time, are
 seldom recovered, it being extreme hard to play an after-game of
 reputation.  And lastly I place honour, which is more easily won by any
 of the other three, much more by all, than any of them can be purchased
 by honour.  To conclude this precept, as there is order and priority in
 matter, so is there in time, the preposterous placing whereof is one of
 the commonest errors: while men fly to their ends when they should intend
 their beginnings, and do not take things in order of time as they come
 on, but marshal them according to greatness and not according to
 instance; not observing the good precept, _Quod nunc instat agamus_.
 
 (39) Another precept of this knowledge is not to embrace any matters
 which do occupy too great a quantity of time, but to have that sounding
 in a mans ears, _Sed fugit interea fugit irreparabile tempus_: and that
 is the cause why those which take their course of rising by professions
 of burden, as lawyers, orators, painful divines, and the like, are not
 commonly so politic for their own fortune, otherwise than in their
 ordinary way, because they want time to learn particulars, to wait
 occasions, and to devise plots.
 
 (40) Another precept of this knowledge is to imitate nature, which doth
 nothing in vain; which surely a man may do if he do well interlace his
 business, and bend not his mind too much upon that which he principally
 intendeth.  For a man ought in every particular action so to carry the
 motions of his mind, and so to have one thing under another, as if he
 cannot have that he seeketh in the best degree, yet to have it in a
 second, or so in a third; and if he can have no part of that which he
 purposed, yet to turn the use of it to somewhat else; and if he cannot
 make anything of it for the present, yet to make it as a seed of somewhat
 in time to come; and if he can contrive no effect or substance from it,
 yet to win some good opinion by it, or the like.  So that he should exact
 an account of himself of every action, to reap somewhat, and not to stand
 amazed and confused if he fail of that he chiefly meant: for nothing is
 more impolitic than to mind actions wholly one by one.  For he that doth
 so loseth infinite occasions which intervene, and are many times more
 proper and propitious for somewhat that he shall need afterwards, than
 for that which he urgeth for the present; and therefore men must be
 perfect in that rule, _Hc oportet facere_, _et illa non imittere_.
 
 (41) Another precept of this knowledge is, not to engage a mans self
 peremptorily in anything, though it seem not liable to accident; but ever
 to have a window to fly out at, or a way to retire: following the wisdom
 in the ancient fable of the two frogs, which consulted when their plash
 was dry whither they should go; and the one moved to go down into a pit,
 because it was not likely the water would dry there; but the other
 answered, True, but if it do, how shall we get out again?
 
 (42) Another precept of this knowledge is that ancient precept of Bias,
 construed not to any point of perfidiousness, but to caution and
 moderation, _Et ama tanquam inimicus futurus et odi tanquam amaturus_.
 For it utterly betrayeth all utility for men to embark themselves too far
 into unfortunate friendships, troublesome spleens, and childish and
 humorous envies or emulations.
 
 (43) But I continue this beyond the measure of an example; led, because I
 would not have such knowledges, which I note as deficient, to be thought
 things imaginative or in the air, or an observation or two much made of,
 but things of bulk and mass, whereof an end is more hardly made than a
 beginning.  It must be likewise conceived, that in these points which I
 mention and set down, they are far from complete tractates of them, but
 only as small pieces for patterns.  And lastly, no man I suppose will
 think that I mean fortunes are not obtained without all this ado; for I
 know they come tumbling into some mens laps; and a number obtain good
 fortunes by diligence in a plain way, little intermeddling, and keeping
 themselves from gross errors.
 
 (44) But as Cicero, when he setteth down an idea of a perfect orator,
 doth not mean that every pleader should be such; and so likewise, when a
 prince or a courtier hath been described by such as have handled those
 subjects, the mould hath used to be made according to the perfection of
 the art, and not according to common practice: so I understand it, that
 it ought to be done in the description of a politic man, I mean politic
 for his own fortune.
 
 (45) But it must be remembered all this while, that the precepts which we
 have set down are of that kind which may be counted and called _Bon
 Artes_.  As for evil arts, if a man would set down for himself that
 principle of Machiavel, That a man seek not to attain virtue itself, but
 the appearance only thereof; because the credit of virtue is a help, but
 the use of it is cumber: or that other of his principles, That he
 presuppose that men are not fitly to be wrought otherwise but by fear;
 and therefore that he seek to have every man obnoxious, low, and in
 straits, which the Italians call _seminar spine_, to sow thorns: or that
 other principle, contained in the verse which Cicero citeth, _Cadant
 amici_, _dummodo inimici intercidant_, as the triumvirs, which sold every
 one to other the lives of their friends for the deaths of their enemies:
 or that other protestation of L. Catilina, to set on fire and trouble
 states, to the end to fish in droumy waters, and to unwrap their
 fortunes, _Ego si quid in fortunis meis excitatum sit incendium_, _id non
 aqua sed ruina restinguam_: or that other principle of Lysander, That
 children are to be deceived with comfits, and men with oaths: and the
 like evil and corrupt positions, whereof (as in all things) there are
 more in number than of the good: certainly with these dispensations from
 the laws of charity and integrity, the pressing of a mans fortune may be
 more hasty and compendious.  But it is in life as it is in ways, the
 shortest way is commonly the foulest, and surely the fairer way is not
 much about.
 
 (46) But men, if they be in their own power, and do bear and sustain
 themselves, and be not carried away with a whirlwind or tempest of
 ambition, ought in the pursuit of their own fortune to set before their
 eyes not only that general map of the world, That all things are vanity
 and vexation of spirit, but many other more particular cards and
 directions: chiefly that, that being without well-being is a curse, and
 the greater being the greater curse; and that all virtue is most rewarded
 and all wickedness most punished in itself: according as the poet saith
 excellently:
 
     Qu vobis, qu digna, viri pro laudibus istis
     Prmia posse rear solvi? pulcherrima primum
     Dii _moresque_ dabunt vestri.
 
 And so of the contrary.  And secondly they ought to look up to the
 Eternal Providence and Divine Judgment, which often subverteth the wisdom
 of evil plots and imaginations, according to that scripture, He hath
 conceived mischief, and shall bring forth a vain thing.  And although
 men should refrain themselves from injury and evil arts, yet this
 incessant and Sabbathless pursuit of a mans fortune leaveth not tribute
 which we owe to God of our time; who (we see) demandeth a tenth of our
 substance, and a seventh, which is more strict, of our time: and it is to
 small purpose to have an erected face towards heaven, and a perpetual
 grovelling spirit upon earth, eating dust as doth the serpent, _Atque
 affigit humo divin particulam aur_.  And if any man flatter himself
 that he will employ his fortune well, though he should obtain it ill, as
 was said concerning Augustus Csar, and after of Septimius Severus, That
 either they should never have been born, or else they should never have
 died, they did so much mischief in the pursuit and ascent of their
 greatness, and so much good when they were established; yet these
 compensations and satisfactions are good to be used, but never good to be
 purposed.  And lastly, it is not amiss for men, in their race towards
 their fortune, to cool themselves a little with that conceit which is
 elegantly expressed by the Emperor Charles V., in his instructions to the
 king his son, That fortune hath somewhat of the nature of a woman, that
 if she he too much wooed she is the farther off.  But this last is but a
 remedy for those whose tastes are corrupted: let men rather build upon
 that foundation which is as a corner-stone of divinity and philosophy,
 wherein they join close, namely that same _Primum qurite_.  For divinity
 saith, _Primum qurite regnum Dei_, _et ista omnia adjicientur vobis_:
 and philosophy saith, _Primum qurite bona animi_; _ctera aut aderunt_,
 _aut non oberunt_.  And although the human foundation hath somewhat of
 the sands, as we see in M. Brutus, when he broke forth into that speech,
 
     Te colui (Virtus) ut rem; ast tu nomen inane es;
 
 yet the divine foundation is upon the rock.  But this may serve for a
 taste of that knowledge which I noted as deficient.
 
 (47) Concerning government, it is a part of knowledge secret and retired
 in both these respects in which things are deemed secret; for some things
 are secret because they are hard to know, and some because they are not
 fit to utter.  We see all governments are obscure and invisible:
 
        Totamque infusa per artus
     Mens agitat molem, et magno se corpore miscet.
 
 Such is the description of governments.  We see the government of God
 over the world is hidden, insomuch as it seemeth to participate of much
 irregularity and confusion.  The government of the soul in moving the
 body is inward and profound, and the passages thereof hardly to be
 reduced to demonstration.  Again, the wisdom of antiquity (the shadows
 whereof are in the poets) in the description of torments and pains, next
 unto the crime of rebellion, which was the giants offence, doth detest
 the offence of futility, as in Sisyphus and Tantalus.  But this was meant
 of particulars: nevertheless even unto the general rules and discourses
 of policy and government there is due a reverent and reserved handling.
 
 (48) But contrariwise in the governors towards the governed, all things
 ought as far as the frailty of man permitteth to be manifest and
 revealed.  For so it is expressed in the Scriptures touching the
 government of God, that this globe, which seemeth to us a dark and shady
 body, is in the view of God as crystal: _Et in conspectu sedis tanquam
 mare vitreum simile crystallo_.  So unto princes and states, and
 specially towards wise senates and councils, the natures and dispositions
 of the people, their conditions and necessities, their factions and
 combinations, their animosities and discontents, ought to be, in regard
 of the variety of their intelligences, the wisdom of their observations,
 and the height of their station where they keep sentinel, in great part
 clear and transparent.  Wherefore, considering that I write to a king
 that is a master of this science, and is so well assisted, I think it
 decent to pass over this part in silence, as willing to obtain the
 certificate which one of the ancient philosophers aspired unto; who being
 silent, when others contended to make demonstration of their abilities by
 speech, desired it might be certified for his part, That there was one
 that knew how to hold his peace.
 
 (49) Notwithstanding, for the more public part of government, which is
 laws, I think good to note only one deficiency; which is, that all those
 which have written of laws have written either as philosophers or as
 lawyers, and none as statesmen.  As for the philosophers, they make
 imaginary laws for imaginary commonwealths, and their discourses are as
 the stars, which give little light because they are so high.  For the
 lawyers, they write according to the states where they live what is
 received law, and not what ought to be law; for the wisdom of a law-maker
 is one, and of a lawyer is another.  For there are in nature certain
 fountains of justice whence all civil laws are derived but as streams;
 and like as waters do take tinctures and tastes from the soils through
 which they run, so do civil laws vary according to the regions and
 governments where they are planted, though they proceed from the same
 fountains.  Again, the wisdom of a law-maker consisteth not only in a
 platform of justice, but in the application thereof; taking into
 consideration by what means laws may be made certain, and what are the
 causes and remedies of the doubtfulness and uncertainty of law; by what
 means laws may be made apt and easy to be executed, and what are the
 impediments and remedies in the execution of laws; what influence laws
 touching private right of _meum_ and _tuum_ have into the public state,
 and how they may be made apt and agreeable; how laws are to be penned and
 delivered, whether in texts or in Acts, brief or large, with preambles or
 without; how they are to be pruned and reformed from time to time, and
 what is the best means to keep them from being too vast in volume, or too
 full of multiplicity and crossness; how they are to be expounded, when
 upon causes emergent and judicially discussed, and when upon responses
 and conferences touching general points or questions; how they are to be
 pressed, rigorously or tenderly; how they are to be mitigated by equity
 and good conscience, and whether discretion and strict law are to be
 mingled in the same courts, or kept apart in several courts; again, how
 the practice, profession, and erudition of law is to be censured and
 governed; and many other points touching the administration and (as I may
 term it) animation of laws.  Upon which I insist the less, because I
 purpose (if God give me leave), having begun a work of this nature in
 aphorisms, to propound it hereafter, noting it in the meantime for
 deficient.
 
 (50) And for your Majestys laws of England, I could say much of their
 dignity, and somewhat of their defect; but they cannot but excel the
 civil laws in fitness for the government, for the civil law was _nonhos
 qusitum munus in usus_; it was not made for the countries which it
 governeth.  Hereof I cease to speak because I will not intermingle matter
 of action with matter of general learning.
 
 XXIV.  Thus have I concluded this portion of learning touching civil
 knowledge; and with civil knowledge have concluded human philosophy; and
 with human philosophy, philosophy in general.  And being now at some
 pause, looking back into that I have passed through, this writing seemeth
 to me (_si nunquam fallit imago_), as far as a man can judge of his own
 work, not much better than that noise or sound which musicians make while
 they are in tuning their instruments, which is nothing pleasant to hear,
 but yet is a cause why the music is sweeter afterwards.  So have I been
 content to tune the instruments of the Muses, that they may play that
 have better hands.  And surely, when I set before me the condition of
 these times, in which learning hath made her third visitation or circuit
 in all the qualities thereof; as the excellency and vivacity of the wits
 of this age; the noble helps and lights which we have by the travails of
 ancient writers; the art of printing, which communicateth books to men of
 all fortunes; the openness of the world by navigation, which hath
 disclosed multitudes of experiments, and a mass of natural history; the
 leisure wherewith these times abound, not employing men so generally in
 civil business, as the states of Grcia did, in respect of their
 popularity, and the state of Rome, in respect of the greatness of their
 monarchy; the present disposition of these times at this instant to
 peace; the consumption of all that ever can be said in controversies of
 religion, which have so much diverted men from other sciences; the
 perfection of your Majestys learning, which as a phnix may call whole
 volleys of wits to follow you; and the inseparable propriety of time,
 which is ever more and more to disclose truth; I cannot but be raised to
 this persuasion, that this third period of time will far surpass that of
 the Grecian and Roman learning; only if men will know their own strength
 and their own weakness both; and take, one from the other, light of
 invention, and not fire of contradiction; and esteem of the inquisition
 of truth as of an enterprise, and not as of a quality or ornament; and
 employ wit and magnificence to things of worth and excellency, and not to
 things vulgar and of popular estimation.  As for my labours, if any man
 shall please himself or others in the reprehension of them, they shall
 make that ancient and patient request, _Verbera_, _sed audi_: let men
 reprehend them, so they observe and weigh them.  For the appeal is lawful
 (though it may be it shall not be needful) from the first cogitations of
 men to their second, and from the nearer times to the times further off.
 Now let us come to that learning, which both the former times were not so
 blessed as to know, sacred and inspired divinity, the Sabbath and port of
 all mens labours and peregrinations.
 
 XXV. (1) The prerogative of God extendeth as well to the reason as to the
 will of man: so that as we are to obey His law, though we find a
 reluctation in our will, so we are to believe His word, though we find a
 reluctation in our reason.  For if we believe only that which is
 agreeable to our sense we give consent to the matter, and not to the
 author; which is no more than we would do towards a suspected and
 discredited witness; but that faith which was accounted to Abraham for
 righteousness was of such a point as whereat Sarah laughed, who therein
 was an image of natural reason.
 
 (2) Howbeit (if we will truly consider of it) more worthy it is to
 believe than to know as we now know.  For in knowledge mans mind
 suffereth from sense: but in belief it suffereth from spirit, such one as
 it holdeth for more authorised than itself and so suffereth from the
 worthier agent.  Otherwise it is of the state of man glorified; for then
 faith shall cease, and we shall know as we are known.
 
 (3) Wherefore we conclude that sacred theology (which in our idiom we
 call divinity) is grounded only upon the word and oracle of God, and not
 upon the light of nature: for it is written, _Cli enarrant gloriam Dei_;
 but it is not written, _Cli enarrant voluntatem Dei_: but of that it is
 said, _Ad legem et testimonium_: _si non fecerint secundum verbum istud_,
 &c.  This holdeth not only in those points of faith which concern the
 great mysteries of the Deity, of the creation, of the redemption, but
 likewise those which concern the law moral, truly interpreted: Love your
 enemies: do good to them that hate you; be like to your heavenly Father,
 that suffereth His rain to fall upon the just and unjust.  To this it
 ought to be applauded, _Nec vox hominem sonat_: it is a voice beyond the
 light of nature.  So we see the heathen poets, when they fall upon a
 libertine passion, do still expostulate with laws and moralities, as if
 they were opposite and malignant to nature: _Et quod natura remittit_,
 _invida jura negant_.  So said Dendamis the Indian unto Alexanders
 messengers, that he had heard somewhat of Pythagoras, and some other of
 the wise men of Grcia, and that he held them for excellent men: but that
 they had a fault, which was that they had in too great reverence and
 veneration a thing they called law and manners.  So it must be confessed
 that a great part of the law moral is of that perfection whereunto the
 light of nature cannot aspire: how then is it that man is said to have,
 by the light and law of nature, some notions and conceits of virtue and
 vice, justice and wrong, good and evil?  Thus, because the light of
 nature is used in two several senses: the one, that which springeth from
 reason, sense, induction, argument, according to the laws of heaven and
 earth; the other, that which is imprinted upon the spirit of man by an
 inward instinct, according to the law of conscience, which is a sparkle
 of the purity of his first estate: in which latter sense only he is
 participant of some light and discerning touching the perfection of the
 moral law; but how? sufficient to check the vice but not to inform the
 duty.  So then the doctrine of religion, as well moral as mystical, is
 not to be attained but by inspiration and revelation from God.
 
 (4) The use notwithstanding of reason in spiritual things, and the
 latitude thereof, is very great and general: for it is not for nothing
 that the apostle calleth religion our reasonable service of God;
 insomuch as the very ceremonies and figures of the old law were full of
 reason and signification, much more than the ceremonies of idolatry and
 magic, that are full of non-significants and surd characters.  But most
 specially the Christian faith, as in all things so in this, deserveth to
 be highly magnified; holding and preserving the golden mediocrity in this
 point between the law of the heathen and the law of Mahomet, which have
 embraced the two extremes.  For the religion of the heathen had no
 constant belief or confession, but left all to the liberty of agent; and
 the religion of Mahomet on the other side interdicteth argument
 altogether: the one having the very face of error, and the other of
 imposture; whereas the Faith doth both admit and reject disputation with
 difference.
 
 (5) The use of human reason in religion is of two sorts: the former, in
 the conception and apprehension of the mysteries of God to us revealed;
 the other, in the inferring and deriving of doctrine and direction
 thereupon.  The former extendeth to the mysteries themselves; but how? by
 way of illustration, and not by way of argument.  The latter consisteth
 indeed of probation and argument.  In the former we see God vouchsafeth
 to descend to our capacity, in the expressing of His mysteries in sort as
 may be sensible unto us; and doth graft His revelations and holy doctrine
 upon the notions of our reason, and applieth His inspirations to open our
 understanding, as the form of the key to the ward of the lock.  For the
 latter there is allowed us a use of reason and argument, secondary and
 respective, although not original and absolute.  For after the articles
 and principles of religion are placed and exempted from examination of
 reason, it is then permitted unto us to make derivations and inferences
 from and according to the analogy of them, for our better direction.  In
 nature this holdeth not; for both the principles are examinable by
 induction, though not by a medium or syllogism; and besides, those
 principles or first positions have no discordance with that reason which
 draweth down and deduceth the inferior positions.  But yet it holdeth not
 in religion alone, but in many knowledges, both of greater and smaller
 nature, namely, wherein there are not only _posita_ but _placita_; for in
 such there can be no use of absolute reason.  We see it familiarly in
 games of wit, as chess, or the like.  The draughts and first laws of the
 game are positive, but how? merely _ad placitum_, and not examinable by
 reason; but then how to direct our play thereupon with best advantage to
 win the game is artificial and rational.  So in human laws there be many
 grounds and maxims which are _placita juris_, positive upon authority,
 and not upon reason, and therefore not to be disputed: but what is most
 just, not absolutely but relatively, and according to those maxims, that
 affordeth a long field of disputation.  Such therefore is that secondary
 reason, which hath place in divinity, which is grounded upon the
 _placets_ of God.
 
 (6) Here therefore I note this deficiency, that there hath not been, to
 my understanding, sufficiently inquired and handled the true limits and
 use of reason in spiritual things, as a kind of divine dialectic: which
 for that it is not done, it seemeth to me a thing usual, by pretext of
 true conceiving that which is revealed, to search and mine into that
 which is not revealed; and by pretext of enucleating inferences and
 contradictories, to examine that which is positive.  The one sort falling
 into the error of Nicodemus, demanding to have things made more sensible
 than it pleaseth God to reveal them, _Quomodo possit homo nasci cum sit
 senex_?  The other sort into the error of the disciples, which were
 scandalised at a show of contradiction, _Quid est hoc quod dicit nobis_?
 _Modicum et non videbitis me_; _et iterum_, _modicum_, _et videbitis me_,
 &c.
 
 (7) Upon this I have insisted the more, in regard of the great and
 blessed use thereof; for this point well laboured and defined of would in
 my judgment be an opiate to stay and bridle not only the vanity of
 curious speculations, wherewith the schools labour, but the fury of
 controversies, wherewith the Church laboureth.  For it cannot but open
 mens eyes to see that many controversies do merely pertain to that which
 is either not revealed or positive; and that many others do grow upon
 weak and obscure inferences or derivations: which latter sort, if men
 would revive the blessed style of that great doctor of the Gentiles,
 would be carried thus, _ego_, _non dominus_; and again, _secundum
 consilium meum_, in opinions and counsels, and not in positions and
 oppositions.  But men are now over-ready to usurp the style, _non ego_,
 _sed dominus_; and not so only, but to bind it with the thunder and
 denunciation of curses and anathemas, to the terror of those which have
 not sufficiently learned out of Solomon that The causeless curse shall
 not come.
 
 (8) Divinity hath two principal parts: the matter informed or revealed,
 and the nature of the information or revelation; and with the latter we
 will begin, because it hath most coherence with that which we have now
 last handled.  The nature of the information consisteth of three
 branches: the limits of the information, the sufficiency of the
 information, and the acquiring or obtaining the information.  Unto the
 limits of the information belong these considerations: how far forth
 particular persons continue to be inspired; how far forth the Church is
 inspired; and how far forth reason may be used; the last point whereof I
 have noted as deficient.  Unto the sufficiency of the information belong
 two considerations: what points of religion are fundamental, and what
 perfective, being matter of further building and perfection upon one and
 the same foundation; and again, how the gradations of light according to
 the dispensation of times are material to the sufficiency of belief.
 
 (9) Here again I may rather give it in advice than note it as deficient,
 that the points fundamental, and the points of further perfection only,
 ought to be with piety and wisdom distinguished; a subject tending to
 much like end as that I noted before; for as that other were likely to
 abate the number of controversies, so this is likely to abate the heat of
 many of them.  We see Moses when he saw the Israelite and the Egyptian
 fight, he did not say, Why strive you? but drew his sword and slew the
 Egyptian; but when he saw the two Israelites fight, he said, You are
 brethren, why strive you?  If the point of doctrine be an Egyptian, it
 must be slain by the sword of the Spirit, and not reconciled; but if it
 be an Israelite, though in the wrong, then, Why strive you?  We see of
 the fundamental points, our Saviour penneth the league thus, He that is
 not with us is against us; but of points not fundamental, thus, He that
 is not against us is with us.  So we see the coat of our Saviour was
 entire without seam, and so is the doctrine of the Scriptures in itself;
 but the garment of the Church was of divers colours and yet not divided.
 We see the chaff may and ought to be severed from the corn in the ear,
 but the tares may not be pulled up from the corn in the field.  So as it
 is a thing of great use well to define what, and of what latitude, those
 points are which do make men mere aliens and disincorporate from the
 Church of God.
 
 (10) For the obtaining of the information, it resteth upon the true and
 sound interpretation of the Scriptures, which are the fountains of the
 water of life.  The interpretations of the Scriptures are of two sorts:
 methodical, and solute or at large.  For this divine water, which
 excelleth so much that of Jacobs well, is drawn forth much in the same
 kind as natural water useth to be out of wells and fountains; either it
 is first forced up into a cistern, and from thence fetched and derived
 for use; or else it is drawn and received in buckets and vessels
 immediately where it springeth.  The former sort whereof, though it seem
 to be the more ready, yet in my judgment is more subject to corrupt.
 This is that method which hath exhibited unto us the scholastical
 divinity; whereby divinity hath been reduced into an art, as into a
 cistern, and the streams of doctrine or positions fetched and derived
 from thence.
 
 (11) In this men have sought three things, a summary brevity, a compacted
 strength, and a complete perfection; whereof the two first they fail to
 find, and the last they ought not to seek.  For as to brevity, we see in
 all summary methods, while men purpose to abridge, they give cause to
 dilate.  For the sum or abridgment by contraction becometh obscure; the
 obscurity requireth exposition, and the exposition is deduced into large
 commentaries, or into commonplaces and titles, which grow to be more vast
 than the original writings, whence the sum was at first extracted.  So we
 see the volumes of the schoolmen are greater much than the first writings
 of the fathers, whence the master of the sentences made his sum or
 collection.  So in like manner the volumes of the modern doctors of the
 civil law exceed those of the ancient jurisconsults, of which Tribonian
 compiled the digest.  So as this course of sums and commentaries is that
 which doth infallibly make the body of sciences more immense in quantity,
 and more base in substance.
 
 (12) And for strength, it is true that knowledges reduced into exact
 methods have a show of strength, in that each part seemeth to support and
 sustain the other; but this is more satisfactory than substantial, like
 unto buildings which stand by architecture and compaction, which are more
 subject to ruin than those that are built more strong in their several
 parts, though less compacted.  But it is plain that the more you recede
 from your grounds, the weaker do you conclude; and as in nature, the more
 you remove yourself from particulars, the greater peril of error you do
 incur; so much more in divinity, the more you recede from the Scriptures
 by inferences and consequences, the more weak and dilute are your
 positions.
 
 (13) And as for perfection or completeness in divinity, it is not to be
 sought, which makes this course of artificial divinity the more suspect.
 For he that will reduce a knowledge into an art will make it round and
 uniform; but in divinity many things must be left abrupt, and concluded
 with this: _O altitudo sapienti et scienti Dei_! _quam
 incomprehensibilia sunt juducua ejus_, _et non investigabiles vi ejus_.
 So again the apostle saith, _Ex parte scimus_: and to have the form of a
 total, where there is but matter for a part, cannot be without supplies
 by supposition and presumption.  And therefore I conclude that the true
 use of these sums and methods hath place in institutions or introductions
 preparatory unto knowledge; but in them, or by deducement from them, to
 handle the main body and substance of a knowledge is in all sciences
 prejudicial, and in divinity dangerous.
 
 (14) As to the interpretation of the Scriptures solute and at large,
 there have been divers kinds introduced and devised; some of them rather
 curious and unsafe than sober and warranted.  Notwithstanding, thus much
 must be confessed, that the Scriptures, being given by inspiration and
 not by human reason, do differ from all other books in the Author, which
 by consequence doth draw on some difference to be used by the expositor.
 For the Inditer of them did know four things which no man attains to
 know; which arethe mysteries of the kingdom of glory, the perfection of
 the laws of nature, the secrets of the heart of man, and the future
 succession of all ages.  For as to the first it is said, He that
 presseth into the light shall be oppressed of the glory.  And again, No
 man shall see My face and live.  To the second, When He prepared the
 heavens I was present, when by law and compass He enclosed the deep.  To
 the third, Neither was it needful that any should bear witness to Him of
 man, for He knew well what was in man.  And to the last, From the
 beginning are known to the Lord all His works.
 
 (15) From the former two of these have been drawn certain senses and
 expositions of Scriptures, which had need be contained within the bounds
 of sobrietythe one anagogical, and the other philosophical.  But as to
 the former, man is not to prevent his time: _Videmus nunc per speculum in
 nigmate_, _tunc autem facie ad faciem_; wherein nevertheless there
 seemeth to be a liberty granted, as far forth as the polishing of this
 glass, or some moderate explication of this enigma.  But to press too far
 into it cannot but cause a dissolution and overthrow of the spirit of
 man.  For in the body there are three degrees of that we receive into
 italiment, medicine, and poison; whereof aliment is that which the
 nature of man can perfectly alter and overcome; medicine is that which is
 partly converted by nature, and partly converteth nature; and poison is
 that which worketh wholly upon nature, without that nature can in any
 part work upon it.  So in the mind, whatsoever knowledge reason cannot at
 all work upon and convert is a mere intoxication, and endangereth a
 dissolution of the mind and understanding.
 
 (16) But for the latter, it hath been extremely set on foot of late time
 by the school of Paracelsus, and some others, that have pretended to find
 the truth of all natural philosophy in the Scriptures; scandalising and
 traducing all other philosophy as heathenish and profane.  But there is
 no such enmity between Gods Word and His works; neither do they give
 honour to the Scriptures, as they suppose, but much embase them.  For to
 seek heaven and earth in the Word of God, whereof it is said, Heaven and
 earth shall pass, but My word shall not pass, is to seek temporary
 things amongst eternal: and as to seek divinity in philosophy is to seek
 the living amongst the dead, so to seek philosophy in divinity is to seek
 the dead amongst the living: neither are the pots or lavers, whose place
 was in the outward part of the temple, to be sought in the holiest place
 of all where the ark of the testimony was seated.  And again, the scope
 or purpose of the Spirit of God is not to express matters of nature in
 the Scriptures, otherwise than in passage, and for application to mans
 capacity and to matters moral or divine.  And it is a true rule,
 _Auctoris aliud agentis parva auctoritas_.  For it were a strange
 conclusion, if a man should use a similitude for ornament or illustration
 sake, borrowed from nature or history according to vulgar conceit, as of
 a basilisk, a unicorn, a centaur, a Briareus, a hydra, or the like, that
 therefore he must needs be thought to affirm the matter thereof
 positively to be true.  To conclude therefore these two interpretations,
 the one by reduction or enigmatical, the other philosophical or physical,
 which have been received and pursued in imitation of the rabbins and
 cabalists, are to be confined with a _a noli akryn sapere_, _sed time_.
 
 (17) But the two latter points, known to God and unknown to man, touching
 the secrets of the heart and the successions of time, doth make a just
 and sound difference between the manner of the exposition of the
 Scriptures and all other books.  For it is an excellent observation which
 hath been made upon the answers of our Saviour Christ to many of the
 questions which were propounded to Him, how that they are impertinent to
 the state of the question demanded: the reason whereof is, because not
 being like man, which knows mans thoughts by his words, but knowing
 mans thoughts immediately, He never answered their words, but their
 thoughts.  Much in the like manner it is with the Scriptures, which being
 written to the thoughts of men, and to the succession of all ages, with a
 foresight of all heresies, contradictions, differing estates of the
 Church, yea, and particularly of the elect, are not to be interpreted
 only according to the latitude of the proper sense of the place, and
 respectively towards that present occasion whereupon the words were
 uttered, or in precise congruity or contexture with the words before or
 after, or in contemplation of the principal scope of the place; but have
 in themselves, not only totally or collectively, but distributively in
 clauses and words, infinite springs and streams of doctrine to water the
 Church in every part.  And therefore as the literal sense is, as it were,
 the main stream or river, so the moral sense chiefly, and sometimes the
 allegorical or typical, are they whereof the Church hath most use; not
 that I wish men to be bold in allegories, or indulgent or light in
 allusions: but that I do much condemn that interpretation of the
 Scripture which is only after the manner as men use to interpret a
 profane book.
 
 (18) In this part touching the exposition of the Scriptures, I can report
 no deficiency; but by way of remembrance this I will add.  In perusing
 books of divinity I find many books of controversies, and many of
 commonplaces and treatises, a mass of positive divinity, as it is made an
 art: a number of sermons and lectures, and many prolix commentaries upon
 the Scriptures, with harmonies and concordances.  But that form of
 writing in divinity which in my judgment is of all others most rich and
 precious is positive divinity, collected upon particular texts of
 Scriptures in brief observations; not dilated into commonplaces, not
 chasing after controversies, not reduced into method of art; a thing
 abounding in sermons, which will vanish, but defective in books which
 will remain, and a thing wherein this age excelleth.  For I am persuaded,
 and I may speak it with an _absit invidia verbo_, and nowise in
 derogation of antiquity, but as in a good emulation between the vine and
 the olive, that if the choice and best of those observations upon texts
 of Scriptures which have been made dispersedly in sermons within this
 your Majestys Island of Brittany by the space of these forty years and
 more (leaving out the largeness of exhortations and applications
 thereupon) had been set down in a continuance, it had been the best work
 in divinity which had been written since the Apostles times.
 
 (19) The matter informed by divinity is of two kinds: matter of belief
 and truth of opinion, and matter of service and adoration; which is also
 judged and directed by the formerthe one being as the internal soul of
 religion, and the other as the external body thereof.  And, therefore,
 the heathen religion was not only a worship of idols, but the whole
 religion was an idol in itself; for it had no soul; that is, no certainty
 of belief or confession: as a man may well think, considering the chief
 doctors of their church were the poets; and the reason was because the
 heathen gods were no jealous gods, but were glad to be admitted into
 part, as they had reason.  Neither did they respect the pureness of
 heart, so they might have external honour and rites.
 
 (20) But out of these two do result and issue four main branches of
 divinity: faith, manners, liturgy, and government.  Faith containeth the
 doctrine of the nature of God, of the attributes of God, and of the works
 of God.  The nature of God consisteth of three persons in unity of
 Godhead.  The attributes of God are either common to the Deity, or
 respective to the persons.  The works of God summary are two, that of the
 creation and that of the redemption; and both these works, as in total
 they appertain to the unity of the Godhead, so in their parts they refer
 to the three persons: that of the creation, in the mass of the matter, to
 the Father; in the disposition of the form, to the Son; and in the
 continuance and conservation of the being, to the Holy Spirit.  So that
 of the redemption, in the election and counsel, to the Father; in the
 whole act and consummation, to the Son; and in the application, to the
 Holy Spirit; for by the Holy Ghost was Christ conceived in flesh, and by
 the Holy Ghost are the elect regenerate in spirit.  This work likewise we
 consider either effectually, in the elect; or privately, in the
 reprobate; or according to appearance, in the visible Church.
 
 (21) For manners, the doctrine thereof is contained in the law, which
 discloseth sin.  The law itself is divided, according to the edition
 thereof, into the law of nature, the law moral, and the law positive; and
 according to the style, into negative and affirmative, prohibitions and
 commandments.  Sin, in the matter and subject thereof, is divided
 according to the commandments; in the form thereof it referreth to the
 three persons in Deity: sins of infirmity against the Father, whose more
 special attribute is power; sins of ignorance against the Son, whose
 attribute is wisdom; and sins of malice against the Holy Ghost, whose
 attribute is grace or love.  In the motions of it, it either moveth to
 the right hand or to the left; either to blind devotion or to profane and
 libertine transgression; either in imposing restraint where God granteth
 liberty, or in taking liberty where God imposeth restraint.  In the
 degrees and progress of it, it divideth itself into thought, word, or
 act.  And in this part I commend much the deducing of the law of God to
 cases of conscience; for that I take indeed to be a breaking, and not
 exhibiting whole of the bread of life.  But that which quickeneth both
 these doctrines of faith and manners is the elevation and consent of the
 heart; whereunto appertain books of exhortation, holy meditation,
 Christian resolution, and the like.
 
 (22) For the liturgy or service, it consisteth of the reciprocal acts
 between God and man; which, on the part of God, are the preaching of the
 word, and the sacraments, which are seals to the covenant, or as the
 visible word; and on the part of man, invocation of the name of God; and
 under the law, sacrifices; which were as visible prayers or confessions:
 but now the adoration being _in spiritu et veritate_, there remaineth
 only _vituli labiorum_; although the use of holy vows of thankfulness and
 retribution may be accounted also as sealed petitions.
 
 (23) And for the government of the Church, it consisteth of the patrimony
 of the Church, the franchises of the Church, and the offices and
 jurisdictions of the Church, and the laws of the Church directing the
 whole; all which have two considerations, the one in themselves, the
 other how they stand compatible and agreeable to the civil estate.
 
 (24) This matter of divinity is handled either in form of instruction of
 truth, or in form of confutation of falsehood.  The declinations from
 religion, besides the privative, which is atheism and the branches
 thereof, are threeheresies, idolatry, and witchcraft: heresies, when we
 serve the true God with a false worship; idolatry, when we worship false
 gods, supposing them to be true; and witchcraft, when we adore false
 gods, knowing them to be wicked and false.  For so your Majesty doth
 excellently well observe, that witchcraft is the height of idolatry.  And
 yet we see though these be true degrees, Samuel teacheth us that they are
 all of a nature, when there is once a receding from the Word of God; for
 so he saith, _Quasi peccatum ariolandi est repugnare_, _et quasi scelus
 idololatri nolle acquiescere_.
 
 (25) These things I have passed over so briefly because I can report no
 deficiency concerning them: for I can find no space or ground that lieth
 vacant and unsown in the matter of divinity, so diligent have men been
 either in sowing of good seed, or in sowing of tares.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
 Thus have I made as it were a small globe of the intellectual world, as
 truly and faithfully as I could discover; with a note and description of
 those parts which seem to me not constantly occupate, or not well
 converted by the labour of man.  In which, if I have in any point receded
 from that which is commonly received, it hath been with a purpose of
 proceeding in _melius_, and not _in aliud_; a mind of amendment and
 proficiency, and not of change and difference.  For I could not be true
 and constant to the argument I handle if I were not willing to go beyond
 others; but yet not more willing than to have others go beyond me again:
 which may the better appear by this, that I have propounded my opinions
 naked and unarmed, not seeking to preoccupate the liberty of mens
 judgments by confutations.  For in anything which is well set down, I am
 in good hope that if the first reading move an objection, the second
 reading will make an answer.  And in those things wherein I have erred, I
 am sure I have not prejudiced the right by litigious arguments; which
 certainly have this contrary effect and operation, that they add
 authority to error, and destroy the authority of that which is well
 invented.  For question is an honour and preferment to falsehood, as on
 the other side it is a repulse to truth.  But the errors I claim and
 challenge to myself as mine own.  The good, it any be, is due _tanquam
 adeps sacrificii_, to be incensed to the honour, first of the Divine
 Majesty, and next of your Majesty, to whom on earth I am most bounden.
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES.
 
 
 {39}  Stoops in the rice and takes the speeding gold.  Ovid. Metam, x.
 667.
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Boss
 
 
 
 
 
 THE ESSAYS OR COUNSELS, CIVIL AND MORAL,
 
 OF FRANCIS Ld. VERULAM VISCOUNT ST. ALBANS
 
 
 By Francis Bacon
 
 
 THE ESSAYS
 
      Of Truth
      Of Death
      Of Unity in Religion
      Of Revenge
      Of Adversity
      Of Simulation and Dissimulation
      Of Parents and Children
      Of Marriage and Single Life
      Of Envy
      Of Love
      Of Great Place
      Of Boldness
      Of Goodness and Goodness of Nature
      Of Nobility
      Of Seditions and Troubles
      Of Atheism
      Of Superstition
      Of Travel
      Of Empire
      Of Counsel
      Of Delays
      Of Cunning
      Of Wisdom for a Man's Self
      Of Innovations
      Of Dispatch
      Of Seeming Wise
      Of Friendship
      Of Expense
      Of the True Greatness of Kingdoms and Estates
      Of Regiment of Health
      Of Suspicion
      Of Discourse
      Of Plantations
      Of Riches
      Of Prophecies
      Of Ambition
      Of Masques and Triumphs
      Of Nature in Men
      Of Custom and Education
      Of Fortune
      Of Usury
      Of Youth and Age
      Of Beauty
      Of Deformity
      Of Building
      Of Gardens
      Of Negotiating
      Of Followers and Friends
      Of Suitors
      Of Studies
      Of Faction
      Of Ceremonies and Respects
      Of Praise
      Of Vain-glory
      Of Honor and Reputation
      Of Judicature
      Of Anger
      Of Vicissitude of Things
      Of Fame
 
 
 TO
 
 THE RIGHT HONORABLE
 
 MY VERY GOOD LORD
 
 THE DUKE OF BUCKINGHAM
 
 HIS GRACE, LORD
 
 HIGH ADMIRAL OF ENGLAND
 
 
 EXCELLENT LORD:
 
 SALOMON saies; A good Name is as a precious oyntment; And I assure my
 selfe, such wil your Graces Name bee, with Posteritie. For your Fortune,
 and Merit both, have been Eminent. And you have planted Things, that
 are like to last. I doe now publish my Essayes; which, of all my other
 workes, have beene most Currant: For that, as it seemes, they come home,
 to Mens Businesse, and Bosomes. I have enlarged them, both in Number,
 and Weight; So that they are indeed a New Worke. I thought it therefore
 agreeable, to my Affection, and Obligation to your Grace, to prefix your
 Name before them, both in English, and in Latine. For I doe conceive,
 that the Latine Volume of them, (being in the Universall Language) may
 last, as long as Bookes last. My Instauration, I dedicated to the King:
 My Historie of Henry the Seventh, (which I have now also translated into
 Latine) and my Portions of Naturall History, to the Prince: And these
 I dedicate to your Grace; Being of the best Fruits, that by the good
 Encrease, which God gives to my Pen and Labours, I could yeeld. God
 leade your Grace by the Hand. Your Graces most Obliged and faithfull
 Servant,
 
 FR. ST. ALBAN
 
 
 
 
 
 Of Truth
 
 
 WHAT is truth? said jesting Pilate, and would not stay for an answer.
 Certainly there be, that delight in giddiness, and count it a bondage to
 fix a belief; affecting free-will in thinking, as well as in acting. And
 though the sects of philosophers of that kind be gone, yet there remain
 certain discoursing wits, which are of the same veins, though there be
 not so much blood in them, as was in those of the ancients. But it is
 not only the difficulty and labor, which men take in finding out
 of truth, nor again, that when it is found, it imposeth upon men's
 thoughts, that doth bring lies in favor; but a natural, though corrupt
 love, of the lie itself. One of the later school of the Grecians,
 examineth the matter, and is at a stand, to think what should be in it,
 that men should love lies; where neither they make for pleasure, as with
 poets, nor for advantage, as with the merchant; but for the lie's sake.
 But I cannot tell; this same truth, is a naked, and open day-light, that
 doth not show the masks, and mummeries, and triumphs, of the world, half
 so stately and daintily as candle-lights. Truth may perhaps come to the
 price of a pearl, that showeth best by day; but it will not rise to the
 price of a diamond, or carbuncle, that showeth best in varied lights.
 A mixture of a lie doth ever add pleasure. Doth any man doubt, that if
 there were taken out of men's minds, vain opinions, flattering hopes,
 false valuations, imaginations as one would, and the like, but it would
 leave the minds, of a number of men, poor shrunken things, full of
 melancholy and indisposition, and unpleasing to themselves?
 
 One of the fathers, in great severity, called poesy vinum daemonum,
 because it fireth the imagination; and yet, it is but with the shadow of
 a lie. But it is not the lie that passeth through the mind, but the
 lie that sinketh in, and settleth in it, that doth the hurt; such as we
 spake of before. But howsoever these things are thus in men's depraved
 judgments, and affections, yet truth, which only doth judge itself,
 teacheth that the inquiry of truth, which is the love-making, or wooing
 of it, the knowledge of truth, which is the presence of it, and the
 belief of truth, which is the enjoying of it, is the sovereign good of
 human nature. The first creature of God, in the works of the days,
 was the light of the sense; the last, was the light of reason; and his
 sabbath work ever since, is the illumination of his Spirit. First he
 breathed light, upon the face of the matter or chaos; then he breathed
 light, into the face of man; and still he breatheth and inspireth light,
 into the face of his chosen. The poet, that beautified the sect, that
 was otherwise inferior to the rest, saith yet excellently well: It is a
 pleasure, to stand upon the shore, and to see ships tossed upon the sea;
 a pleasure, to stand in the window of a castle, and to see a battle,
 and the adventures thereof below: but no pleasure is comparable to the
 standing upon the vantage ground of truth (a hill not to be commanded,
 and where the air is always clear and serene), and to see the errors,
 and wanderings, and mists, and tempests, in the vale below; so always
 that this prospect be with pity, and not with swelling, or pride.
 Certainly, it is heaven upon earth, to have a man's mind move in
 charity, rest in providence, and turn upon the poles of truth.
 
 To pass from theological, and philosophical truth, to the truth of civil
 business; it will be acknowledged, even by those that practise it not,
 that clear, and round dealing, is the honor of man's nature; and that
 mixture of falsehoods, is like alloy in coin of gold and silver, which
 may make the metal work the better, but it embaseth it. For these
 winding, and crooked courses, are the goings of the serpent; which goeth
 basely upon the belly, and not upon the feet. There is no vice, that
 doth so cover a man with shame, as to be found false and perfidious. And
 therefore Montaigne saith prettily, when he inquired the reason, why the
 word of the lie should be such a disgrace, and such an odious charge?
 Saith he, If it be well weighed, to say that a man lieth, is as much to
 say, as that he is brave towards God, and a coward towards men. For a
 lie faces God, and shrinks from man. Surely the wickedness of falsehood,
 and breach of faith, cannot possibly be so highly expressed, as in
 that it shall be the last peal, to call the judgments of God upon the
 generations of men; it being foretold, that when Christ cometh, he shall
 not find faith upon the earth.
 
 
 
 
 Of Death
 
 
 MEN fear death, as children fear to go in the dark; and as that natural
 fear in children, is increased with tales, so is the other. Certainly,
 the contemplation of death, as the wages of sin, and passage to another
 world, is holy and religious; but the fear of it, as a tribute due
 unto nature, is weak. Yet in religious meditations, there is sometimes
 mixture of vanity, and of superstition. You shall read, in some of the
 friars' books of mortification, that a man should think with himself,
 what the pain is, if he have but his finger's end pressed, or tortured,
 and thereby imagine, what the pains of death are, when the whole body is
 corrupted, and dissolved; when many times death passeth, with less
 pain than the torture of a limb; for the most vital parts, are not the
 quickest of sense. And by him that spake only as a philosopher, and
 natural man, it was well said, Pompa mortis magis terret, quam mors
 ipsa. Groans, and convulsions, and a discolored face, and friends
 weeping, and blacks, and obsequies, and the like, show death terrible.
 It is worthy the observing, that there is no passion in the mind of man,
 so weak, but it mates, and masters, the fear of death; and therefore,
 death is no such terrible enemy, when a man hath so many attendants
 about him, that can win the combat of him. Revenge triumphs over
 death; love slights it; honor aspireth to it; grief flieth to it;
 fear preoccupateth it; nay, we read, after Otho the emperor had slain
 himself, pity (which is the tenderest of affections) provoked many to
 die, out of mere compassion to their sovereign, and as the truest sort
 of followers. Nay, Seneca adds niceness and satiety: Cogita quamdiu
 eadem feceris; mori velle, non tantum fortis aut miser, sed etiam
 fastidiosus potest. A man would die, though he were neither valiant, nor
 miserable, only upon a weariness to do the same thing so oft, over and
 over. It is no less worthy, to observe, how little alteration in good
 spirits, the approaches of death make; for they appear to be the same
 men, till the last instant. Augustus Caesar died in a compliment; Livia,
 conjugii nostri memor, vive et vale. Tiberius in dissimulation; as
 Tacitus saith of him, Jam Tiberium vires et corpus, non dissimulatio,
 deserebant. Vespasian in a jest, sitting upon the stool; Ut puto deus
 fio. Galba with a sentence; Feri, si ex re sit populi Romani; holding
 forth his neck. Septimius Severus in despatch; Adeste si quid mihi
 restat agendum. And the like. Certainly the Stoics bestowed too much
 cost upon death, and by their great preparations, made it appear more
 fearful. Better saith he, qui finem vitae extremum inter munera ponat
 naturae. It is as natural to die, as to be born; and to a little infant,
 perhaps, the one is as painful, as the other. He that dies in an earnest
 pursuit, is like one that is wounded in hot blood; who, for the time,
 scarce feels the hurt; and therefore a mind fixed, and bent upon
 somewhat that is good, doth avert the dolors of death. But, above all,
 believe it, the sweetest canticle is', Nunc dimittis; when a man hath
 obtained worthy ends, and expectations. Death hath this also; that
 it openeth the gate to good fame, and extinguisheth envy.--Extinctus
 amabitur idem.
 
 
 
 
 Of Unity In Religion
 
 
 RELIGION being the chief band of human society, it is a happy thing,
 when itself is well contained within the true band of unity. The
 quarrels, and divisions about religion, were evils unknown to the
 heathen. The reason was, because the religion of the heathen, consisted
 rather in rites and ceremonies, than in any constant belief. For you
 may imagine, what kind of faith theirs was, when the chief doctors,
 and fathers of their church, were the poets. But the true God hath this
 attribute, that he is a jealous God; and therefore, his worship and
 religion, will endure no mixture, nor partner. We shall therefore speak
 a few words, concerning the unity of the church; what are the fruits
 thereof; what the bounds; and what the means.
 
 The fruits of unity (next unto the well pleasing of God, which is all
 in all) are two: the one, towards those that are without the church,
 the other, towards those that are within. For the former; it is certain,
 that heresies, and schisms, are of all others the greatest scandals;
 yea, more than corruption of manners. For as in the natural body, a
 wound, or solution of continuity, is worse than a corrupt humor; so in
 the spiritual. So that nothing, doth so much keep men out of the church,
 and drive men out of the church, as breach of unity. And therefore,
 whensoever it cometh to that pass, that one saith, Ecce in deserto,
 another saith, Ecce in penetralibus; that is, when some men seek Christ,
 in the conventicles of heretics, and others, in an outward face of a
 church, that voice had need continually to sound in men's ears, Nolite
 exire,--Go not out. The doctor of the Gentiles (the propriety of whose
 vocation, drew him to have a special care of those without) saith, if
 an heathen come in, and hear you speak with several tongues, will he not
 say that you are mad? And certainly it is little better, when atheists,
 and profane persons, do hear of so many discordant, and contrary
 opinions in religion; it doth avert them from the church, and maketh
 them, to sit down in the chair of the scorners. It is but a light thing,
 to be vouched in so serious a matter, but yet it expresseth well the
 deformity. There is a master of scoffing, that in his catalogue of books
 of a feigned library, sets down this title of a book, The Morris-Dance
 of Heretics. For indeed, every sect of them, hath a diverse posture, or
 cringe by themselves, which cannot but move derision in worldlings, and
 depraved politics, who are apt to contemn holy things.
 
 As for the fruit towards those that are within; it is peace; which
 containeth infinite blessings. It establisheth faith; it kindleth
 charity; the outward peace of the church, distilleth into peace of
 conscience; and it turneth the labors of writing, and reading of
 controversies, into treaties of mortification and devotion.
 
 Concerning the bounds of unity; the true placing of them, importeth
 exceedingly. There appear to be two extremes. For to certain zealants,
 all speech of pacification is odious. Is it peace, Jehu,? What hast
 thou to do with peace? turn thee behind me. Peace is not the matter,
 but following, and party. Contrariwise, certain Laodiceans, and lukewarm
 persons, think they may accommodate points of religion, by middle way,
 and taking part of both, and witty reconcilements; as if they would
 make an arbitrament between God and man. Both these extremes are to be
 avoided; which will be done, if the league of Christians, penned by our
 Savior himself, were in two cross clauses thereof, soundly and plainly
 expounded: He that is not with us, is against us; and again, He that is
 not against us, is with us; that is, if the points fundamental and of
 substance in religion, were truly discerned and distinguished, from
 points not merely of faith, but of opinion, order, or good intention.
 This is a thing may seem to many a matter trivial, and done already. But
 if it were done less partially, it would be embraced more generally.
 
 Of this I may give only this advice, according to my small model.
 Men ought to take heed, of rending God's church, by two kinds of
 controversies. The one is, when the matter of the point controverted,
 is too small and light, not worth the heat and strife about it, kindled
 only by contradiction. For, as it is noted, by one of the fathers,
 Christ's coat indeed had no seam, but the church's vesture was of divers
 colors; whereupon he saith, In veste varietas sit, scissura non sit;
 they be two things, unity and uniformity. The other is, when the matter
 of the point controverted, is great, but it is driven to an over-great
 subtilty, and obscurity; so that it becometh a thing rather ingenious,
 than substantial. A man that is of judgment and understanding, shall
 sometimes hear ignorant men differ, and know well within himself, that
 those which so differ, mean one thing, and yet they themselves would
 never agree. And if it come so to pass, in that distance of judgment,
 which is between man and man, shall we not think that God above, that
 knows the heart, doth not discern that frail men, in some of their
 contradictions, intend the same thing; and accepteth of both? The nature
 of such controversies is excellently expressed, by St. Paul, in the
 warning and precept, that he giveth concerning the same, Devita profanas
 vocum novitates, et oppositiones falsi nominis scientiae. Men create
 oppositions, which are not; and put them into new terms, so fixed,
 as whereas the meaning ought to govern the term, the term in effect
 governeth the meaning. There be also two false peaces, or unities: the
 one, when the peace is grounded, but upon an implicit ignorance; for all
 colors will agree in the dark: the other, when it is pieced up, upon
 a direct admission of contraries, in fundamental points. For truth and
 falsehood, in such things, are like the iron and clay, in the toes of
 Nebuchadnezzar's image; they may cleave, but they will not incorporate.
 
 Concerning the means of procuring unity; men must beware, that in the
 procuring, or reuniting, of religious unity, they do not dissolve and
 deface the laws of charity, and of human society. There be two swords
 amongst Christians, the spiritual and temporal; and both have their due
 office and place, in the maintenance of religion. But we may not take up
 the third sword, which is Mahomet's sword, or like unto it; that is,
 to propagate religion by wars, or by sanguinary persecutions to force
 consciences; except it be in cases of overt scandal, blasphemy, or
 intermixture of practice against the state; much less to nourish
 seditions; to authorize conspiracies and rebellions; to put the sword
 into the people's hands; and the like; tending to the subversion of all
 government, which is the ordinance of God. For this is but to dash the
 first table against the second; and so to consider men as Christians, as
 we forget that they are men. Lucretius the poet, when he beheld the act
 of Agamemnon, that could endure the sacrificing of his own daughter,
 exclaimed: Tantum Religio potuit suadere malorum.
 
 What would he have said, if he had known of the massacre in France,
 or the powder treason of England? He would have been seven times more
 Epicure, and atheist, than he was. For as the temporal sword is to be
 drawn with great circumspection in cases of religion; so it is a thing
 monstrous to put it into the hands of the common people. Let that be
 left unto the Anabaptists, and other furies. It was great blasphemy,
 when the devil said, I will ascend, and be like the highest; but it is
 greater blasphemy, to personate God, and bring him in saying, I will
 descend, and be like the prince of darkness; and what is it better,
 to make the cause of religion to descend, to the cruel and execrable
 actions of murthering princes, butchery of people, and subversion of
 states and governments? Surely this is to bring down the Holy Ghost,
 instead of the likeness of a dove, in the shape of a vulture or raven;
 and set, out of the bark of a Christian church, a flag of a bark of
 pirates, and assassins. Therefore it is most necessary, that the church,
 by doctrine and decree, princes by their sword, and all learnings, both
 Christian and moral, as by their Mercury rod, do damn and send to hell
 for ever, those facts and opinions tending to the support of the same;
 as hath been already in good part done. Surely in counsels concerning
 religion, that counsel of the apostle would be prefixed, Ira hominis non
 implet justitiam Dei. And it was a notable observation of a wise father,
 and no less ingenuously confessed; that those which held and persuaded
 pressure of consciences, were commonly interested therein, themselves,
 for their own ends.
 
 
 
 
 Of Revenge
 
 
 REVENGE is a kind of wild justice; which the more man's nature runs to,
 the more ought law to weed it out. For as for the first wrong, it doth
 but offend the law; but the revenge of that wrong, putteth the law out
 of office. Certainly, in taking revenge, a man is but even with his
 enemy; but in passing it over, he is superior; for it is a prince's part
 to pardon. And Solomon, I am sure, saith, It is the glory of a man, to
 pass by an offence. That which is past is gone, and irrevocable; and
 wise men have enough to do, with things present and to come; therefore
 they do but trifle with themselves, that labor in past matters. There
 is no man doth a wrong, for the wrong's sake; but thereby to purchase
 himself profit, or pleasure, or honor, or the like. Therefore why should
 I be angry with a man, for loving himself better than me? And if any man
 should do wrong, merely out of ill-nature, why, yet it is but like the
 thorn or briar, which prick and scratch, because they can do no other.
 The most tolerable sort of revenge, is for those wrongs which there is
 no law to remedy; but then let a man take heed, the revenge be such as
 there is no law to punish; else a man's enemy is still before hand, and
 it is two for one. Some, when they take revenge, are desirous, the
 party should know, whence it cometh. This is the more generous. For the
 delight seemeth to be, not so much in doing the hurt, as in making
 the party repent. But base and crafty cowards, are like the arrow that
 flieth in the dark. Cosmus, duke of Florence, had a desperate saying
 against perfidious or neglecting friends, as if those wrongs were
 unpardonable; You shall read (saith he) that we are commanded to forgive
 our enemies; but you never read, that we are commanded to forgive our
 friends. But yet the spirit of Job was in a better tune: Shall we (saith
 he) take good at God's hands, and not be content to take evil also? And
 so of friends in a proportion. This is certain, that a man that studieth
 revenge, keeps his own wounds green, which otherwise would heal, and do
 well. Public revenges are for the most part fortunate; as that for the
 death of Caesar; for the death of Pertinax; for the death of Henry the
 Third of France; and many more. But in private revenges, it is not so.
 Nay rather, vindictive persons live the life of witches; who, as they
 are mischievous, so end they infortunate.
 
 
 
 
 Of Adversity
 
 
 IT WAS an high speech of Seneca (after the manner of the Stoics), that
 the good things, which belong to prosperity, are to be wished; but the
 good things, that belong to adversity, are to be admired. Bona rerum
 secundarum optabilia; adversarum mirabilia. Certainly if miracles be the
 command over nature, they appear most in adversity. It is yet a higher
 speech of his, than the other (much too high for a heathen), It is true
 greatness, to have in one the frailty of a man, and the security of
 a God. Vere magnum habere fragilitatem hominis, securitatem Dei. This
 would have done better in poesy, where transcendences are more allowed.
 And the poets indeed have been busy with it; for it is in effect the
 thing, which figured in that strange fiction of the ancient poets, which
 seemeth not to be without mystery; nay, and to have some approach to the
 state of a Christian; that Hercules, when he went to unbind Prometheus
 (by whom human nature is represented), sailed the length of the great
 ocean, in an earthen pot or pitcher; lively describing Christian
 resolution, that saileth in the frail bark of the flesh, through the
 waves of the world. But to speak in a mean. The virtue of prosperity,
 is temperance; the virtue of adversity, is fortitude; which in morals
 is the more heroical virtue. Prosperity is the blessing of the Old
 Testament; adversity is the blessing of the New; which carrieth the
 greater benediction, and the clearer revelation of God's favor. Yet even
 in the Old Testament, if you listen to David's harp, you shall hear as
 many hearse-like airs as carols; and the pencil of the Holy Ghost hath
 labored more in describing the afflictions of Job, than the felicities
 of Solomon. Prosperity is not without many fears and distastes; and
 adversity is not without comforts and hopes. We see in needle-works and
 embroideries, it is more pleasing to have a lively work, upon a sad and
 solemn ground, than to have a dark and melancholy work, upon a lightsome
 ground: judge therefore of the pleasure of the heart, by the pleasure
 of the eye. Certainly virtue is like precious odors, most fragrant when
 they are incensed, or crushed: for prosperity doth best discover vice,
 but adversity doth best discover virtue.
 
 
 
 
 Of Simulation And Dissimulation
 
 
 DISSIMULATION is but a faint kind of policy, or wisdom; for it asketh
 a strong wit, and a strong heart, to know when to tell truth, and to
 do it. Therefore it is the weaker sort of politics, that are the great
 dissemblers.
 
 Tacitus saith, Livia sorted well with the arts of her husband, and
 dissimulation of her son; attributing arts or policy to Augustus,
 and dissimulation to Tiberius. And again, when Mucianus encourageth
 Vespasian, to take arms against Vitellius, he saith, We rise not against
 the piercing judgment of Augustus, nor the extreme caution or closeness
 of Tiberius. These properties, of arts or policy, and dissimulation
 or closeness, are indeed habits and faculties several, and to be
 distinguished. For if a man have that penetration of judgment, as he can
 discern what things are to be laid open, and what to be secreted, and
 what to be showed at half lights, and to whom and when (which indeed are
 arts of state, and arts of life, as Tacitus well calleth them), to him,
 a habit of dissimulation is a hinderance and a poorness. But if a man
 cannot obtain to that judgment, then it is left to him generally, to
 be close, and a dissembler. For where a man cannot choose, or vary in
 particulars, there it is good to take the safest, and wariest way, in
 general; like the going softly, by one that cannot well see. Certainly
 the ablest men that ever were, have had all an openness, and frankness,
 of dealing; and a name of certainty and veracity; but then they were
 like horses well managed; for they could tell passing well, when to stop
 or turn; and at such times, when they thought the case indeed required
 dissimulation, if then they used it, it came to pass that the former
 opinion, spread abroad, of their good faith and clearness of dealing,
 made them almost invisible.
 
 There be three degrees of this hiding and veiling of a man's self. The
 first, closeness, reservation, and secrecy; when a man leaveth himself
 without observation, or without hold to be taken, what he is. The
 second, dissimulation, in the negative; when a man lets fall signs and
 arguments, that he is not, that he is. And the third, simulation, in the
 affirmative; when a man industriously and expressly feigns and pretends
 to be, that he is not.
 
 For the first of these, secrecy; it is indeed the virtue of a confessor.
 And assuredly, the secret man heareth many confessions. For who will
 open himself, to a blab or a babbler? But if a man be thought secret, it
 inviteth discovery; as the more close air sucketh in the more open; and
 as in confession, the revealing is not for worldly use, but for the ease
 of a man's heart, so secret men come to the knowledge of many things
 in that kind; while men rather discharge their minds, than impart their
 minds. In few words, mysteries are due to secrecy. Besides (to say
 truth) nakedness is uncomely, as well in mind as body; and it addeth no
 small reverence, to men's manners and actions, if they be not altogether
 open. As for talkers and futile persons, they are commonly vain and
 credulous withal. For he that talketh what he knoweth, will also talk
 what he knoweth not. Therefore set it down, that an habit of secrecy, is
 both politic and moral. And in this part, it is good that a man's face
 give his tongue leave to speak. For the discovery of a man' s self, by
 the tracts of his countenance, is a great weakness and betraying; by how
 much it is many times more marked, and believed, than a man's words.
 
 For the second, which is dissimulation; it followeth many times upon
 secrecy, by a necessity; so that he that will be secret, must be a
 dissembler in some degree. For men are too cunning, to suffer a man to
 keep an indifferent carriage between both, and to be secret, without
 swaying the balance on either side. They will so beset a man with
 questions, and draw him on, and pick it out of him, that, without an
 absurd silence, he must show an inclination one way; or if he do not,
 they will gather as much by his silence, as by his speech. As for
 equivocations, or oraculous speeches, they cannot hold out long. So
 that no man can be secret, except he give himself a little scope of
 dissimulation; which is, as it were, but the skirts or train of secrecy.
 
 But for the third degree, which is simulation, and false profession;
 that I hold more culpable, and less politic; except it be in great and
 rare matters. And therefore a general custom of simulation (which is
 this last degree) is a vice, using either of a natural falseness or
 fearfulness, or of a mind that hath some main faults, which because
 a man must needs disguise, it maketh him practise simulation in other
 things, lest his hand should be out of use.
 
 The great advantages of simulation and dissimulation are three. First,
 to lay asleep opposition, and to surprise. For where a man's intentions
 are published, it is an alarum, to call up all that are against them.
 The second is, to reserve to a man's self a fair retreat. For if a man
 engage himself by a manifest declaration, he must go through or take a
 fall. The third is, the better to discover the mind of another. For to
 him that opens himself, men will hardly show themselves adverse; but
 will fair let him go on, and turn their freedom of speech, to freedom of
 thought. And therefore it is a good shrewd proverb of the Spaniard, Tell
 a lie and find a troth. As if there were no way of discovery, but by
 simulation. There be also three disadvantages, to set it even. The
 first, that simulation and dissimulation commonly carry with them a show
 of fearfulness, which in any business, doth spoil the feathers, of round
 flying up to the mark. The second, that it puzzleth and perplexeth the
 conceits of many, that perhaps would otherwise co-operate with him; and
 makes a man walk almost alone, to his own ends. The third and greatest
 is, that it depriveth a man of one of the most principal instruments for
 action; which is trust and belief. The best composition and temperature,
 is to have openness in fame and opinion; secrecy in habit; dissimulation
 in seasonable use; and a power to feign, if there be no remedy.
 
 
 
 
 Of Parents And Children
 
 
 THE joys of parents are secret; and so are their griefs and fears.
 They cannot utter the one; nor they will not utter the other. Children
 sweeten labors; but they make misfortunes more bitter. They increase
 the cares of life; but they mitigate the remembrance of death. The
 perpetuity by generation is common to beasts; but memory, merit, and
 noble works, are proper to men. And surely a man shall see the noblest
 works and foundations have proceeded from childless men; which have
 sought to express the images of their minds, where those of their bodies
 have failed. So the care of posterity is most in them, that have no
 posterity. They that are the first raisers of their houses, are most
 indulgent towards their children; beholding them as the continuance,
 not only of their kind, but of their work; and so both children and
 creatures.
 
 The difference in affection, of parents towards their several children,
 is many times unequal; and sometimes unworthy; especially in the
 mothers; as Solomon saith, A wise son rejoiceth the father, but an
 ungracious son shames the mother. A man shall see, where there is a
 house full of children, one or two of the eldest respected, and the
 youngest made wantons; but in the midst, some that are as it
 were forgotten, who many times, nevertheless, prove the best. The
 illiberality of parents, in allowance towards their children, is an
 harmful error; makes them base; acquaints them with shifts; makes them
 sort with mean company; and makes them surfeit more when they come to
 plenty. And therefore the proof is best, when men keep their authority
 towards the children, but not their purse. Men have a foolish manner
 (both parents and schoolmasters and servants) in creating and breeding
 an emulation between brothers, during childhood, which many times
 sorteth to discord when they are men, and disturbeth families. The
 Italians make little difference between children, and nephews or near
 kinsfolks; but so they be of the lump, they care not though they pass
 not through their own body. And, to say truth, in nature it is much
 a like matter; insomuch that we see a nephew sometimes resembleth an
 uncle, or a kinsman, more than his own parent; as the blood happens.
 Let parents choose betimes, the vocations and courses they mean their
 children should take; for then they are most flexible; and let them
 not too much apply themselves to the disposition of their children, as
 thinking they will take best to that, which they have most mind to.
 It is true, that if the affection or aptness of the children be
 extraordinary, then it is good not to cross it; but generally the
 precept is good, optimum elige, suave et facile illud faciet consuetudo.
 Younger brothers are commonly fortunate, but seldom or never where the
 elder are disinherited.
 
 
 
 
 Of Marriage And Single Life
 
 
 HE THAT hath wife and children hath given hostages to fortune; for they
 are impediments to great enterprises, either of virtue or mischief.
 Certainly the best works, and of greatest merit for the public, have
 proceeded from the unmarried or childless men; which both in affection
 and means, have married and endowed the public. Yet it were great reason
 that those that have children, should have greatest care of future
 times; unto which they know they must transmit their dearest pledges.
 Some there are, who though they lead a single life, yet their thoughts
 do end with themselves, and account future times impertinences. Nay,
 there are some other, that account wife and children, but as bills of
 charges. Nay more, there are some foolish rich covetous men, that take
 a pride, in having no children, because they may be thought so much the
 richer. For perhaps they have heard some talk, Such an one is a great
 rich man, and another except to it, Yea, but he hath a great charge
 of children; as if it were an abatement to his riches. But the most
 ordinary cause of a single life, is liberty, especially in certain
 self-pleasing and humorous minds, which are so sensible of every
 restraint, as they will go near to think their girdles and garters, to
 be bonds and shackles. Unmarried men are best friends, best masters,
 best servants; but not always best subjects; for they are light to run
 away; and almost all fugitives, are of that condition. A single life
 doth well with churchmen; for charity will hardly water the ground,
 where it must first fill a pool. It is indifferent for judges and
 magistrates; for if they be facile and corrupt, you shall have a
 servant, five times worse than a wife. For soldiers, I find the generals
 commonly in their hortatives, put men in mind of their wives and
 children; and I think the despising of marriage amongst the Turks,
 maketh the vulgar soldier more base. Certainly wife and children are a
 kind of discipline of humanity; and single men, though they may be many
 times more charitable, because their means are less exhaust, yet, on
 the other side, they are more cruel and hardhearted (good to make severe
 inquisitors), because their tenderness is not so oft called upon. Grave
 natures, led by custom, and therefore constant, are commonly loving
 husbands, as was said of Ulysses, vetulam suam praetulit immortalitati.
 Chaste women are often proud and froward, as presuming upon the merit
 of their chastity. It is one of the best bonds, both of chastity and
 obedience, in the wife, if she think her husband wise; which she will
 never do, if she find him jealous. Wives are young men's mistresses;
 companions for middle age; and old men's nurses. So as a man may have a
 quarrel to marry, when he will. But yet he was reputed one of the wise
 men, that made answer to the question, when a man should marry,--A
 young man not yet, an elder man not at all. It is often seen that bad
 husbands, have very good wives; whether it be, that it raiseth the price
 of their husband's kindness, when it comes; or that the wives take a
 pride in their patience. But this never fails, if the bad husbands were
 of their own choosing, against their friends' consent; for then they
 will be sure to make good their own folly.
 
 
 
 
 Of Envy
 
 
 THERE be none of the affections, which have been noted to fascinate or
 bewitch, but love and envy. They both have vehement wishes; they frame
 themselves readily into imaginations and suggestions; and they come
 easily into the eye, especially upon the present of the objects; which
 are the points that conduce to fascination, if any such thing there
 be. We see likewise, the Scripture calleth envy an evil eye; and the
 astrologers, call the evil influences of the stars, evil aspects; so
 that still there seemeth to be acknowledged, in the act of envy, an
 ejaculation or irradiation of the eye. Nay, some have been so curious,
 as to note, that the times when the stroke or percussion of an envious
 eye doth most hurt, are when the party envied is beheld in glory or
 triumph; for that sets an edge upon envy: and besides, at such times the
 spirits of the person envied, do come forth most into the outward parts,
 and so meet the blow.
 
 But leaving these curiosities (though not unworthy to be thought on, in
 fit place), we will handle, what persons are apt to envy others; what
 persons are most subject to be envied themselves; and what is the
 difference between public and private envy.
 
 A man that hath no virtue in himself, ever envieth virtue in others. For
 men's minds, will either feed upon their own good, or upon others' evil;
 and who wanteth the one, will prey upon the other; and whoso is out of
 hope, to attain to another's virtue, will seek to come at even hand, by
 depressing another's fortune.
 
 A man that is busy, and inquisitive, is commonly envious. For to know
 much of other men's matters, cannot be because all that ado may concern
 his own estate; therefore it must needs be, that he taketh a kind of
 play-pleasure, in looking upon the fortunes of others. Neither can he,
 that mindeth but his own business, find much matter for envy. For envy
 is a gadding passion, and walketh the streets, and doth not keep home:
 Non est curiosus, quin idem sit malevolus.
 
 Men of noble birth, are noted to be envious towards new men, when they
 rise. For the distance is altered, and it is like a deceit of the eye,
 that when others come on, they think themselves, go back.
 
 Deformed persons, and eunuchs, and old men, and bastards, are envious.
 For he that cannot possibly mend his own case, will do what he can,
 to impair another's; except these defects light upon a very brave, and
 heroical nature, which thinketh to make his natural wants part of his
 honor; in that it should be said, that an eunuch, or a lame man, did
 such great matters; affecting the honor of a miracle; as it was in
 Narses the eunuch, and Agesilaus and Tamberlanes, that were lame men.
 
 The same is the case of men, that rise after calamities and misfortunes.
 For they are as men fallen out with the times; and think other men's
 harms, a redemption of their own sufferings.
 
 They that desire to excel in too many matters, out of levity and vain
 glory, are ever envious. For they cannot want work; it being impossible,
 but many, in some one of those things, should surpass them. Which was
 the character of Adrian the Emperor; that mortally envied poets, and
 painters, and artificers, in works wherein he had a vein to excel.
 
 Lastly, near kinsfolks, and fellows in office, and those that have been
 bred together, are more apt to envy their equals, when they are raised.
 For it doth upbraid unto them their own fortunes, and pointeth at them,
 and cometh oftener into their remembrance, and incurreth likewise more
 into the note of others; and envy ever redoubleth from speech and fame.
 Cain's envy was the more vile and malignant, towards his brother Abel,
 because when his sacrifice was better accepted, there was no body to
 look on. Thus much for those, that are apt to envy.
 
 Concerning those that are more or less subject to envy: First, persons
 of eminent virtue, when they are advanced, are less envied. For their
 fortune seemeth, but due unto them; and no man envieth the payment of a
 debt, but rewards and liberality rather. Again, envy is ever joined
 with the comparing of a man's self; and where there is no comparison, no
 envy; and therefore kings are not envied, but by kings. Nevertheless it
 is to be noted, that unworthy persons are most envied, at their first
 coming in, and afterwards overcome it better; whereas contrariwise,
 persons of worth and merit are most envied, when their fortune
 continueth long. For by that time, though their virtue be the same, yet
 it hath not the same lustre; for fresh men grow up that darken it.
 
 Persons of noble blood, are less envied in their rising. For it seemeth
 but right done to their birth. Besides, there seemeth not much added
 to their fortune; and envy is as the sunbeams, that beat hotter upon a
 bank, or steep rising ground, than upon a flat. And for the same reason,
 those that are advanced by degrees, are less envied than those that are
 advanced suddenly and per saltum.
 
 Those that have joined with their honor great travels, cares, or perils,
 are less subject to envy. For men think that they earn their honors
 hardly, and pity them sometimes; and pity ever healeth envy. Wherefore
 you shall observe, that the more deep and sober sort of politic persons,
 in their greatness, are ever bemoaning themselves, what a life they
 lead; chanting a quanta patimur! Not that they feel it so, but only to
 abate the edge of envy. But this is to be understood, of business
 that is laid upon men, and not such, as they call unto themselves.
 For nothing increaseth envy more, than an unnecessary and ambitious
 engrossing of business. And nothing doth extinguish envy more, than for
 a great person to preserve all other inferior officers, in their full
 lights and pre-eminences of their places. For by that means, there be so
 many screens between him and envy.
 
 Above all, those are most subject to envy, which carry the greatness of
 their fortunes, in an insolent and proud manner; being never well, but
 while they are showing how great they are, either by outward pomp, or
 by triumphing over all opposition or competition; whereas wise men
 will rather do sacrifice to envy, in suffering themselves sometimes of
 purpose to be crossed, and overborne in things that do not much concern
 them. Notwithstanding, so much is true, that the carriage of greatness,
 in a plain and open manner (so it be without arrogancy and vain glory)
 doth draw less envy, than if it be in a more crafty and cunning fashion.
 For in that course, a man doth but disavow fortune; and seemeth to be
 conscious of his own want in worth; and doth but teach others, to envy
 him.
 
 Lastly, to conclude this part; as we said in the beginning, that the act
 of envy had somewhat in it of witchcraft, so there is no other cure of
 envy, but the cure of witchcraft; and that is, to remove the lot (as
 they call it) and to lay it upon another. For which purpose, the wiser
 sort of great persons, bring in ever upon the stage somebody upon whom
 to derive the envy, that would come upon themselves; sometimes upon
 ministers and servants; sometimes upon colleagues and associates; and
 the like; and for that turn there are never wanting, some persons
 of violent and undertaking natures, who, so they may have power and
 business, will take it at any cost.
 
 Now, to speak of public envy. There is yet some good in public envy,
 whereas in private, there is none. For public envy, is as an ostracism,
 that eclipseth men, when they grow too great. And therefore it is a
 bridle also to great ones, to keep them within bounds.
 
 This envy, being in the Latin word invidia, goeth in the modern
 language, by the name of discontentment; of which we shall speak, in
 handling sedition. It is a disease, in a state, like to infection. For
 as infection spreadeth upon that which is sound, and tainteth it;
 so when envy is gotten once into a state, it traduceth even the best
 actions thereof, and turneth them into an ill odor. And therefore there
 is little won, by intermingling of plausible actions. For that doth
 argue but a weakness, and fear of envy, which hurteth so much the more,
 as it is likewise usual in infections; which if you fear them, you call
 them upon you.
 
 This public envy, seemeth to beat chiefly upon principal officers or
 ministers, rather than upon kings, and estates themselves. But this is
 a sure rule, that if the envy upon the minister be great, when the cause
 of it in him is small; or if the envy be general, in a manner upon all
 the ministers of an estate; then the envy (though hidden) is truly upon
 the state itself. And so much of public envy or discontentment, and the
 difference thereof from private envy, which was handled in the first
 place.
 
 We will add this in general, touching the affection of envy; that of all
 other affections, it is the most importune and continual. For of other
 affections, there is occasion given, but now and then; and therefore it
 was well said, Invidia festos dies non agit: for it is ever working upon
 some or other. And it is also noted, that love and envy do make a man
 pine, which other affections do not, because they are not so continual.
 It is also the vilest affection, and the most depraved; for which cause
 it is the proper attribute of the devil, who is called, the envious man,
 that soweth tares amongst the wheat by night; as it always cometh to
 pass, that envy worketh subtilly, and in the dark, and to the prejudice
 of good things, such as is the wheat.
 
 
 
 
 Of Love
 
 
 THE stage is more beholding to love, than the life of man. For as to the
 stage, love is ever matter of comedies, and now and then of tragedies;
 but in life it doth much mischief; sometimes like a siren, sometimes
 like a fury. You may observe, that amongst all the great and worthy
 persons (whereof the memory remaineth, either ancient or recent) there
 is not one, that hath been transported to the mad degree of love: which
 shows that great spirits, and great business, do keep out this weak
 passion. You must except, nevertheless, Marcus Antonius, the half
 partner of the empire of Rome, and Appius Claudius, the decemvir
 and lawgiver; whereof the former was indeed a voluptuous man, and
 inordinate; but the latter was an austere and wise man: and therefore it
 seems (though rarely) that love can find entrance, not only into an open
 heart, but also into a heart well fortified, if watch be not well kept.
 It is a poor saying of Epicurus, Satis magnum alter alteri theatrum
 sumus; as if man, made for the contemplation of heaven, and all noble
 objects, should do nothing but kneel before a little idol, and make
 himself a subject, though not of the mouth (as beasts are), yet of the
 eye; which was given him for higher purposes. It is a strange thing, to
 note the excess of this passion, and how it braves the nature, and
 value of things, by this; that the speaking in a perpetual hyperbole, is
 comely in nothing but in love. Neither is it merely in the phrase; for
 whereas it hath been well said, that the arch-flatterer, with whom all
 the petty flatterers have intelligence, is a man's self; certainly the
 lover is more. For there was never proud man thought so absurdly well
 of himself, as the lover doth of the person loved; and therefore it was
 well said, That it is impossible to love, and to be wise. Neither doth
 this weakness appear to others only, and not to the party loved; but to
 the loved most of all, except the love be reciproque. For it is a true
 rule, that love is ever rewarded, either with the reciproque, or with an
 inward and secret contempt. By how much the more, men ought to beware of
 this passion, which loseth not only other things, but itself! As for the
 other losses, the poet's relation doth well figure them: that he that
 preferred Helena, quitted the gifts of Juno and Pallas. For whosoever
 esteemeth too much of amorous affection, quitteth both riches and
 wisdom. This passion hath his floods, in very times of weakness; which
 are great prosperity, and great adversity; though this latter hath been
 less observed: both which times kindle love, and make it more fervent,
 and therefore show it to be the child of folly. They do best, who if
 they cannot but admit love, yet make it keep quarters; and sever it
 wholly from their serious affairs, and actions, of life; for if it check
 once with business, it troubleth men's fortunes, and maketh men, that
 they can no ways be true to their own ends. I know not how, but martial
 men are given to love: I think, it is but as they are given to wine; for
 perils commonly ask to be paid in pleasures. There is in man's nature,
 a secret inclination and motion, towards love of others, which if it be
 not spent upon some one or a few, doth naturally spread itself towards
 many, and maketh men become humane and charitable; as it is seen
 sometime in friars. Nuptial love maketh mankind; friendly love
 perfecteth it; but wanton love corrupteth, and embaseth it.
 
 
 
 
 Of Great Place
 
 
 MEN in great place are thrice servants: servants of the sovereign or
 state; servants of fame; and servants of business. So as they have no
 freedom; neither in their persons, nor in their actions, nor in their
 times. It is a strange desire, to seek power and to lose liberty: or to
 seek power over others, and to lose power over a man's self. The rising
 unto place is laborious; and by pains, men come to greater pains; and
 it is sometimes base; and by indignities, men come to dignities. The
 standing is slippery, and the regress is either a downfall, or at least
 an eclipse, which is a melancholy thing. Cum non sis qui fueris, non
 esse cur velis vivere. Nay, retire men cannot when they would, neither
 will they, when it were reason; but are impatient of privateness, even
 in age and sickness, which require the shadow; like old townsmen, that
 will be still sitting at their street door, though thereby they offer
 age to scom. Certainly great persons had need to borrow other men's
 opinions, to think themselves happy; for if they judge by their own
 feeling, they cannot find it; but if they think with themselves, what
 other men think of them, and that other men would fain be, as they are,
 then they are happy, as it were, by report; when perhaps they find the
 contrary within. For they are the first, that find their own griefs,
 though they be the last, that find their own faults. Certainly men in
 great fortunes are strangers to themselves, and while they are in the
 puzzle of business, they have no time to tend their health, either of
 body or mind. Illi mors gravis incubat, qui notus nimis omnibus, ignotus
 moritur sibi. In place, there is license to do good, and evil; whereof
 the latter is a curse: for in evil, the best condition is not to win;
 the second, not to can. But power to do good, is the true and lawful
 end of aspiring. For good thoughts (though God accept them) yet, towards
 men, are little better than good dreams, except they be put in act; and
 that cannot be, without power and place, as the vantage, and commanding
 ground. Merit and good works, is the end of man's motion; and conscience
 of the same is the accomplishment of man's rest. For if a man can be
 partaker of God's theatre, he shall likewise be partaker of God's rest.
 Et conversus Deus, ut aspiceret opera quae fecerunt manus suae, vidit
 quod omnia essent bona nimis; and then the sabbath. In the discharge of
 thy place, set before thee the best examples; for imitation is a globe
 of precepts. And after a time, set before thee thine own example; and
 examine thyself strictly, whether thou didst not best at first. Neglect
 not also the examples, of those that have carried themselves ill, in
 the same place; not to set off thyself, by taxing their memory, but to
 direct thyself, what to avoid. Reform therefore, without bravery, or
 scandal of former times and persons; but yet set it down to thyself, as
 well to create good precedents, as to follow them. Reduce things to the
 first institution, and observe wherein, and how, they have degenerate;
 but yet ask counsel of both times; of the ancient time, what is best;
 and of the latter time, what is fittest. Seek to make thy course
 regular, that men may know beforehand, what they may expect; but be
 not too positive and peremptory; and express thyself well, when thou
 digressest from thy rule. Preserve the right of thy place; but stir not
 questions of jurisdiction; and rather assume thy right, in silence and
 de facto, than voice it with claims, and challenges. Preserve likewise
 the rights of inferior places; and think it more honor, to direct in
 chief, than to be busy in all. Embrace and invite helps, and advices,
 touching the execution of thy place; and do not drive away such, as
 bring thee information, as meddlers; but accept of them in good part.
 The vices of authority are chiefly four: delays, corruption, roughness,
 and facility. For delays: give easy access; keep times appointed; go
 through with that which is in hand, and interlace not business, but
 of necessity. For corruption: do not only bind thine own hands, or thy
 servants' hands, from taking, but bind the hands of suitors also, from
 offering. For integrity used doth the one; but integrity professed, and
 with a manifest detestation of bribery, doth the other. And avoid not
 only the fault, but the suspicion. Whosoever is found variable,
 and changeth manifestly without manifest cause, giveth suspicion of
 corruption. Therefore always, when thou changest thine opinion or
 course, profess it plainly, and declare it, together with the reasons
 that move thee to change; and do not think to steal it. A servant or
 a favorite, if he be inward, and no other apparent cause of esteem, is
 commonly thought, but a by-way to close corruption. For roughness: it
 is a needless cause of discontent: severity breedeth fear, but roughness
 breedeth hate. Even reproofs from authority, ought to be grave, and not
 taunting. As for facility: it is worse than bribery. For bribes come but
 now and then; but if importunity, or idle respects, lead a man, he shall
 never be without. As Solomon saith, To respect persons is not good; for
 such a man will transgress for a piece of bread. It is most true, that
 was anciently spoken, A place showeth the man. And it showeth some to
 the better, and some to the worse. Omnium consensu capax imperii, nisi
 imperasset, saith Tacitus of Galba; but of Vespasian he saith, Solus
 imperantium, Vespasianus mutatus in melius; though the one was meant of
 sufficiency, the other of manners, and affection. It is an assured sign
 of a worthy and generous spirit, whom honor amends. For honor is, or
 should be, the place of virtue; and as in nature, things move violently
 to their place, and calmly in their place, so virtue in ambition is
 violent, in authority settled and calm. All rising to great place is
 by a winding star; and if there be factions, it is good to side a man's
 self, whilst he is in the rising, and to balance himself when he is
 placed. Use the memory of thy predecessor, fairly and tenderly; for if
 thou dost not, it is a debt will sure be paid when thou art gone. If
 thou have colleagues, respect them, and rather call them, when they
 look not for it, than exclude them, when they have reason to look to
 be called. Be not too sensible, or too remembering, of thy place in
 conversation, and private answers to suitors; but let it rather be said,
 When he sits in place, he is another man.
 
 
 
 
 Of Boldness
 
 
 IT IS a trivial grammar-school text, but yet worthy a wise man's
 consideration. Question was asked of Demosthenes, what was the chief
 part of an orator? he answered, action; what next? action; what next
 again? action. He said it, that knew it best, and had, by nature,
 himself no advantage in that he commended. A strange thing, that that
 part of an orator, which is but superficial, and rather the virtue of
 a player, should be placed so high, above those other noble parts, of
 invention, elocution, and the rest; nay, almost alone, as if it were
 all in all. But the reason is plain. There is in human nature generally,
 more of the fool than of the wise; and therefore those faculties,
 by which the foolish part of men's minds is taken, are most potent.
 Wonderful like is the case of boldness in civil business: what first?
 boldness; what second and third? boldness. And yet boldness is a child
 of ignorance and baseness, far inferior to other parts. But nevertheless
 it doth fascinate, and bind hand and foot, those that are either shallow
 in judgment, or weak in courage, which are the greatest part; yea and
 prevaileth with wise men at weak times. Therefore we see it hath done
 wonders, in popular states; but with senates, and princes less; and
 more ever upon the first entrance of bold persons into action, than soon
 after; for boldness is an ill keeper of promise. Surely, as there are
 mountebanks for the natural body, so are there mountebanks for the
 politic body; men that undertake great cures, and perhaps have been
 lucky, in two or three experiments, but want the grounds of science, and
 therefore cannot hold out. Nay, you shall see a bold fellow many times
 do Mahomet's miracle. Mahomet made the people believe that he would call
 an hill to him, and from the top of it offer up his prayers, for the
 observers of his law. The people assembled; Mahomet called the hill
 to come to him, again and again; and when the hill stood still, he was
 never a whit abashed, but said, If the hill will not come to Mahomet,
 Mahomet will go to the hill. So these men, when they have promised great
 matters, and failed most shamefully, yet (if they have the perfection
 of boldness) they will but slight it over, and make a turn, and no more
 ado. Certainly to men of great judgment, bold persons are a sport
 to behold; nay, and to the vulgar also, boldness has somewhat of the
 ridiculous. For if absurdity be the subject of laughter, doubt you not
 but great boldness is seldom without some absurdity. Especially it is
 a sport to see, when a bold fellow is out of countenance; for that puts
 his face into a most shrunken, and wooden posture; as needs it must; for
 in bashfulness, the spirits do a little go and come; but with bold men,
 upon like occasion, they stand at a stay; like a stale at chess, where
 it is no mate, but yet the game cannot stir. But this last were fitter
 for a satire than for a serious observation. This is well to be
 weighed; that boldness is ever blind; for it seeth not danger, and
 inconveniences. Therefore it is ill in counsel, good in execution; so
 that the right use of bold persons is, that they never command in chief,
 but be seconds, and under the direction of others. For in counsel, it is
 good to see dangers; and in execution, not to see them, except they be
 very great.
 
 
 
 
 Of Goodness and Goodness Of Nature
 
 
 I TAKE goodness in this sense, the affecting of the weal of men, which
 is that the Grecians call philanthropia; and the word humanity (as it
 is used) is a little too light to express it. Goodness I call the
 habit, and goodness of nature, the inclination. This of all virtues,
 and dignities of the mind, is the greatest; being the character of the
 Deity: and without it, man is a busy, mischievous, wretched thing;
 no better than a kind of vermin. Goodness answers to the theological
 virtue, charity, and admits no excess, but error. The desire of power
 in excess, caused the angels to fall; the desire of knowledge in excess,
 caused man to fall: but in charity there is no excess; neither can
 angel, nor man, come in danger by it. The inclination to goodness, is
 imprinted deeply in the nature of man; insomuch, that if it issue not
 towards men, it will take unto other living creatures; as it is seen in
 the Turks, a cruel people, who nevertheless are kind to beasts, and give
 alms, to dogs and birds; insomuch, as Busbechius reporteth, a Christian
 boy, in Constantinople, had like to have been stoned, for gagging in
 a waggishness a long-billed fowl. Errors indeed in this virtue of
 goodness, or charity, may be committed. The Italians have an ungracious
 proverb, Tanto buon che val niente: so good, that he is good for
 nothing. And one of the doctors of Italy, Nicholas Machiavel, had the
 confidence to put in writing, almost in plain terms, That the Christian
 faith, had given up good men, in prey to those that are tyrannical and
 unjust. Which he spake, because indeed there was never law, or sect, or
 opinion, did so much magnify goodness, as the Christian religion doth.
 Therefore, to avoid the scandal and the danger both, it is good, to take
 knowledge of the errors of an habit so excellent. Seek the good of other
 men, but be not in bondage to their faces or fancies; for that is but
 facility, or softness; which taketh an honest mind prisoner. Neither
 give thou AEsop's cock a gem, who would be better pleased, and happier,
 if he had had a barley-corn. The example of God, teacheth the lesson
 truly: He sendeth his rain, and maketh his sun to shine, upon the just
 and unjust; but he doth not rain wealth, nor shine honor and virtues,
 upon men equally. Common benefits, are to be communicate with all;
 but peculiar benefits, with choice. And beware how in making the
 portraiture, thou breakest the pattern. For divinity, maketh the love of
 ourselves the pattern; the love of our neighbors, but the portraiture.
 Sell all thou hast, and give it to the poor, and follow me: but, sell
 not all thou hast, except thou come and follow me; that is, except thou
 have a vocation, wherein thou mayest do as much good, with little means
 as with great; for otherwise, in feeding the streams, thou driest the
 fountain. Neither is there only a habit of goodness, directed by right
 reason; but there is in some men, even in nature, a disposition towards
 it; as on the other side, there is a natural malignity. For there be,
 that in their nature do not affect the good of others. The lighter sort
 of malignity, turneth but to a crassness, or frowardness, or aptness to
 oppose, or difficulties, or the like; but the deeper sort, to envy and
 mere mischief. Such men, in other men's calamities, are, as it were, in
 season, and are ever on the loading part: not so good as the dogs, that
 licked Lazarus' sores; but like flies, that are still buzzing upon any
 thing that is raw; misanthropi, that make it their practice, to bring
 men to the bough, and yet never a tree for the purpose in their gardens,
 as Timon had. Such dispositions, are the very errors of human nature;
 and yet they are the fittest timber, to make great politics of; like to
 knee timber, that is good for ships, that are ordained to be tossed; but
 not for building houses, that shall stand firm. The parts and signs of
 goodness, are many. If a man be gracious and courteous to strangers, it
 shows he is a citizen of the world, and that his heart is no island,
 cut off from other lands, but a continent, that joins to them. If he be
 compassionate towards the afflictions of others, it shows that his heart
 is like the noble tree, that is wounded itself, when it gives the balm.
 If he easily pardons, and remits offences, it shows that his mind is
 planted above injuries; so that he cannot be shot. If he be thankful
 for small benefits, it shows that he weighs men's minds, and not their
 trash. But above all, if he have St. Paul's perfection, that he would
 wish to be anathema from Christ, for the salvation of his brethren,
 it shows much of a divine nature, and a kind of conformity with Christ
 himself.
 
 
 
 
 Of Nobility
 
 
 WE WILL speak of nobility, first as a portion of an estate, then as a
 condition of particular persons. A monarchy, where there is no nobility
 at all, is ever a pure and absolute tyranny; as that of the Turks.
 For nobility attempers sovereignty, and draws the eyes of the people,
 somewhat aside from the line royal. But for democracies, they need it
 not; and they are commonly more quiet, and less subject to sedition,
 than where there are stirps of nobles. For men's eyes are upon the
 business, and not upon the persons; or if upon the persons, it is for
 the business' sake, as fittest, and not for flags and pedigree. We see
 the Switzers last well, notwithstanding their diversity of religion,
 and of cantons. For utility is their bond, and not respects. The united
 provinces of the Low Countries, in their government, excel; for where
 there is an equality, the consultations are more indifferent, and the
 payments and tributes, more cheerful. A great and potent nobility,
 addeth majesty to a monarch, but diminisheth power; and putteth life
 and spirit into the people, but presseth their fortune. It is well,
 when nobles are not too great for sovereignty nor for justice; and yet
 maintained in that height, as the insolency of inferiors may be broken
 upon them, before it come on too fast upon the majesty of kings. A
 numerous nobility causeth poverty, and inconvenience in a state; for it
 is a surcharge of expense; and besides, it being of necessity, that many
 of the nobility fall, in time, to be weak in fortune, it maketh a kind
 of disproportion, between honor and means.
 
 As for nobility in particular persons; it is a reverend thing, to see an
 ancient castle or building, not in decay; or to see a fair timber tree,
 sound and perfect. How much more, to behold an ancient noble family,
 which has stood against the waves and weathers of time! For new nobility
 is but the act of power, but ancient nobility is the act of time. Those
 that are first raised to nobility, are commonly more virtuous, but less
 innocent, than their descendants; for there is rarely any rising, but
 by a commixture of good and evil arts. But it is reason, the memory
 of their virtues remain to their posterity, and their faults die with
 themselves. Nobility of birth commonly abateth industry; and he that is
 not industrious, envieth him that is. Besides, noble persons cannot
 go much higher; and he that standeth at a stay, when others rise, can
 hardly avoid motions of envy. On the other side, nobility extinguisheth
 the passive envy from others, towards them; because they are in
 possession of honor. Certainly, kings that have able men of their
 nobility, shall find ease in employing them, and a better slide into
 their business; for people naturally bend to them, as born in some sort
 to command.
 
 
 
 
 Of Seditions And Troubles
 
 
 SHEPHERDS of people, had need know the calendars of tempests in state;
 which are commonly greatest, when things grow to equality; as natural
 tempests are greatest about the Equinoctia. And as there are certain
 hollow blasts of wind, and secret swellings of seas before a tempest, so
 are there in states:
 
 
      --Ille etiam caecos instare tumultus
      Saepe monet, fraudesque et operta tunescere bella.
 
 
 Libels and licentious discourses against the state, when they are
 frequent and open; and in like sort, false news often running up and
 down, to the disadvantage of the state, and hastily embraced; are
 amongst the signs of troubles. Virgil, giving the pedigree of Fame,
 saith, she was sister to the Giants:
 
 
 Illam Terra parens, irra irritata deorum, Extremam (ut perhibent) Coeo
 Enceladoque sororem Progenuit.
 
 As if fames were the relics of seditions past; but they are no less,
 indeed, the preludes of seditions to come. Howsoever he noteth it right,
 that seditious tumults, and seditious fames, differ no more but as
 brother and sister, masculine and feminine; especially if it come to
 that, that the best actions of a state, and the most plausible, and
 which ought to give greatest contentment, are taken in ill sense, and
 traduced: for that shows the envy great, as Tacitus saith; conflata
 magna invidia, seu bene seu male gesta premunt. Neither doth it follow,
 that because these fames are a sign of troubles, that the suppressing
 of them with too much severity, should be a remedy of troubles. For the
 despising of them, many times checks them best; and the going about
 to stop them, doth but make a wonder long-lived. Also that kind of
 obedience, which Tacitus speaketh of, is to be held suspected: Erant
 in officio, sed tamen qui mallent mandata imperantium interpretari quam
 exequi; disputing, excusing, cavilling upon mandates and directions, is
 a kind of shaking off the yoke, and assay of disobedience; especially if
 in those disputings, they which are for the direction, speak fearfully
 and tenderly, and those that are against it, audaciously.
 
 Also, as Machiavel noteth well, when princes, that ought to be common
 parents, make themselves as a party, and lean to a side, it is as a
 boat, that is overthrown by uneven weight on the one side; as was well
 seen, in the time of Henry the Third of France; for first, himself
 entered league for the extirpation of the Protestants; and presently
 after, the same league was turned upon himself. For when the authority
 of princes, is made but an accessory to a cause, and that there be other
 bands, that tie faster than the band of sovereignty, kings begin to be
 put almost out of possession.
 
 Also, when discords, and quarrels, and factions are carried openly and
 audaciously, it is a sign the reverence of government is lost. For the
 motions of the greatest persons in a government, ought to be as the
 motions of the planets under primum mobile; according to the old
 opinion: which is, that every of them, is carried swiftly by the highest
 motion, and softly in their own motion. And therefore, when great
 ones in their own particular motion, move violently, and, as Tacitus
 expresseth it well, liberius quam ut imperantium meminissent; it is a
 sign the orbs are out of frame. For reverence is that, wherewith princes
 are girt from God; who threateneth the dissolving thereof; Solvam
 cingula regum.
 
 So when any of the four pillars of government, are mainly shaken, or
 weakened (which are religion, justice, counsel, and treasure), men
 had need to pray for fair weather. But let us pass from this part of
 predictions (concerning which, nevertheless, more light may be taken
 from that which followeth); and let us speak first, of the materials of
 seditions; then of the motives of them; and thirdly of the remedies.
 
 Concerning the materials of seditions. It is a thing well to be
 considered; for the surest way to prevent seditions (if the times
 do bear it) is to take away the matter of them. For if there be fuel
 prepared, it is hard to tell, whence the spark shall come, that shall
 set it on fire. The matter of seditions is of two kinds: much poverty,
 and much discontentment. It is certain, so many overthrown estates, so
 many votes for troubles. Lucan noteth well the state of Rome before the
 Civil War,
 
 
      Hinc usura vorax, rapidumque in tempore foenus,
      Hinc concussa fides, et multis utile bellum.
 
 
 This same multis utile bellum, is an assured and infallible sign, of a
 state disposed to seditions and troubles. And if this poverty and broken
 estate in the better sort, be joined with a want and necessity in the
 mean people, the danger is imminent and great. For the rebellions of the
 belly are the worst. As for discontentments, they are, in the politic
 body, like to humors in the natural, which are apt to gather a
 preternatural heat, and to inflame. And let no prince measure the
 danger of them by this, whether they be just or unjust: for that were
 to imagine people, to be too reasonable; who do often spurn at their
 own good: nor yet by this, whether the griefs whereupon they rise, be
 in fact great or small: for they are the most dangerous discontentments,
 where the fear is greater than the feeling. Dolendi modus, timendi non
 item. Besides, in great oppressions, the same things that provoke the
 patience, do withal mate the courage; but in fears it is not so. Neither
 let any prince, or state, be secure concerning discontentments, because
 they have been often, or have been long, and yet no peril hath ensued:
 for as it is true, that every vapor or fume doth not turn into a storm;
 so it is nevertheless true, that storms, though they blow over divers
 times, yet may fall at last; and, as the Spanish proverb noteth well,
 The cord breaketh at the last by the weakest pull.
 
 The causes and motives of seditions are, innovation in religion;
 taxes; alteration of laws and customs; breaking of privileges; general
 oppression; advancement of unworthy persons; strangers; dearths;
 disbanded soldiers; factions grown desperate; and what soever, in
 offending people, joineth and knitteth them in a common cause.
 
 For the remedies; there may be some general preservatives, whereof
 we will speak: as for the just cure, it must answer to the particular
 disease; and so be left to counsel, rather than rule.
 
 The first remedy or prevention is to remove, by all means possible, that
 material cause of sedition whereof we spake; which is, want and poverty
 in the estate. To which purpose serveth the opening, and well-balancing
 of trade; the cherishing of manufactures; the banishing of idleness; the
 repressing of waste, and excess, by sumptuary laws; the improvement and
 husbanding of the soil; the regulating of prices of things vendible; the
 moderating of taxes and tributes; and the like. Generally, it is to be
 foreseen that the population of a kingdom (especially if it be not
 mown down by wars) do not exceed the stock of the kingdom, which should
 maintain them. Neither is the population to be reckoned only by number;
 for a smaller number, that spend more and earn less, do wear out an
 estate sooner, than a greater number that live lower, and gather more.
 Therefore the multiplying of nobility, and other degrees of quality, in
 an over proportion to the common people, doth speedily bring a state
 to necessity; and so doth likewise an overgrown clergy; for they bring
 nothing to the stock; and in like manner, when more are bred scholars,
 than preferments can take off.
 
 It is likewise to be remembered, that forasmuch as the increase of any
 estate must be upon the foreigner (for whatsoever is somewhere gotten,
 is somewhere lost), there be but three things, which one nation selleth
 unto another; the commodity as nature yieldeth it; the manufacture; and
 the vecture, or carriage. So that if these three wheels go, wealth
 will flow as in a spring tide. And it cometh many times to pass, that
 materiam superabit opus; that the work and carriage is more worth than
 the material, and enricheth a state more; as is notably seen in the
 Low-Countrymen, who have the best mines above ground, in the world.
 
 Above all things, good policy is to be used, that the treasure and
 moneys, in a state, be not gathered into few hands. For otherwise a
 state may have a great stock, and yet starve. And money is like muck,
 not good except it be spread. This is done, chiefly by suppressing,
 or at least keeping a strait hand, upon the devouring trades of usury,
 ingrossing great pasturages, and the like.
 
 For removing discontentments, or at least the danger of them; there is
 in every state (as we know) two portions of subjects; the noblesse
 and the commonalty. When one of these is discontent, the danger is not
 great; for common people are of slow motion, if they be not excited by
 the greater sort; and the greater sort are of small strength, except the
 multitude be apt, and ready to move of themselves. Then is the danger,
 when the greater sort, do but wait for the troubling of the waters
 amongst the meaner, that then they may declare themselves. The poets
 feign, that the rest of the gods would have bound Jupiter; which he
 hearing of, by the counsel of Pallas, sent for Briareus, with his
 hundred hands, to come in to his aid. An emblem, no doubt, to show how
 safe it is for monarchs, to make sure of the good will of common people.
 To give moderate liberty for griefs and discontentments to evaporate
 (so it be without too great insolency or bravery), is a safe way. For
 he that turneth the humors back, and maketh the wound bleed inwards,
 endangereth malign ulcers, and pernicious imposthumations.
 
 The part of Epimetheus mought well become Prometheus, in the case of
 discontentments: for there is not a better provision against them.
 Epimetheus, when griefs and evils flew abroad, at last shut the lid,
 and kept hope in the bottom of the vessel. Certainly, the politic and
 artificial nourishing, and entertaining of hopes, and carrying men
 from hopes to hopes, is one of the best antidotes against the poison
 of discontentments. And it is a certain sign of a wise government and
 proceeding, when it can hold men's hearts by hopes, when it cannot by
 satisfaction; and when it can handle things, in such manner, as no evil
 shall appear so peremptory, but that it hath some outlet of hope; which
 is the less hard to do, because both particular persons and factions,
 are apt enough to flatter themselves, or at least to brave that, which
 they believe not.
 
 Also the foresight and prevention, that there be no likely or fit head,
 whereunto discontented persons may resort, and under whom they may join,
 is a known, but an excellent point of caution. I understand a fit head,
 to be one that hath greatness and reputation; that hath confidence with
 the discontented party, and upon whom they turn their eyes; and that is
 thought discontented, in his own particular: which kind of persons, are
 either to be won, and reconciled to the state, and that in a fast and
 true manner; or to be fronted with some other, of the same party, that
 may oppose them, and so divide the reputation. Generally, the dividing
 and breaking, of all factions and combinations that are adverse to
 the state, and setting them at distance, or at least distrust, amongst
 themselves, is not one of the worst remedies. For it is a desperate
 case, if those that hold with the proceeding of the state, be full
 of discord and faction, and those that are against it, be entire and
 united.
 
 I have noted, that some witty and sharp speeches, which have fallen from
 princes, have given fire to seditions. Caesar did himself infinite hurt
 in that speech, Sylla nescivit literas, non potuit dictare; for it did
 utterly cut off that hope, which men had entertained, that he would at
 one time or other give over his dictatorship. Galba undid himself by
 that speech, legi a se militem, non emi; for it put the soldiers out of
 hope of the donative. Probus likewise, by that speech, Si vixero, non
 opus erit amplius Romano imperio militibus; a speech of great despair
 for the soldiers. And many the like. Surely princes had need, in tender
 matters and ticklish times, to beware what they say; especially in these
 short speeches, which fly abroad like darts, and are thought to be shot
 out of their secret intentions. For as for large discourses, they are
 flat things, and not so much noted.
 
 
 Lastly, let princes, against all events, not be without some great
 person, one or rather more, of military valor, near unto them, for the
 repressing of seditions in their beginnings. For without that, there
 useth to be more trepidation in court upon the first breaking out of
 troubles, than were fit. And the state runneth the danger of that which
 Tacitus saith; Atque is habitus animorum fuit, ut pessimum facinus
 auderent pauci, plures vellent, omnes paterentur. But let such military
 persons be assured, and well reputed of, rather than factious and
 popular; holding also good correspondence with the other great men in
 the state; or else the remedy, is worse than the disease.
 
 
 
 
 Of Atheism
 
 
 I HAD rather believe all the fables in the Legend, and the Talmud,
 and the Alcoran, than that this universal frame is without a mind. And
 therefore, God never wrought miracle, to convince atheism, because
 his ordinary works convince it. It is true, that a little philosophy
 inclineth man's mind to atheism; but depth in philosophy bringeth men's
 minds about to religion. For while the mind of man looketh upon second
 causes scattered, it may sometimes rest in them, and go no further; but
 when it beholdeth the chain of them, confederate and linked together, it
 must needs fly to Providence and Deity. Nay, even that school which is
 most accused of atheism doth most demonstrate religion; that is, the
 school of Leucippus and Democritus and Epicurus. For it is a thousand
 times more credible, that four mutable elements, and one immutable fifth
 essence, duly and eternally placed, need no God, than that an army of
 infinite small portions, or seeds unplaced, should have produced this
 order and beauty, without a divine marshal. The Scripture saith, The
 fool hath said in his heart, there is no God; it is not said, The fool
 hath thought in his heart; so as he rather saith it, by rote to himself,
 as that he would have, than that he can thoroughly believe it, or be
 persuaded of it. For none deny, there is a God, but those, for whom
 it maketh that there were no God. It appeareth in nothing more, that
 atheism is rather in the lip, than in the heart of man, than by this;
 that atheists will ever be talking of that their opinion, as if they
 fainted in it, within themselves, and would be glad to be strengthened,
 by the consent of others. Nay more, you shall have atheists strive to
 get disciples, as it fareth with other sects. And, which is most of all,
 you shall have of them, that will suffer for atheism, and not recant;
 whereas if they did truly think, that there were no such thing as God,
 why should they trouble themselves? Epicurus is charged, that he did
 but dissemble for his credit's sake, when he affirmed there were blessed
 natures, but such as enjoyed themselves, without having respect to the
 government of the world. Wherein they say he did temporize; though in
 secret, he thought there was no God. But certainly he is traduced; for
 his words are noble and divine: Non deos vulgi negare profanum; sed
 vulgi opiniones diis applicare profanum. Plato could have said no more.
 And although he had the confidence, to deny the administration, he had
 not the power, to deny the nature. The Indians of the West, have names
 for their particular gods, though they have no name for God: as if the
 heathens should have had the names Jupiter, Apollo, Mars, etc., but not
 the word Deus; which shows that even those barbarous people have the
 notion, though they have not the latitude and extent of it. So that
 against atheists, the very savages take part, with the very subtlest
 philosophers. The contemplative atheist is rare: a Diagoras, a Bion, a
 Lucian perhaps, and some others; and yet they seem to be more than they
 are; for that all that impugn a received religion, or superstition, are
 by the adverse part branded with the name of atheists. But the great
 atheists, indeed are hypocrites; which are ever handling holy things,
 but without feeling; so as they must needs be cauterized in the end. The
 causes of atheism are: divisions in religion, if they be many; for
 any one main division, addeth zeal to both sides; but many divisions
 introduce atheism. Another is, scandal of priests; when it is come
 to that which St. Bernard saith, non est jam dicere, ut populus sic
 sacerdos; quia nec sic populus ut sacerdos. A third is, custom of
 profane scoffing in holy matters; which doth, by little and little,
 deface the reverence of religion. And lastly, learned times, specially
 with peace and prosperity; for troubles and adversities do more bow
 men's minds to religion. They that deny a God, destroy man's nobility;
 for certainly man is of kin to the beasts, by his body; and, if he be
 not of kin to God, by his spirit, he is a base and ignoble creature. It
 destroys likewise magnanimity, and the raising of human nature; for take
 an example of a dog, and mark what a generosity and courage he will put
 on, when he finds himself maintained by a man; who to him is instead
 of a God, or melior natura; which courage is manifestly such, as that
 creature, without that confidence of a better nature than his own, could
 never attain. So man, when he resteth and assureth himself, upon divine
 protection and favor, gathered a force and faith, which human nature
 in itself could not obtain. Therefore, as atheism is in all respects
 hateful, so in this, that it depriveth human nature of the means to
 exalt itself, above human frailty. As it is in particular persons, so it
 is in nations. Never was there such a state for magnanimity as Rome.
 Of this state hear what Cicero saith: Quam volumus licet, patres
 conscripti, nos amemus, tamen nec numero Hispanos, nec robore Gallos,
 nec calliditate Poenos, nec artibus Graecos, nec denique hoc ipso hujus
 gentis et terrae domestico nativoque sensu Italos ipsos et Latinos; sed
 pietate, ac religione, atque hac una sapientia, quod deorum immortalium
 numine omnia regi gubernarique perspeximus, omnes gentes nationesque
 superavimus.
 
 
 
 
 Of Superstition
 
 
 IT WERE better to have no opinion of God at all, than such an opinion,
 as is unworthy of him. For the one is unbelief, the other is contumely;
 and certainly superstition is the reproach of the Deity. Plutarch saith
 well to that purpose: Surely (saith he) I had rather a great deal, men
 should say, there was no such man at all, as Plutarch, than that they
 should say, that there was one Plutarch, that would eat his children
 as soon as they were born; as the poets speak of Saturn. And as the
 contumely is greater towards God, so the danger is greater towards men.
 Atheism leaves a man to sense, to philosophy, to natural piety, to
 laws, to reputation; all which may be guides to an outward moral virtue,
 though religion were not; but superstition dismounts all these, and
 erecteth an absolute monarchy, in the minds of men. Therefore atheism did
 never perturb states; for it makes men wary of themselves, as looking
 no further: and we see the times inclined to atheism (as the time
 of Augustus Caesar) were civil times. But superstition hath been the
 confusion of many states, and bringeth in a new primum mobile, that
 ravisheth all the spheres of government. The master of superstition,
 is the people; and in all superstition, wise men follow fools; and
 arguments are fitted to practice, in a reversed order. It was gravely
 said by some of the prelates in the Council of Trent, where the
 doctrine of the Schoolmen bare great sway, that the Schoolmen were like
 astronomers, which did feign eccentrics and epicycles, and such engines
 of orbs, to save the phenomena; though they knew there were no such
 things; and in like manner, that the Schoolmen had framed a number of
 subtle and intricate axioms, and theorems, to save the practice of the
 church. The causes of superstition are: pleasing and sensual rites
 and ceremonies; excess of outward and pharisaical holiness; overgreat
 reverence of traditions, which cannot but load the church; the
 stratagems of prelates, for their own ambition and lucre; the favoring
 too much of good intentions, which openeth the gate to conceits and
 novelties; the taking an aim at divine matters, by human, which cannot
 but breed mixture of imaginations: and, lastly, barbarous times,
 especially joined with calamities and disasters. Superstition, without a
 veil, is a deformed thing; for, as it addeth deformity to an ape, to be
 so like a man, so the similitude of superstition to religion, makes it
 the more deformed. And as wholesome meat corrupteth to little worms, so
 good forms and orders corrupt, into a number of petty observances. There
 is a superstition in avoiding superstition, when men think to do best,
 if they go furthest from the superstition, formerly received; therefore
 care would be had that (as it fareth in ill purgings) the good be not
 taken away with the bad; which commonly is done, when the people is the
 reformer.
 
 
 
 
 Of Travel
 
 
 TRAVEL, in the younger sort, is a part of education, in the elder, a
 part of experience. He that travelleth into a country, before he hath
 some entrance into the language, goeth to school, and not to travel.
 That young men travel under some tutor, or grave servant, I allow well;
 so that he be such a one that hath the language, and hath been in the
 country before; whereby he may be able to tell them what things are
 worthy to be seen, in the country where they go; what acquaintances
 they are to seek; what exercises, or discipline, the place yieldeth. For
 else, young men shall go hooded, and look abroad little. It is a strange
 thing, that in sea voyages, where there is nothing to be seen, but sky
 and sea, men should make diaries; but in land-travel, wherein so much is
 to be observed, for the most part they omit it; as if chance were fitter
 to be registered, than observation. Let diaries, therefore, be brought
 in use. The things to be seen and observed are: the courts of princes,
 especially when they give audience to ambassadors; the courts of
 justice, while they sit and hear causes; and so of consistories
 ecclesiastic; the churches and monasteries, with the monuments which are
 therein extant; the walls and fortifications of cities, and towns, and
 so the heavens and harbors; antiquities and ruins; libraries; colleges,
 disputations, and lectures, where any are; shipping and navies;
 houses and gardens of state and pleasure, near great cities; armories;
 arsenals; magazines; exchanges; burses; warehouses; exercises of
 horsemanship, fencing, training of soldiers, and the like; comedies,
 such whereunto the better sort of persons do resort; treasuries of
 jewels and robes; cabinets and rarities; and, to conclude, whatsoever is
 memorable, in the places where they go. After all which, the tutors,
 or servants, ought to make diligent inquiry. As for triumphs, masks,
 feasts, weddings, funerals, capital executions, and such shows, men need
 not to be put in mind of them; yet are they not to be neglected. If you
 will have a young man to put his travel into a little room, and in short
 time to gather much, this you must do. First, as was said, he must have
 some entrance into the language before he goeth. Then he must have such
 a servant, or tutor, as knoweth the country, as was likewise said. Let
 him carry with him also, some card or book, describing the country where
 he travelleth; which will be a good key to his inquiry. Let him keep
 also a diary. Let him not stay long, in one city or town; more or less
 as the place deserveth, but not long; nay, when he stayeth in one city
 or town, let him change his lodging from one end and part of the town,
 to another; which is a great adamant of acquaintance. Let him sequester
 himself, from the company of his countrymen, and diet in such places,
 where there is good company of the nation where he travelleth. Let him,
 upon his removes from one place to another, procure recommendation to
 some person of quality, residing in the place whither he removeth; that
 he may use his favor, in those things he desireth to see or know. Thus
 he may abridge his travel, with much profit. As for the acquaintance,
 which is to be sought in travel; that which is most of all profitable,
 is acquaintance with the secretaries and employed men of ambassadors:
 for so in travelling in one country, he shall suck the experience of
 many. Let him also see, and visit, eminent persons in all kinds, which
 are of great name abroad; that he may be able to tell, how the life
 agreeth with the fame. For quarrels, they are with care and discretion
 to be avoided. They are commonly for mistresses, healths, place, and
 words. And let a man beware, how he keepeth company with choleric and
 quarrelsome persons; for they will engage him into their own quarrels.
 When a traveller returneth home, let him not leave the countries, where
 he hath travelled, altogether behind him; but maintain a correspondence
 by letters, with those of his acquaintance, which are of most worth.
 And let his travel appear rather in his discourse, than his apparel or
 gesture; and in his discourse, let him be rather advised in his answers,
 than forward to tell stories; and let it appear that he doth not change
 his country manners, for those of foreign parts; but only prick in some
 flowers, of that he hath learned abroad, into the customs of his own
 country.
 
 
 
 
 Of Empire
 
 
 IT IS a miserable state of mind, to have few things to desire, and many
 things to fear; and yet that commonly is the case of kings; who, being
 at the highest, want matter of desire, which makes their minds more
 languishing; and have many representations of perils and shadows, which
 makes their minds the less clear. And this is one reason also, of
 that effect which the Scripture speaketh of, That the king's heart is
 inscrutable. For multitude of jealousies, and lack of some predominant
 desire, that should marshal and put in order all the rest, maketh
 any man's heart, hard to find or sound. Hence it comes likewise, that
 princes many times make themselves desires, and set their hearts upon
 toys; sometimes upon a building; sometimes upon erecting of an order;
 sometimes upon the advancing of a person; sometimes upon obtaining
 excellency in some art, or feat of the hand; as Nero for playing on the
 harp, Domitian for certainty of the hand with the arrow, Commodus for
 playing at fence, Caracalla for driving chariots, and the like. This
 seemeth incredible, unto those that know not the principle, that the
 mind of man, is more cheered and refreshed by profiting in small things,
 than by standing at a stay, in great. We see also that kings that have
 been fortunate conquerors, in their first years, it being not possible
 for them to go forward infinitely, but that they must have some
 check, or arrest in their fortunes, turn in their latter years to be
 superstitious, and melancholy; as did Alexander the Great; Diocletian;
 and in our memory, Charles the Fifth; and others: for he that is used to
 go forward, and findeth a stop, falleth out of his own favor, and is not
 the thing he was.
 
 To speak now of the true temper of empire, it is a thing rare and hard
 to keep; for both temper, and distemper, consist of contraries. But it
 is one thing, to mingle contraries, another to interchange them. The
 answer of Apollonius to Vespasian, is full of excellent instruction.
 Vespasian asked him, What was Nero's overthrow? He answered, Nero could
 touch and tune the harp well; but in government, sometimes he used to
 wind the pins too high, sometimes to let them down too low. And certain
 it is, that nothing destroyeth authority so much, as the unequal and
 untimely interchange of power pressed too far, and relaxed too much.
 
 This is true, that the wisdom of all these latter times, in princes'
 affairs, is rather fine deliveries, and shiftings of dangers and
 mischiefs, when they are near, than solid and grounded courses to keep
 them aloof. But this is but to try masteries with fortune. And let men
 beware, how they neglect and suffer matter of trouble to be prepared;
 for no man can forbid the spark, nor tell whence it may come. The
 difficulties in princes' business are many and great; but the greatest
 difficulty, is often in their own mind. For it is common with princes
 (saith Tacitus) to will contradictories, Sunt plerumque regum voluntates
 vehementes, et inter se contrariae. For it is the solecism of power, to
 think to command the end, and yet not to endure the mean.
 
 Kings have to deal with their neighbors, their wives, their children,
 their prelates or clergy, their nobles, their second-nobles or
 gentlemen, their merchants, their commons, and their men of war; and
 from all these arise dangers, if care and circumspection be not used.
 
 First for their neighbors; there can no general rule be given (for
 occasions are so variable), save one, which ever holdeth, which is, that
 princes do keep due sentinel, that none of their neighbors do ever grow
 so (by increase of territory, by embracing of trade, by approaches, or
 the like), as they become more able to annoy them, than they were.
 And this is generally the work of standing counsels, to foresee and to
 hinder it. During that triumvirate of kings, King Henry the Eighth
 of England, Francis the First King of France, and Charles the Fifth
 Emperor, there was such a watch kept, that none of the three could win a
 palm of ground, but the other two would straightways balance it, either
 by confederation, or, if need were, by a war; and would not in any wise
 take up peace at interest. And the like was done by that league (which
 Guicciardini saith was the security of Italy) made between Ferdinando
 King of Naples, Lorenzius Medici, and Ludovicus Sforza, potentates, the
 one of Florence, the other of Milan. Neither is the opinion of some of
 the Schoolmen, to be received, that a war cannot justly be made, but
 upon a precedent injury or provocation. For there is no question, but
 a just fear of an imminent danger, though there be no blow given, is a
 lawful cause of a war.
 
 For their wives; there are cruel examples of them. Livia is infamed,
 for the poisoning of her husband; Roxalana, Solyman's wife, was the
 destruction of that renowned prince, Sultan Mustapha, and otherwise
 troubled his house and succession; Edward the Second of England, his
 queen, had the principal hand in the deposing and murder of her husband.
 This kind of danger, is then to be feared chiefly, when the wives have
 plots, for the raising of their own children; or else that they be
 advoutresses.
 
 For their children; the tragedies likewise of dangers from them, have
 been many. And generally, the entering of fathers into suspicion of
 their children, hath been ever unfortunate. The destruction of Mustapha
 (that we named before) was so fatal to Solyman's line, as the succession
 of the Turks, from Solyman until this day, is suspected to be untrue,
 and of strange blood; for that Selymus the Second, was thought to
 be suppositious. The destruction of Crispus, a young prince of rare
 towardness, by Constantinus the Great, his father, was in like manner
 fatal to his house; for both Constantinus and Constance, his sons, died
 violent deaths; and Constantius, his other son, did little better; who
 died indeed of sickness, but after that Julianus had taken arms against
 him. The destruction of Demetrius, son to Philip the Second of Macedon,
 turned upon the father, who died of repentance. And many like examples
 there are; but few or none, where the fathers had good by such distrust;
 except it were, where the sons were up in open arms against them; as
 was Selymus the First against Bajazet; and the three sons of Henry the
 Second, King of England.
 
 For their prelates; when they are proud and great, there is also danger
 from them; as it was in the times of Anselmus, and Thomas Becket,
 Archbishops of Canterbury; who, with their croziers, did almost try it
 with the king's sword; and yet they had to deal with stout and haughty
 kings, William Rufus, Henry the First, and Henry the Second. The danger
 is not from that state, but where it hath a dependence of foreign
 authority; or where the churchmen come in and are elected, not by the
 collation of the king, or particular patrons, but by the people.
 
 For their nobles; to keep them at a distance, it is not amiss; but to
 depress them, may make a king more absolute, but less safe; and less
 able to perform, any thing that he desires. I have noted it, in
 my History of King Henry the Seventh of England, who depressed his
 nobility; whereupon it came to pass, that his times were full of
 difficulties and troubles; for the nobility, though they continued loyal
 unto him, yet did they not co-operate with him in his business. So that
 in effect, he was fain to do all things himself.
 
 For their second-nobles; there is not much danger from them, being a
 body dispersed. They may sometimes discourse high, but that doth little
 hurt; besides, they are a counterpoise to the higher nobility, that they
 grow not too potent; and, lastly, being the most immediate in authority,
 with the common people, they do best temper popular commotions.
 
 For their merchants; they are vena porta; and if they flourish not,
 a kingdom may have good limbs, but will have empty veins, and nourish
 little. Taxes and imposts upon them, do seldom good to the king's
 revenue; for that that he wins in the hundred, he leeseth in the shire;
 the particular rates being increased, but the total bulk of trading,
 rather decreased.
 
 For their commons; there is little danger from them, except it be, where
 they have great and potent heads; or where you meddle with the point of
 religion, or their customs, or means of life.
 
 For their men of war; it is a dangerous state, where they live and
 remain in a body, and are used to donatives; whereof we see examples in
 the janizaries, and pretorian bands of Rome; but trainings of men, and
 arming them in several places, and under several commanders, and without
 donatives, are things of defence, and no danger.
 
 Princes are like to heavenly bodies, which cause good or evil times; and
 which have much veneration, but no rest. All precepts concerning kings,
 are in effect comprehended in those two remembrances: memento quod es
 homo; and memento quod es Deus, or vice Dei; the one bridleth their
 power, and the other their will.
 
 
 
 
 Of Counsel
 
 
 THE greatest trust, between man and man, is the trust of giving counsel.
 For in other confidences, men commit the parts of life; their lands,
 their goods, their children, their credit, some particular affair; but
 to such as they make their counsellors, they commit the whole: by how
 much the more, they are obliged to all faith and integrity. The
 wisest princes need not think it any diminution to their greatness, or
 derogation to their sufficiency, to rely upon counsel. God himself is
 not without, but hath made it one of the great names of his blessed Son:
 The Counsellor. Solomon hath pronounced, that in counsel is stability.
 Things will have their first, or second agitation: if they be not tossed
 upon the arguments of counsel, they will be tossed upon the waves of
 fortune; and be full of inconstancy, doing and undoing, like the reeling
 of a drunken man. Solomon's son found the force of counsel, as his
 father saw the necessity of it. For the beloved kingdom of God, was
 first rent, and broken, by ill counsel; upon which counsel, there are
 set for our instruction, the two marks whereby bad counsel is for ever
 best discerned; that it was young counsel, for the person; and violent
 counsel, for the matter.
 
 The ancient times, do set forth in figure, both the incorporation, and
 inseparable conjunction, of counsel with kings, and the wise and politic
 use of counsel by kings: the one, in that they say Jupiter did marry
 Metis, which signifieth counsel; whereby they intend that Sovereignty,
 is married to Counsel: the other in that which followeth, which was
 thus: They say, after Jupiter was married to Metis, she conceived by
 him, and was with child, but Jupiter suffered her not to stay, till she
 brought forth, but eat her up; whereby he became himself with child, and
 was delivered of Pallas armed, out of his head. Which monstrous fable
 containeth a secret of empire; how kings are to make use of their
 counsel of state. That first, they ought to refer matters unto them,
 which is the first begetting, or impregnation; but when they are
 elaborate, moulded, and shaped in the womb of their counsel, and grow
 ripe, and ready to be brought forth, that then they suffer not their
 counsel to go through with the resolution and direction, as if it
 depended on them; but take the matter back into their own hands, and
 make it appear to the world, that the decrees and final directions
 (which, because they come forth, with prudence and power, are resembled
 to Pallas armed) proceeded from themselves; and not only from their
 authority, but (the more to add reputation to themselves) from their
 head and device.
 
 Let us now speak of the inconveniences of counsel, and of the remedies.
 The inconveniences that have been noted, in calling and using counsel,
 are three. First, the revealing of affairs, whereby they become less
 secret. Secondly, the weakening of the authority of princes, as if
 they were less of themselves. Thirdly, the danger of being unfaithfully
 counselled, and more for the good of them that counsel, than of him
 that is counselled. For which inconveniences, the doctrine of Italy,
 and practice of France, in some kings' times, hath introduced cabinet
 counsels; a remedy worse than the disease.
 
 As to secrecy; princes are not bound to communicate all matters, with
 all counsellors; but may extract and select. Neither is it necessary,
 that he that consulteth what he should do, should declare what he will
 do. But let princes beware, that the unsecreting of their affairs, comes
 not from themselves. And as for cabinet counsels, it may be their motto,
 plenus rimarum sum: one futile person, that maketh it his glory to tell,
 will do more hurt than many, that know it their duty to conceal. It is
 true there be some affairs, which require extreme secrecy, which will
 hardly go beyond one or two persons, besides the king: neither are those
 counsels unprosperous; for, besides the secrecy, they commonly go on
 constantly, in one spirit of direction, without distraction. But then
 it must be a prudent king, such as is able to grind with a handmill; and
 those inward counsellors had need also be wise men, and especially true
 and trusty to the king's ends; as it was with King Henry the Seventh of
 England, who, in his great business, imparted himself to none, except it
 were to Morton and Fox.
 
 For weakening of authority; the fable showeth the remedy. Nay, the
 majesty of kings, is rather exalted than diminished, when they are in
 the chair of counsel; neither was there ever prince, bereaved of his
 dependences, by his counsel, except where there hath been, either an
 over-greatness in one counsellor, or an over-strict combination in
 divers; which are things soon found, and holpen.
 
 For the last inconvenience, that men will counsel, with an eye to
 themselves; certainly, non inveniet fidem super terram is meant, of the
 nature of times, and not of all particular persons. There be, that are
 in nature faithful, and sincere, and plain, and direct; not crafty
 and involved; let princes, above all, draw to themselves such
 natures. Besides, counsellors are not commonly so united, but that one
 counsellor, keepeth sentinel over another; so that if any do counsel out
 of faction or private ends, it commonly comes to the king's ear. But
 the best remedy is, if princes know their counsellors, as well as their
 counsellors know them:
 
 
 Principis est virtus maxima nosse suos.
 
 And on the other side, counsellors should not be too speculative into
 their sovereign's person. The true composition of a counsellor, is
 rather to be skilful in their master's business, than in his nature; for
 then he is like to advise him, and not feed his humor. It is of singular
 use to princes, if they take the opinions of their counsel, both
 separately and together. For private opinion is more free; but opinion
 before others, is more reverent. In private, men are more bold in their
 own humors; and in consort, men are more obnoxious to others' humors;
 therefore it is good to take both; and of the inferior sort, rather
 in private, to preserve freedom; of the greater, rather in consort, to
 preserve respect. It is in vain for princes, to take counsel concerning
 matters, if they take no counsel likewise concerning persons; for all
 matters are as dead images; and the life of the execution of affairs,
 resteth in the good choice of persons. Neither is it enough, to consult
 concerning persons secundum genera, as in an idea, or mathematical
 description, what the kind and character of the person should be; for
 the greatest errors are committed, and the most judgment is shown, in
 the choice of individuals. It was truly said, optimi consiliarii mortui:
 books will speak plain, when counsellors blanch. Therefore it is good to
 be conversant in them, specially the books of such as themselves have
 been actors upon the stage.
 
 The counsels at this day, in most places, are but familiar meetings,
 where matters are rather talked on, than debated. And they run too
 swift, to the order, or act, of counsel. It were better that in causes
 of weight, the matter were propounded one day, and not spoken to till
 the next day; in nocte consilium. So was it done in the Commission
 of Union, between England and Scotland; which was a grave and orderly
 assembly. I commend set days for petitions; for both it gives the
 suitors more certainty for their attendance, and it frees the meetings
 for matters of estate, that they may hoc agere. In choice of committees;
 for ripening business for the counsel, it is better to choose
 indifferent persons, than to make an indifferency, by putting in those,
 that are strong on both sides. I commend also standing commissions; as
 for trade, for treasure, for war, for suits, for some provinces; for
 where there be divers particular counsels, and but one counsel of
 estate (as it is in Spain), they are, in effect, no more than standing
 commissions: save that they have greater authority. Let such as are
 to inform counsels, out of their particular professions (as lawyers,
 seamen, mintmen, and the like) be first heard before committees; and
 then, as occasion serves, before the counsel. And let them not come in
 multitudes, or in a tribunitious manner; for that is to clamor counsels,
 not to inform them. A long table and a square table, or seats about the
 walls, seem things of form, but are things of substance; for at a long
 table a few at the upper end, in effect, sway all the business; but in
 the other form, there is more use of the counsellors' opinions, that sit
 lower. A king, when he presides in counsel, let him beware how he opens
 his own inclination too much, in that which he propoundeth; for else
 counsellors will but take the wind of him, and instead of giving free
 counsel, sing him a song of placebo.
 
 
 
 
 Of Delays
 
 
 FORTUNE is like the market; where many times if you can stay a little,
 the price will fall. Again, it is sometimes like Sibylla's offer; which
 at first, offereth the commodity at full, then consumeth part and part,
 and still holdeth up the price. For occasion (as it is in the common
 verse) turneth a bald noddle, after she hath presented her locks in
 front, and no hold taken; or at least turneth the handle of the bottle,
 first to be received, and after the belly, which is hard to clasp.
 There is surely no greater wisdom, than well to time the beginnings, and
 onsets, of things. Dangers are no more light, if they once seem light;
 and more dangers have deceived men, than forced them. Nay, it were
 better, to meet some dangers half way, though they come nothing near,
 than to keep too long a watch upon their approaches; for if a man watch
 too long, it is odds he will fall asleep. On the other side, to be
 deceived with too long shadows (as some have been, when the moon was
 low, and shone on their enemies' back), and so to shoot off before the
 time; or to teach dangers to come on, by over early buckling towards
 them; is another extreme. The ripeness, or unripeness, of the occasion
 (as we said) must ever be well weighed; and generally it is good, to
 commit the beginnings of all great actions to Argus, with his hundred
 eyes, and the ends to Briareus, with his hundred hands; first to watch,
 and then to speed. For the helmet of Pluto, which maketh the politic man
 go invisible, is secrecy in the counsel, and celerity in the execution.
 For when things are once come to the execution, there is no secrecy,
 comparable to celerity; like the motion of a bullet in the air, which
 flieth so swift, as it outruns the eye.
 
 
 
 
 Of Cunning
 
 
 WE TAKE cunning for a sinister or crooked wisdom. And certainly there is
 a great difference, between a cunning man, and a wise man; not only in
 point of honesty, but in point of ability. There be, that can pack the
 cards, and yet cannot play well; so there are some that are good in
 canvasses and factions, that are otherwise weak men. Again, it is one
 thing to understand persons, and another thing to understand matters;
 for many are perfect in men's humors, that are not greatly capable of
 the real part of business; which is the constitution of one that hath
 studied men, more than books. Such men are fitter for practice, than
 for counsel; and they are good, but in their own alley: turn them to new
 men, and they have lost their aim; so as the old rule, to know a fool
 from a wise man, Mitte ambos nudos ad ignotos, et videbis, doth scarce
 hold for them. And because these cunning men, are like haberdashers of
 small wares, it is not amiss to set forth their shop.
 
 It is a point of cunning, to wait upon him with whom you speak, with
 your eye; as the Jesuits give it in precept: for there be many wise men,
 that have secret hearts, and transparent countenances. Yet this would be
 done with a demure abasing of your eye, sometimes, as the Jesuits also
 do use.
 
 Another is, that when you have anything to obtain, of present despatch,
 you entertain and amuse the party, with whom you deal, with some other
 discourse; that he be not too much awake to make objections. I knew a
 counsellor and secretary, that never came to Queen Elizabeth of
 England, with bills to sign, but he would always first put her into some
 discourse of estate, that she mought the less mind the bills.
 
 The like surprise may be made by moving things, when the party is in
 haste, and cannot stay to consider advisedly of that is moved.
 
 If a man would cross a business, that he doubts some other would
 handsomely and effectually move, let him pretend to wish it well, and
 move it himself in such sort as may foil it.
 
 The breaking off, in the midst of that one was about to say, as if he
 took himself up, breeds a greater appetite in him with whom you confer,
 to know more.
 
 And because it works better, when anything seemeth to be gotten from you
 by question, than if you offer it of yourself, you may lay a bait for a
 question, by showing another visage, and countenance, than you are wont;
 to the end to give occasion, for the party to ask, what the matter is
 of the change? As Nehemias did; And I had not before that time, been sad
 before the king.
 
 In things that are tender and unpleasing, it is good to break the ice,
 by some whose words are of less weight, and to reserve the more weighty
 voice, to come in as by chance, so that he may be asked the question
 upon the other's speech: as Narcissus did, relating to Claudius the
 marriage of Messalina and Silius.
 
 In things that a man would not be seen in himself, it is a point of
 cunning, to borrow the name of the world; as to say, The world says, or
 There is a speech abroad.
 
 I knew one that, when he wrote a letter, he would put that, which was
 most material, in the postscript, as if it had been a by-matter.
 
 I knew another that, when he came to have speech, he would pass over
 that, that he intended most; and go forth, and come back again, and
 speak of it as of a thing, that he had almost forgot.
 
 Some procure themselves, to be surprised, at such times as it is like
 the party that they work upon, will suddenly come upon them; and to be
 found with a letter in their hand, or doing somewhat which they are not
 accustomed; to the end, they may be apposed of those things, which of
 themselves they are desirous to utter.
 
 It is a point of cunning, to let fall those words in a man's own name,
 which he would have another man learn, and use, and thereupon take
 advantage. I knew two, that were competitors for the secretary's place
 in Queen Elizabeth's time, and yet kept good quarter between themselves;
 and would confer, one with another, upon the business; and the one of
 them said, That to be a secretary, in the declination of a monarchy,
 was a ticklish thing, and that he did not affect it: the other straight
 caught up those words, and discoursed with divers of his friends, that
 he had no reason to desire to be secretary, in the declination of a
 monarchy. The first man took hold of it, and found means it was told the
 Queen; who, hearing of a declination of a monarchy, took it so ill, as
 she would never after hear of the other's suit.
 
 There is a cunning, which we in England call, the turning of the cat in
 the pan; which is, when that which a man says to another, he lays it as
 if another had said it to him. And to say truth, it is not easy, when
 such a matter passed between two, to make it appear from which of them
 it first moved and began.
 
 It is a way that some men have, to glance and dart at others, by
 justifying themselves by negatives; as to say, This I do not; as
 Tigellinus did towards Burrhus, Se non diversas spes, sed incolumitatem
 imperatoris simpliciter spectare.
 
 Some have in readiness so many tales and stories, as there is nothing
 they would insinuate, but they can wrap it into a tale; which serveth
 both to keep themselves more in guard, and to make others carry it with
 more pleasure. It is a good point of cunning, for a man to shape the
 answer he would have, in his own words and propositions; for it makes
 the other party stick the less.
 
 It is strange how long some men will lie in wait to speak somewhat they
 desire to say; and how far about they will fetch; and how many other
 matters they will beat over, to come near it. It is a thing of great
 patience, but yet of much use.
 
 A sudden, bold, and unexpected question doth many times surprise a man,
 and lay him open. Like to him that, having changed his name, and walking
 in Paul's, another suddenly came behind him, and called him by his true
 name, whereat straightways he looked back.
 
 But these small wares, and petty points, of cunning, are infinite; and
 it were a good deed to make a list of them; for that nothing doth more
 hurt in a state, than that cunning men pass for wise.
 
 But certainly some there are that know the resorts and falls of
 business, that cannot sink into the main of it; like a house that hath
 convenient stairs and entries, but never a fair room. Therefore, you
 shall see them find out pretty looses in the conclusion, but are no ways
 able to examine or debate matters. And yet commonly they take advantage
 of their inability, and would be thought wits of direction. Some build
 rather upon the abusing of others, and (as we now say) putting tricks
 upon them, than upon soundness of their own proceedings. But Solomon
 saith, Prudens advertit ad gressus suos; stultus divertit ad dolos.
 
 
 
 
 Of Wisdom For A Man's Self
 
 
 AN ANT is a wise creature for itself, but it is a shrewd thing, in
 an orchard or garden. And certainly, men that are great lovers of
 themselves, waste the public. Divide with reason; between self-love and
 society; and be so true to thyself, as thou be not false to others;
 specially to thy king and country. It is a poor centre of a man's
 actions, himself. It is right earth. For that only stands fast upon his
 own centre; whereas all things, that have affinity with the heavens,
 move upon the centre of another, which they benefit. The referring of
 all to a man's self, is more tolerable in a sovereign prince; because
 themselves are not only themselves, but their good and evil is at the
 peril of the public fortune. But it is a desperate evil, in a servant to
 a prince, or a citizen in a republic. For whatsoever affairs pass such a
 man's hands, he crooketh them to his own ends; which must needs be often
 eccentric to the ends of his master, or state. Therefore, let princes,
 or states, choose such servants, as have not this mark; except they mean
 their service should be made but the accessory. That which maketh
 the effect more pernicious, is that all proportion is lost. It were
 disproportion enough, for the servant's good to be preferred before the
 master's; but yet it is a greater extreme, when a little good of the
 servant, shall carry things against a great good of the master's. And
 yet that is the case of bad officers, treasurers, ambassadors, generals,
 and other false and corrupt servants; which set a bias upon their bowl,
 of their own petty ends and envies, to the overthrow of their master's
 great and important affairs. And for the most part, the good such
 servants receive, is after the model of their own fortune; but the hurt
 they sell for that good, is after the model of their master's fortune.
 And certainly it is the nature of extreme self-lovers, as they will set
 an house on fire, and it were but to roast their eggs; and yet these men
 many times hold credit with their masters, because their study is but
 to please them, and profit themselves; and for either respect, they will
 abandon the good of their affairs.
 
 Wisdom for a man's self is, in many branches thereof, a depraved thing.
 It is the wisdom of rats, that will be sure to leave a house, somewhat
 before it fall. It is the wisdom of the fox, that thrusts out
 the badger, who digged and made room for him. It is the wisdom of
 crocodiles, that shed tears when they would devour. But that which is
 specially to be noted is, that those which (as Cicero says of Pompey)
 are sui amantes, sine rivali, are many times unfortunate. And whereas
 they have, all their times, sacrificed to themselves, they become in the
 end, themselves sacrifices to the inconstancy of fortune, whose wings
 they thought, by their self-wisdom, to have pinioned.
 
 
 
 
 Of Innovations
 
 
 AS THE births of living creatures, at first are ill-shapen, so are all
 innovations, which are the births of time. Yet notwithstanding, as those
 that first bring honor into their family, are commonly more worthy than
 most that succeed, so the first precedent (if it be good) is seldom
 attained by imitation. For ill, to man's nature, as it stands perverted,
 hath a natural motion, strongest in continuance; but good, as a forced
 motion, strongest at first. Surely every medicine is an innovation; and
 he that will not apply new remedies, must expect new evils; for time is
 the greatest innovator; and if time of course alter things to the worse,
 and wisdom and counsel shall not alter them to the better, what shall
 be the end? It is true, that what is settled by custom, though it be
 not good, yet at least it is fit; and those things which have long gone
 together, are, as it were, confederate within themselves; whereas new
 things piece not so well; but though they help by their utility, yet
 they trouble by their inconformity. Besides, they are like strangers;
 more admired, and less favored. All this is true, if time stood still;
 which contrariwise moveth so round, that a froward retention of custom,
 is as turbulent a thing as an innovation; and they that reverence too
 much old times, are but a scorn to the new. It were good, therefore,
 that men in their innovations would follow the example of time itself;
 which indeed innovateth greatly, but quietly, by degrees scarce to be
 perceived. For otherwise, whatsoever is new is unlooked for; and ever
 it mends some, and pairs others; and he that is holpen, takes it for
 a fortune, and thanks the time; and he that is hurt, for a wrong, and
 imputeth it to the author. It is good also, not to try experiments in
 states, except the necessity be urgent, or the utility evident; and well
 to beware, that it be the reformation, that draweth on the change, and
 not the desire of change, that pretendeth the reformation. And lastly,
 that the novelty, though it be not rejected, yet be held for a suspect;
 and, as the Scripture saith, that we make a stand upon the ancient way,
 and then look about us, and discover what is the straight and right way,
 and so to walk in it.
 
 
 
 
 Of Dispatch
 
 
 AFFECTED dispatch is one of the most dangerous things to business that
 can be. It is like that, which the physicians call predigestion, or
 hasty digestion; which is sure to fill the body full of crudities, and
 secret seeds of diseases. Therefore measure not dispatch, by the times
 of sitting, but by the advancement of the business. And as in races
 it is not the large stride or high lift that makes the speed; so in
 business, the keeping close to the matter, and not taking of it too much
 at once, procureth dispatch. It is the care of some, only to come off
 speedily for the time; or to contrive some false periods of business,
 because they may seem men of dispatch. But it is one thing, to
 abbreviate by contracting, another by cutting off. And business so
 handled, at several sittings or meetings, goeth commonly backward and
 forward in an unsteady manner. I knew a wise man that had it for a
 byword, when he saw men hasten to a conclusion, Stay a little, that we
 may make an end the sooner.
 
 On the other side, true dispatch is a rich thing. For time is the
 measure of business, as money is of wares; and business is bought at
 a dear hand, where there is small dispatch. The Spartans and Spaniards
 have been noted to be of small dispatch; Mi venga la muerte de Spagna;
 Let my death come from Spain; for then it will be sure to be long in
 coming.
 
 Give good hearing to those, that give the first information in business;
 and rather direct them in the beginning, than interrupt them in the
 continuance of their speeches; for he that is put out of his own order,
 will go forward and backward, and be more tedious, while he waits
 upon his memory, than he could have been, if he had gone on in his
 own course. But sometimes it is seen, that the moderator is more
 troublesome, than the actor.
 
 Iterations are commonly loss of time. But there is no such gain of time,
 as to iterate often the state of the question; for it chaseth away many
 a frivolous speech, as it is coming forth. Long and curious speeches,
 are as fit for dispatch, as a robe or mantle, with a long train, is
 for race. Prefaces and passages, and excusations, and other speeches of
 reference to the person, are great wastes of time; and though they
 seem to proceed of modesty, they are bravery. Yet beware of being too
 material, when there is any impediment or obstruction in men's wills;
 for pre-occupation of mind ever requireth preface of speech; like a
 fomentation to make the unguent enter.
 
 Above all things, order, and distribution, and singling out of parts, is
 the life of dispatch; so as the distribution be not too subtle: for he
 that doth not divide, will never enter well into business; and he that
 divideth too much, will never come out of it clearly. To choose time, is
 to save time; and an unseasonable motion, is but beating the air. There
 be three parts of business; the preparation, the debate or examination,
 and the perfection. Whereof, if you look for dispatch, let the middle
 only be the work of many, and the first and last the work of few. The
 proceeding upon somewhat conceived in writing, doth for the most part
 facilitate dispatch: for though it should be wholly rejected, yet that
 negative is more pregnant of direction, than an indefinite; as ashes are
 more generative than dust.
 
 
 
 
 Of Seeming Wise
 
 
 IT HATH been an opinion, that the French are wiser than they seem, and
 the Spaniards seem wiser than they are. But howsoever it be between
 nations, certainly it is so between man and man. For as the Apostle
 saith of godliness, Having a show of godliness, but denying the power
 thereof; so certainly there are, in point of wisdom and sufficiency,
 that do nothing or little very solemnly: magno conatu nugas. It is a
 ridiculous thing, and fit for a satire to persons of judgment, to
 see what shifts these formalists have, and what prospectives to make
 superficies to seem body, that hath depth and bulk. Some are so close
 and reserved, as they will not show their wares, but by a dark light;
 and seem always to keep back somewhat; and when they know within
 themselves, they speak of that they do not well know, would nevertheless
 seem to others, to know of that which they may not well speak. Some
 help themselves with countenance and gesture, and are wise by signs; as
 Cicero saith of Piso, that when he answered him, he fetched one of
 his brows up to his forehead, and bent the other down to his chin;
 Respondes, altero ad frontem sublato, altero ad mentum depresso
 supercilio, crudelitatem tibi non placere. Some think to bear it by
 speaking a great word, and being peremptory; and go on, and take by
 admittance, that which they cannot make good. Some, whatsoever is beyond
 their reach, will seem to despise, or make light of it, as impertinent
 or curious; and so would have their ignorance seem judgment. Some are
 never without a difference, and commonly by amusing men with a subtilty,
 blanch the matter; of whom A. Gellius saith, Hominem delirum, qui
 verborum minutiis rerum frangit pondera. Of which kind also, Plato,
 in his Protagoras, bringeth in Prodicus in scorn, and maketh him make a
 speech, that consisteth of distinction from the beginning to the end.
 Generally, such men in all deliberations find ease to be of the negative
 side, and affect a credit to object and foretell difficulties; for
 when propositions are denied, there is an end of them; but if they be
 allowed, it requireth a new work; which false point of wisdom is the
 bane of business. To conclude, there is no decaying merchant, or inward
 beggar, hath so many tricks to uphold the credit of their wealth, as
 these empty persons have, to maintain the credit of their sufficiency.
 Seeming wise men may make shift to get opinion; but let no man choose
 them for employment; for certainly you were better take for business, a
 man somewhat absurd, than over-formal.
 
 
 
 
 Of Friendship
 
 
 IT HAD been hard for him that spake it to have put more truth and
 untruth together in few words, than in that speech, Whatsoever is
 delighted in solitude, is either a wild beast or a god. For it is most
 true, that a natural and secret hatred, and aversation towards society,
 in any man, hath somewhat of the savage beast; but it is most untrue,
 that it should have any character at all, of the divine nature; except
 it proceed, not out of a pleasure in solitude, but out of a love and
 desire to sequester a man's self, for a higher conversation: such as
 is found to have been falsely and feignedly in some of the heathen; as
 Epimenides the Candian, Numa the Roman, Empedocles the Sicilian, and
 Apollonius of Tyana; and truly and really, in divers of the ancient
 hermits and holy fathers of the church. But little do men perceive what
 solitude is, and how far it extendeth. For a crowd is not company; and
 faces are but a gallery of pictures; and talk but a tinkling cymbal,
 where there is no love. The Latin adage meeteth with it a little: Magna
 civitas, magna solitudo; because in a great town friends are scattered;
 so that there is not that fellowship, for the most part, which is in
 less neighborhoods. But we may go further, and affirm most truly, that
 it is a mere and miserable solitude to want true friends; without which
 the world is but a wilderness; and even in this sense also of solitude,
 whosoever in the frame of his nature and affections, is unfit for
 friendship, he taketh it of the beast, and not from humanity.
 
 A principal fruit of friendship, is the ease and discharge of the
 fulness and swellings of the heart, which passions of all kinds do cause
 and induce. We know diseases of stoppings, and suffocations, are the
 most dangerous in the body; and it is not much otherwise in the mind;
 you may take sarza to open the liver, steel to open the spleen, flowers
 of sulphur for the lungs, castoreum for the brain; but no receipt
 openeth the heart, but a true friend; to whom you may impart griefs,
 joys, fears, hopes, suspicions, counsels, and whatsoever lieth upon the
 heart to oppress it, in a kind of civil shrift or confession.
 
 It is a strange thing to observe, how high a rate great kings and
 monarchs do set upon this fruit of friendship, whereof we speak: so
 great, as they purchase it, many times, at the hazard of their own
 safety and greatness. For princes, in regard of the distance of their
 fortune from that of their subjects and servants, cannot gather this
 fruit, except (to make themselves capable thereof) they raise some
 persons to be, as it were, companions and almost equals to themselves,
 which many times sorteth to inconvenience. The modern languages give
 unto such persons the name of favorites, or privadoes; as if it were
 matter of grace, or conversation. But the Roman name attaineth the true
 use and cause thereof, naming them participes curarum; for it is that
 which tieth the knot. And we see plainly that this hath been done, not
 by weak and passionate princes only, but by the wisest and most politic
 that ever reigned; who have oftentimes joined to themselves some of
 their servants; whom both themselves have called friends, and allowed
 other likewise to call them in the same manner; using the word which is
 received between private men.
 
 L. Sylla, when he commanded Rome, raised Pompey (after surnamed
 the Great) to that height, that Pompey vaunted himself for Sylla's
 overmatch. For when he had carried the consulship for a friend of
 his, against the pursuit of Sylla, and that Sylla did a little resent
 thereat, and began to speak great, Pompey turned upon him again, and in
 effect bade him be quiet; for that more men adored the sun rising, than
 the sun setting. With Julius Caesar, Decimus Brutus had obtained that
 interest as he set him down in his testament, for heir in remainder,
 after his nephew. And this was the man that had power with him, to
 draw him forth to his death. For when Caesar would have discharged
 the senate, in regard of some ill presages, and specially a dream of
 Calpurnia; this man lifted him gently by the arm out of his chair,
 telling him he hoped he would not dismiss the senate, till his wife
 had dreamt a better dream. And it seemeth his favor was so great, as
 Antonius, in a letter which is recited verbatim in one of Cicero's
 Philippics, calleth him venefica, witch; as if he had enchanted Caesar.
 Augustus raised Agrippa (though of mean birth) to that height, as when
 he consulted with Maecenas, about the marriage of his daughter Julia,
 Maecenas took the liberty to tell him, that he must either marry his
 daughter to Agrippa, or take away his life; there was no third way, he
 had made him so great. With Tiberius Caesar, Sejanus had ascended
 to that height, as they two were termed, and reckoned, as a pair of
 friends. Tiberius in a letter to him saith, Haec pro amicitia nostra non
 occultavi; and the whole senate dedicated an altar to Friendship, as to
 a goddess, in respect of the great dearness of friendship, between them
 two. The like, or more, was between Septimius Severus and Plautianus.
 For he forced his eldest son to marry the daughter of Plautianus; and
 would often maintain Plautianus, in doing affronts to his son; and did
 write also in a letter to the senate, by these words: I love the man so
 well, as I wish he may over-live me. Now if these princes had been as
 a Trajan, or a Marcus Aurelius, a man might have thought that this had
 proceeded of an abundant goodness of nature; but being men so wise, of
 such strength and severity of mind, and so extreme lovers of themselves,
 as all these were, it proveth most plainly that they found their own
 felicity (though as great as ever happened to mortal men) but as an half
 piece, except they mought have a friend, to make it entire; and yet,
 which is more, they were princes that had wives, sons, nephews; and yet
 all these could not supply the comfort of friendship.
 
 It is not to be forgotten, what Comineus observeth of his first master,
 Duke Charles the Hardy, namely, that he would communicate his secrets
 with none; and least of all, those secrets which troubled him most.
 Whereupon he goeth on, and saith that towards his latter time, that
 closeness did impair, and a little perish his understanding. Surely
 Comineus mought have made the same judgment also, if it had pleased him,
 of his second master, Lewis the Eleventh, whose closeness was indeed his
 tormentor. The parable of Pythagoras is dark, but true; Cor ne edito;
 Eat not the heart. Certainly, if a man would give it a hard phrase,
 those that want friends, to open themselves unto, are cannibals of
 their own hearts. But one thing is most admirable (wherewith I
 will conclude this first fruit of friendship), which is, that this
 communicating of a man's self to his friend, works two contrary effects;
 for it redoubleth joys, and cutteth griefs in halves. For there is no
 man, that imparteth his joys to his friend, but he joyeth the more;
 and no man that imparteth his griefs to his friend, but he grieveth the
 less. So that it is in truth, of operation upon a man's mind, of like
 virtue as the alchemists use to attribute to their stone, for man's
 body; that it worketh all contrary effects, but still to the good and
 benefit of nature. But yet without praying in aid of alchemists, there
 is a manifest image of this, in the ordinary course of nature. For in
 bodies, union strengtheneth and cherisheth any natural action; and on
 the other side, weakeneth and dulleth any violent impression: and even
 so it is of minds.
 
 The second fruit of friendship, is healthful and sovereign for the
 understanding, as the first is for the affections. For friendship maketh
 indeed a fair day in the affections, from storm and tempests; but it
 maketh daylight in the understanding, out of darkness, and confusion
 of thoughts. Neither is this to be understood only of faithful counsel,
 which a man receiveth from his friend; but before you come to that,
 certain it is, that whosoever hath his mind fraught with many thoughts,
 his wits and understanding do clarify and break up, in the communicating
 and discoursing with another; he tosseth his thoughts more easily; he
 marshalleth them more orderly, he seeth how they look when they are
 turned into words: finally, he waxeth wiser than himself; and that more
 by an hour's discourse, than by a day's meditation. It was well said
 by Themistocles, to the king of Persia, That speech was like cloth of
 Arras, opened and put abroad; whereby the imagery doth appear in figure;
 whereas in thoughts they lie but as in packs. Neither is this second
 fruit of friendship, in opening the understanding, restrained only to
 such friends as are able to give a man counsel; (they indeed are best;)
 but even without that, a man learneth of himself, and bringeth his
 own thoughts to light, and whetteth his wits as against a stone, which
 itself cuts not. In a word, a man were better relate himself to a
 statua, or picture, than to suffer his thoughts to pass in smother.
 
 Add now, to make this second fruit of friendship complete, that other
 point, which lieth more open, and falleth within vulgar observation;
 which is faithful counsel from a friend. Heraclitus saith well in one
 of his enigmas, Dry light is ever the best. And certain it is, that the
 light that a man receiveth by counsel from another, is drier and purer,
 than that which cometh from his own understanding and judgment; which is
 ever infused, and drenched, in his affections and customs. So as there
 is as much difference between the counsel, that a friend giveth, and
 that a man giveth himself, as there is between the counsel of a friend,
 and of a flatterer. For there is no such flatterer as is a man's self;
 and there is no such remedy against flattery of a man's self, as
 the liberty of a friend. Counsel is of two sorts: the one concerning
 manners, the other concerning business. For the first, the best
 preservative to keep the mind in health, is the faithful admonition of a
 friend. The calling of a man's self to a strict account, is a medicine,
 sometime too piercing and corrosive. Reading good books of morality,
 is a little flat and dead. Observing our faults in others, is sometimes
 improper for our case. But the best receipt (best, I say, to work, and
 best to take) is the admonition of a friend. It is a strange thing to
 behold, what gross errors and extreme absurdities many (especially of
 the greater sort) do commit, for want of a friend to tell them of them;
 to the great damage both of their fame and fortune: for, as St. James
 saith, they are as men that look sometimes into a glass, and presently
 forget their own shape and favor. As for business, a man may think, if
 he win, that two eyes see no more than one; or that a gamester seeth
 always more than a looker-on; or that a man in anger, is as wise as he
 that hath said over the four and twenty letters; or that a musket may be
 shot off as well upon the arm, as upon a rest; and such other fond and
 high imaginations, to think himself all in all. But when all is done,
 the help of good counsel, is that which setteth business straight. And
 if any man think that he will take counsel, but it shall be by pieces;
 asking counsel in one business, of one man, and in another business,
 of another man; it is well (that is to say, better, perhaps, than if he
 asked none at all); but he runneth two dangers: one, that he shall not
 be faithfully counselled; for it is a rare thing, except it be from a
 perfect and entire friend, to have counsel given, but such as shall
 be bowed and crooked to some ends, which he hath, that giveth it. The
 other, that he shall have counsel given, hurtful and unsafe (though with
 good meaning), and mixed partly of mischief and partly of remedy; even
 as if you would call a physician, that is thought good for the cure of
 the disease you complain of, but is unacquainted with your body; and
 therefore may put you in way for a present cure, but overthroweth
 your health in some other kind; and so cure the disease, and kill the
 patient. But a friend that is wholly acquainted with a man's estate,
 will beware, by furthering any present business, how he dasheth upon
 other inconvenience. And therefore rest not upon scattered counsels;
 they will rather distract and mislead, than settle and direct.
 
 After these two noble fruits of friendship (peace in the affections, and
 support of the judgment), followeth the last fruit; which is like the
 pomegranate, full of many kernels; I mean aid, and bearing a part, in
 all actions and occasions. Here the best way to represent to life the
 manifold use of friendship, is to cast and see how many things there
 are, which a man cannot do himself; and then it will appear, that it
 was a sparing speech of the ancients, to say, that a friend is another
 himself; for that a friend is far more than himself. Men have
 their time, and die many times, in desire of some things which they
 principally take to heart; the bestowing of a child, the finishing of
 a work, or the like. If a man have a true friend, he may rest almost
 secure that the care of those things will continue after him. So that a
 man hath, as it were, two lives in his desires. A man hath a body, and
 that body is confined to a place; but where friendship is, all offices
 of life are as it were granted to him, and his deputy. For he may
 exercise them by his friend. How many things are there which a man
 cannot, with any face or comeliness, say or do himself? A man can scarce
 allege his own merits with modesty, much less extol them; a man cannot
 sometimes brook to supplicate or beg; and a number of the like. But all
 these things are graceful, in a friend's mouth, which are blushing in a
 man's own. So again, a man's person hath many proper relations, which
 he cannot put off. A man cannot speak to his son but as a father; to his
 wife but as a husband; to his enemy but upon terms: whereas a friend may
 speak as the case requires, and not as it sorteth with the person. But
 to enumerate these things were endless; I have given the rule, where a
 man cannot fitly play his own part; if he have not a friend, he may quit
 the stage.
 
 
 
 
 Of Expense
 
 
 RICHES are for spending, and spending for honor and good actions.
 Therefore extraordinary expense must be limited by the worth of the
 occasion; for voluntary undoing, may be as well for a man's country, as
 for the kingdom of heaven. But ordinary expense, ought to be limited
 by a man's estate; and governed with such regard, as it be within his
 compass; and not subject to deceit and abuse of servants; and ordered
 to the best show, that the bills may be less than the estimation abroad.
 Certainly, if a man will keep but of even hand, his ordinary expenses
 ought to be but to the half of his receipts; and if he think to wax
 rich, but to the third part. It is no baseness, for the greatest to
 descend and look into their own estate. Some forbear it, not upon
 negligence alone, but doubting to bring themselves into melancholy, in
 respect they shall find it broken. But wounds cannot be cured without
 searching. He that cannot look into his own estate at all, had need both
 choose well those whom he employeth, and change them often; for new
 are more timorous and less subtle. He that can look into his estate but
 seldom, it behooveth him to turn all to certainties. A man had need, if
 he be plentiful in some kind of expense, to be as saving again in some
 other. As if he be plentiful in diet, to be saving in apparel; if he be
 plentiful in the hall, to be saving in the stable; and the like. For
 he that is plentiful in expenses of all kinds, will hardly be preserved
 from decay. In clearing of a man's estate, he may as well hurt himself
 in being too sudden, as in letting it run on too long. For hasty
 selling, is commonly as disadvantageable as interest. Besides, he that
 clears at once will relapse; for finding himself out of straits, he will
 revert to his custom: but he that cleareth by degrees, induceth a habit
 of frugality, and gaineth as well upon his mind, as upon his estate.
 Certainly, who hath a state to repair, may not despise small things;
 and commonly it is less dishonorable, to abridge petty charges, than to
 stoop to petty gettings. A man ought warily to begin charges which once
 begun will continue; but in matters that return not, he may be more
 magnificent.
 
 
 
 
 Of the True Greatness Of Kingdoms And Estates
 
 
 THE speech of Themistocles the Athenian, which was haughty and arrogant,
 in taking so much to himself, had been a grave and wise observation and
 censure, applied at large to others. Desired at a feast to touch a lute,
 he said, He could not fiddle, but yet he could make a small town, a
 great city. These words (holpen a little with a metaphor) may express
 two differing abilities, in those that deal in business of estate. For
 if a true survey be taken of counsellors and statesmen, there may be
 found (though rarely) those which can make a small state great, and yet
 cannot fiddle; as on the other side, there will be found a great many,
 that can fiddle very cunningly, but yet are so far from being able to
 make a small state great, as their gift lieth the other way; to bring
 a great and flourishing estate, to ruin and decay. And certainly whose
 degenerate arts and shifts, whereby many counsellors and governors gain
 both favor with their masters, and estimation with the vulgar, deserve
 no better name than fiddling; being things rather pleasing for the
 time, and graceful to themselves only, than tending to the weal and
 advancement of the state which they serve. There are also (no doubt)
 counsellors and governors which may be held sufficient (negotiis pares),
 able to manage affairs, and to keep them from precipices and manifest
 inconveniences; which nevertheless are far from the ability to raise and
 amplify an estate in power, means, and fortune. But be the workmen what
 they may be, let us speak of the work; that is, the true greatness of
 kingdoms and estates, and the means thereof. An argument fit for great
 and mighty princes to have in their hand; to the end that neither by
 over-measuring their forces, they leese themselves in vain enterprises;
 nor on the other side, by undervaluing them, they descend to fearful and
 pusillanimous counsels.
 
 The greatness of an estate, in bulk and territory, doth fall under
 measure; and the greatness of finances and revenue, doth fall under
 computation. The population may appear by musters; and the number and
 greatness of cities and towns by cards and maps. But yet there is not
 any thing amongst civil affairs more subject to error, than the right
 valuation and true judgment concerning the power and forces of an
 estate. The kingdom of heaven is compared, not to any great kernel or
 nut, but to a grain of mustard-seed: which is one of the least grains,
 but hath in it a property and spirit hastily to get up and spread. So
 are there states, great in territory, and yet not apt to enlarge or
 command; and some that have but a small dimension of stem, and yet apt
 to be the foundations of great monarchies.
 
 Walled towns, stored arsenals and armories, goodly races of horse,
 chariots of war, elephants, ordnance, artillery, and the like; all this
 is but a sheep in a lion's skin, except the breed and disposition of the
 people, be stout and warlike. Nay, number (itself) in armies importeth
 not much, where the people is of weak courage; for (as Virgil saith) It
 never troubles a wolf, how many the sheep be. The army of the Persians,
 in the plains of Arbela, was such a vast sea of people, as it did
 somewhat astonish the commanders in Alexander's army; who came to him
 therefore, and wished him to set upon them by night; and he answered, He
 would not pilfer the victory. And the defeat was easy. When Tigranes
 the Armenian, being encamped upon a hill with four hundred thousand men,
 discovered the army of the Romans, being not above fourteen thousand,
 marching towards him, he made himself merry with it, and said, Yonder
 men are too many for an embassage, and too few for a fight. But before
 the sun set, he found them enow to give him the chase with infinite
 slaughter. Many are the examples of the great odds, between number and
 courage; so that a man may truly make a judgment, that the principal
 point of greatness in any state, is to have a race of military men.
 Neither is money the sinews of war (as it is trivially said), where the
 sinews of men's arms, in base and effeminate people, are failing. For
 Solon said well to Croesus (when in ostentation he showed him his gold),
 Sir, if any other come, that hath better iron, than you, he will be
 master of all this gold. Therefore let any prince or state think solely
 of his forces, except his militia of natives be of good and valiant
 soldiers. And let princes, on the other side, that have subjects of
 martial disposition, know their own strength; unless they be otherwise
 wanting unto themselves. As for mercenary forces (which is the help in
 this case), all examples show, that whatsoever estate or prince doth
 rest upon them, he may spread his feathers for a time, but he will mew
 them soon after.
 
 The blessing of Judah and Issachar will never meet; that the same
 people, or nation, should be both the lion's whelp and the ass between
 burthens; neither will it be, that a people overlaid with taxes, should
 ever become valiant and martial. It is true that taxes levied by
 consent of the estate, do abate men's courage less: as it hath been seen
 notably, in the excises of the Low Countries; and, in some degree, in
 the subsidies of England. For you must note, that we speak now of the
 heart, and not of the purse. So that although the same tribute and tax,
 laid by consent or by imposing, be all one to the purse, yet it works
 diversely upon the courage. So that you may conclude, that no people
 overcharged with tribute, is fit for empire.
 
 Let states that aim at greatness, take heed how their nobility and
 gentlemen do multiply too fast. For that maketh the common subject, grow
 to be a peasant and base swain, driven out of heart, and in effect but
 the gentleman's laborer. Even as you may see in coppice woods; if you
 leave your staddles too thick, you shall never have clean underwood, but
 shrubs and bushes. So in countries, if the gentlemen be too many,
 the commons will be base; and you will bring it to that, that not the
 hundred poll, will be fit for an helmet; especially as to the infantry,
 which is the nerve of an army; and so there will be great population,
 and little strength. This which I speak of, hath been nowhere better
 seen, than by comparing of England and France; whereof England, though
 far less in territory and population, hath been (nevertheless) an
 overmatch; in regard the middle people of England make good soldiers,
 which the peasants of France do not. And herein the device of king Henry
 the Seventh (whereof I have spoken largely in the History of his Life)
 was profound and admirable; in making farms and houses of husbandry of a
 standard; that is, maintained with such a proportion of land unto them,
 as may breed a subject to live in convenient plenty and no servile
 condition; and to keep the plough in the hands of the owners, and not
 mere hirelings. And thus indeed you shall attain to Virgil's character
 which he gives to ancient Italy:
 
 
 Terra potens armis atque ubere glebae.
 
 Neither is that state (which, for any thing I know, is almost peculiar
 to England, and hardly to be found anywhere else, except it be perhaps
 in Poland) to be passed over; I mean the state of free servants, and
 attendants upon noblemen and gentlemen; which are no ways inferior unto
 the yeomanry for arms. And therefore out of all questions, the splendor
 and magnificence, and great retinues and hospitality, of noblemen
 and gentlemen, received into custom, doth much conduce unto martial
 greatness. Whereas, contrariwise, the close and reserved living of
 noblemen and gentlemen, causeth a penury of military forces.
 
 By all means it is to be procured, that the trunk of Nebuchadnezzar's
 tree of monarchy, be great enough to bear the branches and the boughs;
 that is, that the natural subjects of the crown or state, bear
 a sufficient proportion to the stranger subjects, that they
 govern. Therefore all states that are liberal of naturalization towards
 strangers, are fit for empire. For to think that an handful of people
 can, with the greatest courage and policy in the world, embrace too
 large extent of dominion, it may hold for a time, but it will fail
 suddenly. The Spartans were a nice people in point of naturalization;
 whereby, while they kept their compass, they stood firm; but when they
 did spread, and their boughs were becomen too great for their stem, they
 became a windfall, upon the sudden. Never any state was in this point so
 open to receive strangers into their body, as were the Romans. Therefore
 it sorted with them accordingly; for they grew to the greatest monarchy.
 Their manner was to grant naturalization (which they called jus
 civitatis), and to grant it in the highest degree; that is, not only jus
 commercii, jus connubii, jus haereditatis; but also jus suffragii, and
 jus honorum. And this not to singular persons alone, but likewise to
 whole families; yea to cities, and sometimes to nations. Add to this
 their custom of plantation of colonies; whereby the Roman plant was
 removed into the soil of other nations. And putting both constitutions
 together, you will say that it was not the Romans that spread upon the
 world, but it was the world that spread upon the Romans; and that was
 the sure way of greatness. I have marvelled, sometimes, at Spain,
 how they clasp and contain so large dominions, with so few natural
 Spaniards; but sure the whole compass of Spain, is a very great body of
 a tree; far above Rome and Sparta at the first. And besides, though they
 have not had that usage, to naturalize liberally, yet they have that
 which is next to it; that is, to employ, almost indifferently, all
 nations in their militia of ordinary soldiers; yea, and sometimes
 in their highest commands. Nay, it seemeth at this instant they are
 sensible, of this want of natives; as by the Pragmatical Sanction, now
 published, appeareth.
 
 It is certain that sedentary, and within-door arts, and delicate
 manufactures (that require rather the finger than the arm), have, in
 their nature, a contrariety to a military disposition. And generally,
 all warlike people are a little idle, and love danger better than
 travail. Neither must they be too much broken of it, if they shall be
 preserved in vigor. Therefore it was great advantage, in the ancient
 states of Sparta, Athens, Rome, and others, that they had the use
 of slaves, which commonly did rid those manufactures. But that is
 abolished, in greatest part, by the Christian law. That which cometh
 nearest to it, is to leave those arts chiefly to strangers (which, for
 that purpose, are the more easily to be received), and to contain
 the principal bulk of the vulgar natives, within those three
 kinds,--tillers of the ground; free servants; and handicraftsmen of
 strong and manly arts, as smiths, masons, carpenters, etc.; not
 reckoning professed soldiers.
 
 But above all, for empire and greatness, it importeth most, that a
 nation do profess arms, as their principal honor, study, and occupation.
 For the things which we formerly have spoken of, are but habilitations
 towards arms; and what is habilitation without intention and act?
 Romulus, after his death (as they report or feign), sent a present
 to the Romans, that above all, they should intend arms; and then they
 should prove the greatest empire of the world. The fabric of the state
 of Sparta was wholly (though not wisely) framed and composed, to that
 scope and end. The Persians and Macedonians had it for a flash. The
 Gauls, Germans, Goths, Saxons, Normans, and others, had it for a time.
 The Turks have it at this day, though in great declination. Of Christian
 Europe, they that have it are, in effect, only the Spaniards. But it is
 so plain, that every man profiteth in that, he most intendeth, that
 it needeth not to be stood upon. It is enough to point at it; that no
 nation which doth not directly profess arms, may look to have greatness
 fall into their mouths. And on the other side, it is a most certain
 oracle of time, that those states that continue long in that profession
 (as the Romans and Turks principally have done) do wonders. And those
 that have professed arms but for an age, have, notwithstanding, commonly
 attained that greatness, in that age, which maintained them long after,
 when their profession and exercise of arms hath grown to decay.
 
 Incident to this point is, for a state to have those laws or customs,
 which may reach forth unto them just occasions (as may be pretended)
 of war. For there is that justice, imprinted in the nature of men, that
 they enter not upon wars (whereof so many calamities do ensue) but upon
 some, at the least specious, grounds and quarrels. The Turk hath at
 hand, for cause of war, the propagation of his law or sect; a quarrel
 that he may always command. The Romans, though they esteemed the
 extending the limits of their empire, to be great honor to their
 generals, when it was done, yet they never rested upon that alone, to
 begin a war. First, therefore, let nations that pretend to greatness
 have this; that they be sensible of wrongs, either upon borderers,
 merchants, or politic ministers; and that they sit not too long upon
 a provocation. Secondly, let them be prest, and ready to give aids
 and succors, to their confederates; as it ever was with the Romans;
 insomuch, as if the confederate had leagues defensive, with divers other
 states, and, upon invasion offered, did implore their aids severally,
 yet the Romans would ever be the foremost, and leave it to none other to
 have the honor. As for the wars which were anciently made, on the behalf
 of a kind of party, or tacit conformity of estate, I do not see how they
 may be well justified: as when the Romans made a war, for the liberty of
 Grecia; or when the Lacedaemonians and Athenians, made wars to set up
 or pull down democracies and oligarchies; or when wars were made by
 foreigners, under the pretence of justice or protection, to deliver the
 subjects of others, from tyranny and oppression; and the like. Let it
 suffice, that no estate expect to be great, that is not awake upon any
 just occasion of arming.
 
 No body can be healthful without exercise, neither natural body nor
 politic; and certainly to a kingdom or estate, a just and honorable war,
 is the true exercise. A civil war, indeed, is like the heat of a fever;
 but a foreign war is like the heat of exercise, and serveth to keep the
 body in health; for in a slothful peace, both courages will effeminate,
 and manners corrupt. But howsoever it be for happiness, without all
 question, for greatness, it maketh to be still for the most part in
 arms; and the strength of a veteran army (though it be a chargeable
 business) always on foot, is that which commonly giveth the law, or at
 least the reputation, amongst all neighbor states; as may well be seen
 in Spain, which hath had, in one part or other, a veteran army almost
 continually, now by the space of six score years.
 
 To be master of the sea, is an abridgment of a monarchy. Cicero, writing
 to Atticus of Pompey his preparation against Caesar, saith, Consilium
 Pompeii plane Themistocleum est; putat enim, qui mari potitur, eum rerum
 potiri. And, without doubt, Pompey had tired out Caesar, if upon vain
 confidence, he had not left that way. We see the great effects of
 battles by sea. The battle of Actium, decided the empire of the world.
 The battle of Lepanto, arrested the greatness of the Turk. There be many
 examples, where sea-fights have been final to the war; but this is when
 princes or states have set up their rest, upon the battles. But thus
 much is certain, that he that commands the sea, is at great liberty, and
 may take as much, and as little, of the war as he will. Whereas those
 that be strongest by land, are many times nevertheless in great straits.
 Surely, at this day, with us of Europe, the vantage of strength at sea
 (which is one of the principal dowries of this kingdom of Great Britain)
 is great; both because most of the kingdoms of Europe, are not merely
 inland, but girt with the sea most part of their compass; and because
 the wealth of both Indies seems in great part, but an accessory to the
 command of the seas.
 
 The wars of latter ages seem to be made in the dark, in respect of the
 glory, and honor, which reflected upon men from the wars, in ancient
 time. There be now, for martial encouragement, some degrees and orders
 of chivalry; which nevertheless are conferred promiscuously, upon
 soldiers and no soldiers; and some remembrance perhaps, upon the
 scutcheon; and some hospitals for maimed soldiers; and such like
 things. But in ancient times, the trophies erected upon the place of the
 victory; the funeral laudatives and monuments for those that died in the
 wars; the crowns and garlands personal; the style of emperor, which the
 great kings of the world after borrowed; the triumphs of the generals,
 upon their return; the great donatives and largesses, upon the
 disbanding of the armies; were things able to inflame all men's
 courages. But above all, that of the triumph, amongst the Romans, was
 not pageants or gaudery, but one of the wisest and noblest institutions,
 that ever was. For it contained three things: honor to the general;
 riches to the treasury out of the spoils; and donatives to the army.
 But that honor, perhaps were not fit for monarchies; except it be in the
 person of the monarch himself, or his sons; as it came to pass in the
 times of the Roman emperors, who did impropriate the actual triumphs to
 themselves, and their sons, for such wars as they did achieve in person;
 and left only, for wars achieved by subjects, some triumphal garments
 and ensigns to the general.
 
 To conclude: no man can by care taking (as the Scripture saith) add a
 cubit to his stature, in this little model of a man's body; but in the
 great frame of kingdoms and commonwealths, it is in the power of princes
 or estates, to add amplitude and greatness to their kingdoms; for by
 introducing such ordinances, constitutions, and customs, as we have now
 touched, they may sow greatness to their posterity and succession. But
 these things are commonly not observed, but left to take their chance.
 
 
 
 
 Of Regiment Of Health
 
 
 THERE is a wisdom in this; beyond the rules of physic: a man's own
 observation, what he finds good of, and what he finds hurt of, is the
 best physic to preserve health. But it is a safer conclusion to say,
 This agreeth not well with me, therefore, I will not continue it; than
 this, I find no offence of this, therefore I may use it. For strength of
 nature in youth, passeth over many excesses, which are owing a man till
 his age. Discern of the coming on of years, and think not to do the same
 things still; for age will not be defied. Beware of sudden change, in
 any great point of diet, and, if necessity enforce it, fit the rest to
 it. For it is a secret both in nature and state, that it is safer
 to change many things, than one. Examine thy customs of diet, sleep,
 exercise, apparel, and the like; and try, in any thing thou shalt judge
 hurtful, to discontinue it, by little and little; but so, as if thou
 dost find any inconvenience by the change, thou come back to it again:
 for it is hard to distinguish that which is generally held good and
 wholesome, from that which is good particularly, and fit for thine own
 body. To be free-minded and cheerfully disposed, at hours of meat, and
 of sleep, and of exercise, is one of the best precepts of long lasting.
 As for the passions, and studies of the mind; avoid envy, anxious
 fears; anger fretting inwards; subtle and knotty inquisitions; joys
 and exhilarations in excess; sadness not communicated. Entertain hopes;
 mirth rather than joy; variety of delights, rather than surfeit of them;
 wonder and admiration, and therefore novelties; studies that fill the
 mind with splendid and illustrious objects, as histories, fables, and
 contemplations of nature. If you fly physic in health altogether, it
 will be too strange for your body, when you shall need it. If you make
 it too familiar, it will work no extraordinary effect, when sickness
 cometh. I commend rather some diet for certain seasons, than frequent
 use of physic, except it be grown into a custom. For those diets alter
 the body more, and trouble it less. Despise no new accident in your
 body, but ask opinion of it. In sickness, respect health principally;
 and in health, action. For those that put their bodies to endure in
 health, may in most sicknesses, which are not very sharp, be cured
 only with diet, and tendering. Celsus could never have spoken it as a
 physician, had he not been a wise man withal, when he giveth it for one
 of the great precepts of health and lasting, that a man do vary, and
 interchange contraries, but with an inclination to the more benign
 extreme: use fasting and full eating, but rather full eating; watching
 and sleep, but rather sleep; sitting and exercise, but rather exercise;
 and the like. So shall nature be cherished, and yet taught masteries.
 Physicians are, some of them, so pleasing and conformable to the humor
 of the patient, as they press not the true cure of the disease; and some
 other are so regular, in proceeding according to art for the disease, as
 they respect not sufficiently the condition of the patient. Take one of
 a middle temper; or if it may not be found in one man, combine two of
 either sort; and forget not to call as well, the best acquainted with
 your body, as the best reputed of for his faculty.
 
 
 
 
 Of Suspicion
 
 
 SUSPICIONS amongst thoughts, are like bats amongst birds, they ever
 fly by twilight. Certainly they are to be repressed, or at least well
 guarded: for they cloud the mind; they leese friends; and they check
 with business, whereby business cannot go on currently and constantly.
 They dispose kings to tyranny, husbands to jealousy, wise men to
 irresolution and melancholy. They are defects, not in the heart, but
 in the brain; for they take place in the stoutest natures; as in the
 example of Henry the Seventh of England. There was not a more suspicious
 man, nor a more stout. And in such a composition they do small hurt. For
 commonly they are not admitted, but with examination, whether they be
 likely or no. But in fearful natures they gain ground too fast. There
 is nothing makes a man suspect much, more than to know little; and
 therefore men should remedy suspicion, by procuring to know more, and
 not to keep their suspicions in smother. What would men have? Do they
 think, those they employ and deal with, are saints? Do they not think,
 they will have their own ends, and be truer to themselves, than to
 them? Therefore there is no better way, to moderate suspicions, than to
 account upon such suspicions as true, and yet to bridle them as false.
 For so far a man ought to make use of suspicions, as to provide, as
 if that should be true, that he suspects, yet it may do him no hurt.
 Suspicions that the mind of itself gathers, are but buzzes; but
 suspicions that are artificially nourished, and put into men's heads,
 by the tales and whisperings of others, have stings. Certainly, the best
 mean, to clear the way in this same wood of suspicions, is frankly to
 communicate them with the party, that he suspects; for thereby he shall
 be sure to know more of the truth of them, than he did before; and
 withal shall make that party more circumspect, not to give further cause
 of suspicion. But this would not be done to men of base natures; for
 they, if they find themselves once suspected, will never be true.
 The Italian says, Sospetto licentia fede; as if suspicion, did give
 a passport to faith; but it ought, rather, to kindle it to discharge
 itself.
 
 
 
 
 Of Discourse
 
 
 SOME, in their discourse, desire rather commendation of wit, in being
 able to hold all arguments, than of judgment, in discerning what is
 true; as if it were a praise, to know what might be said, and not, what
 should be thought. Some have certain common places, and themes, wherein
 they are good and want variety; which kind of poverty is for the most
 part tedious, and when it is once perceived, ridiculous. The honorablest
 part of talk, is to give the occasion; and again to moderate, and
 pass to somewhat else; for then a man leads the dance. It is good, in
 discourse and speech of conversation, to vary and intermingle speech
 of the present occasion, with arguments, tales with reasons, asking of
 questions, with telling of opinions, and jest with earnest: for it is a
 dull thing to tire, and, as we say now, to jade, any thing too far. As
 for jest, there be certain things, which ought to be privileged from
 it; namely, religion, matters of state, great persons, any man's present
 business of importance, and any case that deserveth pity. Yet there
 be some, that think their wits have been asleep, except they dart out
 somewhat that is piquant, and to the quick. That is a vein which would
 be bridled:
 
 
 Parce, puer, stimulis, et fortius utere loris.
 
 
 And generally, men ought to find the difference, between saltness and
 bitterness. Certainly, he that hath a satirical vein, as he maketh
 others afraid of his wit, so he had need be afraid of others' memory.
 He that questioneth much, shall learn much, and content much; but
 especially, if he apply his questions to the skill of the persons whom
 he asketh; for he shall give them occasion, to please themselves in
 speaking, and himself shall continually gather knowledge. But let his
 questions not be troublesome; for that is fit for a poser. And let him
 be sure to leave other men, their turns to speak. Nay, if there be any,
 that would reign and take up all the time, let him find means to take
 them off, and to bring others on; as musicians use to do, with those
 that dance too long galliards. If you dissemble, sometimes, your
 knowledge of that you are thought to know, you shall be thought, another
 time, to know that you know not. Speech of a man's self ought to be
 seldom, and well chosen. I knew one, was wont to say in scorn, He must
 needs be a wise man, he speaks so much of himself: and there is but one
 case, wherein a man may commend himself with good grace; and that is
 in commending virtue in another; especially if it be such a virtue,
 whereunto himself pretendeth. Speech of touch towards others, should
 be sparingly used; for discourse ought to be as a field, without coming
 home to any man. I knew two noblemen, of the west part of England,
 whereof the one was given to scoff, but kept ever royal cheer in his
 house; the other would ask, of those that had been at the other's table,
 Tell truly, was there never a flout or dry blow given? To which the
 guest would answer, Such and such a thing passed. The lord would say, I
 thought, he would mar a good dinner. Discretion of speech, is more than
 eloquence; and to speak agreeably to him, with whom we deal, is more
 than to speak in good words, or in good order. A good continued speech,
 without a good speech of interlocution, shows slowness: and a good reply
 or second speech, without a good settled speech, showeth shallowness
 and weakness. As we see in beasts, that those that are weakest in the
 course, are yet nimblest in the turn; as it is betwixt the greyhound and
 the hare. To use too many circumstances, ere one come to the matter, is
 wearisome; to use none at all, is blunt.
 
 
 
 
 Of Plantations
 
 
 PLANTATIONS are amongst ancient, primitive, and heroical works. When the
 world was young, it begat more children; but now it is old, it begets
 fewer: for I may justly account new plantations, to be the children
 of former kingdoms. I like a plantation in a pure soil; that is, where
 people are not displanted, to the end, to plant in others. For else it
 is rather an extirpation, than a plantation. Planting of countries, is
 like planting of woods; for you must make account to leese almost twenty
 years' profit, and expect your recompense in the end. For the principal
 thing, that hath been the destruction of most plantations, hath been the
 base and hasty drawing of profit, in the first years. It is true, speedy
 profit is not to be neglected, as far as may stand with the good of the
 plantation, but no further. It is a shameful and unblessed thing, to
 take the scum of people, and wicked condemned men, to be the people with
 whom you plant; and not only so, but it spoileth the plantation; for
 they will ever live like rogues, and not fall to work, but be lazy, and
 do mischief, and spend victuals, and be quickly weary, and then certify
 over to their country, to the discredit of the plantation. The people
 wherewith you plant ought to be gardeners, ploughmen, laborers, smiths,
 carpenters, joiners, fishermen, fowlers, with some few apothecaries,
 surgeons, cooks, and bakers. In a country of plantation, first look
 about, what kind of victual the country yields of itself to hand; as
 chestnuts, walnuts, pineapples, olives, dates, plums, cherries, wild
 honey, and the like; and make use of them. Then consider what victual or
 esculent things there are, which grow speedily, and within the year; as
 parsnips, carrots, turnips, onions, radish, artichokes of Hierusalem,
 maize, and the like. For wheat, barley, and oats, they ask too much
 labor; but with pease and beans you may begin, both because they ask
 less labor, and because they serve for meat, as well as for bread. And
 of rice, likewise cometh a great increase, and it is a kind of meat.
 Above all, there ought to be brought store of biscuit, oat-meal, flour,
 meal, and the like, in the beginning, till bread may be had. For beasts,
 or birds, take chiefly such as are least subject to diseases, and
 multiply fastest; as swine, goats, cocks, hens, turkeys, geese,
 house-doves, and the like. The victual in plantations, ought to be
 expended almost as in a besieged town; that is, with certain allowance.
 And let the main part of the ground, employed to gardens or corn, be to
 a common stock; and to be laid in, and stored up, and then delivered out
 in proportion; besides some spots of ground, that any particular person
 will manure for his own private. Consider likewise what commodities, the
 soil where the plantation is, doth naturally yield, that they may some
 way help to defray the charge of the plantation (so it be not, as was
 said, to the untimely prejudice of the main business), as it hath fared
 with tobacco in Virginia. Wood commonly aboundeth but too much; and
 therefore timber is fit to be one. If there be iron ore, and streams
 whereupon to set the mills, iron is a brave commodity where wood
 aboundeth. Making of bay-salt, if the climate be proper for it, would
 be put in experience. Growing silk likewise, if any be, is a likely
 commodity. Pitch and tar, where store of firs and pines are, will not
 fail. So drugs and sweet woods, where they are, cannot but yield great
 profit. Soap-ashes likewise, and other things that may be thought
 of. But moil not too much under ground; for the hope of mines is very
 uncertain, and useth to make the planters lazy, in other things. For
 government; let it be in the hands of one, assisted with some counsel;
 and let them have commission to exercise martial laws, with some
 limitation. And above all, let men make that profit, of being in the
 wilderness, as they have God always, and his service, before their
 eyes. Let not the government of the plantation, depend upon too many
 counsellors, and undertakers, in the country that planteth, but upon a
 temperate number; and let those be rather noblemen and gentlemen, than
 merchants; for they look ever to the present gain. Let there be freedom
 from custom, till the plantation be of strength; and not only freedom
 from custom, but freedom to carry their commodities, where they may make
 their best of them, except there be some special cause of caution. Cram
 not in people, by sending too fast company after company; but rather
 harken how they waste, and send supplies proportionably; but so, as
 the number may live well in the plantation, and not by surcharge be
 in penury. It hath been a great endangering to the health of some
 plantations, that they have built along the sea and rivers, in marish
 and unwholesome grounds. Therefore, though you begin there, to avoid
 carriage and like discommodities, yet build still rather upwards from
 the streams, than along. It concerneth likewise the health of the
 plantation, that they have good store of salt with them, that they may
 use it in their victuals, when it shall be necessary. If you plant where
 savages are, do not only entertain them, with trifles and gingles, but
 use them justly and graciously, with sufficient guard nevertheless; and
 do not win their favor, by helping them to invade their enemies, but for
 their defence it is not amiss; and send oft of them, over to the country
 that plants, that they may see a better condition than their own, and
 commend it when they return. When the plantation grows to strength, then
 it is time to plant with women, as well as with men; that the plantation
 may spread into generations, and not be ever pieced from without. It is
 the sinfullest thing in the world, to forsake or destitute a plantation
 once in forwardness; for besides the dishonor, it is the guiltiness of
 blood of many commiserable persons.
 
 
 
 
 Of Riches
 
 
 I CANNOT call riches better than the baggage of virtue. The Roman word
 is better, impedimenta. For as the baggage is to an army, so is riches
 to virtue. It cannot be spared, nor left behind, but it hindereth the
 march; yea, and the care of it, sometimes loseth or disturbeth the
 victory. Of great riches there is no real use, except it be in the
 distribution; the rest is but conceit. So saith Solomon, Where much is,
 there are many to consume it; and what hath the owner, but the sight of
 it with his eyes? The personal fruition in any man, cannot reach to
 feel great riches: there is a custody of them; or a power of dole, and
 donative of them; or a fame of them; but no solid use to the owner.
 Do you not see what feigned prices, are set upon little stones and
 rarities? and what works of ostentation are undertaken, because there
 might seem to be some use of great riches? But then you will say, they
 may be of use, to buy men out of dangers or troubles. As Solomon saith,
 Riches are as a strong hold, in the imagination of the rich man. But
 this is excellently expressed, that it is in imagination, and not always
 in fact. For certainly great riches, have sold more men, than they have
 bought out. Seek not proud riches, but such as thou mayest get justly,
 use soberly, distribute cheerfully, and leave contentedly. Yet have no
 abstract nor friarly contempt of them. But distinguish, as Cicero saith
 well of Rabirius Posthumus, In studio rei amplificandae apparebat, non
 avaritiae praedam, sed instrumentum bonitati quaeri. Harken also to
 Solomon, and beware of hasty gathering of riches; Qui festinat ad
 divitias, non erit insons. The poets feign, that when Plutus (which is
 Riches) is sent from Jupiter, he limps and goes slowly; but when he
 is sent from Pluto, he runs, and is swift of foot. Meaning that riches
 gotten by good means, and just labor, pace slowly; but when they come
 by the death of others (as by the course of inheritance, testaments,
 and the like), they come tumbling upon a man. But it mought be applied
 likewise to Pluto, taking him for the devil. For when riches come from
 the devil (as by fraud and oppression, and unjust means), they come upon
 speed. The ways to enrich are many, and most of them foul. Parsimony is
 one of the best, and yet is not innocent; for it withholdeth men from
 works of liberality and charity. The improvement of the ground, is the
 most natural obtaining of riches; for it is our great mother's blessing,
 the earth's; but it is slow. And yet where men of great wealth do stoop
 to husbandry, it multiplieth riches exceedingly. I knew a nobleman in
 England, that had the greatest audits of any man in my time; a great
 grazier, a great sheep-master, a great timber man, a great collier, a
 great corn-master, a great lead-man, and so of iron, and a number of
 the like points of husbandry. So as the earth seemed a sea to him, in
 respect of the perpetual importation. It was truly observed by one, that
 himself came very hardly, to a little riches, and very easily, to great
 riches. For when a man's stock is come to that, that he can expect the
 prime of markets, and overcome those bargains, which for their greatness
 are few men's money, and be partner in the industries of younger men, he
 cannot but increase mainly. The gains of ordinary trades and vocations
 are honest; and furthered by two things chiefly: by diligence, and by a
 good name, for good and fair dealing. But the gains of bargains, are
 of a more doubtful nature; when men shall wait upon others' necessity,
 broke by servants and instruments to draw them on, put off others
 cunningly, that would be better chapmen, and the like practices, which
 are crafty and naught. As for the chopping of bargains, when a man buys
 not to hold but to sell over again, that commonly grindeth double, both
 upon the seller, and upon the buyer. Sharings do greatly enrich, if the
 hands be well chosen, that are trusted. Usury is the certainest means of
 gain, though one of the worst; as that whereby a man doth eat his bread,
 in sudore vultus alieni; and besides, doth plough upon Sundays. But yet
 certain though it be, it hath flaws; for that the scriveners and brokers
 do value unsound men, to serve their own turn. The fortune in being
 the first, in an invention or in a privilege, doth cause sometimes a
 wonderful overgrowth in riches; as it was with the first sugar man, in
 the Canaries. Therefore if a man can play the true logician, to have as
 well judgment, as invention, he may do great matters; especially if the
 times be fit. He that resteth upon gains certain, shall hardly grow
 to great riches; and he that puts all upon adventures, doth oftentimes
 break and come to poverty: it is good, therefore, to guard adventures
 with certainties, that may uphold losses. Monopolies, and coemption of
 wares for re-sale, where they are not restrained, are great means to
 enrich; especially if the party have intelligence, what things are like
 to come into request, and so store himself beforehand. Riches gotten
 by service, though it be of the best rise, yet when they are gotten
 by flattery, feeding humors, and other servile conditions, they may
 be placed amongst the worst. As for fishing for testaments and
 executorships (as Tacitus saith of Seneca, testamenta et orbos tamquam
 indagine capi), it is yet worse; by how much men submit themselves to
 meaner persons, than in service. Believe not much, them that seem to
 despise riches; for they despise them, that despair of them; and none
 worse, when they come to them. Be not penny-wise; riches have wings,
 and sometimes they fly away of themselves, sometimes they must be
 set flying, to bring in more. Men leave their riches, either to their
 kindred, or to the public; and moderate portions, prosper best in both.
 A great state left to an heir, is as a lure to all the birds of prey
 round about, to seize on him, if he be not the better stablished in
 years and judgment. Likewise glorious gifts and foundations, are like
 sacrifices without salt; and but the painted sepulchres of alms, which
 soon will putrefy, and corrupt inwardly. Therefore measure not thine
 advancements, by quantity, but frame them by measure: and defer not
 charities till death; for, certainly, if a man weigh it rightly, he that
 doth so, is rather liberal of another man's, than of his own.
 
 
 
 
 Of Prophecies
 
 
 I MEAN not to speak of divine prophecies; nor of heathen oracles; nor
 of natural predictions; but only of prophecies that have been of certain
 memory, and from hidden causes. Saith the Pythonissa to Saul, To-morrow
 thou and thy son shall be with me. Homer hath these verses:
 
 
 At domus AEneae cunctis dominabitur oris, Et nati natorum, et qui
 nascentur ab illis.
 
 
 A prophecy, as it seems, of the Roman empire. Seneca the tragedian hath
 these verses:
 
 
        --Venient annis
      Saecula seris, quibus Oceanus
      Vincula rerum laxet, et ingens
      Pateat Tellus, Tiphysque novos
      Detegat orbes; nec sit terris
      Ultima Thule:
 
 
 a prophecy of the discovery of America. The daughter of Polycrates,
 dreamed that Jupiter bathed her father, and Apollo anointed him; and it
 came to pass, that he was crucified in an open place, where the sun
 made his body run with sweat, and the rain washed it. Philip of Macedon
 dreamed, he sealed up his wife's belly; whereby he did expound it, that
 his wife should be barren; but Aristander the soothsayer, told him his
 wife was with child, because men do not use to seal vessels, that are
 empty. A phantasm that appeared to M. Brutus, in his tent, said to him,
 Philippis iterum me videbis. Tiberius said to Galba, Tu quoque, Galba,
 degustabis imperium. In Vespasian's time, there went a prophecy in the
 East, that those that should come forth of Judea, should reign over
 the world: which though it may be was meant of our Savior; yet Tacitus
 expounds it of Vespasian. Domitian dreamed, the night before he was
 slain, that a golden head was growing, out of the nape of his neck: and
 indeed, the succession that followed him for many years, made golden
 times. Henry the Sixth of England, said of Henry the Seventh, when he
 was a lad, and gave him water, This is the lad that shall enjoy the
 crown, for which we strive. When I was in France, I heard from one Dr.
 Pena, that the Queen Mother, who was given to curious arts, caused the
 King her husband's nativity to be calculated, under a false name; and
 the astrologer gave a judgment, that he should be killed in a duel; at
 which the Queen laughed, thinking her husband to be above challenges
 and duels: but he was slain upon a course at tilt, the splinters of the
 staff of Montgomery going in at his beaver. The trivial prophecy, which
 I heard when I was a child, and Queen Elizabeth was in the flower of her
 years, was,
 
 
      When hempe is spun
 
      England's done:
 
 whereby it was generally conceived, that after the princes had reigned,
 which had the principal letters of that word hempe (which were Henry,
 Edward, Mary, Philip, and Elizabeth), England should come to utter
 confusion; which, thanks be to God, is verified only in the change of
 the name; for that the King's style, is now no more of England but of
 Britain. There was also another prophecy, before the year of '88, which
 I do not well understand.
 
 
      There shall be seen upon a day,
      Between the Baugh and the May,
      The black fleet of Norway.
      When that that is come and gone,
      England build houses of lime and stone,
      For after wars shall you have none.
 
 
 It was generally conceived to be meant, of the Spanish fleet that came
 in '88: for that the king of Spain's surname, as they say, is Norway.
 The prediction of Regiomontanus,
 
 
      Octogesimus octavus mirabilis annus,
 
 
 was thought likewise accomplished in the sending of that great fleet,
 being the greatest in strength, though not in number, of all that ever
 swam upon the sea. As for Cleon's dream, I think it was a jest. It was,
 that he was devoured of a long dragon; and it was expounded of a maker
 of sausages, that troubled him exceedingly. There are numbers of
 the like kind; especially if you include dreams, and predictions of
 astrology. But I have set down these few only, of certain credit, for
 example. My judgment is, that they ought all to be despised; and
 ought to serve but for winter talk by the fireside. Though when I say
 despised, I mean it as for belief; for otherwise, the spreading, or
 publishing, of them, is in no sort to be despised. For they have done
 much mischief; and I see many severe laws made, to suppress them. That
 that hath given them grace, and some credit, consisteth in three things.
 First, that men mark when they hit, and never mark when they miss;
 as they do generally also of dreams. The second is, that probable
 conjectures, or obscure traditions, many times turn themselves into
 prophecies; while the nature of man, which coveteth divination, thinks
 it no peril to foretell that which indeed they do but collect. As that
 of Seneca's verse. For so much was then subject to demonstration, that
 the globe of the earth had great parts beyond the Atlantic, which
 mought be probably conceived not to be all sea: and adding thereto the
 tradition in Plato's Timaeus, and his Atlanticus, it mought encourage
 one to turn it to a prediction. The third and last (which is the great
 one) is, that almost all of them, being infinite in number, have been
 impostures, and by idle and crafty brains merely contrived and feigned,
 after the event past.
 
 
 
 
 Of Ambition
 
 
 AMBITION is like choler; which is an humor that maketh men active,
 earnest, full of alacrity, and stirring, if it be not stopped. But if
 it be stopped, and cannot have his way, it becometh adust, and thereby
 malign and venomous. So ambitious men, if they find the way open
 for their rising, and still get forward, they are rather busy than
 dangerous; but if they be checked in their desires, they become secretly
 discontent, and look upon men and matters with an evil eye, and are
 best pleased, when things go backward; which is the worst property in a
 servant of a prince, or state. Therefore it is good for princes, if they
 use ambitious men, to handle it, so as they be still progressive and
 not retrograde; which, because it cannot be without inconvenience, it
 is good not to use such natures at all. For if they rise not with their
 service, they will take order, to make their service fall with them. But
 since we have said, it were good not to use men of ambitious natures,
 except it be upon necessity, it is fit we speak, in what cases they are
 of necessity. Good commanders in the wars must be taken, be they never
 so ambitious; for the use of their service, dispenseth with the rest;
 and to take a soldier without ambition, is to pull off his spurs. There
 is also great use of ambitious men, in being screens to princes in
 matters of danger and envy; for no man will take that part, except he be
 like a seeled dove, that mounts and mounts, because he cannot see about
 him. There is use also of ambitious men, in pulling down the greatness
 of any subject that overtops; as Tiberius used Marco, in the pulling
 down of Sejanus. Since, therefore, they must be used in such cases,
 there resteth to speak, how they are to be bridled, that they may be
 less dangerous. There is less danger of them, if they be of mean birth,
 than if they be noble; and if they be rather harsh of nature, than
 gracious and popular: and if they be rather new raised, than grown
 cunning, and fortified, in their greatness. It is counted by some, a
 weakness in princes, to have favorites; but it is, of all others,
 the best remedy against ambitious great-ones. For when the way of
 pleasuring, and displeasuring, lieth by the favorite, it is impossible
 any other should be overgreat. Another means to curb them, is to balance
 them by others, as proud as they. But then there must be some middle
 counsellors, to keep things steady; for without that ballast, the ship
 will roll too much. At the least, a prince may animate and inure some
 meaner persons, to be as it were scourges, to ambitious men. As for the
 having of them obnoxious to ruin; if they be of fearful natures, it
 may do well; but if they be stout and daring, it may precipitate their
 designs, and prove dangerous. As for the pulling of them down, if the
 affairs require it, and that it may not be done with safety suddenly,
 the only way is the interchange, continually, of favors and disgraces;
 whereby they may not know what to expect, and be, as it were, in a
 wood. Of ambitions, it is less harmful, the ambition to prevail in
 great things, than that other, to appear in every thing; for that breeds
 confusion, and mars business. But yet it is less danger, to have an
 ambitious man stirring in business, than great in dependences. He that
 seeketh to be eminent amongst able men, hath a great task; but that
 is ever good for the public. But he, that plots to be the only figure
 amongst ciphers, is the decay of a whole age. Honor hath three things in
 it: the vantage ground to do good; the approach to kings and principal
 persons; and the raising of a man's own fortunes. He that hath the
 best of these intentions, when he aspireth, is an honest man; and that
 prince, that can discern of these intentions in another that aspireth,
 is a wise prince. Generally, let princes and states choose such
 ministers, as are more sensible of duty than of using; and such as love
 business rather upon conscience, than upon bravery, and let them discern
 a busy nature, from a willing mind.
 
 
 
 
 Of Masques And Triumphs
 
 
 THESE things are but toys, to come amongst such serious observations.
 But yet, since princes will have such things, it is better they should
 be graced with elegancy, than daubed with cost. Dancing to song, is a
 thing of great state and pleasure. I understand it, that the song be
 in quire, placed aloft, and accompanied with some broken music; and the
 ditty fitted to the device. Acting in song, especially in dialogues,
 hath an extreme good grace; I say acting, not dancing (for that is a
 mean and vulgar thing); and the voices of the dialogue would be strong
 and manly (a base and a tenor; no treble); and the ditty high and
 tragical; not nice or dainty. Several quires, placed one over against
 another, and taking the voice by catches, anthem-wise, give great
 pleasure. Turning dances into figure, is a childish curiosity. And
 generally let it be noted, that those things which I here set down, are
 such as do naturally take the sense, and not respect petty wonderments.
 It is true, the alterations of scenes, so it be quietly and without
 noise, are things of great beauty and pleasure; for they feed and
 relieve the eye, before it be full of the same object. Let the scenes
 abound with light, specially colored and varied; and let the masquers,
 or any other, that are to come down from the scene, have some motions
 upon the scene itself, before their coming down; for it draws the eye
 strangely, and makes it, with great pleasure, to desire to see, that it
 cannot perfectly discern. Let the songs be loud and cheerful, and not
 chirpings or pulings. Let the music likewise be sharp and loud, and well
 placed. The colors that show best by candle-light are white, carnation,
 and a kind of sea-water-green; and oes, or spangs, as they are of no
 great cost, so they are of most glory. As for rich embroidery, it is
 lost and not discerned. Let the suits of the masquers be graceful, and
 such as become the person, when the vizors are off; not after examples
 of known attires; Turke, soldiers, mariners', and the like. Let
 anti-masques not be long; they have been commonly of fools, satyrs,
 baboons, wild-men, antics, beasts, sprites, witches, Ethiops, pigmies,
 turquets, nymphs, rustics, Cupids, statuas moving, and the like. As
 for angels, it is not comical enough, to put them in anti-masques; and
 anything that is hideous, as devils, giants, is on the other side as
 unfit. But chiefly, let the music of them be recreative, and with some
 strange changes. Some sweet odors suddenly coming forth, without any
 drops falling, are, in such a company as there is steam and heat, things
 of great pleasure and refreshment. Double masques, one of men, another
 of ladies, addeth state and variety. But all is nothing except the room
 be kept clear and neat.
 
 For justs, and tourneys, and barriers; the glories of them are chiefly
 in the chariots, wherein the challengers make their entry; especially
 if they be drawn with strange beasts: as lions, bears, camels, and the
 like; or in the devices of their entrance; or in the bravery of their
 liveries; or in the goodly furniture of their horses and armor. But
 enough of these toys.
 
 
 
 
 Of Nature In Men
 
 
 NATURE is often hidden; sometimes overcome; seldom extinguished. Force,
 maketh nature more violent in the return; doctrine and discourse, maketh
 nature less importune; but custom only doth alter and subdue nature. He
 that seeketh victory over his nature, let him not set himself too great,
 nor too small tasks; for the first will make him dejected by often
 failings; and the second will make him a small proceeder, though by
 often prevailings. And at the first let him practise with helps, as
 swimmers do with bladders or rushes; but after a time let him practise
 with disadvantages, as dancers do with thick shoes. For it breeds great
 perfection, if the practice be harder than the use. Where nature is
 mighty, and therefore the victory hard, the degrees had need be, first
 to stay and arrest nature in time; like to him that would say over the
 four and twenty letters when he was angry; then to go less in quantity;
 as if one should, in forbearing wine, come from drinking healths, to a
 draught at a meal; and lastly, to discontinue altogether. But if a man
 have the fortitude, and resolution, to enfranchise himself at once, that
 is the best:
 
 
      Optimus ille animi vindex laedentia pectus
      Vincula qui rupit, dedoluitque semel.
 
 
 Neither is the ancient rule amiss, to bend nature, as a wand, to a
 contrary extreme, whereby to set it right, understanding it, where the
 contrary extreme is no vice. Let not a man force a habit upon himself,
 with a perpetual continuance, but with some intermission. For both the
 pause reinforceth the new onset; and if a man that is not perfect,
 be ever in practice, he shall as well practise his errors, as his
 abilities, and induce one habit of both; and there is no means to help
 this, but by seasonable intermissions. But let not a man trust his
 victory over his nature, too far; for nature will lay buried a great
 time, and yet revive, upon the occasion or temptation. Like as it was
 with AEsop's damsel, turned from a cat to a woman, who sat very demurely
 at the board's end, till a mouse ran before her. Therefore, let a man
 either avoid the occasion altogether; or put himself often to it, that
 he may be little moved with it. A man's nature is best perceived in
 privateness, for there is no affectation; in passion, for that putteth
 a man out of his precepts; and in a new case or experiment, for there
 custom leaveth him. They are happy men, whose natures sort with their
 vocations; otherwise they may say, multum incola fuit anima mea;
 when they converse in those things, they do not affect. In studies,
 whatsoever a man commandeth upon himself, let him set hours for it; but
 whatsoever is agreeable to his nature, let him take no care for any set
 times; for his thoughts will fly to it, of themselves; so as the spaces
 of other business, or studies, will suffice. A man's nature, runs either
 to herbs or weeds; therefore let him seasonably water the one, and
 destroy the other.
 
 
 
 
 Of Custom And Education
 
 
 MEN'S thoughts, are much according to their inclination; their discourse
 and speeches, according to their learning and infused opinions; but
 their deeds, are after as they have been accustomed. And therefore, as
 Machiavel well noteth (though in an evil-favored instance), there is no
 trusting to the force of nature, nor to the bravery of words, except it
 be corroborate by custom. His instance is, that for the achieving of a
 desperate conspiracy, a man should not rest upon the fierceness of any
 man's nature, or his resolute undertakings; but take such an one, as
 hath had his hands formerly in blood. But Machiavel knew not of a Friar
 Clement, nor a Ravillac, nor a Jaureguy, nor a Baltazar Gerard; yet his
 rule holdeth still, that nature, nor the engagement of words, are not so
 forcible, as custom. Only superstition is now so well advanced, that men
 of the first blood, are as firm as butchers by occupation; and votary
 resolution, is made equipollent to custom, even in matter of blood. In
 other things, the predominancy of custom is everywhere visible; insomuch
 as a man would wonder, to hear men profess, protest, engage, give great
 words, and then do, just as they have done before; as if they were dead
 images, and engines moved only by the wheels of custom. We see also the
 reign or tyranny of custom, what it is. The Indians (I mean the sect
 of their wise men) lay themselves quietly upon a stock of wood, and so
 sacrifice themselves by fire. Nay, the wives strive to be burned, with
 the corpses of their husbands. The lads of Sparta, of ancient time,
 were wont to be scourged upon the altar of Diana, without so much as
 queching. I remember, in the beginning of Queen Elizabeth's time of
 England, an Irish rebel condemned, put up a petition to the deputy, that
 he might be hanged in a withe, and not in an halter; because it had been
 so used, with former rebels. There be monks in Russia, for penance, that
 will sit a whole night in a vessel of water, till they be engaged with
 hard ice. Many examples may be put of the force of custom, both upon
 mind and body. Therefore, since custom is the principal magistrate
 of man's life, let men by all means endeavor, to obtain good customs.
 Certainly custom is most perfect, when it beginneth in young years: this
 we call education; which is, in effect, but an early custom. So we see,
 in languages, the tongue is more pliant to all expressions and sounds,
 the joints are more supple, to all feats of activity and motions, in
 youth than afterwards. For it is true, that late learners cannot so
 well take the ply; except it be in some minds, that have not suffered
 themselves to fix, but have kept themselves open, and prepared to
 receive continual amendment, which is exceeding rare. But if the force
 of custom simple and separate, be great, the force of custom copulate
 and conjoined and collegiate, is far greater. For there example
 teacheth, company comforteth, emulation quickeneth, glory raiseth: so as
 in such places the force of custom is in his exaltation. Certainly
 the great multiplication of virtues upon human nature, resteth upon
 societies well ordained and disciplined. For commonwealths, and good
 governments, do nourish virtue grown but do not much mend the deeds.
 But the misery is, that the most effectual means, are now applied to the
 ends, least to be desired.
 
 
 
 
 Of Fortune
 
 
 IT CANNOT be denied, but outward accidents conduce much to fortune;
 favor, opportunity, death of others, occasion fitting virtue. But
 chiefly, the mould of a man's fortune is in his own hands. Faber quisque
 fortunae suae, saith the poet. And the most frequent of external causes
 is, that the folly of one man, is the fortune of another. For no man
 prospers so suddenly, as by others' errors. Serpens nisi serpentem
 comederit non fit draco. Overt and apparent virtues, bring forth praise;
 but there be secret and hidden virtues, that bring forth fortune;
 certain deliveries of a man's self, which have no name. The Spanish
 name, desemboltura, partly expresseth them; when there be not stonds nor
 restiveness in a man's nature; but that the wheels of his mind, keep way
 with the wheels of his fortune. For so Livy (after he had described Cato
 Major in these words, In illo viro tantum robur corporis et animi fuit,
 ut quocunque loco natus esset, fortunam sibi facturus videretur) falleth
 upon that, that he had versatile ingenium. Therefore if a man look
 sharply and attentively, he shall see Fortune: for though she be blind,
 yet she is not invisible. The way of fortune, is like the Milken Way in
 the sky; which is a meeting or knot of a number of small stars; not seen
 asunder, but giving light together. So are there a number of little, and
 scarce discerned virtues, or rather faculties and customs, that make men
 fortunate. The Italians note some of them, such as a man would little
 think. When they speak of one that cannot do amiss, they will throw in,
 into his other conditions, that he hath Poco di matto. And certainly
 there be not two more fortunate properties, than to have a little of the
 fool, and not too much of the honest. Therefore extreme lovers of their
 country or masters, were never fortunate, neither can they be. For when
 a man placeth his thoughts without himself, he goeth not his own way.
 An hasty fortune maketh an enterpriser and remover (the French hath it
 better, entreprenant, or remuant); but the exercised fortune maketh the
 able man. Fortune is to be honored and respected, and it be but for her
 daughters, Confidence and Reputation. For those two, Felicity breedeth;
 the first within a man's self, the latter in others towards him. All
 wise men, to decline the envy of their own virtues, use to ascribe them
 to Providence and Fortune; for so they may the better assume them: and,
 besides, it is greatness in a man, to be the care of the higher powers.
 So Caesar said to the pilot in the tempest, Caesarem portas, et fortunam
 ejus. So Sylla chose the name of Felix, and not of Magnus. And it hath
 been noted, that those who ascribe openly too much to their own wisdom
 and policy, end infortunate. It is written that Timotheus the Athenian,
 after he had, in the account he gave to the state of his government,
 often interlaced this speech, and in this, Fortune had no part, never
 prospered in anything, he undertook afterwards. Certainly there be,
 whose fortunes are like Homer's verses, that have a slide and easiness
 more than the verses of other poets; as Plutarch saith of Timoleon's
 fortune, in respect of that of Agesilaus or Epaminondas. And that this
 should be, no doubt it is much, in a man's self.
 
 
 
 
 Of Usury
 
 
 MANY have made witty invectives against usury. They say that it is a
 pity, the devil should have God's part, which is the tithe. That the
 usurer is the greatest Sabbath-breaker, because his plough goeth every
 Sunday. That the usurer is the drone, that Virgil speaketh of;
 
 
      Ignavum fucos pecus a praesepibus arcent.
 
 That the usurer breaketh the first law, that was made for mankind after
 the fall, which was, in sudore vultus tui comedes panem tuum; not, in
 sudore vultus alieni. That usurers should have orange-tawny bonnets,
 because they do judaize. That it is against nature for money to beget
 money; and the like. I say this only, that usury is a concessum propter
 duritiem cordis; for since there must be borrowing and lending, and
 men are so hard of heart, as they will not lend freely, usury must be
 permitted. Some others, have made suspicious and cunning propositions
 of banks, discovery of men's estates, and other inventions. But few have
 spoken of usury usefully. It is good to set before us, the incommodities
 and commodities of usury, that the good, may be either weighed out or
 culled out; and warily to provide, that while we make forth to that
 which is better, we meet not with that which is worse.
 
 The discommodities of usury are, First, that it makes fewer merchants.
 For were it not for this lazy trade of usury, money would not be still,
 but would in great part be employed upon merchandizing; which is
 the vena porta of wealth in a state. The second, that it makes poor
 merchants. For, as a farmer cannot husband his ground so well, if he sit
 at a great rent; so the merchant cannot drive his trade so well, if he
 sit at great usury. The third is incident to the other two; and that
 is the decay of customs of kings or states, which ebb or flow, with
 merchandizing. The fourth, that it bringeth the treasure of a realm, or
 state, into a few hands. For the usurer being at certainties, and others
 at uncertainties, at the end of the game, most of the money will be
 in the box; and ever a state flourisheth, when wealth is more equally
 spread. The fifth, that it beats down the price of land; for the
 employment of money, is chiefly either merchandizing or purchasing;
 and usury waylays both. The sixth, that it doth dull and damp all
 industries, improvements, and new inventions, wherein money would be
 stirring, if it were not for this slug. The last, that it is the canker
 and ruin of many men's estates; which, in process of time, breeds a
 public poverty.
 
 On the other side, the commodities of usury are, first, that howsoever
 usury in some respect hindereth merchandizing, yet in some other it
 advanceth it; for it is certain that the greatest part of trade is
 driven by young merchants, upon borrowing at interest; so as if the
 usurer either call in, or keep back, his money, there will ensue,
 presently, a great stand of trade. The second is, that were it not for
 this easy borrowing upon interest, men's necessities would draw upon
 them a most sudden undoing; in that they would be forced to sell their
 means (be it lands or goods) far under foot; and so, whereas usury doth
 but gnaw upon them, bad markets would swallow them quite up. As for
 mortgaging or pawning, it will little mend the matter: for either men
 will not take pawns without use; or if they do, they will look precisely
 for the forfeiture. I remember a cruel moneyed man in the country, that
 would say, The devil take this usury, it keeps us from forfeitures,
 of mortgages and bonds. The third and last is, that it is a vanity to
 conceive, that there would be ordinary borrowing without profit; and it
 is impossible to conceive, the number of inconveniences that will ensue,
 if borrowing be cramped. Therefore to speak of the abolishing of usury
 is idle. All states have ever had it, in one kind or rate, or other. So
 as that opinion must be sent to Utopia.
 
 To speak now of the reformation, and reiglement, of usury; how the
 discommodities of it may be best avoided, and the commodities retained.
 It appears, by the balance of commodities and discommodities of usury,
 two things are to be reconciled. The one, that the tooth of usury be
 grinded, that it bite not too much; the other, that there be left open
 a means, to invite moneyed men to lend to the merchants, for the
 continuing and quickening of trade. This cannot be done, except you
 introduce two several sorts of usury, a less and a greater. For if you
 reduce usury to one low rate, it will ease the common borrower, but
 the merchant will be to seek for money. And it is to be noted, that the
 trade of merchandize, being the most lucrative, may bear usury at a good
 rate; other contracts not so.
 
 To serve both intentions, the way would be briefly thus. That there be
 two rates of usury: the one free, and general for all; the other
 under license only, to certain persons, and in certain places of
 merchandizing. First, therefore, let usury in general, be reduced to
 five in the hundred; and let that rate be proclaimed, to be free and
 current; and let the state shut itself out, to take any penalty for the
 same. This will preserve borrowing, from any general stop or dryness.
 This will ease infinite borrowers in the country. This will, in good
 part, raise the price of land, because land purchased at sixteen years'
 purchase will yield six in the hundred, and somewhat more; whereas this
 rate of interest, yields but five. This by like reason will encourage,
 and edge, industrious and profitable improvements; because many will
 rather venture in that kind, than take five in the hundred, especially
 having been used to greater profit. Secondly, let there be certain
 persons licensed, to lend to known merchants, upon usury at a higher
 rate; and let it be with the cautions following. Let the rate be, even
 with the merchant himself, somewhat more easy than that he used formerly
 to pay; for by that means, all borrowers, shall have some ease by this
 reformation, be he merchant, or whosoever. Let it be no bank or common
 stock, but every man be master of his own money. Not that I altogether
 mislike banks, but they will hardly be brooked, in regard of certain
 suspicions. Let the state be answered some small matter for the license,
 and the rest left to the lender; for if the abatement be but small,
 it will no whit discourage the lender. For he, for example, that took
 before ten or nine in the hundred, will sooner descend to eight in the
 hundred than give over his trade of usury, and go from certain gains, to
 gains of hazard. Let these licensed lenders be in number indefinite, but
 restrained to certain principal cities and towns of merchandizing;
 for then they will be hardly able to color other men's moneys in the
 country: so as the license of nine will not suck away the current rate
 of five; for no man will send his moneys far off, nor put them into
 unknown hands.
 
 If it be objected that this doth in a sort authorize usury, which
 before, was in some places but permissive; the answer is, that it is
 better to mitigate usury, by declaration, than to suffer it to rage, by
 connivance.
 
 
 
 
 Of Youth And Age
 
 
 A MAN that is young in years, may be old in hours, if he have lost no
 time. But that happeneth rarely. Generally, youth is like the first
 cogitations, not so wise as the second. For there is a youth in
 thoughts, as well as in ages. And yet the invention of young men, is
 more lively than that of old; and imaginations stream into their minds
 better, and, as it were, more divinely. Natures that have much heat, and
 great and violent desires and perturbations, are not ripe for action,
 till they have passed the meridian of their years; as it was with
 Julius Caesar and Septimius Severus. Of the latter, of whom it is said,
 Juventutem egit erroribus, imo furoribus, plenam. And yet he was the
 ablest emperor, almost, of all the list. But reposed natures may do well
 in youth. As it is seen in Augustus Caesar, Cosmus Duke of Florence,
 Gaston de Foix, and others. On the other side, heat and vivacity in
 age, is an excellent composition for business. Young men are fitter
 to invent, than to judge; fitter for execution, than for counsel; and
 fitter for new projects, than for settled business. For the experience
 of age, in things that fall within the compass of it, directeth them;
 but in new things, abuseth them.
 
 The errors of young men, are the ruin of business; but the errors of
 aged men, amount but to this, that more might have been done, or sooner.
 Young men, in the conduct and manage of actions, embrace more than
 they can hold; stir more than they can quiet; fly to the end, without
 consideration of the means and degrees; pursue some few principles,
 which they have chanced upon absurdly; care not to innovate, which draws
 unknown inconveniences; use extreme remedies at first; and, that which
 doubleth all errors, will not acknowledge or retract them; like an
 unready horse, that will neither stop nor turn. Men of age object too
 much, consult too long, adventure too little, repent too soon, and
 seldom drive business home to the full period, but content themselves
 with a mediocrity of success. Certainly it is good to compound
 employments of both; for that will be good for the present, because the
 virtues of either age, may correct the defects of both; and good for
 succession, that young men may be learners, while men in age are actors;
 and, lastly, good for extern accidents, because authority followeth old
 men, and favor and popularity, youth. But for the moral part, perhaps
 youth will have the pre-eminence, as age hath for the politic. A certain
 rabbin, upon the text, Your young men shall see visions, and your old
 men shall dream dreams, inferreth that young men, are admitted nearer to
 God than old, because vision, is a clearer revelation, than a dream.
 And certainly, the more a man drinketh of the world, the more it
 intoxicateth; and age doth profit rather in the powers of understanding,
 than in the virtues of the will and affections. There be some, have an
 over-early ripeness in their years, which fadeth betimes. These are,
 first, such as have brittle wits, the edge whereof is soon turned; such
 as was Hermogenes the rhetorician, whose books are exceeding subtle;
 who afterwards waxed stupid. A second sort, is of those that have some
 natural dispositions which have better grace in youth, than in age; such
 as is a fluent and luxuriant speech; which becomes youth well, but not
 age: so Tully saith of Hortensius, Idem manebat, neque idem decebat.
 The third is of such, as take too high a strain at the first, and
 are magnanimous, more than tract of years can uphold. As was Scipio
 Africanus, of whom Livy saith in effect, Ultima primis cedebant.
 
 
 
 
 Of Beauty
 
 
 VIRTUE is like a rich stone, best plain set; and surely virtue is best,
 in a body that is comely, though not of delicate features; and that hath
 rather dignity of presence, than beauty of aspect. Neither is it almost
 seen, that very beautiful persons are otherwise of great virtue; as
 if nature were rather busy, not to err, than in labor to produce
 excellency. And therefore they prove accomplished, but not of great
 spirit; and study rather behavior, than virtue. But this holds not
 always: for Augustus Caesar, Titus Vespasianus, Philip le Belle of
 France, Edward the Fourth of England, Alcibiades of Athens, Ismael
 the Sophy of Persia, were all high and great spirits; and yet the most
 beautiful men of their times. In beauty, that of favor, is more than
 that of color; and that of decent and gracious motion, more than that of
 favor. That is the best part of beauty, which a picture cannot express;
 no, nor the first sight of the life. There is no excellent beauty, that
 hath not some strangeness in the proportion. A man cannot tell whether
 Apelles, or Albert Durer, were the more trifler; whereof the one, would
 make a personage by geometrical proportions; the other, by taking the
 best parts out of divers faces, to make one excellent. Such personages,
 I think, would please nobody, but the painter that made them. Not but I
 think a painter may make a better face than ever was; but he must do
 it by a kind of felicity (as a musician that maketh an excellent air in
 music), and not by rule. A man shall see faces, that if you examine them
 part by part, you shall find never a good; and yet altogether do well.
 If it be true that the principal part of beauty is in decent motion,
 certainly it is no marvel, though persons in years seem many times more
 amiable; pulchrorum autumnus pulcher; for no youth can be comely but by
 pardon, and considering the youth, as to make up the comeliness. Beauty
 is as summer fruits, which are easy to corrupt, and cannot last; and
 for the most part it makes a dissolute youth, and an age a little out of
 countenance; but yet certainly again, if it light well, it maketh virtue
 shine, and vices blush.
 
 
 
 
 Of Deformity
 
 
 DEFORMED persons are commonly even with nature; for as nature hath
 done ill by them, so do they by nature; being for the most part (as
 the Scripture saith) void of natural affection; and so they have their
 revenge of nature. Certainly there is a consent, between the body and
 the mind; and where nature erreth in the one, she ventureth in the
 other. Ubi peccat in uno, periclitatur in altero. But because there is,
 in man, an election touching the frame of his mind, and a necessity in
 the frame of his body, the stars of natural inclination are sometimes
 obscured, by the sun of discipline and virtue. Therefore it is good to
 consider of deformity, not as a sign, which is more deceivable; but as a
 cause, which seldom faileth of the effect. Whosoever hath anything fixed
 in his person, that doth induce contempt, hath also a perpetual spur
 in himself, to rescue and deliver himself from scorn. Therefore all
 deformed persons, are extreme bold. First, as in their own defence, as
 being exposed to scorn; but in process of time, by a general habit. Also
 it stirreth in them industry, and especially of this kind, to watch and
 observe the weakness of others, that they may have somewhat to repay.
 Again, in their superiors, it quencheth jealousy towards them, as
 persons that they think they may, at pleasure, despise: and it layeth
 their competitors and emulators asleep; as never believing they should
 be in possibility of advancement, till they see them in possession.
 So that upon the matter, in a great wit, deformity is an advantage to
 rising. Kings in ancient times (and at this present in some countries)
 were wont to put great trust in eunuchs; because they that are envious
 towards all are more obnoxious and officious, towards one. But yet
 their trust towards them, hath rather been as to good spials, and good
 whisperers, than good magistrates and officers. And much like is the
 reason of deformed persons. Still the ground is, they will, if they be
 of spirit, seek to free themselves from scorn; which must be either by
 virtue or malice; and therefore let it not be marvelled, if sometimes
 they prove excellent persons; as was Agesilaus, Zanger the son of
 Solyman, AEsop, Gasca, President of Peru; and Socrates may go likewise
 amongst them; with others.
 
 
 
 
 Of Building
 
 
 HOUSES are built to live in, and not to look on; therefore let use be
 preferred before uniformity, except where both may be had. Leave the
 goodly fabrics of houses, for beauty only, to the enchanted palaces of
 the poets; who build them with small cost. He that builds a fair house,
 upon an ill seat, committeth himself to prison. Neither do I reckon it
 an ill seat, only where the air is unwholesome; but likewise where the
 air is unequal; as you shall see many fine seats set upon a knap of
 ground, environed with higher hills round about it; whereby the heat
 of the sun is pent in, and the wind gathereth as in troughs; so as you
 shall have, and that suddenly, as great diversity of heat and cold as if
 you dwelt in several places. Neither is it ill air only that maketh
 an ill seat, but ill ways, ill markets; and, if you will consult with
 Momus, ill neighbors. I speak not of many more; want of water; want of
 wood, shade, and shelter; want of fruitfulness, and mixture of grounds
 of several natures; want of prospect; want of level grounds; want of
 places at some near distance for sports of hunting, hawking, and races;
 too near the sea, too remote; having the commodity of navigable rivers,
 or the discommodity of their overflowing; too far off from great
 cities, which may hinder business, or too near them, which lurcheth all
 provisions, and maketh everything dear; where a man hath a great living
 laid together, and where he is scanted: all which, as it is impossible
 perhaps to find together, so it is good to know them, and think of them,
 that a man may take as many as he can; and if he have several dwellings,
 that he sort them so that what he wanteth in the one, he may find in
 the other. Lucullus answered Pompey well; who, when he saw his stately
 galleries, and rooms so large and lightsome, in one of his houses, said,
 Surely an excellent place for summer, but how do you in winter? Lucullus
 answered, Why, do you not think me as wise as some fowl are, that ever
 change their abode towards the winter?
 
 To pass from the seat, to the house itself; we will do as Cicero doth
 in the orator's art; who writes books De Oratore, and a book he entitles
 Orator; whereof the former, delivers the precepts of the art, and the
 latter, the perfection. We will therefore describe a princely palace,
 making a brief model thereof. For it is strange to see, now in Europe,
 such huge buildings as the Vatican and Escurial and some others be, and
 yet scarce a very fair room in them.
 
 First, therefore, I say you cannot have a perfect palace except you have
 two several sides; a side for the banquet, as it is spoken of in the
 book of Hester, and a side for the household; the one for feasts and
 triumphs, and the other for dwelling. I understand both these sides to
 be not only returns, but parts of the front; and to be uniform without,
 though severally partitioned within; and to be on both sides of a great
 and stately tower, in the midst of the front, that, as it were, joineth
 them together on either hand. I would have on the side of the banquet,
 in front, one only goodly room above stairs, of some forty foot high;
 and under it a room for a dressing, or preparing place, at times of
 triumphs. On the other side, which is the household side, I wish
 it divided at the first, into a hall and a chapel (with a partition
 between); both of good state and bigness; and those not to go all the
 length, but to have at the further end, a winter and a summer parlor,
 both fair. And under these rooms, a fair and large cellar, sunk under
 ground; and likewise some privy kitchens, with butteries and pantries,
 and the like. As for the tower, I would have it two stories, of eighteen
 foot high apiece, above the two wings; and a goodly leads upon the
 top, railed with statuas interposed; and the same tower to be divided
 into rooms, as shall be thought fit. The stairs likewise to the upper
 rooms, let them be upon a fair open newel, and finely railed in, with
 images of wood, cast into a brass color; and a very fair landing-place
 at the top. But this to be, if you do not point any of the lower rooms,
 for a dining place of servants. For otherwise, you shall have the
 servants' dinner after your own: for the steam of it, will come up as in
 a tunnel. And so much for the front. Only I understand the height of the
 first stairs to be sixteen foot, which is the height of the lower room.
 
 Beyond this front, is there to be a fair court, but three sides of it,
 of a far lower building than the front. And in all the four corners of
 that court, fair staircases, cast into turrets, on the outside, and not
 within the row of buildings themselves. But those towers, are not to
 be of the height of the front, but rather proportionable to the lower
 building. Let the court not be paved, for that striketh up a great heat
 in summer, and much cold in winter. But only some side alleys, with a
 cross, and the quarters to graze, being kept shorn, but not too near
 shorn. The row of return on the banquet side, let it be all stately
 galleries: in which galleries let there be three, or five, fine cupolas
 in the length of it, placed at equal distance; and fine colored windows
 of several works. On the household side, chambers of presence and
 ordinary entertainments, with some bed-chambers; and let all three sides
 be a double house, without thorough lights on the sides, that you may
 have rooms from the sun, both for forenoon and afternoon. Cast it also,
 that you may have rooms, both for summer and winter; shady for summer,
 and warm for winter. You shall have sometimes fair houses so full of
 glass, that one cannot tell where to become, to be out of the sun or
 cold. For inbowed windows, I hold them of good use (in cities, indeed,
 upright do better, in respect of the uniformity towards the street); for
 they be pretty retiring places for conference; and besides, they keep
 both the wind and sun off; for that which would strike almost through
 the room, doth scarce pass the window. But let them be but few, four in
 the court, on the sides only.
 
 Beyond this court, let there be an inward court, of the same square and
 height; which is to be environed with the garden on all sides; and in
 the inside, cloistered on all sides, upon decent and beautiful arches,
 as high as the first story. On the under story, towards the garden, let
 it be turned to a grotto, or a place of shade, or estivation. And only
 have opening and windows towards the garden; and be level upon the
 floor, no whit sunken under ground, to avoid all dampishness. And let
 there be a fountain, or some fair work of statuas, in the midst of this
 court; and to be paved as the other court was. These buildings to be for
 privy lodgings on both sides; and the end for privy galleries. Whereof
 you must foresee that one of them be for an infirmary, if the prince
 or any special person should be sick, with chambers, bed-chamber,
 antecamera, and recamera joining to it. This upon the second story. Upon
 the ground story, a fair gallery, open, upon pillars; and upon the third
 story likewise, an open gallery, upon pillars, to take the prospect and
 freshness of the garden. At both corners of the further side, by way
 of return, let there be two delicate or rich cabinets, daintily paved,
 richly hanged, glazed with crystalline glass, and a rich cupola in the
 midst; and all other elegancy that may be thought upon. In the upper
 gallery too, I wish that there may be, if the place will yield it,
 some fountains running in divers places from the wall, with some fine
 avoidances. And thus much for the model of the palace; save that you
 must have, before you come to the front, three courts. A green court
 plain, with a wall about it; a second court of the same, but more
 garnished, with little turrets, or rather embellishments, upon the wall;
 and a third court, to make a square with the front, but not to be built,
 nor yet enclosed with a naked wall, but enclosed with terraces, leaded
 aloft, and fairly garnished, on the three sides; and cloistered on the
 inside, with pillars, and not with arches below. As for offices, let
 them stand at distance, with some low galleries, to pass from them to
 the palace itself.
 
 
 
 
 Of Gardens
 
 
 GOD Almighty first planted a garden. And indeed it is the purest of
 human pleasures. It is the greatest refreshment to the spirits of man;
 without which, buildings and palaces are but gross handiworks; and a man
 shall ever see, that when ages grow to civility and elegancy, men come
 to build stately sooner than to garden finely; as if gardening were
 the greater perfection. I do hold it, in the royal ordering of gardens,
 there ought to be gardens, for all the months in the year; in which
 severally things of beauty may be then in season. For December, and
 January, and the latter part of November, you must take such things as
 are green all winter: holly; ivy; bays; juniper; cypress-trees; yew;
 pine-apple-trees; fir-trees; rosemary; lavender; periwinkle, the white,
 the purple, and the blue; germander; flags; orange-trees; lemon-trees;
 and myrtles, if they be stoved; and sweet marjoram, warm set.
 There followeth, for the latter part of January and February, the
 mezereon-tree, which then blossoms; crocus vernus, both the yellow and
 the grey; primroses, anemones; the early tulippa; hyacinthus orientalis;
 chamairis; fritellaria. For March, there come violets, specially the
 single blue, which are the earliest; the yellow daffodil; the daisy; the
 almond-tree in blossom; the peach-tree in blossom; the cornelian-tree
 in blossom; sweet-briar. In April follow the double white violet; the
 wallflower; the stock-gilliflower; the cowslip; flowerdelices, and
 lilies of all natures; rosemary-flowers; the tulippa; the double peony;
 the pale daffodil; the French honeysuckle; the cherry-tree in blossom;
 the damson and plum-trees in blossom; the white thorn in leaf; the
 lilac-tree. In May and June come pinks of all sorts, specially the
 blushpink; roses of all kinds, except the musk, which comes later;
 honeysuckles; strawberries; bugloss; columbine; the French marigold,
 flos Africanus; cherry-tree in fruit; ribes; figs in fruit; rasps;
 vineflowers; lavender in flowers; the sweet satyrian, with the white
 flower; herba muscaria; lilium convallium; the apple-tree in blossom.
 In July come gilliflowers of all varieties; musk-roses; the lime-tree in
 blossom; early pears and plums in fruit; jennetings, codlins. In
 August come plums of all sorts in fruit; pears; apricocks; berberries;
 filberds; musk-melons; monks-hoods, of all colors. In September come
 grapes; apples; poppies of all colors; peaches; melocotones; nectarines;
 cornelians; wardens; quinces. In October and the beginning of November
 come services; medlars; bullaces; roses cut or removed to come late;
 hollyhocks; and such like. These particulars are for the climate of
 London; but my meaning is perceived, that you may have ver perpetuum, as
 the place affords.
 
 And because the breath of flowers is far sweeter in the air (where it
 comes and goes like the warbling of music) than in the hand, therefore
 nothing is more fit for that delight, than to know what be the flowers
 and plants that do best perfume the air. Roses, damask and red, are fast
 flowers of their smells; so that you may walk by a whole row of them,
 and find nothing of their sweetness; yea though it be in a morning's
 dew. Bays likewise yield no smell as they grow. Rosemary little; nor
 sweet marjoram. That which above all others yields the sweetest smell
 in the air is the violet, specially the white double violet, which comes
 twice a year; about the middle of April, and about Bartholomew-tide.
 Next to that is the musk-rose. Then the strawberry-leaves dying, which
 yield a most excellent cordial smell. Then the flower of vines; it is
 a little dust, like the dust of a bent, which grows upon the cluster in
 the first coming forth. Then sweet-briar. Then wall-flowers, which are
 very delightful to be set under a parlor or lower chamber window.
 Then pinks and gilliflowers, especially the matted pink and clove
 gilliflower. Then the flowers of the lime-tree. Then the honeysuckles,
 so they be somewhat afar off. Of beanflowers I speak not, because they
 are field flowers. But those which perfume the air most delightfully,
 not passed by as the rest, but being trodden upon and crushed, are
 three; that is, burnet, wildthyme, and watermints. Therefore you are to
 set whole alleys of them, to have the pleasure when you walk or tread.
 
 For gardens (speaking of those which are indeed princelike, as we have
 done of buildings), the contents ought not well to be under thirty acres
 of ground; and to be divided into three parts; a green in the entrance;
 a heath or desert in the going forth; and the main garden in the midst;
 besides alleys on both sides. And I like well that four acres of ground
 be assigned to the green; six to the heath; four and four to either
 side; and twelve to the main garden. The green hath two pleasures: the
 one, because nothing is more pleasant to the eye than green grass kept
 finely shorn; the other, because it will give you a fair alley in the
 midst, by which you may go in front upon a stately hedge, which is to
 enclose the garden. But because the alley will be long, and, in great
 heat of the year or day, you ought not to buy the shade in the garden,
 by going in the sun through the green, therefore you are, of either side
 the green, to plant a covert alley upon carpenter's work, about twelve
 foot in height, by which you may go in shade into the garden. As for the
 making of knots or figures, with divers colored earths, that they may
 lie under the windows of the house on that side which the garden stands,
 they be but toys; you may see as good sights, many times, in tarts. The
 garden is best to be square, encompassed on all the four sides with a
 stately arched hedge. The arches to be upon pillars of carpenter's work,
 of some ten foot high, and six foot broad; and the spaces between of the
 same dimension with the breadth of the arch. Over the arches let there
 be an entire hedge of some four foot high, framed also upon carpenter's
 work; and upon the upper hedge, over every arch, a little turret, with
 a belly, enough to receive a cage of birds: and over every space between
 the arches some other little figure, with broad plates of round colored
 glass gilt, for the sun to play upon. But this hedge I intend to be
 raised upon a bank, not steep, but gently slope, of some six foot, set
 all with flowers. Also I understand, that this square of the garden,
 should not be the whole breadth of the ground, but to leave on either
 side, ground enough for diversity of side alleys; unto which the two
 covert alleys of the green, may deliver you. But there must be no alleys
 with hedges, at either end of this great enclosure; not at the hither
 end, for letting your prospect upon this fair hedge from the green; nor
 at the further end, for letting your prospect from the hedge, through
 the arches upon the heath.
 
 For the ordering of the ground, within the great hedge, I leave it to
 variety of device; advising nevertheless, that whatsoever form you cast
 it into, first, it be not too busy, or full of work. Wherein I, for my
 part, do not like images cut out in juniper or other garden stuff; they
 be for children. Little low hedges, round, like welts, with some pretty
 pyramids, I like well; and in some places, fair columns upon frames of
 carpenter's work. I would also have the alleys, spacious and fair. You
 may have closer alleys, upon the side grounds, but none in the main
 garden. I wish also, in the very middle, a fair mount, with three
 ascents, and alleys, enough for four to walk abreast; which I would
 have to be perfect circles, without any bulwarks or embossments; and the
 whole mount to be thirty foot high; and some fine banqueting-house, with
 some chimneys neatly cast, and without too much glass.
 
 For fountains, they are a great beauty and refreshment; but pools mar
 all, and make the garden unwholesome, and full of flies and frogs.
 Fountains I intend to be of two natures: the one that sprinkleth or
 spouteth water; the other a fair receipt of water, of some thirty or
 forty foot square, but without fish, or slime, or mud. For the first,
 the ornaments of images gilt, or of marble, which are in use, do well:
 but the main matter is so to convey the water, as it never stay,
 either in the bowls or in the cistern; that the water be never by
 rest discolored, green or red or the like; or gather any mossiness or
 putrefaction. Besides that, it is to be cleansed every day by the hand.
 Also some steps up to it, and some fine pavement about it, doth well. As
 for the other kind of fountain, which we may call a bathing pool, it
 may admit much curiosity and beauty; wherewith we will not trouble
 ourselves: as, that the bottom be finely paved, and with images; the
 sides likewise; and withal embellished with colored glass, and such
 things of lustre; encompassed also with fine rails of low statuas. But
 the main point is the same which we mentioned in the former kind of
 fountain; which is, that the water be in perpetual motion, fed by a
 water higher than the pool, and delivered into it by fair spouts, and
 then discharged away under ground, by some equality of bores, that it
 stay little. And for fine devices, of arching water without spilling,
 and making it rise in several forms (of feathers, drinking glasses,
 canopies, and the like), they be pretty things to look on, but nothing
 to health and sweetness.
 
 For the heath, which was the third part of our plot, I wish it to be
 framed, as much as may be, to a natural wildness. Trees I would have
 none in it, but some thickets made only of sweet-briar and honeysuckle,
 and some wild vine amongst; and the ground set with violets,
 strawberries, and primroses. For these are sweet, and prosper in the
 shade. And these to be in the heath, here and there, not in any order. I
 like also little heaps, in the nature of mole-hills (such as are in wild
 heaths), to be set, some with wild thyme; some with pinks; some with
 germander, that gives a good flower to the eye; some with periwinkle;
 some with violets; some with strawberries; some with cowslips; some with
 daisies; some with red roses; some with lilium convallium; some with
 sweet-williams red; some with bear's-foot: and the like low flowers,
 being withal sweet and sightly. Part of which heaps, are to be with
 standards of little bushes pricked upon their top, and part without. The
 standards to be roses; juniper; holly; berberries (but here and there,
 because of the smell of their blossoms); red currants; gooseberries;
 rosemary; bays; sweetbriar; and such like. But these standards to be
 kept with cutting, that they grow not out of course.
 
 For the side grounds, you are to fill them with variety of alleys,
 private, to give a full shade, some of them, wheresoever the sun be.
 You are to frame some of them, likewise, for shelter, that when the
 wind blows sharp you may walk as in a gallery. And those alleys must
 be likewise hedged at both ends, to keep out the wind; and these closer
 alleys must be ever finely gravelled, and no grass, because of going
 wet. In many of these alleys, likewise, you are to set fruit-trees
 of all sorts; as well upon the walls, as in ranges. And this would be
 generally observed, that the borders wherein you plant your fruit-trees,
 be fair and large, and low, and not steep; and set with fine flowers,
 but thin and sparingly, lest they deceive the trees. At the end of both
 the side grounds, I would have a mount of some pretty height, leaving
 the wall of the enclosure breast high, to look abroad into the fields.
 
 For the main garden, I do not deny, but there should be some fair
 alleys ranged on both sides, with fruit-trees; and some pretty tufts of
 fruit-trees, and arbors with seats, set in some decent order; but these
 to be by no means set too thick; but to leave the main garden so as it
 be not close, but the air open and free. For as for shade, I would have
 you rest upon the alleys of the side grounds, there to walk, if you be
 disposed, in the heat of the year or day; but to make account, that the
 main garden is for the more temperate parts of the year; and in the heat
 of summer, for the morning and the evening, or overcast days.
 
 For aviaries, I like them not, except they be of that largeness as they
 may be turfed, and have living plants and bushes set in them; that the
 birds may have more scope, and natural nesting, and that no foulness
 appear in the floor of the aviary. So I have made a platform of a
 princely garden, partly by precept, partly by drawing, not a model, but
 some general lines of it; and in this I have spared for no cost. But it
 is nothing for great princes, that for the most part taking advice with
 workmen, with no less cost set their things together; and sometimes add
 statuas and such things for state and magnificence, but nothing to the
 true pleasure of a garden.
 
 
 
 
 Of Negotiating
 
 
 IT IS generally better to deal by speech than by letter; and by the
 mediation of a third than by a man's self. Letters are good, when a man
 would draw an answer by letter back again; or when it may serve for a
 man's justification afterwards to produce his own letter; or where it
 may be danger to be interrupted, or heard by pieces. To deal in person
 is good, when a man's face breedeth regard, as commonly with inferiors;
 or in tender cases, where a man's eye, upon the countenance of him with
 whom he speaketh, may give him a direction how far to go; and generally,
 where a man will reserve to himself liberty, either to disavow or to
 expound. In choice of instruments, it is better to choose men of a
 plainer sort, that are like to do that, that is committed to them,
 and to report back again faithfully the success, than those that are
 cunning, to contrive, out of other men's business, somewhat to grace
 themselves, and will help the matter in report for satisfaction's sake.
 Use also such persons as affect the business, wherein they are employed;
 for that quickeneth much; and such, as are fit for the matter; as bold
 men for expostulation, fair-spoken men for persuasion, crafty men for
 inquiry and observation, froward, and absurd men, for business that
 doth not well bear out itself. Use also such as have been lucky, and
 prevailed before, in things wherein you have employed them; for that
 breeds confidence, and they will strive to maintain their prescription.
 It is better to sound a person, with whom one deals afar off, than to
 fall upon the point at first; except you mean to surprise him by some
 short question. It is better dealing with men in appetite, than with
 those that are where they would be. If a man deal with another upon
 conditions, the start or first performance is all; which a man cannot
 reasonably demand, except either the nature of the thing be such, which
 must go before; or else a man can persuade the other party, that he
 shall still need him in some other thing; or else that he be counted
 the honester man. All practice is to discover, or to work. Men discover
 themselves in trust, in passion, at unawares, and of necessity, when
 they would have somewhat done, and cannot find an apt pretext. If you
 would work any man, you must either know his nature and fashions, and
 so lead him; or his ends, and so persuade him; or his weakness and
 disadvantages, and so awe him; or those that have interest in him, and
 so govern him. In dealing with cunning persons, we must ever consider
 their ends, to interpret their speeches; and it is good to say little
 to them, and that which they least look for. In all negotiations of
 difficulty, a man may not look to sow and reap at once; but must prepare
 business, and so ripen it by degrees.
 
 
 
 
 Of Followers And Friends
 
 
 COSTLY followers are not to be liked; lest while a man maketh his train
 longer, he make his wings shorter. I reckon to be costly, not them alone
 which charge the purse, but which are wearisome, and importune in
 suits. Ordinary followers ought to challenge no higher conditions,
 than countenance, recommendation, and protection from wrongs. Factious
 followers are worse to be liked, which follow not upon affection to
 him, with whom they range themselves, but upon discontentment conceived
 against some other; whereupon commonly ensueth that ill intelligence,
 that we many times see between great personages. Likewise glorious
 followers, who make themselves as trumpets of the commendation of those
 they follow, are full of inconvenience; for they taint business through
 want of secrecy; and they export honor from a man, and make him a return
 in envy. There is a kind of followers likewise, which are dangerous,
 being indeed espials; which inquire the secrets of the house, and bear
 tales of them, to others. Yet such men, many times, are in great favor;
 for they are officious, and commonly exchange tales. The following by
 certain estates of men, answerable to that, which a great person himself
 professeth (as of soldiers, to him that hath been employed in the wars,
 and the like), hath ever been a thing civil, and well taken, even in
 monarchies; so it be without too much pomp or popularity. But the most
 honorable kind of following, is to be followed as one, that apprehendeth
 to advance virtue, and desert, in all sorts of persons. And yet, where
 there is no eminent odds in sufficiency, it is better to take with the
 more passable, than with the more able. And besides, to speak truth, in
 base times, active men are of more use than virtuous. It is true that
 in government, it is good to use men of one rank equally: for to
 countenance some extraordinarily, is to make them insolent, and the rest
 discontent; because they may claim a due. But contrariwise, in favor,
 to use men with much difference and election is good; for it maketh the
 persons preferred more thankful, and the rest more officious: because
 all is of favor. It is good discretion, not to make too much of any
 man at the first; because one cannot hold out that proportion. To be
 governed (as we call it) by one is not safe; for it shows softness, and
 gives a freedom, to scandal and disreputation; for those, that would
 not censure or speak ill of a man immediately, will talk more boldly of
 those that are so great with them, and thereby wound their honor. Yet
 to be distracted with many is worse; for it makes men to be of the last
 impression, and full of change. To take advice of some few friends, is
 ever honorable; for lookers-on many times see more than gamesters; and
 the vale best discovereth the hill. There is little friendship in the
 world, and least of all between equals, which was wont to be magnified.
 That that is, is between superior and inferior, whose fortunes may
 comprehend the one the other.
 
 
 
 
 Of Suitors
 
 
 MANY ill matters and projects are undertaken; and private suits do
 putrefy the public good. Many good matters, are undertaken with bad
 minds; I mean not only corrupt minds, but crafty minds, that intend not
 performance. Some embrace suits, which never mean to deal effectually
 in them; but if they see there may be life in the matter, by some other
 mean, they will be content to win a thank, or take a second reward, or
 at least to make use, in the meantime, of the suitor's hopes. Some take
 hold of suits, only for an occasion to cross some other; or to make an
 information, whereof they could not otherwise have apt pretext; without
 care what become of the suit, when that turn is served; or, generally,
 to make other men's business a kind of entertainment, to bring in their
 own. Nay, some undertake suits, with a full purpose to let them fall; to
 the end to gratify the adverse party, or competitor. Surely there is in
 some sort a right in every suit; either a right of equity, if it be a
 suit of controversy; or a right of desert, if it be a suit of petition.
 If affection lead a man to favor the wrong side in justice, let him
 rather use his countenance to compound the matter, than to carry it. If
 affection lead a man to favor the less worthy in desert, let him do it,
 without depraving or disabling the better deserver. In suits which a
 man doth not well understand, it is good to refer them to some friend
 of trust and judgment, that may report, whether he may deal in them with
 honor: but let him choose well his referendaries, for else he may be led
 by the nose. Suitors are so distasted with delays and abuses, that plain
 dealing, in denying to deal in suits at first, and reporting the success
 barely, and in challenging no more thanks than one hath deserved, is
 grown not only honorable, but also gracious. In suits of favor, the
 first coming ought to take little place: so far forth, consideration
 may be had of his trust, that if intelligence of the matter could not
 otherwise have been had, but by him, advantage be not taken of the note,
 but the party left to his other means; and in some sort recompensed, for
 his discovery. To be ignorant of the value of a suit, is simplicity;
 as well as to be ignorant of the right thereof, is want of conscience.
 Secrecy in suits, is a great mean of obtaining; for voicing them to be
 in forwardness, may discourage some kind of suitors, but doth quicken
 and awake others. But timing of the suit is the principal. Timing, I
 say, not only in respect of the person that should grant it, but in
 respect of those, which are like to cross it. Let a man, in the choice
 of his mean, rather choose the fittest mean, than the greatest mean; and
 rather them that deal in certain things, than those that are general.
 The reparation of a denial, is sometimes equal to the first grant; if
 a man show himself neither dejected nor discontented. Iniquum petas ut
 aequum feras is a good rule, where a man hath strength of favor: but
 otherwise, a man were better rise in his suit; for he, that would have
 ventured at first to have lost the suitor, will not in the conclusion
 lose both the suitor, and his own former favor. Nothing is thought so
 easy a request to a great person, as his letter; and yet, if it be not
 in a good cause, it is so much out of his reputation. There are no worse
 instruments, than these general contrivers of suits; for they are but a
 kind of poison, and infection, to public proceedings.
 
 
 
 
 Of Studies
 
 
 STUDIES serve for delight, for ornament, and for ability. Their chief
 use for delight, is in privateness and retiring; for ornament, is in
 discourse; and for ability, is in the judgment, and disposition of
 business. For expert men can execute, and perhaps judge of particulars,
 one by one; but the general counsels, and the plots and marshalling of
 affairs, come best, from those that are learned. To spend too much time
 in studies is sloth; to use them too much for ornament, is affectation;
 to make judgment wholly by their rules, is the humor of a scholar. They
 perfect nature, and are perfected by experience: for natural abilities
 are like natural plants, that need proyning, by study; and studies
 themselves, do give forth directions too much at large, except they be
 bounded in by experience. Crafty men contemn studies, simple men admire
 them, and wise men use them; for they teach not their own use; but that
 is a wisdom without them, and above them, won by observation. Read not
 to contradict and confute; nor to believe and take for granted; nor to
 find talk and discourse; but to weigh and consider. Some books are to be
 tasted, others to be swallowed, and some few to be chewed and digested;
 that is, some books are to be read only in parts; others to be read, but
 not curiously; and some few to be read wholly, and with diligence and
 attention. Some books also may be read by deputy, and extracts made of
 them by others; but that would be only in the less important arguments,
 and the meaner sort of books, else distilled books are like common
 distilled waters, flashy things. Reading maketh a full man; conference
 a ready man; and writing an exact man. And therefore, if a man write
 little, he had need have a great memory; if he confer little, he had
 need have a present wit: and if he read little, he had need have much
 cunning, to seem to know, that he doth not. Histories make men wise;
 poets witty; the mathematics subtile; natural philosophy deep; moral
 grave; logic and rhetoric able to contend. Abeunt studia in mores. Nay,
 there is no stond or impediment in the wit, but may be wrought out
 by fit studies; like as diseases of the body, may have appropriate
 exercises. Bowling is good for the stone and reins; shooting for the
 lungs and breast; gentle walking for the stomach; riding for the
 head; and the like. So if a man's wit be wandering, let him study the
 mathematics; for in demonstrations, if his wit be called away never so
 little, he must begin again. If his wit be not apt to distinguish or
 find differences, let him study the Schoolmen; for they are cymini
 sectores. If he be not apt to beat over matters, and to call up one
 thing to prove and illustrate another, let him study the lawyers'
 cases. So every defect of the mind, may have a special receipt.
 
 
 
 
 Of Faction
 
 
 MANY have an opinion not wise, that for a prince to govern his estate,
 or for a great person to govern his proceedings, according to
 the respect of factions, is a principal part of policy; whereas
 contrariwise, the chiefest wisdom, is either in ordering those things
 which are general, and wherein men of several factions do nevertheless
 agree; or in dealing with correspondence to particular persons, one
 by one. But I say not that the considerations of factions, is to be
 neglected. Mean men, in their rising, must adhere; but great men,
 that have strength in themselves, were better to maintain themselves
 indifferent, and neutral. Yet even in beginners, to adhere so
 moderately, as he be a man of the one faction, which is most passable
 with the other, commonly giveth best way. The lower and weaker faction,
 is the firmer in conjunction; and it is often seen, that a few that are
 stiff, do tire out a greater number, that are more moderate. When one of
 the factions is extinguished, the remaining subdivideth; as the faction
 between Lucullus, and the rest of the nobles of the senate (which they
 called Optimates) held out awhile, against the faction of Pompey and
 Caesar; but when the senate's authority was pulled down, Caesar and
 Pompey soon after brake. The faction or party of Antonius and Octavianus
 Caesar, against Brutus and Cassius, held out likewise for a time; but
 when Brutus and Cassius were overthrown, then soon after, Antonius and
 Octavianus brake and subdivided. These examples are of wars, but the
 same holdeth in private factions. And therefore, those that are
 seconds in factions, do many times, when the faction subdivideth, prove
 principals; but many times also, they prove ciphers and cashiered;
 for many a man's strength is in opposition; and when that faileth, he
 groweth out of use. It is commonly seen, that men, once placed, take in
 with the contrary faction, to that by which they enter: thinking belike,
 that they have the first sure, and now are ready for a new purchase. The
 traitor in faction, lightly goeth away with it; for when matters have
 stuck long in balancing, the winning of some one man casteth them,
 and he getteth all the thanks. The even carriage between two factions,
 proceedeth not always of moderation, but of a trueness to a man's self,
 with end to make use of both. Certainly in Italy, they hold it a little
 suspect in popes, when they have often in their mouth Padre commune: and
 take it to be a sign of one, that meaneth to refer all to the greatness
 of his own house. Kings had need beware, how they side themselves, and
 make themselves as of a faction or party; for leagues within the
 state, are ever pernicious to monarchies: for they raise an obligation,
 paramount to obligation of sovereignty, and make the king tanquam unus
 ex nobis; as was to be seen in the League of France. When factions are
 carried too high and too violently, it is a sign of weakness in princes;
 and much to the prejudice, both of their authority and business. The
 motions of factions under kings ought to be, like the motions (as the
 astronomers speak) of the inferior orbs, which may have their proper
 motions, but yet still are quietly carried, by the higher motion of
 primum mobile.
 
 
 
 
 Of Ceremonies, And Respects
 
 
 HE THAT is only real, had need have exceeding great parts of virtue; as
 the stone had need to be rich, that is set without foil. But if a man
 mark it well, it is, in praise and commendation of men, as it is in
 gettings and gains: for the proverb is true, That light gains make heavy
 purses; for light gains come thick, whereas great, come but now and
 then. So it is true, that small matters win great commendation, because
 they are continually in use and in note: whereas the occasion of any
 great virtue, cometh but on festivals. Therefore it doth much add to a
 man's reputation, and is (as Queen Isabella said) like perpetual letters
 commendatory, to have good forms. To attain them, it almost sufficeth
 not to despise them; for so shall a man observe them in others; and let
 him trust himself with the rest. For if he labor too much to express
 them, he shall lose their grace; which is to be natural and unaffected.
 Some men's behavior is like a verse, wherein every syllable is measured;
 how can a man comprehend great matters, that breaketh his mind too much,
 to small observations? Not to use ceremonies at all, is to teach others
 not to use them again; and so diminisheth respect to himself; especially
 they be not to be omitted, to strangers and formal natures; but the
 dwelling upon them, and exalting them above the moon, is not only
 tedious, but doth diminish the faith and credit of him that speaks. And
 certainly, there is a kind of conveying, of effectual and imprinting
 passages amongst compliments, which is of singular use, if a man can hit
 upon it. Amongst a man's peers, a man shall be sure of familiarity; and
 therefore it is good, a little to keep state. Amongst a man's inferiors
 one shall be sure of reverence; and therefore it is good, a little to
 be familiar. He that is too much in anything, so that he giveth another
 occasion of satiety, maketh himself cheap. To apply one's self to
 others, is good; so it be with demonstration, that a man doth it upon
 regard, and not upon facility. It is a good precept generally, in
 seconding another, yet to add somewhat of one's own: as if you will
 grant his opinion, let it be with some distinction; if you will follow
 his motion, let it be with condition; if you allow his counsel, let it
 be with alleging further reason. Men had need beware, how they be too
 perfect in compliments; for be they never so sufficient otherwise, their
 enviers will be sure to give them that attribute, to the disadvantage
 of their greater virtues. It is loss also in business, to be too full
 of respects, or to be curious, in observing times and opportunities.
 Solomon saith, He that considereth the wind, shall not sow, and he
 that looketh to the clouds, shall not reap. A wise man will make more
 opportunities, than he finds. Men's behavior should be, like their
 apparel, not too strait or point device, but free for exercise or
 motion.
 
 
 
 
 Of Praise
 
 
 PRAISE is the reflection of virtue; but it is as the glass or body,
 which giveth the reflection. If it be from the common people, it is
 commonly false and naught; and rather followeth vain persons, than
 virtuous. For the common people understand not many excellent virtues.
 The lowest virtues draw praise from them; the middle virtues work in
 them astonishment or admiration; but of the highest virtues, they
 have no sense of perceiving at all. But shows, and species virtutibus
 similes, serve best with them. Certainly fame is like a river, that
 beareth up things light and swoln, and drowns things weighty and solid.
 But if persons of quality and judgment concur, then it is (as the
 Scripture saith) nomen bonum instar unguenti fragrantis. It fireth all
 round about, and will not easily away. For the odors of ointments are
 more durable, than those of flowers. There be so many false points of
 praise, that a man may justly hold it a suspect. Some praises proceed
 merely of flattery; and if he be an ordinary flatterer, he will have
 certain common attributes, which may serve every man; if he be a cunning
 flatterer, he will follow the archflatterer, which is a man's self;
 and wherein a man thinketh best of himself, therein the flatterer will
 uphold him most: but if he be an impudent flatterer, look wherein a man
 is conscious to himself, that he is most defective, and is most out of
 countenance in himself, that will the flatterer entitle him to perforce,
 spreta conscientia. Some praises come of good wishes and respects,
 which is a form due, in civility, to kings and great persons, laudando
 praecipere, when by telling men what they are, they represent to them,
 what they should be. Some men are praised maliciously, to their
 hurt, thereby to stir envy and jealousy towards them: pessimum genus
 inimicorum laudantium; insomuch as it was a proverb, amongst the
 Grecians, that he that was praised to his hurt, should have a push rise
 upon his nose; as we say, that a blister will rise upon one's tongue,
 that tells a lie. Certainly moderate praise, used with opportunity, and
 not vulgar, is that which doth the good. Solomon saith, He that praiseth
 his friend aloud, rising early, it shall be to him no better than
 a curse. Too much magnifying of man or matter, doth irritate
 contradiction, and procure envy and scorn. To praise a man's self,
 cannot be decent, except it be in rare cases; but to praise a man's
 office or profession, he may do it with good grace, and with a kind of
 magnanimity. The cardinals of Rome, which are theologues, and friars,
 and Schoolmen, have a phrase of notable contempt and scorn towards
 civil business: for they call all temporal business of wars,
 embassages, judicature, and other employments, sbirrerie, which is
 under-sheriffries; as if they were but matters, for under-sheriffs and
 catchpoles: though many times those under-sheriffries do more good, than
 their high speculations. St. Paul, when he boasts of himself, he doth
 oft interlace, I speak like a fool; but speaking of his calling, he
 saith, magnificabo apostolatum meum.
 
 
 
 
 Of Vain-glory
 
 
 IT WAS prettily devised of AEsop, The fly sat upon the axle-tree of the
 chariot wheel, and said, What a dust do I raise! So are there some vain
 persons, that whatsoever goeth alone, or moveth upon greater means, if
 they have never so little hand in it, they think it is they that carry
 it. They that are glorious, must needs be factious; for all bravery
 stands upon comparisons. They must needs be violent, to make good their
 own vaunts. Neither can they be secret, and therefore not effectual; but
 according to the French proverb, Beaucoup de bruit, peu de fruit; Much
 bruit little fruit. Yet certainly, there is use of this quality in civil
 affairs. Where there is an opinion and fame to be created, either of
 virtue or greatness, these men are good trumpeters. Again, as Titus
 Livius noteth, in the case of Antiochus and the AEtolians, There are
 sometimes great effects, of cross lies; as if a man, that negotiates
 between two princes, to draw them to join in a war against the third,
 doth extol the forces of either of them, above measure, the one to the
 other: and sometimes he that deals between man and man, raiseth his own
 credit with both, by pretending greater interest than he hath in either.
 And in these and the like kinds, it often falls out, that somewhat
 is produced of nothing; for lies are sufficient to breed opinion,
 and opinion brings on substance. In militar commanders and soldiers,
 vain-glory is an essential point; for as iron sharpens iron, so by
 glory, one courage sharpeneth another. In cases of great enterprise upon
 charge and adventure, a composition of glorious natures, doth put life
 into business; and those that are of solid and sober natures, have more
 of the ballast, than of the sail. In fame of learning, the flight will
 be slow without some feathers of ostentation. Qui de contemnenda gloria
 libros scribunt, nomen, suum inscribunt. Socrates, Aristotle, Galen,
 were men full of ostentation. Certainly vain-glory helpeth to perpetuate
 a man's memory; and virtue was never so beholding to human nature, as
 it received his due at the second hand. Neither had the fame of Cicero,
 Seneca, Plinius Secundus, borne her age so well, if it had not been
 joined with some vanity in themselves; like unto varnish, that makes
 ceilings not only shine but last. But all this while, when I speak of
 vain-glory, I mean not of that property, that Tacitus doth attribute
 to Mucianus; Omnium quae dixerat feceratque arte quadam ostentator: for
 that proceeds not of vanity, but of natural magnanimity and discretion;
 and in some persons, is not only comely, but gracious. For excusations,
 cessions, modesty itself well governed, are but arts of ostentation.
 And amongst those arts, there is none better than that which Plinius
 Secundus speaketh of, which is to be liberal of praise and commendation
 to others, in that, wherein a man's self hath any perfection. For saith
 Pliny, very wittily, In commending another, you do yourself right; for
 he that you commend, is either superior to you in that you commend, or
 inferior. If he be inferior, if he be to be commended, you much more;
 if he be superior, if he be not to be commended, you much less. Glorious
 men are the scorn of wise men, the admiration of fools, the idols of
 parasites, and the slaves of their own vaunts.
 
 
 
 
 Of Honor And Reputation
 
 
 THE winning of honor, is but the revealing of a man's virtue and worth,
 without disadvantage. For some in their actions, do woo and effect honor
 and reputation, which sort of men, are commonly much talked of, but
 inwardly little admired. And some, contrariwise, darken their virtue in
 the show of it; so as they be undervalued in opinion. If a man perform
 that, which hath not been attempted before; or attempted and given
 over; or hath been achieved, but not with so good circumstance; he shall
 purchase more honor, than by effecting a matter of greater difficulty or
 virtue, wherein he is but a follower. If a man so temper his actions,
 as in some one of them he doth content every faction, or combination
 of people, the music will be the fuller. A man is an ill husband of his
 honor, that entereth into any action, the failing wherein may disgrace
 him, more than the carrying of it through, can honor him. Honor that
 is gained and broken upon another, hath the quickest reflection, like
 diamonds cut with facets. And therefore, let a man contend to excel any
 competitors of his in honor, in outshooting them, if he can, in their
 own bow. Discreet followers and servants, help much to reputation. Omnis
 fama a domesticis emanat. Envy, which is the canker of honor, is best
 extinguished by declaring a man's self in his ends, rather to seek
 merit than fame; and by attributing a man's successes, rather to divine
 Providence and felicity, than to his own virtue or policy.
 
 The true marshalling of the degrees of sovereign honor, are these:
 In the first place are conditores imperiorum, founders of states and
 commonwealths; such as were Romulus, Cyrus, Caesar, Ottoman, Ismael.
 In the second place are legislatores, lawgivers; which are also called
 second founders, or perpetui principes, because they govern by their
 ordinances after they are gone; such were Lycurgus, Solon, Justinian,
 Eadgar, Alphonsus of Castile, the Wise, that made the Siete Partidas.
 In the third place are liberatores, or salvatores, such as compound the
 long miseries of civil wars, or deliver their countries from servitude
 of strangers or tyrants; as Augustus Caesar, Vespasianus, Aurelianus,
 Theodoricus, King Henry the Seventh of England, King Henry the Fourth of
 France. In the fourth place are propagatores or propugnatores imperii;
 such as in honorable wars enlarge their territories, or make noble
 defence against invaders. And in the last place are patres patriae;
 which reign justly, and make the times good wherein they live. Both
 which last kinds need no examples, they are in such number. Degrees
 of honor, in subjects, are, first participes curarum, those upon whom,
 princes do discharge the greatest weight of their affairs; their right
 hands, as we call them. The next are duces belli, great leaders in war;
 such as are princes' lieutenants, and do them notable services in
 the wars. The third are gratiosi, favorites; such as exceed not this
 scantling, to be solace to the sovereign, and harmless to the people.
 And the fourth, negotiis pares; such as have great places under princes,
 and execute their places, with sufficiency. There is an honor, likewise,
 which may be ranked amongst the greatest, which happeneth rarely; that
 is, of such as sacrifice themselves to death or danger for the good of
 their country; as was M. Regulus, and the two Decii.
 
 
 
 
 Of Judicature
 
 
 JUDGES ought to remember, that their office is jus dicere, and not jus
 dare; to interpret law, and not to make law, or give law. Else will
 it be like the authority, claimed by the Church of Rome, which under
 pretext of exposition of Scripture, doth not stick to add and alter; and
 to pronounce that which they do not find; and by show of antiquity, to
 introduce novelty. Judges ought to be more learned, than witty, more
 reverend, than plausible, and more advised, than confident. Above all
 things, integrity is their portion and proper virtue. Cursed (saith the
 law) is he that removeth the landmark. The mislayer of a mere-stone is
 to blame. But it is the unjust judge, that is the capital remover of
 landmarks, when he defineth amiss, of lands and property. One foul
 sentence doth more hurt, than many foul examples. For these do but
 corrupt the stream, the other corrupteth the fountain. So with Solomon,
 Fons turbatus, et vena corrupta, est justus cadens in causa sua coram
 adversario. The office of judges may have reference unto the parties
 that use, unto the advocates that plead, unto the clerks and ministers
 of justice underneath them, and to the sovereign or state above them.
 
 First, for the causes or parties that sue. There be (saith the
 Scripture) that turn judgment, into wormwood; and surely there be also,
 that turn it into vinegar; for injustice maketh it bitter, and delays
 make it sour. The principal duty of a judge, is to suppress force and
 fraud; whereof force is the more pernicious, when it is open, and fraud,
 when it is close and disguised. Add thereto contentious suits, which
 ought to be spewed out, as the surfeit of courts. A judge ought to
 prepare his way to a just sentence, as God useth to prepare his way, by
 raising valleys and taking down hills: so when there appeareth on
 either side an high hand, violent prosecution, cunning advantages taken,
 combination, power, great counsel, then is the virtue of a judge seen,
 to make inequality equal; that he may plant his judgment as upon an even
 ground. Qui fortiter emungit, elicit sanguinem; and where the wine-press
 is hard wrought, it yields a harsh wine, that tastes of the grape-stone.
 Judges must beware of hard constructions, and strained inferences; for
 there is no worse torture, than the torture of laws. Specially in case
 of laws penal, they ought to have care, that that which was meant for
 terror, be not turned into rigor; and that they bring not upon the
 people, that shower whereof the Scripture speaketh, Pluet super eos
 laqueos; for penal laws pressed, are a shower of snares upon the people.
 Therefore let penal laws, if they have been sleepers of long, or if they
 be grown unfit for the present time, be by wise judges confined in the
 execution: Judicis officium est, ut res, ita tempora rerum, etc. In
 causes of life and death, judges ought (as far as the law permitteth)
 in justice to remember mercy; and to cast a severe eye upon the example,
 but a merciful eye upon the person.
 
 Secondly, for the advocates and counsel that plead. Patience and gravity
 of hearing, is an essential part of justice; and an overspeaking judge
 is no well-tuned cymbal. It is no grace to a judge, first to find that,
 which he might have heard in due time from the bar; or to show quickness
 of conceit, in cutting off evidence or counsel too short; or to prevent
 information by questions, though pertinent. The parts of a judge
 in hearing, are four: to direct the evidence; to moderate length,
 repetition, or impertinency of speech; to recapitulate, select, and
 collate the material points, of that which hath been said; and to
 give the rule or sentence. Whatsoever is above these is too much; and
 proceedeth either of glory, and willingness to speak, or of impatience
 to hear, or of shortness of memory, or of want of a staid and equal
 attention. It is a strange thing to see, that the boldness of advocates
 should prevail with judges; whereas they should imitate God, in whose
 seat they sit; who represseth the presumptuous, and giveth grace to the
 modest. But it is more strange, that judges should have noted favorites;
 which cannot but cause multiplication of fees, and suspicion of by-ways.
 There is due from the judge to the advocate, some commendation and
 gracing, where causes are well handled and fair pleaded; especially
 towards the side which obtaineth not; for that upholds in the client,
 the reputation of his counsel, and beats down in him the conceit of
 his cause. There is likewise due to the public, a civil reprehension of
 advocates, where there appeareth cunning counsel, gross neglect, slight
 information, indiscreet pressing, or an overbold defence. And let not
 the counsel at the bar, chop with the judge, nor wind himself into the
 handling of the cause anew, after the judge hath declared his sentence;
 but, on the other side, let not the judge meet the cause half way, nor
 give occasion to the party, to say his counsel or proofs were not heard.
 
 Thirdly, for that that concerns clerks and ministers. The place of
 justice is an hallowed place; and therefore not only the bench, but the
 foot-place; and precincts and purprise thereof, ought to be preserved
 without scandal and corruption. For certainly grapes (as the Scripture
 saith) will not be gathered of thorns or thistles; neither can justice
 yield her fruit with sweetness, amongst the briars and brambles of
 catching and polling clerks, and ministers. The attendance of courts, is
 subject to four bad instruments. First, certain persons that are sowers
 of suits; which make the court swell, and the country pine. The second
 sort is of those, that engage courts in quarrels of jurisdiction, and
 are not truly amici curiae, but parasiti curiae, in puffing a court up
 beyond her bounds, for their own scraps and advantage. The third sort,
 is of those that may be accounted the left hands of courts; persons that
 are full of nimble and sinister tricks and shifts, whereby they pervert
 the plain and direct courses of courts, and bring justice into oblique
 lines and labyrinths. And the fourth, is the poller and exacter of fees;
 which justifies the common resemblance of the courts of justice, to the
 bush whereunto, while the sheep flies for defence in weather, he is sure
 to lose part of his fleece. On the other side, an ancient clerk, skilful
 in precedents, wary in proceeding, and understanding in the business of
 the court, is an excellent finger of a court; and doth many times point
 the way to the judge himself.
 
 Fourthly, for that which may concern the sovereign and estate. Judges
 ought above all to remember the conclusion of the Roman Twelve Tables;
 Salus populi suprema lex; and to know that laws, except they be in order
 to that end, are but things captious, and oracles not well inspired.
 Therefore it is an happy thing in a state, when kings and states do
 often consult with judges; and again, when judges do often consult with
 the king and state: the one, when there is matter of law, intervenient
 in business of state; the other, when there is some consideration of
 state, intervenient in matter of law. For many times the things deduced
 to judgment may be meum and tuum, when the reason and consequence
 thereof may trench to point of estate: I call matter of estate, not
 only the parts of sovereignty, but whatsoever introduceth any great
 alteration, or dangerous precedent; or concerneth manifestly any great
 portion of people. And let no man weakly conceive, that just laws
 and true policy have any antipathy; for they are like the spirits and
 sinews, that one moves with the other. Let judges also remember, that
 Solomon's throne was supported by lions on both sides: let them be
 lions, but yet lions under the throne; being circumspect that they do
 not check or oppose any points of sovereignty. Let not judges also be
 ignorant of their own right, as to think there is not left to them, as a
 principal part of their office, a wise use and application of laws. For
 they may remember, what the apostle saith of a greater law than theirs;
 Nos scimus quia lex bona est, modo quis ea utatur legitime.
 
 
 
 
 Of Anger
 
 
 TO SEEK to extinguish anger utterly, is but a bravery of the Stoics. We
 have better oracles: Be angry, but sin not. Let not the sun go down
 upon your anger. Anger must be limited and confined, both in race and
 in time. We will first speak how the natural inclination and habit to be
 angry, may be attempted and calmed. Secondly, how the particular motions
 of anger may be repressed, or at least refrained from doing mischief.
 Thirdly, how to raise anger, or appease anger in another.
 
 For the first; there is no other way but to meditate, and ruminate well
 upon the effects of anger, how it troubles man's life. And the best time
 to do this, is to look back upon anger, when the fit is thoroughly over.
 Seneca saith well, That anger is like ruin, which breaks itself upon
 that it falls. The Scripture exhorteth us to possess our souls in
 patience. Whosoever is out of patience, is out of possession of his
 soul. Men must not turn bees;
 
 
 ... animasque in vulnere ponunt.
 
 
 Anger is certainly a kind of baseness; as it appears well in the
 weakness of those subjects in whom it reigns; children, women, old
 folks, sick folks. Only men must beware, that they carry their anger
 rather with scorn, than with fear; so that they may seem rather to be
 above the injury, than below it; which is a thing easily done, if a man
 will give law to himself in it.
 
 For the second point; the causes and motives of anger, are chiefly
 three. First, to be too sensible of hurt; for no man is angry, that
 feels not himself hurt; and therefore tender and delicate persons must
 needs be oft angry; they have so many things to trouble them, which more
 robust natures have little sense of. The next is, the apprehension and
 construction of the injury offered, to be, in the circumstances thereof,
 full of contempt: for contempt is that, which putteth an edge upon
 anger, as much or more than the hurt itself. And therefore, when men are
 ingenious in picking out circumstances of contempt, they do kindle their
 anger much. Lastly, opinion of the touch of a man's reputation, doth
 multiply and sharpen anger. Wherein the remedy is, that a man should
 have, as Consalvo was wont to say, telam honoris crassiorem. But in all
 refrainings of anger, it is the best remedy to win time; and to make a
 man's self believe, that the opportunity of his revenge is not yet
 come, but that he foresees a time for it; and so to still himself in the
 meantime, and reserve it.
 
 To contain anger from mischief, though it take hold of a man, there be
 two things, whereof you must have special caution. The one, of extreme
 bitterness of words, especially if they be aculeate and proper; for
 cummunia maledicta are nothing so much; and again, that in anger a man
 reveal no secrets; for that, makes him not fit for society. The other,
 that you do not peremptorily break off, in any business, in a fit of
 anger; but howsoever you show bitterness, do not act anything, that is
 not revocable.
 
 For raising and appeasing anger in another; it is done chiefly by
 choosing of times, when men are frowardest and worst disposed, to
 incense them. Again, by gathering (as was touched before) all that you
 can find out, to aggravate the contempt. And the two remedies are by the
 contraries. The former to take good times, when first to relate to a man
 an angry business; for the first impression is much; and the other is,
 to sever, as much as may be, the construction of the injury from the
 point of contempt; imputing it to misunderstanding, fear, passion, or
 what you will.
 
 
 
 
 Of Vicissitude Of Things
 
 
 SOLOMON saith, There is no new thing upon the earth. So that as Plato
 had an imagination, That all knowledge was but remembrance; so Solomon
 giveth his sentence, That all novelty is but oblivion. Whereby you may
 see, that the river of Lethe runneth as well above ground as below.
 There is an abstruse astrologer that saith, If it were not for two
 things that are constant (the one is, that the fixed stars ever stand a
 like distance one from another, and never come nearer together, nor go
 further asunder; the other, that the diurnal motion perpetually keepeth
 time), no individual would last one moment. Certain it is, that
 the matter is in a perpetual flux, and never at a stay. The great
 winding-sheets, that bury all things in oblivion, are two; deluges
 and earthquakes. As for conflagrations and great droughts, they do not
 merely dispeople and destroy. Phaeton's car went but a day. And the
 three years' drought in the time of Elias, was but particular, and left
 people alive. As for the great burnings by lightnings, which are
 often in the West Indies, they are but narrow. But in the other two
 destructions, by deluge and earthquake, it is further to be noted, that
 the remnant of people which hap to be reserved, are commonly ignorant
 and mountainous people, that can give no account of the time past; so
 that the oblivion is all one, as if none had been left. If you consider
 well of the people of the West Indies, it is very probable that they are
 a newer or a younger people, than the people of the Old World. And it is
 much more likely, that the destruction that hath heretofore been there,
 was not by earthquakes (as the Egyptian priest told Solon concerning the
 island of Atlantis, that it was swallowed by an earthquake), but rather
 that it was desolated by a particular deluge. For earthquakes are seldom
 in those parts. But on the other side, they have such pouring rivers, as
 the rivers of Asia and Africk and Europe, are but brooks to them.
 Their Andes, likewise, or mountains, are far higher than those with us;
 whereby it seems, that the remnants of generation of men, were in such
 a particular deluge saved. As for the observation that Machiavel hath,
 that the jealousy of sects, doth much extinguish the memory of things;
 traducing Gregory the Great, that he did what in him lay, to extinguish
 all heathen antiquities; I do not find that those zeals do any great
 effects, nor last long; as it appeared in the succession of Sabinian,
 who did revive the former antiquities.
 
 The vicissitude of mutations in the superior globe, are no fit matter
 for this present argument. It may be, Plato's great year, if the world
 should last so long, would have some effect; not in renewing the state
 of like individuals (for that is the fume of those, that conceive the
 celestial bodies have more accurate influences upon these things below,
 than indeed they have), but in gross. Comets, out of question, have
 likewise power and effect, over the gross and mass of things; but they
 are rather gazed upon, and waited upon in their journey, than wisely
 observed in their effects; specially in, their respective effects; that
 is, what kind of comet, for magnitude, color, version of the beams,
 placing in the reign of heaven, or lasting, produceth what kind of
 effects.
 
 There is a toy which I have heard, and I would not have it given over,
 but waited upon a little. They say it is observed in the Low Countries
 (I know not in what part) that every five and thirty years, the same
 kind and suit of years and weathers come about again; as great frosts,
 great wet, great droughts, warm winters, summers with little heat, and
 the like; and they call it the Prime. It is a thing I do the rather
 mention, because, computing backwards, I have found some concurrence.
 
 But to leave these points of nature, and to come to men. The greatest
 vicissitude of things amongst men, is the vicissitude of sects and
 religions. For those orbs rule in men's minds most. The true religion
 is built upon the rock; the rest are tossed, upon the waves of time. To
 speak, therefore, of the causes of new sects; and to give some counsel
 concerning them, as far as the weakness of human judgment can give stay,
 to so great revolutions. When the religion formerly received, is rent
 by discords; and when the holiness of the professors of religion, is
 decayed and full of scandal; and withal the times be stupid, ignorant,
 and barbarous; you may doubt the springing up of a new sect; if then
 also, there should arise any extravagant and strange spirit, to make
 himself author thereof. All which points held, when Mahomet published
 his law. If a new sect have not two properties, fear it not; for it will
 not spread. The one is the supplanting, or the opposing, of authority
 established; for nothing is more popular than that. The other is
 the giving license to pleasures, and a voluptuous life. For as for
 speculative heresies (such as were in ancient times the Arians, and now
 the Arminians), though they work mightily upon men's wits, yet they do
 not produce any great alterations in states; except it be by the help of
 civil occasions. There be three manner of plantations of new sects. By
 the power of signs and miracles; by the eloquence, and wisdom, of speech
 and persuasion; and by the sword. For martyrdoms, I reckon them amongst
 miracles; because they seem to exceed the strength of human nature: and
 I may do the like, of superlative and admirable holiness of life. Surely
 there is no better way, to stop the rising of new sects and schisms,
 than to reform abuses; to compound the smaller differences; to proceed
 mildly, and not with sanguinary persecutions; and rather to take off the
 principal authors by winning and advancing them, than to enrage them by
 violence and bitterness.
 
 The changes and vicissitude in wars are many; but chiefly in three
 things; in the seats or stages of the war; in the weapons; and in the
 manner of the conduct. Wars, in ancient time, seemed more to move from
 east to west; for the Persians, Assyrians, Arabians, Tartars (which
 were the invaders) were all eastern people. It is true, the Gauls
 were western; but we read but of two incursions of theirs: the one
 to Gallo-Grecia, the other to Rome. But east and west have no certain
 points of heaven; and no more have the wars, either from the east or
 west, any certainty of observation. But north and south are fixed; and
 it hath seldom or never been seen that the far southern people have
 invaded the northern, but contrariwise. Whereby it is manifest that the
 northern tract of the world, is in nature the more martial region: be it
 in respect of the stars of that hemisphere; or of the great continents
 that are upon the north, whereas the south part, for aught that is
 known, is almost all sea; or (which is most apparent) of the cold of
 the northern parts, which is that which, without aid of discipline, doth
 make the bodies hardest, and the courages warmest.
 
 Upon the breaking and shivering of a great state and empire, you may be
 sure to have wars. For great empires, while they stand, do enervate and
 destroy the forces of the natives which they have subdued, resting upon
 their own protecting forces; and then when they fail also, all goes
 to ruin, and they become a prey. So was it in the decay of the Roman
 empire; and likewise in the empire of Almaigne, after Charles the Great,
 every bird taking a feather; and were not unlike to befall to Spain,
 if it should break. The great accessions and unions of kingdoms, do
 likewise stir up wars; for when a state grows to an over-power, it is
 like a great flood, that will be sure to overflow. As it hath been seen
 in the states of Rome, Turkey, Spain, and others. Look when the world
 hath fewest barbarous peoples, but such as commonly will not marry or
 generate, except they know means to live (as it is almost everywhere at
 this day, except Tartary), there is no danger of inundations of people;
 but when there be great shoals of people, which go on to populate,
 without foreseeing means of life and sustentation, it is of necessity
 that once in an age or two, they discharge a portion of their people
 upon other nations; which the ancient northern people were wont to do
 by lot; casting lots what part should stay at home, and what should seek
 their fortunes. When a warlike state grows soft and effeminate, they may
 be sure of a war. For commonly such states are grown rich in the time
 of their degenerating; and so the prey inviteth, and their decay in
 valor, encourageth a war.
 
 As for the weapons, it hardly falleth under rule and observation: yet
 we see even they, have returns and vicissitudes. For certain it is, that
 ordnance was known in the city of the Oxidrakes in India; and was that,
 which the Macedonians called thunder and lightning, and magic. And it
 is well known that the use of ordnance, hath been in China above two
 thousand years. The conditions of weapons, and their improvement, are;
 First, the fetching afar off; for that outruns the danger; as it is
 seen in ordnance and muskets. Secondly, the strength of the percussion;
 wherein likewise ordnance do exceed all arietations and ancient
 inventions. The third is, the commodious use of them; as that they may
 serve in all weathers; that the carriage may be light and manageable;
 and the like.
 
 For the conduct of the war: at the first, men rested extremely upon
 number: they did put the wars likewise upon main force and valor;
 pointing days for pitched fields, and so trying it out upon an even
 match and they were more ignorant in ranging and arraying their battles.
 After, they grew to rest upon number rather competent, than vast; they
 grew to advantages of place, cunning diversions, and the like: and they
 grew more skilful in the ordering of their battles.
 
 In the youth of a state, arms do flourish; in the middle age of a state,
 learning; and then both of them together for a time; in the declining
 age of a state, mechanical arts and merchandize. Learning hath his
 infancy, when it is but beginning and almost childish; then his youth,
 when it is luxuriant and juvenile; then his strength of years, when it
 is solid and reduced; and lastly, his old age, when it waxeth dry and
 exhaust. But it is not good to look too long upon these turning wheels
 of vicissitude, lest we become giddy. As for the philology of them, that
 is but a circle of tales, and therefore not fit for this writing.
 
 
 
 
 Of Fame
 
 
 THE poets make Fame a monster. They describe her in part finely and
 elegantly, and in part gravely and sententiously. They say, look how
 many feathers she hath, so many eyes she hath underneath; so many
 tongues; so many voices; she pricks up so many ears.
 
 This is a flourish. There follow excellent parables; as that, she
 gathereth strength in going; that she goeth upon the ground, and yet
 hideth her head in the clouds; that in the daytime she sitteth in a
 watch tower, and flieth most by night; that she mingleth things done,
 with things not done; and that she is a terror to great cities. But that
 which passeth all the rest is: They do recount that the Earth, mother
 of the giants that made war against Jupiter, and were by him destroyed,
 thereupon in an anger brought forth Fame. For certain it is, that
 rebels, figured by the giants, and seditious fames and libels, are but
 brothers and sisters, masculine and feminine. But now, if a man can tame
 this monster, and bring her to feed at the hand, and govern her, and
 with her fly other ravening fowl and kill them, it is somewhat worth.
 But we are infected with the style of the poets. To speak now in a sad
 and serious manner: There is not, in all the politics, a place less
 handled and more worthy to be handled, than this of fame. We will
 therefore speak of these points: What are false fames; and what are true
 fames; and how they may be best discerned; how fames may be sown, and
 raised; how they may be spread, and multiplied; and how they may be
 checked, and laid dead. And other things concerning the nature of fame.
 Fame is of that force, as there is scarcely any great action, wherein it
 hath not a great part; especially in the war. Mucianus undid Vitellius,
 by a fame that he scattered, that Vitellius had in purpose to remove the
 legions of Syria into Germany, and the legions of Germany into Syria;
 whereupon the legions of Syria were infinitely inflamed. Julius Caesar
 took Pompey unprovided, and laid asleep his industry and preparations,
 by a fame that he cunningly gave out: Caesar's own soldiers loved him
 not, and being wearied with the wars, and laden with the spoils of Gaul,
 would forsake him, as soon as he came into Italy. Livia settled all
 things for the succession of her son Tiberius, by continual giving out,
 that her husband Augustus was upon recovery and amendment, and it is an
 usual thing with the pashas, to conceal the death of the Great Turk from
 the janizaries and men of war, to save the sacking of Constantinople
 and other towns, as their manner is. Themistocles made Xerxes, king of
 Persia, post apace out of Grecia, by giving out, that the Grecians had
 a purpose to break his bridge of ships, which he had made athwart
 Hellespont. There be a thousand such like examples; and the more they
 are, the less they need to be repeated; because a man meeteth with them
 everywhere. Therefore let all wise governors have as great a watch and
 care over fames, as they have of the actions and designs themselves.
 
 
 [This essay was not finished]
 
 
 
 
 A Glossary Of Archaic Words And Phrases
 
 
      Abridgment: miniature
      Absurd: stupid, unpolished
      Abuse: cheat, deceive
      Aculeate: stinging
      Adamant: loadstone
      Adust: scorched
      Advoutress: adulteress
      Affect: like, desire
      Antic: clown
      Appose: question
      Arietation: battering-ram
      Audit: revenue
      Avoidance: secret outlet
      Battle: battalion
      Bestow: settle in life
      Blanch: flatter, evade
      Brave: boastful
      Bravery: boast, ostentation
      Broke: deal in brokerage
      Broken: shine by comparison
      Broken music: part music
      Cabinet: secret
      Calendar: weather forecast
      Card: chart, map
      Care not to: are reckless
      Cast: plan
      Cat: cate, cake
      Charge and adventure: cost and
      risk
      Check with: interfere
      Chop: bandy words
      Civil: peaceful
      Close: secret, secretive
      Collect: infer
      Compound: compromise
      Consent: agreement
      Curious: elaborate
      Custom: import duties
      Deceive: rob
      Derive: divert
      Difficileness: moroseness
      Discover: reveal
      Donative: money gift
      Doubt: fear
      Equipollent: equally powerful
      Espial: spy
      Estate: state
      Facility: of easy persuasion
      Fair: rather
      Fame: rumor
      Favor: feature
      Flashy: insipid
      Foot-pace: lobby
      Foreseen: guarded against
      Froward: stubborn
      Futile: babbling
      Globe: complete body
      Glorious: showy, boastful
      Humorous: capricious
      Hundred poll: hundredth head
      Impertinent: irrelevant
      Implicit: entangled
      In a mean: in moderation
      In smother: suppressed
      Indifferent: impartial
      Intend: attend to
      Knap: knoll
      Leese: lose
      Let: hinder
      Loose: shot
      Lot: spell
      Lurch: intercept
      Make: profit, get
      Manage: train
      Mate: conquer
      Material: business-like
      Mere-stone: boundary stone
      Muniting: fortifying
      Nerve: sinew
      Obnoxious: subservient, liable
      Oes: round spangles
      Pair: impair
      Pardon: allowance
      Passable: mediocre
      Pine-apple-tree: pine
      Plantation: colony
      Platform: plan
      Plausible: praiseworthy
      Point device: excessively precise
      Politic: politician
      Poll: extort
      Poser: examiner
      Practice: plotting
      Preoccupate: anticipate
      Prest: prepared
      Prick: plant
      Proper: personal
      Prospective: stereoscope
      Proyne: prune
      Purprise: enclosure
      Push: pimple
      Quarrel: pretext
      Quech: flinch
      Reason: principle
      Recamera: retiring-room
      Return: reaction
      Return: wing running back
      Rise: dignity
      Round: straight
      Save: account for
      Scantling: measure
      Seel: blind
      Shrewd: mischievous
      Sort: associate
      Spial: spy
      Staddle: sapling
      Steal: do secretly
      Stirp: family
      Stond: stop, stand
      Stoved: hot-housed
      Style: title
      Success: outcome
      Sumptuary law: law against
      extravagance
      Superior globe: the heavens
      Temper: proportion
      Tendering: nursing
      Tract: line, trait
      Travel: travail, labor
      Treaties: treatises
      Trench to: touch
      Trivial: common
      Turquet: Turkish dwarf
      Under foot: below value
      Unready: untrained
      Usury: interest
      Value: certify
      Virtuous: able
      Votary: vowed
      Wanton: spoiled
      Wood: maze
      Work: manage, utilize
 
 
 
 
 
 
